Economic Manuscripts: Capital

Engels' Edition of the Third Volume of Capital and Marx's Original
Manuscript by Michael Heinrich

Works of Karl Marx



  CAPITAL A CRITIQUE OF POLITICAL ECONOMY


  Book Three: The Process of Capitalist Production as a Whole

  ------------------------------------------------------------------------

  Written: Karl Marx, 1863-1883, edited by Friedrick Engels and
  completed by him 11 years after Marx's death;
  Source: Institute of Marxism-Leninism, USSR, 1959;
  Publisher: International Publishers, NY, [n.d.]
  First Published: 1894;
  On-Line Version: Marx.org 1996, Marxists.org 1999;
  Transcribed: in 1996 by Hinrich Kuhls, Dave Walters and Zodiac, and by
  Tim Delaney and M. Griffin in 1999;
  HTML Markup: Zodiac 1996, Tim Delaney and M. Griffin in 1999;
  Proofed and Corrected: by Chris Clayton 2006-7, Mark Harris 2010;
  eBook prepared: by J Eduardo Brissos 2011.

  PDF version.

  ------------------------------------------------------------------------


  Table of Contents

  Preface

  Part I
  The Conversion of Surplus-Value into Profit and of
  the Rate of Surplus-Value into the Rate of Profit

  Part II
  Conversion of Profit into Average Profit

  Part III
  The Law of the Tendency of the Rate of Profit to Fall

  Part IV
  Conversion of Commodity-Capital and Money-Capital into Commercial
  Capital and Money-Dealing Capital (Merchant's Capital)

  Part V
  Division of Profit into Interest and Profit of Enterprise.
  Interest-Bearing Capital.

  Part VI
  Transformation of Surplus-Profit into Ground-Rent

  Part VII
  Revenues and their Sources

  Frederick Engels.
  Supplement to Capital, Volume Three

  A) Introduction
  B) The Law of Value and Rate of Profit
  C) The Stock Exchange

   Engels' Edition of the Third Volume of Capital and Marx's Original
  Manuscript, Michael Heinrich

   Study Guide

  ------------------------------------------------------------------------


Capital Vol. III



PREFACE


 

At last I have the privilege of making public this third book of Marx’s
main work, the conclusion of the theoretical part. When I published the
second volume, in 1885, I thought that except for a few, certainly very
important, sections the third volume would probably offer only technical
difficulties. This was indeed the case. But I had no idea at the time
that these sections, the most important parts of the entire work, would
give me as much trouble as they did, just as I did not anticipate the
other obstacles, which were to retard completion of the work to such an
extent.

Next and most important of all, it was my eye weakness which for years
restricted my writing time to a minimum, and which, even now, permits me
to write by artificial light only in exceptional cases. Furthermore,
there were other pressing labours which could not be turned down, such
as new editions and translations of Marx’s and my own earlier works,
hence reviews, prefaces, and supplements, often impossible without fresh
study, etc. Above all, there was the English edition of the first volume
of this work, for whose text I am ultimately responsible and which
consequently consumed much of my time. Whoever has in any way followed
the colossal growth of international socialist literature during the
last ten years, particularly the great number of translations of Marx’s
and my own earlier works, will agree with me that I have been lucky that
the number of languages in which I could be of help to the translators,
and therefore could not refuse in all conscience to review their work,
is very limited. But the growth of literature was merely indicative of a
corresponding growth of the international working-class movement itself.
And this imposed new obligations upon me. From the first days of our
public activity it was Marx and I who shouldered the main burden of the
work as go-betweens for the national movements of Socialists and workers
in the various countries. This work expanded in proportion to the
expansion of the movement as a whole. Up to the time of his death, Marx
had borne the brunt of the burden in this as well. But after his death
the ever-increasing bulk of work had to be done by myself alone. Since
then it has become the rule for the various national workers’ parties to
establish direct contacts, and this is fortunately ever more the case.
Yet requests for my assistance are still far more frequent than I would
wish in view of my theoretical work. But if a man has been active in the
movement for more than fifty years, as I have been, he regards the work
connected with it as a bounden duty that brooks no delay. In our
eventful time, just as in the 16th century, pure theorists on social
affairs are found only on the side of reaction and for this reason they
are not even theorists in the full sense of the word, but simply
apologists of reaction.

In view of the fact that I live in London my party contacts are limited
to correspondence in winter, while in summer they are largely personal.
This fact, and the necessity of following the movement in a steadily
growing number of countries and a still more rapidly growing number of
press organs, have compelled me to reserve matters which permit no
interruption for completion during the winter months, and primarily the
first three months of the year. When a man is past seventy his Meynert’s
association fibres of the brain function with annoying prudence. He no
longer surmounts interruptions in difficult theoretical problems as
easily and quickly as before. It came about therefore that the work of
one winter, if it was not completed, had to be largely begun anew the
following winter. This was the case with the most difficult fifth part.

As the reader will observe from the following, the work of editing the
third volume was essentially different from that of editing the second.
In the case of the third volume there was nothing to go by outside a
first extremely incomplete draft. The beginnings of the various parts
were, as a rule, pretty carefully done and even stylistically polished.
But the farther one went, the more sketchy and incomplete was the
manuscript, the more excursions it contained into arising side-issues
whose proper place in the argument was left for later decision, and the
longer and more complex the sentences, in which thoughts were recorded
in _statu nascendi._ In some places handwriting and presentation
betrayed all too clearly the outbreak and gradual progress of the
attacks of ill health, caused by overwork, which at the outset rendered
the author’s work increasingly difficult and finally compelled him
periodically to stop work altogether. And no wonder. Between 1863 and
1867, Marx not only completed the first draft of the two last volumes of
_Capital_ and prepared the first volume for the printer, but also
performed the enormous work connected with the founding and expansion of
the International Workingmen’s Association. As a result, already in 1864
and 1865 ominous signs of ill health appeared which prevented Marx from
personally putting the finishing touches to the second and third
volumes.

I began my work by dictating into readable copy the entire manuscript,
which was often hard to decipher even for me. This alone required
considerable time. It was only then that I could start on the actual
editing. I limited this to the essential. I tried my best to preserve
the character of the first draft wherever it was sufficiently clear. I
did not even eliminate repetitions, wherever they, as was Marx’s custom,
viewed the subject from another standpoint or at least expressed the
same thought in different words. Wherever my alterations or additions
exceeded the bounds of editing, or where I had to apply Marx’s factual
material to independent conclusions of my own, if even as faithful as
possible to the spirit of Marx, I have enclosed the entire passage in
brackets and affixed my initials. Some of my footnotes are not enclosed
in brackets; but wherever I have initialled them I am responsible for
the entire note.

As is only to be expected in a first draft, there are numerous allusions
in the manuscript to points which were to have been expanded upon later,
without these promises always having been kept. I have left them,
because they reveal the author’s intentions relative to future
elaboration.

Now as to details.

As regards the first part, the main manuscript was serviceable only with
substantial limitations. The entire mathematical calculation of the
relation between the rate of surplus-value and the rate of profit (which
makes up our Chapter III) is introduced in the very beginning, while the
subject treated in our Chapter I is considered later and as the occasion
arises. Two attempts at revising, each of them eight pages _in folio,_
were useful here. But even these did not possess the desired continuity
throughout. They furnished the substance for what is now Chapter I.
Chapter II is taken from the main manuscript. There was a series of
uncompleted mathematical calculations for Chapter III, as well as a
whole, almost complete, note-book dating from the seventies, which
presents the relation of the rate of surplus-value to the rate of profit
in the form of equations. My friend Samuel Moore, who has also
translated the greater portion of the first volume into English,
undertook to edit this notebook for me, a work for which he was far
better equipped, being an old Cambridge mathematician. It was from his
summary, with occasional use of the main manuscript, that I then
compiled Chapter III. Nothing but the title was available for Chapter
IV. But since its subject-matter, the influence of turnover on the rate
of profit, is of vital importance, I have written it myself, for which
reason the whole chapter has been placed in brackets. It developed in
the course of this work that the formula for the rate of profit given in
Chapter III required modification to be generally valid. Beginning with
Chapter V, the main manuscript is the sole source for the remainder of
the part, although many transpositions and supplements were also
essential.

As for the following three parts, aside from stylistic editing I was
able to follow the original manuscript almost throughout. A few passages
dealing mostly with the influence of turnover had to be brought into
agreement with Chapter IV, which I had inserted, and are likewise placed
in brackets and followed by my initials.

The greatest difficulty was presented by Part V which dealt with the
most complicated subject in the entire volume. And it was just at this
point that Marx was overtaken by one of the above-mentioned serious
attacks of illness. Here, then, was no finished draft, not even a scheme
whose outlines might have been filled out, but only the beginning of an
elaboration — often just a disorderly mass of notes, comments and
extracts. I tried at first to complete this part, as I had done to a
certain extent with the first one, by filling in the gaps and expanding
upon passages that were only indicated, so that it would at least
approximately contain everything the author had intended. I tried this
no less than three times, but failed in every attempt, and the time lost
in this is one of the chief causes that held up this volume. At last I
realised that I was on the wrong track. I should have had to go through
the entire voluminous literature in this field, and would in the end
have produced something that would nevertheless not have been a book by
Marx. I had no other choice but to more or less cut the Gordian knot by
confining myself to as orderly an arrangement of available matter as
possible, and to making only the most indispensable additions. And so it
was that I succeeded in completing the principal labours for this part
in the spring of 1893.

As for the various chapters, Chapters XXI to XXIV were, in the main,
complete. Chapters XXV and XXVI required a sifting of the references and
an interpolation of material found elsewhere. Chapters XXVII and XXIX
could be taken almost completely from the original manuscript, but
Chapter XXVIII had to be re-arranged in places. The real difficulty,
however, began with Chapter XXX. From here on it was not only a matter
of properly arranging the references, but of putting the train of
thought into proper order, interrupted as it was at every point by
intervening clauses and deviations, etc., and resumed elsewhere, often
just casually. Thus, Chapter XXX was put together by means of
transpositions and excisions which were utilised, however, in other
places. Chapter XXXI, again, possessed greater continuity. But then
follows a long section in the manuscript, entitled "The Confusion",
containing nothing but extracts from parliamentary reports on the crises
of 1848 and 1857, in which are compiled statements of twenty-three
businessmen and economists, largely on money and capital, gold drain,
over-speculation, etc., and supplied here and there with short facetious
comments. Practically all the then current views concerning the relation
of money to capital are represented therein, either in the answers or in
the questions, and it was the "confusion" revealed in identifying money
and capital in the money-market that Marx meant to treat with criticism
and sarcasm. After many attempts I convinced myself that this chapter
could not be put into shape. Its material, particularly that supplied
with Marx’s comments, was used wherever I found an opportune place for
it.

Next, in tolerable order, comes what I placed in Chapter XXXII. But this
is immediately followed by a new batch of extracts from parliamentary
reports on every conceivable thing pertinent to this part, intermingled
with the author’s comments. Toward the end these extracts and comments
are focussed more and more on the movement of monetary metals and on
exchange rates, and close with all kinds of miscellaneous remarks. On
the other hand, the "Precapitalist" chapter (Chap. XXXVI) was quite
complete.

Of all this material beginning with the "Confusion", save that which had
been previously inserted, I made up Chapters XXXIII to XXXV. This could
not, of course, be done without considerable interpolations on my part
for the sake of continuity. Unless they are merely formal in nature, the
interpolations are expressly indicated as belonging to me. In this way I
have finally succeeded in working into the text all the author’s
relevant statements. Nothing has been left out but a small portion of
the extracts, which either repeated what had already been said, or
touched on points which the manuscript did not treat any further.

The part on ground-rent was much more fully treated, although by no
means properly arranged, if only for the fact that Marx found it
necessary to recapitulate the plan of the entire part in Chapter XLIII
(the last portion of the part on rent in the manuscript). This was all
the more desirable, since the manuscript opens with Chapter XXXVII,
followed by Chapters XLV to XLVII, and only thereafter Chapters XXXVIII
to XLIV. The titles for the differential rent II involved the greatest
amount of work and so did the discovery that the third case of this
class of rent had not at all been analysed in Chapter XLIII, where it
belonged.

In the seventies Marx engaged in entirely new special studies for this
part on ground-rent. For years he had studied the Russian originals of
statistical reports inevitable after the "reform" of 1861 in Russia and
other publications on landownership, had taken extracts from these
originals, placed at his disposal in admirably complete form by his
Russian friends, and had intended to use them for a new version of this
part. Owing to the variety of forms both of landownership and of
exploitation of agricultural producers in Russia, this country was to
play the same role in the part dealing with ground-rent that England
played in Book I in connection with industrial wage-labour. He was
unfortunately denied the opportunity of carrying out this plan.

Lastly, the seventh part was available complete, but only as a first
draft, whose endlessly involved periods had first to be dissected to be
made printable. There exists only the beginning of the final chapter. It
was to treat of the three major classes of developed capitalist society
— the landowners, capitalists and wage-labourers — corresponding to the
three great forms of revenue, ground-rent, profit and wages, and the
class struggle, an inevitable concomitant of their existence, as the
actual consequence of the capitalist period. Marx used to leave such
concluding summaries until the final editing, just before going to
press, when the latest historical developments furnished him with
unfailing regularity with proofs of the most laudable timeliness for his
theoretical propositions.

Citations and proofs illustrating his statements are, as in the second
volume, considerably less numerous than in the first. Quotations from
Book I refer to pages in the 2nd and 3rd editions. Wherever the
manuscript refers to theoretical statements of earlier economists, the
name alone is given as a rule, and the quotations were to be added
during the final editing. Of course, I had to leave this as it was.
There are only four parliamentary reports, but these are abundantly
used. They are the following:

1) Reports from Committees (of the Lower House), Volume VIII, Commercial
Distress, Volume II, Part I. 1847-48. Minutes of Evidence. — Quoted as
Commercial Distress 1847-48.

2) Secret Committee of the House of Lords on Commercial Distress 1847.
Report printed in 1848. Evidence printed in 1857 (because considered too
compromising in 1848). — Quoted as C. D. 1848/57.

3) Report: Bank Acts, 1857. — Ditto, 1858. — Reports of the Committee of
the Lower House on the Effect of the Bank Acts of 1844 and 1845. With
evidence. — Quoted as: B. A. (also as B. C.) 1857 or 1858.

I am going to start on the fourth volume-the history of the theory of
surplus-value — as soon as it is in any way possible.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

In the preface to the second volume of _Capital_ I had to square
accounts with the gentlemen who raised a hue and cry at the time because
they fancied to have discovered "in Rodbertus the secret source and
superior predecessor of Marx". I offered them an opportunity to show
"what the economics of a Rodbertus can accomplish"; I defied them to
show "in which way an equal average rate of profit can and must come
about, not only without a violation of the law of value, but on the very
basis of it". These same gentlemen who for either subjective or
objective, but as a rule anything but scientific reasons were then
lionising the brave Rodbertus as an economic star of the first
magnitude, have without exception failed to furnish an answer. However,
other people have thought it worth their while to occupy themselves with
the problem.

In his critique of the second volume (_Conrads Jahrbücher,_ XI, 1885, S.
452-65), Professor Lexis took up the question, although he did not care
to offer a direct solution. He says:

"The solution of the contradiction" (between the Ricardo-Marxian law of
value and an equal average rate of profit) "is impossible if the various
classes of commodities are considered _individually_ and if their value
is to be equal to their exchange-value, and the latter equal or
proportional to their price."

According to him, the solution is only possible if

"we cease measuring the value of individual commodities according to
labour, and consider only the production of commodities _as a whole_ and
their distribution among the aggregate classes of capitalists and
workers.... The working class receives but a certain portion of the
total product,... the other portion, which falls to the share of the
capitalist _class,_ represents the surplus-product in the Marxian sense,
and accordingly ... the surplus-value. Then the members of the
capitalist class divide this total surplus-value among themselves _not_
in accordance with the number of workers employed by them, but in
proportion to the capital invested by each, the land also being
accounted for as capital-value."

The Marxian ideal values determined by units of labour incorporated in
the commodities do not correspond to prices but may be

"regarded as points of departure of a shift which leads to the actual
prices. The latter depend on the fact that equal sums of capital demand
equal profits."

For this reason some capitalists will secure prices higher than the
ideal values for their commodities, and others will secure lower prices.

"But since the losses and gains of surplus-value balance one another
within the capitalist class, the total amount of the surplus-value is
the same as it would be if all prices were proportional to the ideal
values."

It is evident that the problem has not in any way been solved here, but
has, though somewhat loosely and shallowly, been on the whole correctly
_formulated._ And this is, indeed, more than we could have expected from
a man who, like the above author, takes a certain pride in being a
"vulgar economist". It is really surprising when compared with the
handiwork of other vulgar economists, which we shall later discuss.
Lexis’s vulgar economy is, anyhow, in a class of its own. He says that
capital gains _might,_ at any rate, be derived in the way indicated by
Marx, but that nothing _compels_ one to accept this view. On the
contrary. Vulgar economy, he says, has at least a more plausible
explanation, namely:

"The capitalist sellers, such as the producer of raw materials, the
manufacturer, the wholesale dealer, and the retail dealer, all make a
gain on their transactions by selling at a price higher than the
purchase price, thus adding a certain percentage to the price they
themselves pay for the commodity. The worker alone is unable to obtain a
similar additional value for his commodity; he is compelled by reason of
his unfavourable condition vis-à-vis the capitalist to sell his labour
at the price it costs him, that is to say, for the essential means of
his subsistence.... Thus, these additions to prices retain their full
impact with regard to the buying worker, and cause the transfer of a
part of the value of the total product to the capitalist class."

One need not strain his thinking powers to see that this explanation for
the profits of capital, as advanced by "vulgar economy," amounts in
practice to the same thing as the Marxian theory of surplus-value; that
the workers are in just the same "unfavourable condition" according to
Lexis as according to Marx; that they are just as much the victims of
swindle because every non-worker can sell commodities above price, while
the worker cannot do so; and that it is just as easy to build up an at
least equally plausible vulgar socialism on the basis of this theory, as
that built in England on the foundation of Jevons’s and Menger’s theory
of use-value and marginal utility. I even suspect that if Mr. George
Bernard Shaw had been familiar with this theory of profit, he would have
likely fallen to with both hands, discarding Jevons and Karl Menger, to
build anew the Fabian church of the future upon this rock.

In reality, however, this theory is merely a paraphrase of the Marxian.
What defrays all the price additions? It is the workers’ "total
product". And this is due to the fact that the commodity "labour", or,
as Marx has it, labour-power, has to be sold below its price. For if it
is a common property of all commodities to be sold at a price higher
than their cost of production, with labour being the sole exception
since it is always sold at the cost of production, then labour is simply
sold below the price that rules in this world of vulgar economy. Hence
the resultant extra profit accruing to the capitalist, or capitalist
class, arises, and can only arise, in the last analysis, from the fact
that the worker, after reproducing the equivalent for the price of his
labour-power, must produce an additional product for which he is not
paid — i.e., a surplus-product, a product of unpaid labour, or
surplus-value. Lexis is an extremely cautious man in the choice of his
terms. He does not say anywhere outright that the above is his own
conception. But if it is, it is plain as day that we are not dealing
with one of those ordinary vulgar economists, of whom he says himself
that every one of them is "at best only a hopeless idiot" in Marx’s
eyes, but with a Marxist disguised as a vulgar economist. Whether this
disguise has occurred consciously or unconsciously is a psychological
question which does not interest us at this point. Whoever would care to
investigate this, might also probe how a man as shrewd as Lexis
undoubtedly is, could at one time defend such nonsense as bimetallism.

The first to really attempt an answer to the question was Dr. _Conrad
Schmidt_ in his pamphlet entitled _Die Durchschnittsprofitrate auf
Grundlage des Marx’schen Werthgesetzes,_ Stuttgart, Dietz, 1889. Schmidt
seeks to reconcile the details of the formation of market-prices with
both the law of value and with the average rate of profit. The
industrial capitalist receives in his product, first, an equivalent of
the capital he has advanced, and, second, a surplus-product for which he
has paid nothing. But to obtain a surplus-product he must advance
capital to production. That is, he must apply a certain quantity of
materialised labour to be able to appropriate this surplus-product. For
the capitalist, therefore, the capital he advances represents the
quantity of materialised labour socially necessary for him to obtain
this surplus-product. This applies to every industrial capitalist. Now,
since commodities are mutually exchanged, according to the law of value,
in proportion to the labour socially necessary for their production and
since, as far as the capitalist is concerned, the labour necessary for
the manufacture of the surplus-product happens to be past labour
accumulated in his capital, it follows that surplus-products are
exchanged in proportion to the sums of capital required for their
production, and not in proportion to the labour _actually_ incorporated
in them. Hence the share of each unit of capital is equal to the sum of
all produced surplus-values divided by the sum of the capitals expended
in production. Accordingly, equal sums of capital yield equal profits in
equal time spans, and this is accomplished by adding the cost-price of
the surplus-product so calculated, i.e., the average profit, to the
cost-price of the paid product and by selling both the paid and unpaid
product at this increased price. The average rate of profit takes shape
in spite of average commodity-prices being determined, as Schmidt holds,
by the law of value.

The construction is extremely ingenious. It is completely patterned
after the Hegelian model, but like the majority of Hegelian
constructions it is not correct. Surplus-product or paid product, makes
no difference. If the law of value is also to be _directly_ valid for
the average prices, both of them must be sold at prices proportionate to
the socially necessary labour required and expended in producing them.
The law of value is aimed from the first against the idea derived from
the capitalist mode of thought that accumulated labour of the past,
which comprises capital, is not merely a certain sum of finished value,
but that, because a factor in production and the formation of profit, it
also produces value and is hence a source of more value than it has
itself; it establishes that living labour alone possesses this faculty.
It is well known that capitalists expect equal profits proportionate to
their capitals and regard their advances of capital as a sort of
cost-price of their profits. But if Schmidt utilises this conception as
a means of reconciling prices based on the average rate of profit with
the law of value, he repudiates the law of value itself by attributing
to it as one of its co-determinative factors a conception with which the
law is wholly at variance.

Either accumulated labour creates value the same as living labour. In
that case the law of value does not apply.

Or, it does not create value. In that case Schmidt’s demonstration is
incompatible with the law of value.

Schmidt strayed into this bypath when quite close to the solution,
because he believed that he needed nothing short of a mathematical
formula to demonstrate the conformance of the average price of every
individual commodity with the law of value. But while on the wrong track
in this instance, in the immediate proximity of the goal, the rest of
his booklet is evidence of the understanding with which he drew further
conclusions from the first two volumes of _Capital._ His is the honour
of independently finding the correct explanation developed by Marx in
the third part of the third volume for the hitherto inexplicable sinking
tendency of the rate of profit, and, similarly, of explaining the
derivation of commercial profit out of industrial surplus-value, and of
making a great number of observations concerning interest and
ground-rent, in which he anticipates ideas developed by Marx in the
fourth and fifth parts of the third volume.

In a subsequent article (_Neue Zeit,_ 1892-93, Nos. 3 and 4), Schmidt
takes a different tack in his effort to solve the problem. He contends
that it is competition which produces the average rate of profit by
causing the transfer of capital from branches of production with
under-average profit to branches with above-average profit. It is not a
revelation that competition is the great equaliser of profits. But now
Schmidt tries to prove that this levelling of profits is identical with
a reduction of the selling price of commodities in excess supply to a
magnitude of value which society can pay for them according to the law
of value. Marx’s analyses in the book itself are ample evidence why this
way, too, could not lead to the goal.

After Schmidt _P. Fireman_ tackled the problem (_Conrads Jahrbücher,_
dritte Folge, III, S. 793). I shall not go into his remarks on other
aspects of the Marxian analysis. They rest upon the false assumption
that Marx wishes to define where he only investigates, and that in
general one might expect fixed, cut-to-measure, once and for all
applicable definitions in Marx’s works. It is self-evident that where
things and their interrelations are conceived, not as fixed, but as
changing, their mental images, the ideas, are likewise subject to change
and transformation; and they are not encapsulated in rigid definitions,
but are developed in their historical or logical process of formation.
This makes clear, of course, why in the beginning of his first book Marx
proceeds from the simple production of commodities as the historical
premise, ultimately to arrive from this basis to capital — why he
proceeds from the simple commodity instead of a logically and
historically secondary form — from an already capitalistically modified
commodity. To be sure, Fireman positively fails to see this. These and
other side-issues, which could give rise to still other diverse
objections, are better left by the wayside, while we go on forthwith to
the gist of the matter. While theory teaches Fireman that at a given
rate of surplus-value the latter is proportional to the labour-power
employed, he learns from experience that at a given average rate of
profit, profit is proportional to the total capital employed. He
explains this by saying that profit is merely a conventional phenomenon
(which means in his language that it belongs to a definite social
formation with which it stands and falls). Its existence is simply tied
up with capital. The latter, provided it is strong enough to secure a
profit for itself, is compelled by competition also to secure for itself
a rate of profit equal for all sums of capital. Capitalist production is
simply impossible without an equal rate of profit. Given this mode of
production, the quantity of profit for the individual capitalist can, at
a certain rate of profit, depend only on the magnitude of his capital.
On the other hand, profit consists of surplus-value, of unpaid labour.
But how is surplus-value, whose magnitude hinges upon the degree of
labour exploitation, transformed into profit, whose magnitude depends
upon the amount of the capital employed?

"Simply by selling commodities above their value in all branches of
production in which the ratio between ... constant and variable capital
is greatest; but this also implies that commodities are sold below their
value in those branches of production in which the ratio between
constant and variable capital = c:v is smallest, and that commodities
are sold at their true value only in branches in which the ratio of c:v
represents a certain mean figure.... Is this discrepancy between
individual prices and their respective values a refutation of the value
principle? By no means. For since the prices of some commodities rise
above their value as much as the prices of others fall below it, the
total sum of prices remains equal to the total sum of values ... in the
end this incongruity disappears." This incongruity is a "disturbance";
"however, in the exact sciences it is not customary to regard a
predictable disturbance as a refutation of a law".

On comparing the relevant passages in Chapter IX with the above, it will
be seen that Fireman has indeed placed his finger on the salient point.
But the undeservedly cool reception of his able article shows how many
interconnecting links would still be needed even after this discovery to
enable Fireman to work out a full and comprehensive solution. Although
many were interested in this problem, they were all still fearful of
getting their fingers burnt. And this is explained not only by the
incomplete form in which Fireman left his discovery, but also by the
undeniable faultiness of both his conception of the Marxian analysis and
of his own general critique of the latter, based as it was on his
misconception.

Whenever there is a chance of making a fool of himself over some
difficult matter, Herr Professor Julius _Wolf,_ of Zurich, never fails
to do so. He tells us (_Conrads Jahrbücher,_ 1891, dritte Folge, II, S.
352 and following) that the entire problem is resolved in relative
surplus-value. The production of relative surplus-value rests on the
increase of constant capital vis-à-vis variable capital.

"A plus in constant capital presupposes a plus in the productive power
of the labourers. Since this plus in productive power (by way of
lowering the worker’s cost of living) produces a plus in surplus-value,
a direct relation is established between the increasing surplus-value
and the increasing share of constant capital in total capital. A plus in
constant capital indicates a plus in the productive power of labour.
With variable capital remaining the same and constant capital
increasing, surplus-value must therefore, in accordance with Marx,
increase as well. This was the problem presented to us."

True, Marx says the very opposite in a hundred places in the first hook;
true, the assertion that, according to Marx, when variable capital
shrinks, relative surplus-value increases in proportion to the increase
in constant capital, is so astounding that it puts to shame all
parliamentary declamation; true, Herr Julius Wolf demonstrates in his
every line that he does not in the least understand, be it relatively or
absolutely, the concepts of relative or absolute surplus-value; to be
sure he says himself that

"at first glance one seems really to he in a nest of incongruities",

which, by the way, is the only true statement in his entire article. But
what does all that matter? Herr Julius Wolf is so proud of his brilliant
discovery that he cannot refrain from bestowing posthumous praise on
Marx for it and from extolling his own fathomless nonsense as a

"new proof of the keen and far-sighted way his" (Marx’s) "system of
criticism of capitalist economy is set forth".

But now comes the choicest bit of all. Herr Wolf says:

"Ricardo has likewise claimed that an equal investment of capital
yielded equal surplus-value (profit), just as the same expenditure of
labour created the same surplus-value (as regards its quantity). And the
question now was how the one agreed with the other. But Marx has refused
to accept this way of putting the problem. _He has proved beyond a doubt
(in the third volume)_ that the second statement was not necessarily a
consequence of the law of value, that it even contradicted his law of
value and should therefore be forthwith repudiated."

And thereupon Wolf probes who of us two, Marx or I, had made a mistake.
It does not occur to him, naturally, that it is he who is groping in the
dark.

I should offend my readers and fail to see the humour of the situation
if I were to waste a single word on this choice morsel. I shall only add
that his audacity in using the opportunity to report the ostensible
gossip among professors that Conrad Schmidt’s above-named work was
"directly inspired by Engels" matches the audacity with which he dared
to say at one time what "Marx has proved beyond a doubt in the third
volume." Herr Julius Wolf! It may be customary in the world in which you
live and strive for the man who publicly poses a problem to others to
acquaint his close friends on the sly with its solution. I am quite
prepared to believe that you are capable of this sort of thing. But that
a man need not stoop to such shabby tricks in my world is proved by the
present preface.

No sooner had Marx died than Mr. _Achille Loria_ hastened to publish an
article about him in the _Nuova Antologia_ (April 1883). To begin with,
a biography brimming with misinformation, followed by a critique of
public, political and literary work. He falsifies Marx’s materialist
conception of history and distorts it with an assurance that bespeaks a
great purpose. And this purpose was eventually carried out. In 1886, the
same Mr. Loria published a book, _La teoria economica della
constituzione politica,_ in which he announced to his astounded
contemporaries that Marx’s conception of history, so completely and
purposefully misrepresented by him in 1883, was his own discovery. To be
sure, the Marxian theory is reduced in this book to a rather Philistine
level, and the historical illustrations and proofs abound in blunders
which would never be tolerated in a fourth-form boy. But what does that
matter? The discovery that political conditions and events are
everywhere invariably explained by corresponding economic conditions
was, as is herewith demonstrated, not made by Marx in 1845, but by Mr.
Loria in 1886. At least he has happily convinced his countrymen of this,
and, after his book appeared in French, also some Frenchmen, and can now
pose in Italy as the author of a new epoch-making theory of history
until the Italian Socialists find time to strip the illustrious Loria of
his stolen peacock feathers.

But this is just a sample or Mr. Loria’s style. He assures us that all
Marx’s theories rest on _conscious_ sophistry (_un consaputo sofisma_);
that Marx did not stop at paralogisms even when _he knew them to be
paralogisms (sapendoli tali),_ etc. And after thus impressing the
necessary upon his readers with a series of similar contemptible
insinuations, so that they should regard Marx as an unprincipled upstart
_à la_ Loria who achieves his little effects by the same wretched humbug
as our professor from Padua, he reveals an important secret to them, and
thereby takes us back to the rate of profit.

Mr. Loria says: According to Marx, the amount of surplus-value (which
Mr. Loria here identifies with profit) produced in a capitalist
industrial establishment should depend on the variable capital employed
in it, since constant capital does not yield profit. But this is
contrary to fact. For in practice profit does not depend on variable,
but on total capital. And Marx himself recognises this (Book I, Chap.
XIII) and admits that on the surface facts appear to contradict his
theory. But how does he get around this contradiction? He refers his
readers to an as yet unpublished subsequent volume. Loria has already
told _his_ readers about this volume that he did not believe Marx had
ever entertained the thought of writing it, and now exclaims
triumphantly:

"I have not been wrong in contending that this second volume, which Marx
always flings at his adversaries without it ever appearing, might very
well have been a shrewd expedient applied by Marx whenever scientific
arguments failed him _(un ingegnoso spediente ideato dal Marx a
sostituzione degli argomenti scientifici)."_ And whosoever is not
convinced after this that Marx stands in the same class of scientific
swindlers as _l’illustre_ Loria, is past all redemption.

We have at least learned this much: According to Mr. Loria, the Marxian
theory of surplus-value is absolutely incompatible with the existence of
a general equal rate of profit. Then, there appeared the second volume
and therewith my public challenge precisely on this very point. If Mr.
Loria had been one of us diffident Germans, he would have experienced a
certain degree of embarrassment. But he is a cocky southerner, coming
from a hot climate, where, as he can testify, cool nerve is a natural
requirement. The question of the rate of profit has been publicly put.
Mr. Loria has publicly declared it insoluble. And for this very reason
he is now going to outdo himself by publicly solving it.

This miracle is accomplished in _Conrads Jahrbücher,_ neue Folge, Buch
XX, S. 272 and following, in an article dealing with Conrad Schmidt’s
already cited pamphlet. After Loria learned from Schmidt how commercial
profit was made, he suddenly saw daylight.

"Since determining value by means of labour-time is to the advantage of
those capitalists who invest a greater portion of their capital in
wages, the unproductive" (read commercial) "capital can derive a higher
interest" (read profit) "from these privileged capitalists and thus
bring about an equalisation between the individual industrial
capitalists... For instance, if each of the industrial capitalists A, B,
C uses 400 working-days and 0, 400, 200 constant capital respectively in
production, and if the wages for 400 working-days amount to 50
working-days, then each receives a surplus-value of 50 working-days, and
the rate of profit is 400% for the first, 33.3% for the second, and 20%
for the third capitalist. But if a fourth capitalist D accumulates an
unproductive capital of 300, which claims an interest" (profit) "equal
in value to 40 working-days from A, and an interest of 20 working-days
from B, then the rate of profit of capitalists A and B will sink to 20%,
just as that of C, while D with his capital of 300 receives profit of
60, or a rate of profit of 20%, the same as the other capitalists."

With such astonishing dexterity, _l’illustre_ Loria solves by sleight of
hand the question which he had declared insoluble ten years previously.
Unfortunately, he did not let us into the secret wherefrom the
"unproductive capital" obtained the power to squeeze out of the
industrialists their extra profit in excess of the average rate of
profit, and to retain it in its own pocket, just as the landowner
pockets the tenant’s surplus-profit as ground-rent. Indeed, according to
him it would be the merchants who would raise a tribute analogous to
ground-rent from the industrialists, and would thereby bring about an
average rate of profit. Commercial capital is indeed a very essential
factor in producing the general rate of profit, as nearly everybody
knows. But only a literary adventurer who in his heart sneezes at
political economy, can venture the assertion that it has the magic power
to absorb all surplus-value in excess of the general rate of profit even
before this general rate has taken shape, and to convert it into
ground-rent for itself without, moreover, even having need to do with
any real estate. No less astonishing is the assertion that commercial
capital manages to discover the particular industrialists, whose
surplus-value just covers the average rate of profit, and that it
considers it a privilege to mitigate the lot of these luckless victims
of the Marxian law of value to a certain extent by selling their
products gratis for them, without asking as much as a commission for it.
What a mountebank one must be to imagine that Marx had need to resort to
such miserable tricks!

But it is not until we compare him with his northern competitors, for
instance with Herr Julius Wolf, who was not born yesterday either, that
the illustrious Loria shines in his full glory. What a yelping pup Herr
Wolf appears even in his big volume on _Sozialismus und kapitalistische
Gesellschaftsordnung,_ alongside the Italian! How awkward, I am almost
tempted to say modest, he appears beside the rare confidence of the
_maestro_ who takes it for granted that Marx, neither more nor less than
other people, was as much a sophist, paralogist, humbug and mountebank
as Mr. Loria himself — that Marx took in the public with the promise of
rounding out his theory in a subsequent volume whenever he was in a
difficult position, knowing full well that he neither could nor ever
would write it. Boundless nerve coupled with a flair for slipping like
an eel through impossible situations, a heroic contempt for pummellings
received, hasty plagiarism of other people’s accomplishments,
importunate and fanfaronading advertising, spreading his fame by means
of a chorus of friends — who can equal him in all this?

Italy is the land of classicism. Ever since the great era when the dawn
of modern times rose there, it has produced magnificent characters of
unequalled classic perfection, from Dante to Garibaldi. But the period
of its degradation and foreign domination also bequeathed it classic
character-masks, among them two particularly clear-cut types, that of
Sganarelle and Dulcamara. The classic unity of both is embodied in our
_illustre_ Loria.

In conclusion I must take my readers across the Atlantic. Dr. (Med.)
_George C. Stiebeling,_ of New York, has also found a solution to the
problem, and a very simple one. So simple, indeed, that no one either
here, or there, took him seriously. This aroused his ire, and he
complained bitterly about the injustice of it in an endless stream of
pamphlets and newspaper articles appearing on both sides of the great
water. He was told in the _Neue Zeit_ that his entire solution rested on
a mathematical error. But this could scarcely disturb him. Marx had also
made mathematical errors, and was yet right in many things. Let us then
take a look at Dr. Stiebeling’s solution.

"I take two factories working with equal capitals for an equal length of
time, but with a different ratio of Constant and variable capitals. I
make the total capital (c + v) = y, and the difference in the ratio of
the constant and variable capital = x. For factory I, y = c + v, for
factory II, y = (c - x) + (v + x). Therefore the rate of surplus-value
for factory I = s/v, and for factory II = s/(v + x). Profit (p) is what
I call the total surplus-value (s) by which the total capital y, or c +
v, is augmented in the given time; thus p = s. Hence, the rate of profit
for factory I = p/y, or s/(c + v), and for factory II it is also p/y, or
s/ (c - x) + (v + x), i.e., it is also s/(c + v). The ... problem thus
resolves itself in such a way that, on the basis of the law of value,
with equal capital and equal time, but unequal quantities of living
labour, a change in the rate of surplus-value causes the equalisation of
an average rate of profit." (G. C. Stiebeling, _Das Werthgesetz und die
Profitrate,_ New York, John Heinrich.)

However pretty and revealing the above calculation may be, we are
compelled to ask Dr. Stiebeling _one_ question: How does he know that
the sum of surplus-value produced by factory I is exactly equal to the
sum of the surplus-value produced by factory II? He states explicitly
that c, v, y and x, that is, all the other factors in the calculation,
are the same for both factories, but makes no mention of s. It does not
by any means follow from the fact that he designated both of the
above-mentioned quantities of surplus-value algebraically with s.
Rather, it is just the thing that has to be proved, since Mr. Stiebeling
without further ado also identifies profit p with the surplus-value. Now
there are just two possible alternatives. Either the two s’s are equal,
both factories produce equal quantities of surplus-value, and therefore
also equal quantities of profit, since both capitals are equal. In that
case Mr. Stiebeling has from the start taken for granted what he was
really called upon to prove. Or, one factory produces more surplus-value
than the other, in which case his entire calculation tumbles about his
ears.

Mr. Stiebeling spared neither pains nor money to build mountains of
calculations upon this mathematical error, and to exhibit them to the
public. I can assure him, for his own peace of mind, that they are
nearly all equally wrong, and that in the exceptional cases when this is
not so, they prove something entirely different from what he set out to
prove. He proves, for instance, by comparing U.S. census figures for
1870 and 1880 that the rate of profit has actually fallen, but
interprets it wrongly and assumes that Marx’s theory of a constantly
stable rate of profit should be corrected on the basis of experience.
Yet it follows from the third part of the present third book that this
Marxian "stable rate of profit" is purely a figment of Mr. Stiebeling’s
imagination, and that the tendency for the rate of profit to fall is due
to circumstances which are just the reverse of those indicated by Dr.
Stiebeling. No doubt Dr. Stiebeling has the best intentions, but when a
man wants to deal with scientific questions he should above all learn to
read the works he wishes to use just as the author had written them, and
above all without reading anything into them that they do not contain.

The outcome of the entire investigation shows again with reference to
this question as well that it is the Marxian school alone which has
accomplished something. If Fireman and Conrad Schmidt read this third
book, each one, for his part, may well be satisfied with his own work.

London, October 4, 1894

Frederick Engels

------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III



PART I. THE CONVERSION OF SURPLUS-VALUE INTO PROFIT AND OF THE RATE OF SURPLUS-VALUE INTO THE RATE OF PROFIT


 


Chapter 1. Cost-Price and profit

 

In Book I we analysed the phenomena which constitute the _process of
capitalist production_ as such, as the immediate productive process,
with no regard for any of the secondary effects of outside influences.
But this immediate process of production does not exhaust the life span
of capital. It is supplemented in the actual world by the _process of
circulation_, which was the object of study in Book II. In the latter,
namely in Part III, which treated the process of circulation as a medium
for the process of social reproduction, it developed that the capitalist
process of production taken as a whole represents a synthesis of the
processes of production and circulation. Considering what this third
book treats, it cannot confine itself to general reflection relative to
this synthesis. On the contrary, it must locate and describe the
concrete forms which grow out of the _movements of capital as a whole_.
In their actual movement capitals confront each other in such concrete
shape, for which the form of capital in the immediate process of
production, just as its form in the process of circulation, appear only
as special instances. The various forms of capital, as evolved in this
book, thus approach step by step the form which they assume on the
surface of society, in the action of different capitals upon one
another, in competition, and in the ordinary consciousness of the agents
of production themselves.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The value of every commodity produced in the capitalist way is
represented in the formula: C = c + v + s. If we subtract surplus-values
from this value of the product there remains a bare equivalent or a
substitute value in goods, for the capital-value c + v expended in the
elements of production.

For example, if the production of a certain article requires a capital
outlay of £500, of which £20 are for the wear and tear of instruments of
production, £380 for the materials of production, and £100 for
labour-power, and if the rate of surplus-value is 100%, then the value
of the product = 400_(c) + 100_(v) + 100_(s) = £600.

After deducting the surplus-value of £100, there remains a
commodity-value of £500 which only replaces the expended capital of
£500. This portion of the value of the commodity, which replaces the
price of the consumed means of production and labour-power, only
replaces what the commodity costs the capitalist himself. For him it,
therefore, represents the cost-price of the commodity.

What the commodity costs the capitalist and its actual production cost
are two quite different magnitudes. That portion of the commodity-value
making up the surplus-value does not cost the capitalist anything simply
because it costs the labourer unpaid labour. Yet, on the basis of
capitalist production, after the labourer enters the production process
he himself constitutes an ingredient of operating productive capital,
which belongs to the capitalist. Therefore, the capitalist is the actual
producer of the commodity. For this reason the cost-price of the
commodity necessarily appears to the capitalist as the actual cost of
the commodity. If we take k to be the cost-price, the formula C = c + v
+ s turns into the formula C = k + s, that is, the commodity-value =
cost-price + surplus-value.

The grouping of the various value portions of a commodity which only
replace the value of the capital expended in its production under the
head of cost-price expresses, on the one hand, the specific character of
capitalist production. The capitalist cost of the commodity is measured
by the expenditure of _capital_, while the actual cost of the commodity
is measured by the expenditure of _labour_. Thus, the capitalist
cost-price of the commodity differs in quantity from its value, or its
actual cost-price. It is smaller than the value of the commodity,
because, with C = k + s, it is evident that k = C - s. On the other
hand, the cost-price of a commodity is by no means simply a category
which exists only in capitalist book-keeping. The individualisation of
this portion of value is continually manifest in practice in the actual
production of the commodity, because it has ever to be reconverted from
its commodity-form by way of the process of circulation into the form of
productive capital, so that the cost-price of the commodity always must
repurchase the elements of production consumed in its manufacture.

The category of cost-price, on the other hand, has nothing to do with
the formation of commodity-value, or with the process of self-expansion
of capital. When I know that of the value of a commodity worth £600,
five-sixths, or £500, represent no more than an equivalent of the
capital of £500 consumed in its production and that it can therefore
suffice only to repurchase the material elements of this capital, I know
nothing as yet either of the way in which these five-sixths of the value
of the commodity, which represent its cost-price, are produced, or about
the way in which the last sixth, which constitutes its surplus-value,
was produced. The investigation will show, however, that in capitalist
economics the cost-price assumes the false appearance of a category of
value production itself.

To return to our example. Suppose the value produced by one labourer
during an average social working-day is represented by a money sum of
6s. = 6M. Then the advanced capital of £500 = 400_(c) + 100_(v)
represents a value produced in 1,666⅔ ten-hour working-days, of which
1,333⅓ working-days are crystallised in the value of the means of
production = 400_(c), and 333⅓ are crystallised in the value of
labour-power = 100_(v). Having assumed a rate of surplus-value of 100%,
the production of the commodity to be newly formed entails a labour
expenditure = 100_(v) + 100_(s) = 666⅔ ten-hour working-days.

We know, then (see Buch 1, Kap. VII, S. 201/193) [English edition: Ch.
IX, p. 212.-_Ed_.] that the value of the newly created product of £600
is composed of 1) the reappearing value of the constant capital of £400
expended for means of production, and 2) a newly produced value of £200.
The cost-price of the commodity = £500 comprises the reappearing 400_(c)
and one-half of the newly produced value of £200 ( = 100_(v)), that is,
two elements of the commodity-value which are of entirely different
origin.

Owing to the purposive nature of the labour expended during 666⅔
ten-hour working-days, the value of the consumed means of production
amounting to £400 is transferred from these means of production to the
product. This previously existing value thus reappears as a component
part of the value of the product, but is not created in the process of
production of _this_ commodity. It exists as a component of the value of
the commodity only because it previously existed as an element of the
invested capital. The expended constant capital is therefore replaced by
that portion of the value of the commodity which this capital itself
adds to that value. This element of the cost-price, therefore, has a
double meaning. On the one hand, it goes into the cost-price of the
commodity, because it is part of the commodity-value which replaces
consumed capital. And on the other hand, it forms an element of the
commodity-value only because it is the value of expended capital or
because the means of production cost so and so much.

It is quite the reverse in the case of the other element of the
cost-price. The 666⅔ working-days expended in the production of the
commodity create a new value of £200. One portion of this new value
merely replaces the advanced variable capital of £100, or the price of
the labour-power employed. But this advanced capital-value does not in
any way go into the creation of the new value. So far as the advance of
capital is concerned, labour-power counts as a _value_. But in the
process of production it acts as the _creator_ of value. The place of
the value of the labour-power that obtains within the advanced capital
is taken in the actually _functioning_ productive capital by living
value-creating labour-power itself.

The difference between these various elements of the commodity-value,
which together make up the cost-price, leaps to the eye whenever a
change takes place in the size of the value of either the expended
constant, or the expended variable, part of the capital. Let the price
of the same means of production, or of the constant part of capital,
rise from £400 to £600, or, conversely, let it fall to £200. In the
first case it is not only the cost-price of the commodity which rises
from £500 to 600_(c) + 100_(v) = £700, but also the value of the
commodity which rises from £600 to 600_(c) + 100_(v) + 100_(s) = £800.
In the second case, it is not only the cost-price which falls from £500
to 200_(c)+100_(v) = £300, but also the value of the commodity which
falls from £600 to 200_(c) + 100_(v) + 100_(s) = £400. Since the
expended constant capital transfers its own value to the product, the
value of the product rises or falls with the absolute magnitude of that
capital-value, other conditions remaining equal. Assume, on the other
hand, that, other circumstances remaining unchanged, the price of the
same amount of labour-power rises from £100 to £150, or, conversely,
that it falls from £100 to £50. In the first case, the cost-price rises
from £500 to 400_(c) + 150_(v) = £550, and falls in the second case from
£500 to 400_(c) + 50_(v) = £450. But in either case the commodity-value
remains unchanged = £600; one time it is 400_(c) + 150_(v) + 50_(s), and
the other time, 400_(c) + 50_(v) + 150_(s). The advanced variable
capital does not add its own value to the product. The place of its
value is taken in the product rather by a new value created by labour.
Therefore, a change in the absolute magnitude of the variable capital,
so far as it expresses merely a change in the price of labour-power,
does not in the least alter the absolute magnitude of the
commodity-value, because it does not alter anything in the absolute
magnitude of the new value created by living labour-power. Such a change
rather affects only the relative proportion of the two component parts
of the new value, of which one forms surplus-value and the other makes
good the variable capital and therefore passes into the cost-price of
the commodity.

The two elements of the cost-price, in the present case 400_(c) +
100_(v), have only this in common that they are both parts of the
commodity-value that replace advanced capital.

But this true state of affairs necessarily appears reversed from the
standpoint of capitalist production.

The capitalist mode of production differs from the mode of production
based on slavery, among other things, by the fact that in it the value,
and accordingly the price, of labour-power appears as the value, or
price, of labour itself, or as wages (Buch 1, Kap. XVII) [English
edition: Ch. XIX. — _Ed_.]. The variable part of the advanced capital,
therefore, appears as capital expended in wages, as a capital-value
which pays for the value, and accordingly the price, of all the labour
expended in production. Let us assume, for instance, that an average
ten-hour social working-day is incorporated in a sum of money amounting
to 6 shillings. In that case the advance of a variable capital of £100
represents the money expression of a value produced in 333 ⅓; ten-hour
working-days. But this value, representing purchased labour-power in the
capital advanced, does not, however, form a part of the actually
functioning productive capital. Its place in the process of production
is taken by living labour-power. If, as in our illustration, the degree
of exploitation of the latter is 100%, then it is expended during 666⅔
ten-hour working-days, and thereby adds to the product a new value of
£200. But in the capital advanced the variable capital of £100 figures
as capital invested in wages, or as the price of labour performed during
666⅔ ten-hour days. The sum of £100 divided by 666⅔ gives us 3 shillings
as the price of a ten-hour working-day, which is equal in value to the
product of five hours' labour.

Now, if we compare the capital advanced on the one hand with the
commodity-value on the other, we find:

I. Capital advanced £500 = £400 of capital expended in means of
production (price of means of production) + £100 of capital expended in
labour (price of 666⅔ working-days, or wages for same).

II. Value of commodities £600 = £500 representing the cost-price (£400
price of expended means of production + £100 price of expended 666⅔;
working-days) + £100 surplus-value.

In this formula, the portion of capital invested in labour-power differs
from that invested in means of production, such as cotton or coal, only
by serving as payment for a materially different element of production,
but not by any means because it serves a functionally different purpose
in the process of creating commodity-value, and thereby also in the
process of the self-expansion of capital. The price of the means of
production reappears in the cost-price of the commodities, just as it
figured in the capital advanced, and it does so because these means of
production have been purposively consumed. The price, or wages, for the
666⅔ working-days consumed in the production of these commodities
likewise reappears in the cost-price of the commodities just as it has
figured in the capital advanced, and also because this amount of labour
has been purposively expended. We see only finished and existing values
— the portions of the value of the advanced capital which go into the
making of the value of the product — but not the element creating new
values. The distinction between constant and variable capital has
disappeared. The entire cost-price of £500 now has the double meaning
that, first, it is that portion of the commodity-value of £600 which
replaces the capital of £500 expended in the production of the
commodity; and that, secondly, this component of the commodity-value
exists only because it existed previously as the cost-price of the
elements of production employed, namely means of production and labour,
i.e., as advanced capital. The capital-value reappears as the cost-price
of a commodity because, and in so far as, it has been expended as a
capital-value.

The fact that the various components of the value of the advanced
capital have been expended for materially different elements of
production, namely for instruments of labour, raw materials, auxiliary
materials, and labour, requires only that the cost-price of the
commodity must buy back these materially different elements of
production. So far as the formation of the cost-price is concerned,
however, only one distinction is appreciable, namely that between fixed
and circulating capital. In our example we have set down £20 for wear
and tear of instruments of labour (400_(c) = £20 for depreciation of
instruments of labour + £380 for materials of production). Before the
productive process the value of these instruments of labour was, say,
£1,200. After the commodities have been produced it exists in two forms,
the £20 as part of the value of the commodity, and 1,200 - 20, or
£1,180, as the remaining value of the instruments of labour which, as
before, are in the possession of the capitalist; in other words, as an
element of his productive, not of his commodity-capital. Materials of
production and wages, as distinct from means of labour, are entirely
consumed in the production of the commodity and thus their entire value
goes into that of the produced commodity. We have seen how these various
components of the advanced capital assume the forms of fixed and
circulating capital in relation to the turnover.

Accordingly, the capital advanced = £1,680: fixed capital = £1,200 +
circulating capital = £480 ( = £380 in materials of production plus £100
in wages).

But the cost-price of the commodity only = £500 (£20 for the wear and
tear of the fixed capital, and £480 for circulating capital).

This difference between the cost-price of the commodity and the capital
advanced merely proves, however, that the cost-price of the commodity is
formed exclusively by the capital actually consumed in its production.

Means of production valued at £1,200 are employed in producing the
commodity, but only £20 of this advanced capital-value are lost in
production. Thus, the employed fixed capital goes only partially into
the cost-price of the commodity, because it is only partially consumed
in its production. The employed circulating capital goes entirely into
the cost-price of the commodity, because it is entirely consumed in
production. But does not this only prove that the consumed portions of
the fixed and circulating capital pass uniformly, _pro rata_ to the
magnitude of their values, into the cost-price of the commodity and that
this component of the value of the commodity originates solely with the
capital expended in its production? If this were not so, it would be
inexplicable why the advanced fixed capital of £1,200 should not, aside
from the £20 which it loses in the productive process, also contribute
the other £1,180 which it does not lose.

This difference between fixed and circulating capital with reference to
the calculation of the cost-price, therefore, only confirms the seeming
origination of the cost-price from the expended capital-value, or the
price paid by the capitalist himself for the expended elements of
production, including labour. On the other hand, so far as the formation
of value is concerned, the variable portion of capital invested in
labour-power is here emphatically identified under the head of
circulating capital with constant capital (that part of capital which
consists of materials of production), and this completes the
mystification of the self-expansion process of capital.^([1])

So far we have considered just one element of the value of commodities,
namely the cost-price. We must now turn also to the other component of
the value of commodities, namely the excess over the cost-price, or the
surplus-value. In the first place, then, surplus-value is the excess
value of a commodity over and above its cost-price. But since the
cost-price equals the value of the consumed capital, into whose material
elements it is continually reconverted, this excess value is an
accretion in the value of the capital expended in the production of the
commodity and returning by way of its circulation.

We have already seen earlier that, though s, the surplus-value, springs
merely from a change in the value of the variable capital v and is,
therefore, originally but an increment of variable capital, after the
process of production is over it nevertheless also forms an increment of
c + v, the expended total capital. The formula c + (v + s), which
indicates that s is produced through the conversion of a definite
capital-value v advanced for labour-power into a fluctuating magnitude,
i.e., of a constant magnitude into a variable one, may also be
represented as (c + v) + s. Before production took place we had a
capital of £500. After production is completed we have the capital of
£500 plus a value increment of £100.^([2])

However, surplus-value forms an increment not only of the portion of the
advanced capital which goes into the self-expansion process, but also of
the portion which does not go into it. In other words, it is an
accretion not only to the consumed capital made good out of the
cost-price of the commodity, but to all the capital invested in
production. Before the production process we had a capital valued at
£1,680, namely £1,200 of fixed capital invested in means of production,
only £20 of which go into the value of the commodity for wear and tear,
plus £480 of circulating capital in materials of production and wages.
After the production process we have £1,180 as the constituent element
of the value of the productive capital plus a commodity-capital of £600.
By adding these two sums of value we find that the capitalist now has a
value of £1,780. After deducting his advanced total capital of £1,680
there remains a value increment of £100. The £100 of surplus-value thus
form as much of an increment in relation to the invested £1,680 as to
its fraction of £500 expended during production.

It is now clear to the capitalist that this increment of value springs
from the productive processes undertaken with the capital, that it
therefore springs from the capital itself, because it is there after the
production process, while it is not there before it. As for the capital
consumed in production, the surplus-value seems to spring equally from
all its different elements of value consisting of means of production
and labour. For all these elements contribute equally to the formation
of the cost-price. All of them add their values, obtaining as advanced
capital, to the value of the product, and are not differentiated as
constant and variable magnitudes of value. This becomes obvious if we
assume for a moment that all the expended capital consisted either
exclusively of wages, or exclusively of the value of the means of
production. In the first case, we should then have the commodity-value
of 500_(v) + 100_(s) instead of the commodity-value of 400_(c) + 100_(v)
+ 100_(s). The capital of £500 laid out in wages represents the value of
all the labour expended in the production of the commodity-value of
£600, and for just this reason forms the cost-price of the entire
product. But the formation of this cost-price, whereby the value of the
expended capital is reproduced as a constituent part of the value of the
product, is the only process in the formation of this commodity-value
that is known to us. We do not know how its surplus-value portion of
£100 is formed. The same is true in the second case, in which the
commodity-value = 500_(c) + 100_(s). We know in both cases that
surplus-value is derived from a given value, because this value was
advanced in the form of productive capital, be it in the form of labour
or of means of production. On the other hand, this advanced
capital-value cannot form surplus-value for the reason that it has been
expended and therefore constitutes the cost-price of the commodity.
Precisely because it forms the cost-price of the commodity, it does not
form any surplus-value, but merely an equivalent, a value replacing the
expended capital. So far, therefore, as it forms surplus-value, it does
so not in its specific capacity as expended, but rather as advanced, and
hence utilised, capital. For this reason, the surplus-value arises as
much out of the portion of the advanced capital which goes into the
cost-price of the commodity, as out of the portion which does not. In
short, it arises equally out of the fixed and the circulating components
of the utilised capital. The aggregate capital serves materially as the
creator of products, the means of labour as well as the materials of
production, and the labour. The total capital materially enters into the
actual labour-process, even though only a portion of it enters the
process of self-expansion. This is, perhaps, the very reason why it
contributes only in part to the formation of the cost-price, but totally
to the formation of surplus-value. However that may be, the outcome is
that surplus-value springs simultaneously from all portions of the
invested capital. This deduction may be substantially abbreviated, by
saying pointedly and concisely in the words of Malthus:

“The capitalist ... _expects_ an equal profit upon all the parts of the
capital which he advances.” ^([3])

In its assumed capacity of offspring of the aggregate advanced capital,
surplus-value takes the converted form of _profit_. Hence, a certain
value is capital when it is invested with a view to producing profit
^([4]), or, there is profit because a certain value was employed as
capital. Suppose profit is p. Then the formula C = c + v + s = k + s
turns into the formula C = k + p, or the _value of a commodity_ =
_cost-price_ + _profit_.

The profit, such as it is represented here, is thus the same as
surplus-value, only in a mystified form that is nonetheless a necessary
outgrowth of the capitalist mode of production. The genesis of the
mutation of values that occurs in the course of the production process,
must be transferred from the variable portion of the capital to the
total capital, because there is no apparent distinction between constant
and variable capital in the assumed formation of the cost-price. Because
at one pole the price of labour-power assumes the transmuted form of
wages, surplus-value appears at the opposite pole in the transmuted form
of profit.

We have seen that the cost-price of a commodity is smaller than its
value. Since C = k + s, it follows that k = C - s. The formula C = k + s
reduces itself to C = k, or commodity-value = commodity cost-price only
if s = 0, a case which never occurs on the basis of capitalist
production, although peculiar market conditions may reduce the selling
price of commodities to the level of, or even below, their cost-price.

Hence, if a commodity is sold at its value, a profit is realised which
is equal to the excess of its value over its cost-price, and therefore
equal to the entire surplus-value incorporated in the value of the
commodity. But the capitalist may sell a commodity at a profit even when
he sells it below its value. So long as its selling price is higher than
its cost-price, though it may be lower than its value, a portion of the
surplus-value incorporated in it is always realised, thus always
yielding a profit. In our illustration the value of the commodity is
£600, and the cost-price £500. If the commodity is sold at £510, 520,
530, 560 or 590, it is sold respectively £90, 80, 70, 40, or 10 below
its value. Yet a profit of £10, 20, 30, 60, or 90 respectively is
realised in its sale. There is obviously an indefinite number of selling
prices possible between the value of a commodity and its cost-price. The
greater the surplus-value element of the value of a commodity, the
greater the practical range of these intermediate prices.

This explains more than just the everyday phenomena of competition, such
as certain cases of underselling, abnormally low commodity-prices in
certain lines of industry ^([5]), etc. The fundamental law of capitalist
competition, which political economy had not hitherto grasped, the law
which regulates the general rate of profit and the so-called prices of
production determined by it, rests, as we shall later see, on this
difference between the value and the cost-price of commodities, and on
the resulting possibility of selling a commodity at a profit under its
value.

The minimal limit of the selling price of a commodity is its cost-price.
If it is sold under its cost-price, the expended constituent elements of
productive capital cannot be fully replaced out of the selling price. If
this process continues, the value of the advanced capital disappears.
From this point of view alone, the capitalist is inclined to regard the
cost-price as the true _inner_ value of the commodity, because it is the
price required for the bare conservation of his capital. But there is
also this, that the cost-price of a commodity is the purchase price paid
by the capitalist himself for its production, therefore the purchase
price determined by the production process itself. For this reason, the
excess value, or the surplus-value, realised in the sale of a commodity
appears to the capitalist as an excess of its selling price over its
value, instead of an excess of its value over its cost-price, so that
accordingly the surplus-value incorporated in a commodity is not
realised through its sale, but springs out of the sale itself. We have
given this illusion closer consideration in Book I (Kap. IV, 2) [English
edition: Ch. V, 2. — _Ed_.] (“Contradictions in the General Formula of
Capital”), but revert here for a moment to the form in which it was
reaffirmed by Torrens, among others, as an advance of political economy
beyond Ricardo.

“The natural price, consisting of the cost of production, or, in other
words, of the capital expended in raising or fabricating commodities,
cannot include the profit.... The farmer, we will suppose, expends one
hundred quarters of corn in cultivating his fields, and obtains in
return one hundred and twenty quarters. In this case, twenty quarters,
being the excess of produce above expenditure, constitute the farmer's
profit; but it would be absurd to call this excess, or profit, a part of
the expenditures... The master manufacturer expends a certain quantity
of raw material, of tools and implements of trade, and of subsistence
for labour, and obtains in return a quantity of finished work. This
finished work must possess a higher exchangeable value than the
materials, tools, and subsistence, by the advance of which it was
obtained.”

Torrens concludes therefrom that the excess of the selling price over
the cost-price, or profit, is derived from the fact that the consumers,

“either by immediate or circuitous barter give some greater portion of
all the ingredients of capital than their production costs.” ^([6])

Indeed, the excess over a given magnitude cannot form a part of this
magnitude, and therefore the profit, the excess value of a commodity
over the capitalist's expenditures, cannot form a part of these
expenditures. Hence, if no other element than the value advance of the
capitalist enters into the formation of the value of a commodity, it is
inexplicable how more value should come out of production than went into
it, for something cannot come out of nothing. But Torrens only evades
this creation out of nothing by transferring it from the sphere of
commodity-production to that of commodity-circulation. Profit cannot
come out of production, says Torrens, for otherwise it would already be
contained in the cost of production, and there would not be a surplus
over this cost. Profit cannot come out of the exchange of commodities,
replies Ramsay, unless it already existed before this exchange. The sum
of the value of the exchanged products is evidently not altered in the
exchange of these products, whose sum of value it is. It is the same
before and after the exchange. It should be noted here that Malthus
refers expressly to the authority of Torrens ^([7]) although he himself
has a different explanation for the sale of commodities above their
value, or rather has no explanation at all, since all arguments of this
sort never, in effect, fail to be reduced to the same thing as the
once-famed negative weight of phlogiston.

In a social order dominated by capitalist production even the
non-capitalist producer is gripped by capitalist conceptions. Balzac,
who is generally remarkable for his profound grasp of reality, aptly
describes in his last novel, _Les Paysans_, how a petty peasant performs
many small tasks gratuitously for his usurer, whose goodwill he is eager
to retain, and how he fancies that he does not give the latter something
for nothing because his own labour does not cost him any cash outlay. As
for the usurer, he thus fells two dogs with one stone. He saves the cash
outlay for wages and enmeshes the peasant, who is gradually ruined by
depriving his own field of labour, deeper and deeper in the spider-web
of usury.

The thoughtless conception that the cost-price of a commodity
constitutes its actual value, and that surplus-value springs from
selling the product above its value, so that commodities would be sold
at their value if their selling price were to equal their cost-price,
i.e., if it were to equal the price of the consumed means of production
plus wages, has been heralded to the world as a newly discovered secret
of socialism by Proudhon with his customary quasi-scientific chicanery.
Indeed, this reduction of the value of commodities to their cost-price
is the basis of his People's Bank. It was earlier shown that the various
constituent elements of the value of a product may be represented in
proportional parts of the product itself. For instance (Buch I, Kap. VI
1, 2, S. 211/203) [English edition: Ch. IX, 2, pp. 220-21. — _Ed_.] if
the value of 20 lbs. of yarn is 30 shillings — namely 24 shillings of
means of production, 3 shillings of labour-power, and 3 shillings of
surplus-value — then this surplus-value may be represented as 1/10 of
the product=2 lbs. of yarn. Should these 20 lbs. of yarn now be sold at
their cost-price, at 27 shillings, then the purchaser receives 2 lbs. of
yarn for nothing, or the article is sold 1/10 below its value. But the
labourer has, as before, performed his surplus-labour, only this time
for the purchaser of the yarn instead of the capitalist yarn producer.
It would be altogether wrong to assume that if all commodities were sold
at their cost-price, the result would really be the same as if they had
all been sold above their cost-price, but at their value. For even if
the value of the labour-power, the length of the working-day, and the
degree of exploitation of labour were the same everywhere, the
quantities of surplus-value contained in the values of the various kinds
of commodities would be unequal, depending on the different organic
composition of the capitals advanced for their production.^([8])

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. In Book I (Kap. VII, 3, S. 216/206 ff.) [English edition: Ch. IX, 3,
225 ff. — _Ed_.] we have given the example of N. W. Senior to show what
confusion this may create in the mind of the economist.

2. “From what has gone before, we know that surplus-value is purely the
result of a variation in the value of v, of that portion of the capital
which is transformed into labour-power; consequently, v + s = v + Dv (or
v plus an increment of v). But the fact that it is v alone that varies,
and the conditions of that variation, are obscured by the circumstance
that in consequence of the increase in the variable component of the
capital, there is also an increase in the sum total of the advanced
capital. It was originally £500, and becomes £590.” (Buch I, Kap. VI I,
1, S. 203/195.) [English edition: Ch. IX, 1, p. 214. — _Ed_.]

3. Malthus, _Principles of Political Economy_, 2nd ed., London, 1836, p.
268.

4. “Capital is that which is expended with a view to profit.” Malthus,
_Definitions in Political Economy_, London, 1827, p. 86.

5. Cf. Buch I. Kap. XVIII, 1, S. 571/561 ff. [English edition: Ch. XX,
1, p. 549 ff. — _Ed_.]

6. R. Torrens, _An Essay on the Production of Wealth_, London, 1821, pp.
51-53, and 349.

7. Malthus, _Definitions in Political Economy_, London, 1853, pp. 70,
71.

8. “The masses of value and of surplus-value produced by different
capitals — the value of labour-power being given and its degree of
exploitation being equal — vary directly as the amounts of the variable
constituents of these capitals, i.e., as their constituents transformed
into living labour-power.” (Buch 1, Kap. IX. S. 312/303.) [English
edition: Ch. XI, pp. 306/307. — _Ed_.]

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Transcribed for the Internet by Hinrich Kuhls

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 2. The Rate of Profit

 

The general formula of capital is M-C-M'. In other words, a sum of value
is thrown into circulation to extract a larger sum out of it. The
process which produces this larger sum is capitalist production. The
process that realises it is circulation of capital. The capitalist does
not produce a commodity for its own sake, nor for the sake of its
use-value, or his personal consumption. The product in which the
capitalist is really interested is not the palpable product itself, but
the excess value of the product over the value of the capital consumed
by it. The capitalist advances the total capital without regard to the
different roles played by its components in the production of
surplus-value. He advances all these components uniformly, not just to
reproduce the advanced capital, but rather to produce value in excess of
it. The only way in which he can convert the value of his advanced
variable capital into a greater value is by exchanging it for living
labour and exploiting living labour. But he cannot exploit this labour
unless he makes a simultaneous advance of the conditions for performing
this labour, namely means of labour and subjects of labour, machinery
and raw materials, i.e., unless he converts a certain amount of value in
his possession into the form of conditions of production; for he is a
capitalist and can undertake the process of exploiting labour only
because, being the owner of the conditions of labour, he confronts the
labourer as the owner of only labour-power. As already shown in the
first book [English edition: Vol. 1, pp. 168-69. 714-16. — _Ed_.], it is
precisely the fact that non-workers own the means of production which
turns labourers into wage-workers and non-workers into capitalists.

The capitalist does not care whether it is considered that he advances
constant capital to make a profit out of his variable capital, or that
he advances variable capital to enhance the value of the constant
capital; that he invests money in wages to raise the value of his
machinery and raw materials, or that he invests money in machinery and
raw materials to be able to exploit labour. Although it is only the
variable portion of capital which creates surplus-value, it does so only
if the other portions, the conditions of production, are likewise
advanced. Seeing that the capitalist can exploit labour only by
advancing constant capital and that he can turn his constant capital to
good account only by advancing variable capital, he lumps them all
together in his imagination, and much more so since the actual rate of
his gain is not determined by its proportion to the variable, but to the
total capital, not by the rate of surplus-value, but by the rate of
profit. And the latter, as we shall see, may remain the same and yet
express different rates of surplus-value.

The costs of the product include all the elements of its value paid by
the capitalist or for which he has thrown an equivalent into production.
These costs must be made good to preserve the capital or to reproduce it
in its original magnitude.

The value contained in a commodity is equal to the labour-time expended
in its production, and the sum of this labour consists of paid and
unpaid portions. But for the capitalist the costs of the commodity
consist only of that portion of the labour materialised in it for which
he has paid. The surplus-labour contained in the commodity costs the
capitalist nothing, although, like the paid portion, it costs the
labourer his labour, and although it creates value and enters into the
commodity as a value-creating element quite like paid labour. The
capitalist's profit is derived from the fact that he has something to
sell for which he has paid nothing. The surplus-value, or profit,
consists precisely in the excess value of a commodity over its
cost-price, i.e., the excess of the total labour embodied in the
commodity over the paid labour embodied in it. The surplus-value,
whatever its origin, is thus a surplus over the advanced total capital.
The proportion of this surplus to the total capital is therefore
expressed by the fraction s/C, in which C stands for total capital. We
thus obtain the _rate of profit_ s/C=s/(c+v), as distinct from the rate
of surplus-value s/v.

The rate of surplus-value measured against the variable capital is
called rate of surplus-value. The rate of surplus-value measured against
the total capital is called rate of profit. These are two different
measurements of the same entity, and owing to the difference of the two
standards of measurement they express different proportions or relations
of this entity.

The transformation of surplus-value into profit must be deduced from the
transformation of the rate of surplus-value into the rate of profit, not
vice versa. And in fact it was rate of profit which was the historical
point of departure. Surplus-value and rate of surplus-value are,
relatively, the invisible and unknown essence that wants investigating,
while rate of profit and therefore the appearance of surplus-value in
the form of profit are revealed on the surface of the phenomenon.

So far as the individual capitalist is concerned, it is evident that he
is only interested in the relation of the surplus-value, or the excess
value at which he sells his commodities, to the total capital advanced
for the production of the commodities, while the specific relationship
and inner connection of this surplus with the various components of
capital fail to interest him, and it is, moreover, rather in his
interests to draw the veil over this specific relationship and this
intrinsic connection.

Although the excess value of a commodity over its cost-price is shaped
in the immediate process of production, it is realised only in the
process of circulation, and appears all the more readily to have arisen
from the process of circulation, since in reality, under competition, in
the actual market, it depends on market conditions whether or not and to
what extent this surplus is realised. There is no need to waste words at
this point about the fact that if a commodity is sold above or below its
value, there is merely another kind of division of surplus-value, and
that this different division, this changed proportion in which various
persons share in the surplus-value, does not in any way alter either the
magnitude or the nature of that surplus-value. It is not alone the
metamorphoses discussed by us in Book II that take place in the process
of circulation; they fall in with actual competition, the sale and
purchase of commodities above or below their value, so that the
surplus-value realised by the individual capitalist depends as much on
the sharpness of his business wits as on the direct exploitation of
labour.

In the process of circulation the time of circulation comes to exert its
influence alongside the working-time, thereby limiting the amount of
surplus-value realisable within a given time span. Still other elements
derived from circulation intrude decisively into the actual production
process. The actual process of production and the process of circulation
intertwine and intermingle continually, and thereby invariably
adulterate their typical distinctive features. The production of
surplus-value, and of value in general, receives new definition in the
process of circulation, as previously shown. Capital passes through the
circuit of its metamorphoses. Finally, stepping beyond its inner organic
life, so to say, it enters into relations with outer life, into
relations in which it is not capital and labour which confront one
another, but capital and capital in one case, and individuals, again
simply as buyers and sellers, in the other. The time of circulation and
working-time cross paths and thus both seem to determine the
surplus-value. The original form in which capital and wage-labour
confront one another is disguised through the intervention of
relationships seemingly independent of it. Surplus-value itself does not
appear as the product of the appropriation of labour-time, but as an
excess of the selling price of commodities over their cost-price, the
latter thus being easily represented as their actual value (_valeur
intrinsèque_), while profit appears as an excess of the selling price of
commodities over their immanent value.

True, the nature of surplus-value impresses itself constantly upon the
consciousness of the capitalist during the process of production, as his
greed for the labour-time of others, etc., has revealed in our analysis
of surplus-value. But: 1) The actual process of production is only a
fleeting stage which continually merges with the process of circulation,
just as the latter merges with the former, so that in the process of
production, the more or less clearly dawning notion of the source of the
gain made in it, i.e., the inkling of the nature of surplus-value,
stands at best as a factor equally valid as the idea that the realised
surplus originates in a movement that is independent of the production
process, that it arises in circulation, and that it belongs to capital
irrespective of the latter's relation to labour. Even such modern
economists as Ramsay, Malthus, Senior, Torrens, etc., identify these
phenomena of circulation directly as proofs that capital in its bare
material existence, independent of its social relation to labour which
makes capital of it, is, as it were, an independent source of
surplus-value alongside labour and independent of labour. 2) Under the
item of expenses, which embrace wages as well as the price of raw
materials, wear and tear of machinery, etc., the extortion of unpaid
labour figures only as a saving in paying for an article which is
included in expenses, only as a smaller payment for a certain quantity
of labour, similar to the saving when raw materials are bought more
cheaply, or the depreciation of machinery decreases. In this way the
extortion of surplus-labour loses its specific character. Its specific
relationship to surplus-value is obscured. This is greatly furthered and
facilitated, as shown in Book I (Abschn. VI) [English edition: Part VI,
pp. 535-43. — _Ed_.], by representing the value of labour-power in the
form of wages.

The relationships of capital are obscured by the fact that all parts of
capital appear equally as the source of excess value (profit).

The way in which surplus-value is transformed into the form of profit by
way of the rate of profit is, however, a further development of the
inversion of subject and object that takes place already in the process
of production. In the latter, we have seen, the subjective productive
forces of labour appear as productive forces of capital. [English
edition: Vol. 1, pp. 332-33. — _Ed_.] On the one hand, the value, or the
past labour, which dominates living labour, is incarnated in the
capitalist. On the other hand, the labourer appears as bare material
labour-power, as a commodity. Even in the simple relations of production
this inverted relationship necessarily produces certain correspondingly
inverted conceptions, a transposed consciousness which is further
developed by the metamorphoses and modifications of the actual
circulation process.

It is altogether erroneous, as a study of the Ricardian school shows, to
try to identify the laws of the rate of profit with the laws of the rate
of surplus-value, or vice versa. The capitalist naturally does not see
the difference between them. In the formula s/C the surplus-value is
measured by the value of the total capital advanced for its production,
of which a part was totally consumed in this production and a part was
merely employed in it. In fact, the formula s/C expresses the degree of
self-expansion of the total capital advanced, or, taken in conformity
with inner conceptual connections and the nature of surplus-value, it
indicates the ratio of the amount of variation of variable capital to
the magnitude of the advanced total capital.

In itself, the magnitude of value of total capital has no inner
relationship to the magnitude of surplus-value, at least not directly.
So far as its material elements are concerned, the total capital minus
the variable capital, that is, the constant capital, consists of the
material requisites — the means of labour and materials of labour —
needed to materialise labour. It is necessary to have a certain quantity
of means and materials of labour for a specific quantity of labour to
materialise in commodities and thereby to produce value. A definite
technical relation depending on the special nature of the labour applied
is established between the quantity of labour and the quantity of means
of production to which this labour is to be applied. Hence there is also
to that extent a definite relation between the quantity of
surplus-value, or surplus-labour, and the quantity of means of
production. For instance, if the labour necessary for the production of
the wage amounts to a daily 6 hours, the labourer must work 12 hours to
do 6 hours of surplus-labour, or produce a surplus-value of 100%. He
uses up twice as much of the means of production in 12 hours as he does
in 6. Yet this is no reason for the surplus-value produced by him in 6
hours to be directly related to the value of the means of production
used up in those 6, or in 12 hours. This value is here altogether
immaterial; it is only a matter of the technically required quantity. It
does not matter whether the raw materials or means of labour are cheap
or dear, as long as they have the required use-value and are available
in technically prescribed proportion to the labour to be applied. If I
know that x lbs. of cotton are consumed in an hour of spinning and that
they cost a shillings, then, of course, I also know that 12 hours'
spinning consumes 12x lbs. of cotton = 12 a shillings, and can then
calculate the proportion of the surplus-value to the value of the 12 as
well as to that of the 6. But the relation of living labour to the
_value_ of means of production obtains here only to the extent that a
shillings serve as a name for x lbs. of cotton; because a definite
quantity of cotton has a definite price, and therefore, conversely, a
definite price may also serve as an index for a definite quantity of
cotton, so long as the price of cotton does not change. If I know that
the labourer must work 12 hours for me to appropriate 6 hours of
surplus-labour, that therefore I must have a 12-hour supply of cotton
ready for use, and if I know the price of this quantity of cotton needed
for 12 hours, then I have an indirect relation between the price of
cotton (as an index of the required quantity) and the surplus-value.
But, conversely, I can never conclude the quantity of the raw material
that may be consumed in, say, one hour, and not 6, of spinning from the
price of the raw material. There is, then, no necessary inner relation
between the value of the constant capital, nor, therefore, between the
value of the total capital (=c+v) and the surplus-value.

If the rate of surplus-value is known and its magnitude given, the rate
of profit expresses nothing but what it actually is, namely a different
way of measuring surplus-value, its measurement according to the value
of the total capital instead of the value of the portion of capital from
which surplus-value directly originates by way of its exchange for
labour. But in reality (i.e., in the world of phenomena) the matter is
reversed. Surplus-value is given, but given as an excess of the selling
price of the commodity over its cost-price; and it remains a mystery
where this surplus originated — from the exploitation of labour in the
process of production, or from outwitting the purchaser in the process
of circulation, or from both. What is also given is the proportion of
this surplus to the value of the total capital, or the rate of profit.
The calculation of this excess of the selling price over the cost-price
in relation to the value of the advanced total capital is very important
and natural, because in effect it yields the ratio in which total
capital has been expanded, i.e., the degree of its self-expansion. If we
proceed from this rate of profit, we cannot therefore conclude the
specific relations between the surplus and the portion of capital
invested in wages. We shall see in a subsequent chapter [K. Marx,
_Theorien über den Mehrwert_. K. Marx/F. Engels, _Werke_, Band 26, Teil
3, S. 25-28 . — _Ed_.] what amusing somersaults Malthus makes when he
tries in this way to get at the secret of the surplus-value and of its
specific relation to the variable part of the capital. What the rate of
profit actually shows is rather a uniform relation of the surplus to
equal portions of the total capital, which, from this point of view,
does not show any inner difference at all, unless it be between the
fixed and circulating capital. And it shows this difference, too, only
because the surplus is calculated in two ways; namely, first, as a
simple magnitude — as excess over the cost-price. In this, its initial,
form, the entire circulating capital goes into the cost-price, while of
the fixed capital only the wear and tear goes into it. Second, the
relation of this excess in value to the total value of the advanced
capital. In this case, the value of the total fixed capital enters into
the calculation, quite the same as the circulating capital. Therefore,
the circulating capital goes in both times in the same way, while the
fixed capital goes in differently the first time, and in the same way as
circulating capital the second time. Under the circumstances the
difference between fixed and circulating capital is the only one which
obtrudes itself.

If, as Hegel would put it, the surplus therefore re-reflects itself in
itself out of the rate of profit, or, put differently, the surplus is
more closely characterised by the rate of profit, it appears as a
surplus produced by capital above its own value over a year, or in a
given period of circulation.

Although the rate of profit thus differs numerically from the rate of
surplus-value, while surplus-value and profit are actually the same
thing and numerically equal, profit is nevertheless a converted form of
surplus-value, a form in which its origin and the secret of its
existence are obscured and extinguished. In effect, profit is the form
in which surplus-value presents itself to the view, and must initially
be stripped by analysis to disclose the latter. In surplus-value, the
relation between capital and labour is laid bare; in the relation of
capital to profit, i.e., of capital to surplus-value that appears on the
one hand as an excess over the cost-price of commodities realised in the
process of circulation and, on the other, as a surplus more closely
determined by its relation to the total capital, _the capital_ appears
_as a relation to itself_, a relation in which it, as the original sum
of value, is distinguished from a new value which it generated. One is
conscious that capital generates this new value by its movement in the
processes of production and circulation. But the way in which this
occurs is cloaked in mystery and appears to originate from hidden
qualities inherent in capital itself.

The further we follow the process of the self-expansion of capital, the
more mysterious the relations of capital will become, and the less the
secret of its internal organism will be revealed.

In this part, the rate of profit is numerically different from the rate
of surplus-value; while profit and surplus-value are treated as having
the same numerical magnitude but only a different form. In the next part
we shall see how the alienation goes further, and how profit represents
a magnitude differing also numerically from surplus-value.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Transcribed for the Internet by Hinrich Kuhls

 

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 3. The Relation of the Rate of Profit to the Rate of Surplus-Value

 

Here, as at the close of the preceding chapter, and generally in this
entire first part, we presume the amount of profit falling to a given
capital to be equal to the total amount of surplus-value produced by
means of this capital during a certain period of circulation. We thus
leave aside for the present the fact that, on the one hand, this
surplus-value may be broken up into various sub-forms, such as interest
on capital, ground-rent, taxes, etc., and that, on the other, it is not,
as a rule, identical with profit as appropriated by virtue of a general
rate of profit, which will be discussed in the second part.

So far as the quantity of profit is assumed to be equal to that of
surplus-value, its magnitude, and that of the rate of profit, is
determined by ratios of simple figures given or ascertainable in every
individual case. The analysis, therefore, first is carried on purely in
the mathematical field.

We retain the designations used in Books I and II. Total capital C
consists of constant capital c and variable capital v, and produces a
surplus-value s. The ratio of this surplus-value to the advanced
variable capital, or s/v, is called the rate of surplus-value and
designated s'. Therefore s/v = s', and consequently s = s'v. If this
surplus-value is related to the total capital instead of the variable
capital, it is called profit, p, and the ratio of the surplus-value s to
the total capital C, or s/C, is called the rate of profit, p'.
Accordingly,

p' = s/C = s/(c + v)

Now, substituting for s its equivalent s'v, we find

p' = s' (v/C) = s' v/(c + v)

which equation may also be expressed by the proportion

p' : s' = v : C ;

the rate of profit is related to the rate of surplus-value as the
variable capital is to the total capital.

It follows from this proportion that the rate of profit, p', is always
smaller than s', the rate of surplus-value, because v, the variable
capital, is always smaller than C, the sum of v + c, or the variable
plus the constant capital; the only, practically impossible case
excepted, in which v = C, that is, no constant capital at all, no means
of production, but only wages are advanced by the capitalist.

However, our analysis also considers a number of other factors which
have a determining influence on the magnitude of c, v, and s, and must
therefore be briefly examined.

First, the _value of money_. We may assume this to be constant
throughout.

Second, the _turnover_. We shall leave this factor entirely out of
consideration for the present, since its influence on the rate of profit
will be treated specially in a later chapter. [Here we anticipate just
one point, that the formula p' = s' (v/C) is strictly correct only for
_one_ period of turnover of the variable capital. But we may correct it
for an annual turnover by substituting for the simple rate of
surplus-value, s', the annual rate of surplus-value, s'n. In this, n is
the number of turnovers of the variable capital within one year. (Cf.
Book II, Chapter XVI, 1) — F. E.]

Third, due consideration must be given to _productivity of labour_,
whose influence on the rate of surplus-value has been thoroughly
discussed in Book I (Abschnitt IV). [English edition: Part IV. — Ed.]
Productivity of labour may also exert a direct influence on the rate of
profit, at least of an individual capital, if, as has been demonstrated
in Book I (Kap. X, S. 323/324 [ = MEW 23, S.335/336]) [English edition:
Ch. XII, pp. 316-17. — Ed.] this individual capital operates with a
higher than the average social productivity and produces commodities at
a lower value than their average social value, thereby realising an
extra profit. However, this case will not be considered for the present,
since in this part of the work we also proceed from the premise that
commodities are produced under normal social conditions and are sold at
their values. Hence, we assume in each case that the productivity of
labour remains constant. In effect, the value-composition of a capital
invested in a branch of industry, that is, a certain proportion between
the variable and constant capital, always expresses a definite degree of
labour productivity. As soon, therefore, as this proportion is altered
by means other than a mere change in the value of the material elements
of the constant capital, or a change in wages, the productivity of
labour must likewise undergo a corresponding change, and we shall often
enough see, for this reason, that changes in the factors c, v, and s
also imply changes in the productivity of labour.

The same applies to the three remaining factors — the _length of the
working-day, intensity of labour, and wages_. Their influence on the
quantity and rate of surplus-value has been exhaustively discussed in
Book I [English edition: Vol. 1, pp. 519-30. — Ed.] It will be
understood, therefore, that notwithstanding the assumption, which we
make for the sake of simplicity, that these three factors remain
constant, the changes that occur in v and s may nevertheless imply
changes in the magnitude of these, their determining elements. In this
respect we must briefly recall that the wage influences the quantity of
surplus-value and the rate of surplus-value in inverse proportion to the
length of the working-day and the intensity of labour; that an increase
in wages reduces the surplus-value, while a lengthening of the
working-day and an increase in the intensity of labour add to it.

Suppose a capital of 100 produces a surplus-value of 20 employing 20
labourers working a 10-hour day for a total weekly wage of 20. Then we
have:

80_(c) + 20_(v) + 20_(s); s' = 100%, p' = 20%.

Now the working-day is lengthened to 15 hours without raising the wages.
The total value produced by the 20 labourers will thereby increase from
40 to 60 (10 : 15 = 40 : 60). Since v, the wages paid to the labourers,
remains the same, the surplus-value rises from 20 to 40, and we have:

80_(c) + 20_(v) + 40_(s); s' = 200%, p' = 40%.

If, conversely, the ten-hour working-day remains unchanged, while wages
fall from 20 to 12, the total value-product amounts to 40 as before, but
is differently distributed; v falls to 12, leaving a remainder of 28 for
s. Then we have:

80_(c) + 20_(v) + 28_(s); s' = 233⅓%, p' = 28/92 = 30 10/23 %.

Hence, we see that a prolonged working-day (or a corresponding increase
in the intensity of labour) and a fall in wages both increase the
amount, and thus the rate, of surplus-value. Conversely, a rise in
wages, other things being equal, would lower the rate of surplus-value.
Hence, if v rises through a rise in wages, it does not express a
greater, but only a dearer quantity of labour, in which case s' and p'
do not rise, but fall.

This indicates that changes in the working-day, intensity of labour and
wages cannot take place without a simultaneous change in v and s and
their ratio, and therefore also p', which is the ratio of s to the total
capital c + v. And it is also evident that changes in the ratio of s to
v also imply corresponding changes in at least one of the three
above-mentioned labour conditions.

Precisely this reveals the specific organic relationship of variable
capital to the movement of the total capital and to its self-expansion,
and also its difference from constant capital. So far as generation of
value is concerned, the constant capital is important only for the value
it has. And it is immaterial to the generation of value whether a
constant capital of £1,500 represents 1,500 tons of iron at, say, £1, or
500 tons of iron at £3. The quantity of actual material, in which the
value of the constant capital is incorporated, is altogether irrelevant
to the formation of value and the rate of profit, which varies inversely
to this value no matter what the ratio of the increase or decrease of
the value of constant capital to the mass of material use-value which it
represents.

It is different with variable capital. It is not the value it has, not
the labour incorporated in it, that matter at this point, but this value
as a mere index of the total labour that it sets in motion and which is
not expressed in it — the total labour, whose difference from the labour
expressed in that value, hence the paid labour, i.e., that portion of
the total labour which produces surplus-value, is all the greater, the
less labour is contained in that value itself. Suppose, a ten-hour
working-day is equal to ten shillings = ten marks. If the labour
necessary to replace the wages, and thus the variable capital = 5 hours
= 5 shillings, then the surplus-labour = 5 hours and the surplus-value =
5 shillings. Should the necessary labour = 4 hours = 4 shillings, then
the surplus-labour = 6 hours and the surplus-value = 6 shillings.

Hence, as soon as the value of the variable capital ceases to be an
index of the quantity of labour set in motion by it, and, moreover, the
measure of this index is altered, the rate of surplus-value will change
in the opposite direction and inversely.

Let us now go on to apply the above-mentioned equation of the rate of
profit, p' = s' (v/C), to the various possible cases. We shall
successively change the value of the individual factors of s' (v/C) and
determine the effect of these changes on the rate of profit. In this way
we shall obtain different series of cases, which we may regard either as
successive altered conditions of operation for one and the same capital,
or as different capitals existing side by side and introduced for the
sake of comparison, taken, as it were, from different branches of
industry or different countries. In cases, therefore, where the
conception of some of our examples as successive conditions for one and
the same capital appears to be forced or impracticable, this objection
falls away the moment they are regarded as comparisons of independent
capitals.

Hence, we now separate the product s' (v/C) into its two factors s' and
v/C. At first we shall treat s' as constant and analyse the effect of
the possible variations of v/C. After that we shall treat the fraction
v/C as constant and let s' pass through its possible variations. Finally
we shall treat all factors as variable magnitudes and thereby exhaust
all the cases from which laws concerning the rate of profit may be
derived.

I. S' CONSTANT, V/C VARIABLE

This case, which embraces a number of subordinate cases, may be covered
by a general formula. Take two capitals, C and C₁, with their respective
variable components, v and v₁, with a common rate of surplus-value, s',
and rates of profit p' and p'₁. Then:

p' = s' (v/C) ; p'₁ = s' (v₁/C₁)

Now let us make a proportion of C and C₁, and of v and v₁. For instance,
let the value of the fraction C₁/C = E, and that of v₁/v = e. Then C₁ =
EC, and v₁ = ev. Substituting in the above equation these values for p₁,
C₁ and v₁, we obtain

p'₁ = s' ev/EC

Again, we may derive a second formula from the above two equations by
transforming them into the proportion:

p' : p'₁ = s' (v/C) : s' (v₁/C₁) = (v/C) : v₁/C₁ .

Since the value of a fraction is not changed if we multiply or divide
its numerator and denominator by the same number, we may reduce v/C and
v₁/C₁ to percentages, that is, we may make C and C₁ both = 100. Then we
have v/C = v/100 and v₁/C₁ = v₁/100, and may then drop the denominators
in the above proportion, obtaining:

p' : p'₁ = v : v₁', or:

Taking any two capitals operating with the same rate of surplus-value,
the rates of profit are to each other as the variable portions of the
capitals calculated as percentages of their respective total capitals.

These two formulas embrace all the possible variations of v/C.

One more remark before we analyse these various cases singly. Since C is
the sum of c and v, of the constant and variable capitals, and since the
rates of surplus-value, as of profit, are usually expressed in
percentages, it is convenient to assume that the sum of c + v is also
equal to 100, i.e., to express c and v in percentages. For the
determination of the rate of profit, if not of the amount, it is
immaterial whether we say that a capital of 15,000, of which 12,000 is
constant and 3,000 is variable, produces a surplus-value of 3,000, or
whether we reduce this capital to percentages:

15,000 C = 12,000_(c) + 3,000_(v) ( + 3,000_(s))

100 C = 80_(c) + 20_(v) ( + 20_(s)).

In either case the rate of surplus-value s' = 100%, and the rate of
profit = 20%.

The same is true when we compare two capitals, say, the foregoing
capital with another, such as

12,000 C = 10,800_(c) + 1,200_(v) ( + 1,200_(s))

100 C = 90_(c) + 10_(v) ( + 10_(s)).

in both of which s' = 100%, p' = 10%, and in which the comparison with
the foregoing capital is clearer in percentage form.

On the other hand, if it is a matter of changes taking place in one and
the same capital, the form of percentages is rarely to be used, because
it almost always obscures these changes. If a capital expressed in the
form of percentages:

80_(c) + 20_(v) + 20_(s)

assumes the form of percentages:

90_(c) + 10_(v) + 10_(s),

we cannot tell whether the changed composition in percentages, 90_(v) +
10_(c), is due to an absolute decrease of v or an absolute increase of
c, or to both. We would need the absolute magnitudes in figures to
ascertain this. In the analysis of the following individual cases of
variation, however, everything depends on how these changes have come
about; whether 80_(v) + 20_(c) changed into 90_(c) + 10_(v) through an
increase of the constant capital without any change in the variable
capital, for instance through 12,000_(c) + 3,000_(v) changing into
27,000_(c) + 3,000_(v) (corresponding to a percentage of 90_(c) +
10_(v)); or whether they took this form through a reduction of the
variable capital, with the constant capital remaining unchanged, that
is, through a change into 12,000_(c) + 1,333⅓ _(v) (also corresponding
to a percentage of 90_(c) + 10_(v)); or, lastly, whether both of the
terms changed into 13,500_(c) + 1,500_(v) (corresponding once more to a
percentage of 90_(c) + 10_(v)). But it is precisely these cases which we
shall have to successively analyse, and in so doing dispense with the
convenient form of percentages, or at least employ these only as a
secondary alternative.

1) _s' and C constant, v variable._

If v changes in magnitude, C can remain unaltered only if c, the other
component of C, that is, the constant capital, changes by the same
amount as v, but in the opposite direction.

If C originally = 80_(c) + 20_(v) = 100, and if v is then reduced to 10,
then C can = 100 only if c is increased to 90; 90_(c) + 10_(v) = 100.
Generally speaking, if v is transformed into v ± d, into v increased or
decreased by d, then c must be transformed into c ± d, into c varying by
the same amount, but in the opposite direction, so that the conditions
of the present case are satisfied.

Similarly, if the rate of surplus-value s' remains the same, while the
variable capital v changes, the amount of surplus-value s must change,
since s = s'v, and since one of the factors of s'v, namely v, is given
another value.

The assumptions of the present case produce, alongside the original
equation,

p' = s' (v/C) ,

still another equation through the variation of v:

p'₁ = s' (v₁/C)

in which v has become v₁ and p'₁, the resultant changed rate of profit,
is to be found.

It is determined by the following proportion:

p' : p'₁ = s' (v/C) : s' (v₁/C) = v : v₁

Or: with the rate of surplus-value and total capital remaining the same,
the original rate of profit is to the new rate of profit produced by a
change in the variable capital as the original variable capital is to
the changed variable capital.

If the original capital was, as above:

I. 15,000 C = 12,000_(c) + 3,000_(v) ( + 3,000_(s)), and if it is now:

II. 15,000 C = 13,000_(c) + 2,000_(v) ( + 2,000_(s)), then C = 15,000
and s' = 100% in either case, and the rate of profit of I, 20%, is to
that of II, 13⅓%, as the variable capital of I, 3,000, is to that of II,
2,000, i. e., 20% : 13⅓% = 3,000 : 2,000.

Now, the variable capital may either rise or fall. Let us first take an
example in which it rises. Let a certain capital be originally
constituted and employed as follows:

I. 100_(c) + 20_(v) + 10_(s); C = 120, s' = 50%, p' = 8⅓%.

Now let the variable capital rise to 30. In that case, according to our
assumption, the constant capital must fall from 100 to 90 so that total
capital remains unchanged at 120. The rate of surplus-value remaining
constant at 50%, the surplus-value produced will then rise from 10 to
15. We shall then have:

II. 90_(c) + 30_(v) + 15_(s); C = 120, s' = 50%, p' = 12½%.

Let us first proceed from the assumption that wages remain unchanged.
Then the other factors of the rate of surplus-value, i.e., the
working-day and the intensity of labour, must also remain unchanged. In
that event the rise of v (from 20 to 30) can signify only that another
half as many labourers are employed. Then the total value produced also
rises one-half, from 30 to 45, and is distributed, just as before, ⅔ for
wages and ⅓ for surplus-value. But at the same time, with the increase
in the number of labourers, the constant capital, the value of the means
of production, has fallen from 100 to 90. We have, then, a case of
decreasing productivity of labour combined with a simultaneous shrinkage
of constant capital. Is such a case economically possible?

In agriculture and the extractive industries, in which a decrease in
labour productivity and, therefore, an increase in the number of
employed labourers is quite comprehensible, this process is on the basis
and within the scope of capitalist production attended by an increase,
instead of a decrease, of constant capital. Even if the above fall of c
were due merely to a fall in prices, an individual capital would be able
to accomplish the transition from I to II only under very exceptional
circumstances. But in the case of two independent capitals invested in
different countries, or in different branches of agriculture or
extractive industry, it would be nothing out of the ordinary if in one
of the cases more labourers (and therefore more variable capital) were
employed and worked with less valuable or scantier means of production
than in the other case.

But let us drop the assumption that the wage remains the same, and let
us explain the rise of the variable capital from 20 to 30 through a rise
of wages by one-half. Then we shall have an entirely different case. The
same number of labourers — say, twenty — continue to work with the same
or only slightly reduced means of production. If the working-day remains
unchanged — say, 10 hours — then the total value produced also remains
unchanged. It was and remains = 30. But all of this 30 is now required
to make good the advanced variable capital of 30; the surplus-value
would disappear. We have assumed, however, that the rate of
surplus-value should remain constant, that is, the same as in I, at 50%.
This is possible only if the working-day is prolonged by one-half to 15
hours. Then the 20 labourers would produce a total value of 45 in 15
hours, and all conditions would be satisfied:

II. 90_(c) + 30_(v) + 15_(s); C = 120, s' = 50%, p' = 12½%.

In this case, the 20 labourers do not require any more means of labour,
tools, machines, etc., than in case I. Only the raw materials or
auxiliary materials would have to be increased by one-half. In the event
of a fall in the prices of these materials, the transition from I to II
might be more possible economically, even for an individual capital in
keeping with our assumption. And the capitalist would be somewhat
compensated by increased profits for any loss incurred through the
depreciation of his constant capital.

Now let us assume that the variable capital falls, instead of rising.
Then we have but to reverse our example, taking II as the original
capital, and passing from II to I.

II. 90_(c) + 30_(v) + 15_(s), then changes into
I. 100_(c) + 20_(v) + 10_(s), and it is evident that this transposition
does not in the least alter any of the conditions regulating the
respective rates of profit and their mutual relation.

If v falls from 30 to 20 because ⅓ fewer labourers are employed with the
growing constant capital, then we have before us the normal case of
modern industry, namely, an increasing productivity of labour, and the
operation of a larger quantity of means of production by fewer
labourers. That this movement is necessarily connected with a
simultaneous drop in the rate of profit will be developed in the third
part of this book.

If, on the other hand, v falls from 30 to 20, because the same number of
labourers is employed at lower wages, the total value produced would,
with the working-day unchanged, as before = 30_(v) + 15_(s) = 45. Since
v fell to 20, the surplus-value would rise to 25, the rate of
surplus-value from 50% to 125%, which would be contrary to our
assumption. To comply with the conditions of our case, the
surplus-value, with its rate at 50%, must rather fall to 10, and the
total value produced must, therefore, fall from 45 to 30, and this is
possible only if the working-day is reduced by ⅓. Then, as before, we
have:

100_(c) + 20_(v) + 10_(s); s' = 50%, p' = 8⅓%.

It need hardly be said that this reduction of the working-time, in the
case of a fall in wages, would not occur in practice. But that is
immaterial. The rate of profit is a function of several variable
magnitudes, and if we wish to know how these variables influence the
rate of profit, we must analyse the individual effect of each in turn,
regardless of whether such an isolated effect is economically
practicable with one and the same capital.

2) _s' constant, v variable, C changes through the variation of v._

This case differs from the preceding one only in degree. Instead of
decreasing or increasing by as much as v increases or decreases, c
remains constant. Under present-day conditions in the major industries
and agriculture the variable capital is only a relatively small part of
the total capital. For this reason, its increase or decrease, so far as
either is due to changes in the variable capital, are likewise
relatively small.

Let us again proceed with a capital:

I. 100_(c) + 20_(v) + 10_(s); C = 120, s' = 50%, p' = 8⅓%.

which would then change, say, into:

II. 100_(c) + 30_(v) + 15_(s); C = 130, s' = 50%, p' = 11 7/13%.

The opposite case, in which the variable capital decreases, would again
be illustrated by the reverse transition from II to I.

The economic conditions would be essentially the same as in the
preceding case, and therefore they need not be discussed again. The
transition from I to II implies a decrease in the productivity of labour
by one-half; for II the utilisation of 100 requires an increase of
labour by one-half over that of I. This case may occur in agriculture.
^([9])

But while the total capital remains constant in the preceding case,
owing to the conversion of constant into variable capital, or vice
versa, there is in this case a tie-up of additional capital if the
variable capital increases, and a release of previously employed capital
if the variable capital decreases.

3) _s' and v constant, c and therefore C variable._

In this case the equation changes from:

p' = s' (v/C) into p' = s' (v/C₁) ,

and after reducing the same factors on both sides, we have:

p'₁ : p' = C : C₁;

with the same rate of surplus-value and equal variable capitals, the
rates of profit are inversely proportional to the total capitals.

Should we, for example, have three capitals, or three different
conditions of the same capital:

I. 80_(c) + 20_(v) + 20_(s); C = 100, s' = 100%, p' = 20%;

II. 100_(c) + 20_(v) + 20_(s); C = 120, s' = 100%, p' = 16⅔%;

III. 60_(c) + 20_(v) + 20_(s); C = 80, s' = 100%, p' = 25%.

Then we obtain the proportions:

20% : 16⅔% = 120 : 100 and 20% : 25% = 80 : 100.

The previously given general formula for variations of v/C with a
constant s' was:

p'₁ = s' ev/EC ; now it becomes: p'₁ = s' v/EC ,

since v does not change, the factor e = v₁/v , becomes = 1.

Since s'v = s, the quantity of surplus-value, and since both s' and v
remain constant, it follows that s, too, is not affected by any
variation of C. The amount of surplus-value is the same after the change
as it was before it.

If c were to fall to zero, p' would = s', i.e., the rate of profit would
equal the rate of surplus-value.

The alteration of c may be due either to a mere change in the value of
the material elements of constant capital, or to a change in the
technical composition of the total capital, that is, a change in the
productivity of labour in the given branch of industry. In the latter
case, the productivity of social labour mounting due to the development
of modern industry and large-scale agriculture would bring about a
transition (in the above illustration) in the sequence from III to I and
from I to II. A quantity of labour which is paid with 20 and produces a
value of 40 would first utilise means of labour to a value of 60; if
productivity mounted and the value remained the same, the used up means
of labour would rise first to 80, and then to 100. An inversion of this
sequence would imply a decrease in productivity. The same quantity of
labour would put a smaller quantity of means of production into motion
and the operation would be curtailed, as may occur in agriculture,
mining, etc.

A saving in constant capital increases the rate of profit on the one
hand, and, on the other, sets free capital, for which reason it is of
importance to the capitalist. We shall make a closer study of this, and
likewise of the influence of a change in the prices of the elements of
constant capital, particularly of raw materials, at a later point.
[Present edition: Ch. V, VI. — Ed.]

It is again evident here that a variation of the constant capital
equally affects the rate of profit, regardless of whether this variation
is due to an increase or decrease of the material elements of c, or
merely to a change in their value.

4) _s' constant, v, c and C all variable._

In this case, the general formula for the changed rate of profit, given
at the outset, remains in force:

p'₁ = s' ev/EC .

It follows from this that with the rate of surplus-value remaining the
same:

a) The rate of profit falls if E is greater than e, that is, if the
constant capital is augmented to such an extent that the total capital
grows at a faster rate than the variable capital. If a capital of 80_(c)
+ 20_(v) + 20_(s) changes into 170_(c) + 30_(v) + 30_(s), then s'
remains = 100%, but v/C falls from 20/100 to 30/100, in spite of the
fact that both v and C have grown, and the rate of profit falls
correspondingly from 20% to 15%.

b) The rate of profit remains unchanged only if e = E, that is, if the
fraction v/C retains the same value in spite of a seeming change, i.e.,
if its numerator and denominator are multiplied or divided by the same
factor. The capitals 80_(c) + 20_(v) + 20_(s) and 160_(c) + 40_(v) +
40_(s) obviously have the same rate of profit of 20%, because s' remains
= 100% and v/C = 20/100 = 40/200 represents the same value in both
examples.

c) The rate of profit rises when e is greater than E, that is, when the
variable capital grows at a faster rate than the total capital. If
80_(c) + 20_(v) + 20_(s) turns into 120_(c) + 40_(v) + 40_(s), the rate
of profit rises from 20% to 25%, because with an unchanged s' (v/C) =
20/100 rises to 40/160, or from 1/5 to 1/4.

If the changes of v and C are in the same direction, we may view this
change of magnitude as though, to a certain extent, both of them varied
in the same proportion, so that v/C remained unchanged up to that point.
Beyond this point, only one of them would vary, and we shall have
thereby reduced this complicated case to one of the preceding simpler
ones.

Should, for instance, 80_(c) + 20_(v) + 20_(s) become 100_(c) + 30_(v) +
30_(s), then the proportion of v to c, and also to C, remains the same
in this variation up to : 100_(c) + 25_(v) + 25_(s). Up to that point,
therefore, the rate of profit likewise remains unchanged. We may then
take 100_(c) + 25_(v) + 25_(s) as our point of departure; we find that v
increased by 5 to become 30_(v), so that C rose from 125 to 130, thus
giving us the second case, that of the simple variation of v and the
consequent variation of C. The rate of profit, which was originally 20%,
rises through this addition of 5_(v) to 23 1/13 %, provided the rate of
surplus-value remains the same.

The same reduction to a simpler case can also take place if v and C
change their magnitudes in opposite directions. For instance, let us
again start with 80_(c) + 20_(v) + 20_(s), and let this become: 110_(c)
+ 10_(v) + 10_(s). In that case, with the change going as far as 40_(c)
+ 10_(v) + 10_(s), the rate of profit would remain the same 20%. By
adding 70_(c) to this intermediate form, it will drop to 8⅓%. Thus, we
have again reduced the case to an instance of change of one variable,
namely of c.

Simultaneous variation of v, c, and C, does not, therefore, offer any
new aspects and in the final analysis leads back to a case in which only
one factor is a variable.

Even the sole remaining case has actually been exhausted, namely that in
which v and C remain numerically the same, while their material elements
undergo a change of value, so that v stands for a changed quantity of
labour put in motion and c for a changed quantity of means of production
put in motion.

In 80_(c) + 20_(v) + 20_(s), let 20_(v) originally represent the wages
of 20 labourers working 10 hours daily. Then let the wages of each rise
from 1 to 1 ¼. In that case the 20_(v) will pay only 16 labourers
instead of 20. But if 20 labourers produce a value of 40 in 200
working-hours, 16 labourers working 10 hours daily will in 160
working-hours produce a value of only 32. After deducting 20_(v) for
wages, only 12 of the 32 would then remain for surplus-value. The rate
of surplus-value would have fallen from 100% to 60%. But since we have
assumed the rate of surplus-value to be constant, the working-day would
have to be prolonged by one-quarter, from 10 to 12½ hours. If 20
labourers working 10 hours daily = 200 working-hours produce a value of
40, then 16 labourers working 12½ hours daily = 200 hours will produce
the same value, and the capital of 80_(c) + 20_(v) would as before yield
the same surplus-value of 20.

Conversely, if wages were to fall to such an extent that 20v would
represent the wages of 30 labourers, then s would remain constant only
if the working-day were reduced from 10 to 6⅔ hours. For 20 × 10 = 30 ×
6⅔ = 200 working-hours.

We have already in the main discussed to what extent c may in these
divergent examples remain unchanged in terms of value expressed in money
and yet represent different quantities of means of production changed in
accordance with changing conditions. In its pure form this case would be
possible only by way of an exception.

As for a change in the value of the elements of c which increases or
decreases their mass but leaves the sum of the value of c unchanged, it
does not affect either the rate of profit or the rate of surplus-value,
so long as it does not lead to a change in the magnitude of v.

We have herewith exhausted all the possible cases of variation of v, c,
and C in our equation. We have seen that the rate of profit may fall,
remain unchanged, or rise, while the rate of surplus-value remains the
same, with the least change in the proportion of v to c or to C, being
sufficient to change the rate of profit as well.

We have seen, furthermore, that in variations of v there is a certain
limit everywhere beyond which it is economically impossible for s' to
remain constant. Since every one-sided variation of c must also reach a
certain limit where v can no longer remain unchanged, we find that there
are limits for every possible variation of v/C, beyond which s' must
likewise become variable. In the variations of s' which we shall now
discuss, this interaction of the different variables of our equation
will stand out still clearer.

II. S' VARIABLE

We obtain a general formula for the rates of profit with different rates
of surplus-value, no matter whether v/C remains constant or not, by
converting the equation:

p' = s' (v/C)

into

p'₁ = s'₁ (v₁/C₁) ,

in which p'₁, s'₁, v₁ and C₁ denote the changed values of p', s', v and
C. Then we have:

p' : p'₁ = s'₁ (v/C) : s'₁ (v₁/C₁) ,

and hence:

p'₁ = (s'₁/s₁) × v₁/v × C/C₁ × p'.

1) _s' variable, v/C constant._

In this case we have the equations:

p' = s' (v/C); p'₁ = s' (v/C) ,

in both of which v/C is equal. Therefore:

p' : p'₁ = s' : s'₁

The rates of profit of two capitals of the same composition are to each
other as the two corresponding rates of surplus-value. Since in the
fraction v/C it is not a question of the absolute magnitudes of v and C,
but only of their ratio, this applies to all capitals of equal
composition whatever their absolute magnitude.

80_(c) + 20_(v) + 20_(s); C = 100, s' = 100%, p' = 20%

160_(c) + 40_(v) + 20_(s); C = 200, s' = 50%, p' = 10%

100% : 50% = 20% : 10%.

If the absolute magnitudes of v and C are the same in both cases, the
rates of profit are moreover also related to one another as the amounts
of surplus-value:

p' : p'₁ = s'v : s'₁v = s : s₁.

For instance:

80_(c) + 20_(v) + 20_(s); s' = 100%, p' = 20%

80_(c) + 20_(v) + 10_(s); s' = 50%, p' = 10%

20% : 10% = 100 × 20 : 50 × 20 = 20_(s) : 10_(s).

It is now clear that with capitals of equal absolute or percentage
composition the rate of surplus-value can differ only if either the
wages, or the length of the working-day, or the intensity of labour,
differ. In the following three cases:

I. 80_(c) + 20_(v) + 10_(s); s' = 50%, p' = 10%

II. 80_(c) + 20_(v) + 20_(s); s' = 100%, p' = 20%

III. 80_(c) + 20_(v) + 40_(s); s' = 200%, p' = 40%

the total value produced in I is 30 (20_(v) + 10_(s)); in II it is 40;
in III it is 60. This may come about in three different ways.

_First_, if the wages are different, and 20_(v) stands for a different
number of labourers in every individual case. Suppose capital I employs
15 labourers 10 hours daily at a wage of £1⅓, who produce a value of
£30, of which £20 replace the wages and £10 are surplus-value. If wages
fall to £1, then 20 labourers may be employed for 10 hours; they will
produce a value of £40, of which £20 will replace the wages and £20 will
be surplus-value. Should wages fall still more, to £⅔, thirty labourers
may be employed for 10 hours. They will produce a value of £60, of which
£20 will be deducted for wages and £40 will represent surplus-value.

This case — a constant composition of capital in per cent, a constant
working-day and constant intensity of labour, and the rate of
surplus-value varying because of variation in wages — is the only one in
which Ricardo's assumption is correct:

"Profit would be high or low, _exactly in proportion_ as wages were low
or high." (_Principles_, Ch. I, Sect. III, p. 18 of the _Works_ of D.
Ricardo, ed. by MacCulloch, 1852.)

Or _second_, if the intensity of labour varies. In that case, say, 20
labourers working 10 hours daily with the same means of production
produce 30 pieces of a certain commodity in I, 40 in II, and 60 in III,
of which every piece, aside from the value of the means of production
incorporated in it, represents a new value of £1. Since every 20 pieces
= £20 make good the wages, there remain 10 pieces = £10 for
surplus-value in I, 20 pieces = £20 in II, and 40 pieces = £40 in III.

Or _third_, the working-day differs in length. If 20 labourers work with
the same intensity for 9 hours in I, 12 hours in II, and 18 hours in
III, their total products, 30 : 40 : 60 vary as 9 : 12 : 18. And since
wages = 20 in every case, 10, 20, and 40 respectively again remain as
surplus-value.

A rise or fall in wages, therefore, influences the rate of surplus-value
inversely, and a rise or fall in the intensity of labour, and a
lengthening or shortening of the working-day, act the same way on the
rate of surplus-value and thereby, with v/C constant, on the rate of
profit.

2) _s' and v variable, C constant._

The following proportion applies in this case:

p' : p'₁ = s' (v/C) : s' (v₁/C) = s'v : s'₁v₁ = s : s₁.

The rates of profit are related to one another as the respective amounts
of surplus-value.

Changes in the rate of surplus-value with the variable capital remaining
constant meant a change in the magnitude and distribution of the
produced value. A simultaneous variation of v and s' also always implies
a different distribution, but not always a change in the magnitude of
the produced value. Three cases are possible:

a) Variation of v and s' takes place in opposite directions, but by the
same amount; for instance:

80_(c) + 20_(v) + 10_(s); s' = 50%, p' = 10%

90_(c) + 10_(v) + 20_(s); s' = 200%, p' = 20%

The produced value is equal in both cases, hence also the quantity of
labour performed; 20_(v) + 10_(s) = 10_(v) + 20_(s) = 30. The only
difference is that in the first case 20 is paid out for wages and 10
remains as surplus-value, while in the second case wages are only 10 and
surplus-value is therefore 20. This is the only case in which the number
of labourers, the intensity of labour, and the length of the working-day
remain unchanged, while v and s' vary simultaneously.

b) Variation of s' and v also takes place in opposite directions, but
not by the same amount. In that case the variation of either v or s'
outweighs the other.

I. 80_(c) + 20_(v) + 20_(s); s' = 100%, p' = 20%

II. 72_(c) + 28_(v) + 20_(s); s' = 71 3/7%, p' = 20%

III. 84_(c) + 16_(v) + 20_(s); s' = 125%, p' = 20%.

Capital I pays for produced value amounting to 40 with 20v, II a value
of 48 with 28_(v), and III a value of 36 with 16_(v). Both the produced
value and the wages have changed. But a change in the produced value
means a change in the amount of labour performed, hence a change either
in the number of labourers, the hours of labour, the intensity of
labour, or in more than one of these.

c) Variation of s' and v takes place in the same direction. In that case
the one intensifies the effect of the other.

90_(c) + 10_(v) + 10_(s); s' = 100%, p' = 10%

80_(c) + 20_(v) + 30_(s); s' = 150%, p' = 30%

92_(c) + 8_(v) + 6_(s); s' = 75%, p' = 6%.

Here too the three values produced are different, namely 20, 50, and 14.
And this difference in the magnitude of the respective quantities of
labour reduces itself once more to a difference in the number of
labourers, the hours of labour, and the intensity of labour, or several
or all of these factors.

3) _s', v and C variable._

This case offers no new aspects and is solved by the general formula
given under II, in which s' is variable.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The effect of a change in the magnitude of the rate of surplus-value on
the rate of profit hence yields the following cases:

1) p' increases or decreases in the same proportion as s' if v/C remains
constant.

80_(c) + 20_(v) + 20_(s); s' = 100%, p' = 20%

80_(c) + 20_(v) + 10_(s); s' = 50%, p' = 10%

100% : 50% = 20% : 10%.

2) p' rises or falls at a faster rate than s' if v/C moves in the same
direction as s', that is, if it increases or decreases when s' increases
or decreases.

80_(c) + 20_(v) + 10_(s); s' = 50%, p' = 10%

70_(c) + 30_(v) + 20_(s); s' = 66⅔%, p' = 10%

50% : 66⅔% < 10% : 20%.

3) p' rises or falls at a slower rate than s' if v/C changes inversely
to s', but at a slower rate.

80_(c) + 20_(v) + 10_(s); s' = 50%, p' = 10%

90_(c) + 10_(v) + 15_(s); s' = 150%, p' = 15%

50% : 150% > 10% : 15%.

4) p' rises while s' falls, or falls while s' rises if v/C changes
inversely to, and at, a faster rate than, s'.

80_(c) + 20_(v) + 20_(s); s' = 100%, p' = 20%

90_(c) + 10_(v) + 15_(s); s' = 150%, p' = 15%.

s' has risen from 100% to 150%, p' has fallen from 20% to 15%.

5) Finally, p' remains constant whereas s' rises or falls, while v/C
changes inversely to, but in exactly the same proportion as, s'.

It is only this last case which still requires some explanation. We have
observed earlier in the variations of v/C that one and the same rate of
surplus-value may be expressed in very much different rates of profit.
Now we see that one and the same rate of profit may be based on very
much different rates of surplus-value. But while any change in the
proportion of v to C is sufficient to produce a difference in the rate
of profit so long as s is constant, a change in the magnitude of s must
lead to a corresponding inverse change of v/C in order that the rate of
profit remains the same. In the case of one and the same capital, or in
that of two capitals in one and the same country this is possible but in
exceptional cases. Assume, for example, that we have a capital of

80_(c) + 20_(v) + 20_(s); C = 100, s' = 100%, p' = 20%;

and let us suppose that wages fall to such an extent that the same
number of labourers is obtainable for 16v instead of 20v. Then, other
things being equal, and 4v being released, we shall have:

80_(c) + 16_(v) + 24_(s); C = 96, s' = 150%, p' = 25%.

In order that p' may now = 20% as before, the total capital would have
to increase to 120, the constant capital therefore rising to 104:

104_(c) + 16_(v) + 24_(s); C = 120, s' = 150%, p' = 20%.

This would only be possible if the fall in wages were attended
simultaneously by a change in the productivity of labour which required
such a change in the composition of capital. Or, if the value in money
of the constant capital increased from 80 to 104. In short, it would
require an accidental coincidence of conditions such as occurs in
exceptional cases. In fact, a variation of s' that does not call for the
simultaneous variation of v, and thus of v/C, is conceivable only under
very definite conditions, namely in such branches of industry in which
only fixed capital and labour are employed, while the materials of
labour are supplied by Nature.

But this is not so when the rates of profit of two different countries
are compared. For in that case the same rate of profit is, in effect,
based largely on different rates of surplus-value.

It follows from all of these five cases, therefore, that a rising rate
of profit may correspond to a falling or rising rate of surplus-value, a
falling rate of profit to a rising or falling rate of surplus-value, and
a constant rate of profit to a rising or falling rate of surplus-value.
And we have seen in I that a rising, falling, or constant rate of profit
may also accord with a constant rate of surplus-value.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The rate of profit, therefore, depends on two main factors — the rate of
surplus-value and the value-composition of capital. The effects of these
two factors may be briefly summed up as follows, by giving the
composition in per cent, for it is immaterial which of the two portions
of the capital causes the variation:

The rates of profit of two different capitals, or of one and the same
capital in two successive different conditions,

_are equal_

1) if the per cent composition of the capitals is the same and their
rates of surplus-value are equal;

2) if their per cent composition is not the same, and the rates of
surplus-value are unequal, provided the products of the rates of
surplus-value by the percentages of the variable portions of capitals
(s' by v) are the same, i.e., if the _masses_ of surplus-value (s = s'v)
calculated in per cent of the total capital are equal; in other words,
if the factors s' and v are inversely proportional to one another in
both cases.

_They are unequal_

1) if the per cent composition is equal and the rates of surplus-value
are unequal, in which case they are related as the rates of
surplus-value;

2) if the rates of surplus-value are the same and the per cent
composition is unequal, in which case they are related as the variable
portions of the capitals;

3) if the rates of surplus-value are unequal and the per cent
composition not the same, in which case they are related as the products
s'v, i.e., as the quantities of surplus-value calculated in per cent of
the total capital. ^([10])

.

Notes

9. The manuscript has the following note at this point: "Investigate
later in what manner this case is connected with ground-rent." _F. E._

10. The manuscript contains also very detailed calculations of the
difference between the rate of surplus-value and the rate of profit
(s'-p'), which has very interesting peculiarities, and whose movement
indicates where the two rates draw apart or approach one another. These
movements may also be represented by curves. I am not reproducing this
material, because it is of less importance to the immediate purposes of
this work, and because it is enough here to call attention to this fact
for readers who wish to pursue this point further. — _F.E._

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Transcribed for the Internet by Hinrich Kuhls

------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 4. The Effect of the Turnover on the Rate of Profit

 

The effect of the turnover on the production of surplus-value, and
consequently of profit, has been discussed in Book II. Briefly
summarised it signifies that owing to the time span required for
turnover, not all the capital can be employed all at once in production;
some of the capital always lies idle, either in the form of
money-capital, of raw material supplies, of finished but still unsold
commodity-capital, or of outstanding claims; that the capital in active
production, i.e., in the production and appropriation of surplus-value,
is always short by this amount, and that the produced and appropriated
surplus-value is always curtailed to the same extent. The shorter the
period of turnover, the smaller this idle portion of capital as compared
with the whole, and the larger, therefore, the appropriated
surplus-value, provided other conditions remain the same.

It has already been shown in detail in Book II [English edition: Vol.
II, pp. 293-98. — _Ed_.] how the quantity of produced surplus-value is
augmented by reductions in the period of turnover, or of one of its two
sections, in the time of production and the time of circulation. But
since the rate of profit only expresses the relation of the produced
quantity of surplus-value to the total capital employed in its
production, it is evident that any such reduction increases the rate of
profit. Whatever has been said earlier in Part II of Book II in regard
to surplus-value, applies equally to profit and the rate of profit and
needs no repetition here. We wish only to stress a few of the principal
points.

The chief means of reducing the time of production is higher labour
productivity, which is commonly called industrial progress. If this does
not involve a simultaneous considerable increase in the outlay of total
capital resulting from the installation of expensive machinery, etc.,
and thus a reduction of the rate of profit, which is calculated on the
total capital, this rate must rise. And this is decidedly true in the
case of many of the latest improvements in metallurgy and in the
chemical industry. The recently discovered methods of producing iron and
steel, such as the processes of Bessemer, Siemens, Gilchrist-Thomas,
etc., cut to a minimum at relatively small costs the formerly arduous
processes. The making of alizarin, a red dye-stuff extracted from
coal-tar, requires but a few weeks, and this by means of already
existing coal-tar dye-producing installations, to yield the same results
which formerly required years. It took a year for the madder to mature,
and it was customary to let the roots grow a few years more before they
were processed.

The chief means of reducing the time of circulation is improved
communications. The last fifty years have brought about a revolution in
this field, comparable only with the industrial revolution of the latter
half of the 18th century. On land the macadamised road has been
displaced by the railway, on sea the slow and irregular sailing vessel
has been pushed into the background by the rapid and dependable
steamboat line, and the entire globe is being girdled by telegraph
wires. The Suez Canal has fully opened East Asia and Australia to
steamer traffic. The time of circulation of a shipment of commodities to
East Asia, at least twelve months in 1847 (cf. Buch II, S. 235 [English
edition: Karl Marx, _Capital_, Vol. II, pp. 251-52. — _Ed_.]), has now
been reduced to almost as many weeks. The two large centres of the
crises of 1825-57, America and India, have been brought from 70 to 90
per cent nearer to the European industrial countries by this revolution
in transport, and have thereby lost a good deal of their explosive
nature. The period of turnover of the total world commerce has been
reduced to the same extent, and the efficacy of the capital involved in
it has been more than doubled or trebled. It goes without saying that
this has not been without effect on the rate of profit.

To single out the effect of the turnover of total capital on the rate of
profit we must assume all other conditions of the capitals to be
compared as equal. Aside from the rate of surplus-value and the
working-day it is also notably the per cent composition which we must
assume to be the same. Now let us take a capital A composed of 80_(c) +
20_(v) = 100 C, which makes two turnovers yearly at a rate of
surplus-value of 100%. The annual product is then:

160_(c) + 40_(v) + 40_(s). However, to determine the rate of profit we
do not calculate the 40s on the turned-over capital-value of 200, but on
the advanced capital of 100, and thus obtain p' = 40%.

Now let us compare this with a capital B = 160_(c) + 40_(v) = 200 C,
which has the same rate of surplus-value of 100%, but which is turned
over only once a year. The annual product of this capital is, therefore,
the same as that of A:

160_(c) + 40_(v) + 40_(s). But this time the 40s are to be calculated on
an advance of capital amounting to 200, which yields a rate of profit of
only 20%, or one-half that of A.

We find, then, that for capitals with an equal per cent composition,
with equal rates of surplus-value and equal working-days, the rates of
profit of the two capitals are related inversely as their periods of
turnover. If either the composition, the rates of surplus-value, the
working-day, or the wages, are unequal in the two compared cases, this
would naturally produce further differences in the rates of profit; but
these are independent of the turnover and, for this reason, do not
concern us at this point. They have already been discussed in Chapter
III.

The direct effect of a reduced period of turnover on the production of
surplus-value, and consequently of profit, consists of an increased
efficiency imparted thereby to the variable portion of capital, as shown
in Book II, Chapter XVI, "The Turnover of Variable Capital". This
chapter demonstrated that a variable capital of 500 turned over ten
times a year produces as much surplus-value in this time as a variable
capital of 5,000 with the same rate of surplus-value and the same wages,
turned over just once a year.

Take capital I, consisting of 10,000 fixed capital whose annual
depreciation is 10% = 1,000, of 500 circulating constant and 500
variable capital. Let the variable capital turn over ten times per year
at a 100% rate of surplus-value. For the sake of simplicity we assume in
all the following examples that the circulating constant capital is
turned over in the same time as the variable, which is generally the
case in practice. Then the product of one such period of turnover will
be:

100_(c) (depreciation) + 500_(c) + 500_(v) + 500_(s) = 1,600

and the product of one entire year, with ten such turnovers, will be

1,000_(c) (depreciation) + 5,000_(c) + 5,000_(v) + 5,000_(s) = 16,000,
C = 11,000, s = 5,000, p' = 5,000/11,000 = 45 5/11 %.

Now let us take capital II: 9,000 fixed capital, 1,000 annual wear and
tear, 1,000 circulating constant capital, 1,000 variable capital, 100%
rate of surplus-value, 5 turnovers of variable capital per year. Then
the product of each of the turnovers of the variable capital will be:

200_(c) (depreciation) + 1,000_(c) + 1,000_(v) + 1,000_(s) = 3,200,

and the total annual product after five turnovers:

1,000_(c) (depreciation) + 5,000_(c) + 5,000_(v) + 5,000_(s) = 16,000,
C = 11,000, s = 5,000, p' = 5,000/11,000 = 45 5/11 %

Further, take capital III with no fixed capital, 6,000 circulating
constant capital and 5,000 variable capital. Let there be one turnover
per year at a 100% rate of surplus-value. Then the total annual product
is:

6,000_(c) + 5,000_(v) + 5,000_(s) = 16,000,
C = 11,000, s = 5,000, p' = 5,000/11,000 = 45 5/11%.

In all the three cases we therefore have the same annual quantity of
surplus-value = 5,000, and, since the total capital is likewise equal in
all three cases, namely = 11,000, also the same rate of profit of 45
5/11%.

But should capital I have only 5 instead of 10 turnovers of its variable
part per year, the result would be different. The product of one
turnover would then be:

200_(c) (depreciation) + 500_(c) + 500_(v) + 500_(s) = 1,700.

And the annual product:

1,000_(c) (depreciation) + 2,500_(c) + 2,500_(v) + 2,500_(s) = 8,500,
C = 11,000, s = 2,500; p' = 2,500/11,000 = 22 8/11%.

The rate of profit has fallen one-half, because the period of turnover
has doubled.

The quantity of surplus-value appropriated in one year is therefore
equal to the quantity of surplus-value appropriated in one turnover of
the _variable_ capital multiplied by the number of such turnovers per
year. Suppose we call the surplus-value, or profit, appropriated in one
year S, the surplus-value appropriated in one period of turnover s, the
number of turnovers of the variable capital in one year n, then S = sn,
and the annual rate of surplus-value S' = s'n, as already demonstrated
in Book II, Chapter XVI, I. [English edition: Vol. II, p. 305. — _Ed_.]

It goes without saying that the formula p' = s' (v/C) = s' v/(c + v) is
correct only so long as the v in the numerator is the same as that in
the denominator. In the denominator v stands for the entire portion of
the total capital used on an average as variable capital for the payment
of wages. The v of the numerator is primarily only determined by the
fact that a certain quantity of surplus-value = s is produced and
appropriated by it, whose relation to it s/v, is m', the rate of
surplus-value. It is only along these lines that the formula p' = s/(c +
v) is transformed into the other: p' = s' v/(c + v). The v of the
numerator will now be more accurately determined by the fact that it
must equal the v of the denominator, that is, the entire variable
portion of capital C. In other words, the equation p' = (s/C) may be
correctly transformed into the equation p' = s' v/(c + v) only if s
stands for surplus-value produced in one turnover of the variable
capital. Should s be only a portion of this surplus-value, then s = s'v
is still correct, but this v is then smaller than the v in C = c + v,
because it is smaller than the entire variable capital expended for
wages. But should s stand for more than the surplus-value of one
turnover of v, then a portion of this v, or perhaps the whole of it,
serves twice, namely in the first and in the second turnover, and
eventually in subsequent turnovers. The v which produces the
surplus-value and represents the sum of all paid wages, is therefore
greater than the v in c + v and the calculation falls into error.

To make the formula precise for the annual rate of profit, we must
substitute the annual rate of surplus-value for the simple rate of
surplus-value, that is, substitute S' or s'n for s'. In other words, we
must multiply the rate of surplus-value s', or, what amounts to the same
thing, the variable capital v contained in C, by n, the number of
turnovers of this variable capital in one year. Thus we obtain p' = s'n
(v/C), which is the formula for the annual rate of profit.

The amount of variable capital invested in his business is something the
capitalist himself does not know in most cases. We have seen in Chapter
VIII of Book II, and shall see further along, that the only essential
distinction within his capital which impresses itself upon the
capitalist is that of fixed and circulating capital. He takes money to
pay wages from his cash-box containing the part of the circulating
capital he has on hand in the form of money, so far as it is not
deposited in a bank; he takes money from the same cash-box for raw and
auxiliary materials, and credits both items to the same cash-account.
And even if he should keep a separate account for wages, at the close of
the year this would only show the sum paid out for this item, hence vn,
but not the variable capital v itself. In order to ascertain this, he
would have to make a special calculation, of which we propose here to
give an illustration.

For this purpose we select the cotton spinnery of 10,000 mule spindles
described in Book I (S. 209/201) [English edition: p. 219. — _Ed_.] and
assume that the data given there for one week of April 1871, are in
force during the whole year. The fixed capital incorporated in the
machinery was £10,000. The circulating capital was not given. We assume
it to have been £2,500. This is a rather high estimate, but justified by
the assumption, which we must always make here, that no credit
operations were effected, hence no permanent or temporary employment of
other people's capital. The value of the weekly product was composed of
£20 for depreciation of machinery, £358 circulating constant advanced
capital (rent £6; cotton £342; coal, gas, oil, £10), £52 variable
capital paid out for wages, and £80 surplus-value. Therefore,

20_(c) (depreciation) + 358_(c) + 52_(v) + 80_(s) = 510.

The weekly advance of circulating capital therefore was 358_(c) + 52_(v)
= 410. In terms of per cent this was 87.3_(c) + 12.7_(v). For the entire
circulating capital of £2,500 this would be £2,182 constant and £318
variable capital. Since the total expenditure for wages in one year was
52 times £52, or £2,704, it follows that in a year the variable capital
of £318 was turned over almost exactly 8½ times. The rate of
surplus-value was 80/52 = 153 11/13. We calculate the rate of profit on
the basis of these elements by inserting the above values in the formula
p' = s'n (v/C) : s' = 153 11/13, n = 8½, v = 318, C = 12,500; hence:

p' = 153 11/13 × 8½ × 318/12,500 = 33.27%.

We test this by means of the simple formula p' = (s/C). The total annual
surplus-value or profit amounts to 52 times £80, or £4,160, and this
divided by the total capital of £12,500 gives us 33.28%, or almost an
identical result. This is an abnormally high rate of profit, which may
only be explained by extraordinarily favourable conditions of the moment
(very low prices of cotton along with very high prices of yarn), and
could certainly not have obtained throughout the year.

The s'n in the formula p' = s'n (v/C) stands, as has been said, for the
thing called in Book II [English edition: Vol. II, p. 295. — _Ed_.] the
annual rate of surplus-value. In the above case it is 153 11/13%
multiplied by 8½ or in exact figures, 1,307 9/18%. Thus, if a certain
Biedermann [Biedermann — Philistine. A pun, being also the name of the
editor of the _Deutsche Allgemeine Zeitung_. — _Ed_.] was shocked by the
abnormity of an annual rate of surplus-value of 1,000% used as an
illustration in Book II, he will now perhaps be pacified by this annual
rate of surplus-value of more than 1,300% taken from the living
experience of Manchester. In times of greatest prosperity, such as we
have not indeed seen for a long time, such a rate is by no means a
rarity.

For that matter we have here an illustration of the actual composition
of capital in modern large-scale industry. The total capital is broken
up into £12,182 constant and £318 variable capital, a sum of £12,500. In
terms of percent this is 97½c + 2½v = 100 C. Only one-fortieth of the
total, but in more than an eight-fold annual turnover, serves for the
payment of wages.

Since very few capitalists ever think of making calculations of this
sort with reference to their own business, statistics is almost
completely silent about the relation of the constant portion of the
total social capital to its variable portion. Only the American census
gives what is possible under modern conditions, namely the sum of wages
paid in each line of business and the profits realised. Questionable as
they may be, being based on the capitalist's own uncontrolled
statements, they are nevertheless very valuable and the only records
available to us on this subject. [In Europe we are far too delicate to
expect such revelations from our major capitalists. — _F.E_.]

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 5. Economy in the Employment of Constant Capital

 

I. In General

The increase of absolute surplus-value, or the prolongation of
surplus-labour, and thus of the working-day, while the variable capital
remains the same and thus employs the same number of labourers at the
same nominal wages, regardless of whether overtime is paid or not,
reduces the relative value of the constant capital as compared to the
total and the variable capital, and thereby increases the rate of
profit, again irrespective of the growth of the quantity of
surplus-value and a possibly rising rate of surplus-value. The volume of
the fixed portion of constant capital, such as factory buildings,
machinery, etc., remains the same, no matter whether these serve the
labour-process 16 or 12 hours. A prolongation of the working-day does
not entail any fresh expenditures in this, the most expensive portion of
constant capital. Furthermore, the value of the fixed capital is thereby
reproduced in a smaller number of turnover periods, so that the time for
which it must be advanced to make a certain profit is abbreviated. A
prolongation of the working-day therefore increases the profit, even if
overtime is paid, or even if, up to a certain point, it is better paid
than the normal hours of labour. The ever-mounting need to increase
fixed capital in modern industry was therefore one of the main reasons
prompting profit-mad capitalists to lengthen the working-day. ^([11])
The same conditions do not obtain if the working-day is constant. Then
it is necessary either to increase the number of labourers, and with
them to a certain extent the amount of fixed capital, the buildings,
machinery, etc., in order to exploit a greater quantity of labour (for
we leave aside deductions from wages or the depression of wages below
their normal level), or, if the intensity and, consequently, the
productivity of labour, increase and, generally, more relative
surplus-value is produced, the magnitude of the circulating portion of
constant capital increases in such industrial branches which use raw
materials, since more raw material, etc., is processed in a given time;
and, secondly, the amount of machinery set in motion by the same number
of labourers, therefore also this part of constant capital, increases as
well. Hence, an increase in surplus-value is accompanied by an increase
in constant capital, and the growing exploitation of labour by greater
outlays of the means of production through which labour is exploited,
i.e., by a greater investment of capital. Therefore, the rate of profit
is thereby reduced on the one hand while it increases on the other.

Quite a number of current expenses remain almost or entirely the same
whether the working-day is longer or shorter. The cost of supervision is
less for 500 working-men during 18 working-hours than for 750
working-men during 12 working-hours.

"The expense of working a factory 10 hours almost equals that of working
it 12." (Reports of Insp. of Fact., October 1848, p. 37.)

State and municipal taxes, fire insurance, wages of various permanent
employees, depreciation of machinery, and various other expenses of a
factory, remain unchanged whether the working-time is long or short. To
the extent to which production decreases, these expenses rise as
compared to the profit. (Reports of Insp. of Fact., October 1862, p.
19.)

The period in which the value of the machinery and of the other
components of fixed capital is reproduced is determined in practice not
by their mere lifetime, but by the duration of the entire labour-process
during which they serve and wear out. If the labourers must work 18
instead of 12 hours, this makes a difference of three days more per
week, so that one week is stretched into one and a half, and two years
into three. If this overtime is unpaid the labourers give away gratis a
week out of every three and a year out of every three on top of the
normal surplus-labour time. In this way, the reproduction of the value
of the machinery is speeded up 50% and accomplished in ⅔ of the usually
required time.

To avoid useless complications, we proceed in this analysis, and in that
of price fluctuations for raw materials (Chap. VI), from the assumption
that the mass and rate of surplus-value are given.

As already shown in the presentation of co-operation, division of labour
and machinery, the economy of production conditions [English edition:
Vol. I, pp. 324-25 — _Ed_.] found in large-scale production is
essentially due to the fact that these conditions prevail as conditions
of social, or socially combined, labour, and therefore as social
conditions of labour. They are commonly consumed in the process of
production by the aggregate labourer, instead of being consumed in small
fractions by a mass of labourers operating disconnectedly or, at best,
directly co-operating on a small scale. In a large factory with one or
two central motors the cost of these motors does not increase in the
same ratio as their horse-power and, hence, their possible sphere of
activity. The cost of the transmission equipment does not grow in the
same ratio as the total number of working machines which it sets in
motion. The frame of a machine does not become dearer in the same ratio
as the mounting number of tools which it employs as its organs, etc.
Furthermore, the concentration of means of production yields a saving on
buildings of various kinds not only for the actual workshops, but also
for storage, etc. The same applies to expenditures for fuel, lighting,
etc. Other conditions of production remain the same, whether used by
many or by few.

This total economy, arising as it does from the concentration of means
of production and their use _en masse_, imperatively requires, however,
the accumulation and co-operation of labourers, i.e., a social
combination of labour. Hence, it originates quite as much from the
social nature of labour, just as surplus-value originates from the
surplus-labour of the individual labourer considered singly. Even the
continual improvements, which are here possible and necessary, are due
solely to the social experience and observation ensured and made
possible by production of aggregate labour combined on a large scale.

The same is true of the second big source of economy in the conditions
of production. We refer to the reconversion of the excretions of
production, the so-called waste, into new elements of production, either
of the same, or of some other line of industry; to the processes by
which this so-called excretion is thrown back into the cycle of
production and, consequently, consumption, whether productive or
individual. This line of savings, which we shall later examine more
closely, is likewise the result of large-scale social labour. It is the
attendant abundance of this waste which renders it available again for
commerce and thereby turns it into new elements of production. It is
only as waste of combined production, therefore, of large-scale
production, that it becomes important to the production process and
remains a bearer of exchange-value. This waste, aside from the services
which it performs as new element of production, reduces the cost of the
raw material to the extent to which it is again saleable, for this cost
always includes the normal waste, namely the quantity ordinarily lost in
processing. The reduction of the cost of this portion of constant
capital increases _pro tanto_ the rate of profit, assuming the magnitude
of the variable capital and the rate of surplus-value to be given.

If the surplus-value is given, the rate of profit can be increased only
by reducing the value of the constant capital required for
commodity-production. So far as constant capital enters into the
production of commodities, it is not its exchange-value, but its
use-value alone, which matters. The quantity of labour which flax can
absorb in a spinnery does not depend on its value, but on its quantity,
assuming the productivity of labour, i.e., the level of technical
development, to be given. In like manner the assistance rendered by a
machine to, say, three labourers does not depend on its value, but on
its use-value as a machine. On one level of technical development a bad
machine may be expensive and on another a good machine may be cheap.

The increased profit received by a capitalist through the cheapening of,
say, cotton and spinning machinery, is the result of higher labour
productivity; not in the spinnery, to be sure, but in cotton cultivation
and construction of machinery. It requires smaller outlays of the
conditions of labour to incorporate a given quantity of labour, and
hence to extract a given quantity of surplus-labour. The costs required
to appropriate a certain quantity of surplus-labour diminish.

We have already mentioned savings yielded in the production process
through co-operative use of means of production by the aggregate, or
socially combined, labour. Other savings of constant capital arising
from the shortening of the time of circulation in which the development
of means of communication is a dominant material factor will be
discussed later. At this point we shall deal with the savings yielded by
continuous improvements of machinery, namely 1) of its material, e.g.,
the substitution of iron for wood; 2) the cheapening of machinery due to
the general improvement of machine-building; so that, although the value
of the fixed portion of constant capital increases continually with the
development of labour on a large scale, it does not increase at the same
rate ^([12]); 3) special improvements enabling existing machinery to
work more cheaply and effectively; for instance, improvements of
steam-boilers, etc., which will be discussed later on in greater detail;
4) reduction of waste through better machinery.

Whatever reduces the wear of machinery, and of fixed capital in general,
for any given period of production, cheapens not only the individual
commodity, in view of the fact that in its price every individual
commodity reproduces its aliquot share of this depreciation, but reduces
also the aliquot portion of the invested capital for this period. Repair
work, etc., to the extent that it becomes necessary, is added to the
original cost of the machinery. A reduction in repair costs, due to
greater durability of the machinery, lowers _pro tanto_ the price of
this machinery.

It may again be said of all these savings that they are largely possible
only for combined labour, and are often not realised until production is
carried forward on a still larger scale, so that they require an even
greater combination of labour in the immediate process of production.

However, on the other hand the development of the productive power of
labour in any _one_ line of production, e.g., the production of iron,
coal, machinery, in architecture, etc., which may again be partly
connected with progress in the field of intellectual production, notably
natural science and its practical application, appears to be the premise
for a reduction of the value, and consequently of the cost, of means of
production in _other_ lines of industry, e.g., the textile industry, or
agriculture. This is self-evident, since a commodity which is the
product of a certain branch of industry enters another as a means of
production. Its greater or lesser price depends on the productivity of
labour in the line of production from which it issues as a product, and
is at the same time a factor that not only cheapens the commodities into
whose production it goes as a means of production, but also reduces the
value of the constant capital whose element it here becomes, and thereby
one that increases the rate of profit.

The characteristic feature of this kind of saving of constant capital
arising from the progressive development of industry is that the rise in
the rate of profit in _one_ line of industry depends on the development
of the productive power of labour in _another_. Whatever falls to the
capitalist's advantage in this case is once more a gain produced by
social labour, if not a product of the labourers he himself exploits.
Such a development of productive power is again traceable in the final
analysis to the social nature of the labour engaged in production; to
the division of labour in society; and to the development of
intellectual labour, especially in the natural sciences. What the
capitalist thus utilises are the advantages of the entire system of the
social division of labour. It is the development of the productive power
of labour in its exterior department, in that department which supplies
it with means of production, whereby the value of the constant capital
employed by the capitalist is relatively lowered and consequently the
rate of profit is raised.

Another rise in the rate of profit is produced, not by savings in the
labour creating the constant capital, but by savings in the application
of this capital itself. On the one hand, the concentration of labourers,
and their large-scale co-operation, saves constant capital. The same
buildings, and heating and lighting appliances, etc., cost relatively
less for the large-scale than for small-scale production. The same is
true of power and working machinery. Although their absolute value
increases, it falls in comparison to the increasing extension of
production and the magnitude of the variable capital, or the quantity of
labour-power set in motion. The economy realised by a certain capital
within its own line of production is first and foremost an economy in
labour, i. e., a reduction of the paid labour of its own labourers. The
previously mentioned economy, on the other hand, is distinguished from
this one by the fact that it accomplishes the greatest possible
appropriation of other people's unpaid labour in the most economical
way, i. e., with as little expense as the given scale of production will
permit. Inasmuch as this economy does not rest with the previously
mentioned exploitation of the productivity of the social labour employed
in the production of constant capital, but with the economy in the
constant capital itself, it springs either directly from the
co-operation and social form of labour within a certain branch of
production, or from the production of machinery, etc., on a scale in
which its value does not grow at the same rate as its use-value.

Two points must be borne in mind here: It the value of c = zero, then p'
= s', and the rate of profit would be at its maximum. Second, however,
the most important thing for the direct exploitation of labour itself is
not the value of the employed means of exploitation, be they fixed
capital, raw materials or auxiliary substances. In so far as they serve
as means of absorbing labour, as media in or by which labour and, hence,
surplus-labour are materialised, the exchange-value of machinery,
buildings, raw materials, etc., is quite immaterial. What is ultimately
essential is, on the one hand, the quantity of them technically required
for combination with a certain quantity of living labour, and, on the
other, their suitability, i.e., not only good machinery, but also good
raw and auxiliary materials. The rate of profit depends partly on the
good quality of the raw material. Good material produces less waste.
Less raw materials are then needed to absorb the same quantity of
labour. Furthermore, the resistance to be overcome by the working
machine is also less. This partly affects even the surplus-value and the
rate of surplus-value. The labourer needs more time when using bad raw
materials to process the same quantity. Assuming wages remain the same,
this causes a reduction in surplus-labour. This also substantially
affects the reproduction and accumulation of capital, which depend more
on the productivity than on the amount of labour employed, as shown in
Book I (S. 627/619ff.) [English edition: p. 603. — _Ed_.].

The capitalist's fanatical insistence on economy in means of production
is therefore quite understandable. That nothing is lost or wasted and
the means of production are consumed only in the manner required by
production itself, depends partly on the skill and intelligence of the
labourers and partly on the discipline enforced by the capitalist for
the combined labour. This discipline will become superfluous under a
social system in which the labourers work for their own account, as it
has already become practically superfluous in piece-work. This fanatical
insistence comes to the surface also conversely in the adulteration of
the elements of production, which is one of the principal means of
lowering the relation of the value of the constant capital to the
variable capital, and thus of raising the rate of profit. Whereby the
sale of these elements of production above their value, so far as this
reappears in the product, acquires a marked element of cheating. This
practice plays an essential part particularly in German industry, whose
maxim is: People will surely appreciate if we send them good samples at
first, and then inferior goods afterward. However, as these matters
belong to the sphere of competition they do not concern us here.

It should be noted that this raising of the rate of profit by means of
lowering the value of the constant capital, i. e., by reducing its
expensiveness, does not in any way depend on whether the branch of
industry in which it takes place produces luxuries, or necessities for
the consumption of labourers, or means of production generally. This
last circumstance would only be of material importance if it were a
question of the rate of surplus-value, which depends essentially on the
value of labour-power, i. e., on the value of the customary necessities
of the labourer. But in the present case the surplus-value and the rate
of surplus-value have been assumed as given. The relation of
surplus-value to total capital — and this determines the rate of profit
— depends under these circumstances exclusively on the value of the
constant capital, and in no way on the use-value of the elements of
which it is composed.

A relative cheapening of the means of production does not, of course,
exclude the possible increase of their absolute aggregate value, for the
absolute volume in which they are employed grows tremendously with the
development of the productive power of labour and the attendant growth
of the level of production. Economy in the use of constant capital, from
whatever angle it may be viewed, is, in part, the exclusive result of
the fact that the means of production function and are consumed as joint
means of production of the combined labourer, so that the resulting
saving appears as a product of the social nature of directly productive
labour; in part, however, it is the result of developing productivity of
labour in spheres which supply capital with its means of production, so
that if we view the total labour in relation to total capital, and not
simply the labourers employed by capitalist X in relation to capitalist
Y, this economy presents itself once more as a product of the
development of the productive forces of social labour, with the only
difference that capitalist X enjoys the advantage not only of the
productivity of labour in his own establishment, but also of that in
other establishments. Yet the capitalist views economy of his constant
capital as a condition wholly independent of, and entirely alien to, his
labourers. He is always well aware, however, that the labourer has
something to do with the employer buying much or little labour with the
same amount of money (for this is how the transaction between the
capitalist and labourer appears in his mind). This economy in the
application of the means of production, this method of obtaining a
certain result with a minimum outlay appears more than any other inner
power of labour as an inherent power of capital and a method peculiar
and characteristic of the capitalist mode of production.

This conception is so much the less surprising since it appears to
accord with fact, and since the relationship of capital actually
conceals the inner connection behind the utter indifference, isolation,
and alienation in which they place the labourer vis-à-vis the means
incorporating his labour.

_First_, the means of production that make up the constant capital
represent only the money belonging to the capitalist (just as the body
of the Roman debtor represented the money of his creditor, according to
Linguet [_Théorie des loix civiles, ou principes fondamentaux de la
société_, tome II, Londres, 1767, livre V, chapitre XX. — _Ed_.]) and
are related to him alone, while the labourer, who comes in contact with
them only in the direct process of production, deals with them as
use-values of production only as means of labour and materials of
production. Increase or decrease of their value, therefore, has as
little bearing on his relations to the capitalist as the circumstance
whether he may be working with copper or iron. For that matter, the
capitalist likes to view this point differently, as we shall later
indicate, whenever the means of production gain in value and thereby
reduce his rate of profit.

_Second_, in so far as these means of production in the capitalist
production process are at the same time means of exploiting labour, the
labourer is no more concerned with their relative dearness or cheapness
than a horse is concerned with the dearness or cheapness of its bit and
bridle.

_Finally_, we have earlier [English edition: Vol. 1, p. 325. — _Ed_.]
seen that, in fact, the labourer looks at the social nature of his
labour, at its combination with the labour of others for a common
purpose, as he would at an alien power; the condition of realising this
combination is alien property, whose dissipation would be totally
indifferent to him if he were not compelled to economise with it. The
situation is quite different in factories owned by the labourers
themselves, as in Rochdale, for instance.

It scarcely needs to be mentioned, then, that as far as concerns the
productivity of labour in one branch of industry as a lever for
cheapening and improving the means of production in another, and thereby
raising the rate of profit, the general interconnection of social labour
affects the labourers as a matter alien to them, a matter that actually
concerns the capitalist alone, since it is he who buys and appropriates
these means of production. The fact that he buys the product of
labourers in another branch of industry with the product of labourers in
his own, and that he therefore disposes of the product of the labourers
of another capitalist only by gratuitously appropriating that of his
own, is a development that is fortunately concealed by the process of
circulation, etc.

Moreover, since production on a large scale develops for the first time
in its capitalist form, the thirst for profits on the one hand, and
competition on the other, which compels the cheapest possible production
of commodities, make this economy in the employment of constant capital
appear as something peculiar to the capitalist mode of production and
therefore as a function of the capitalist.

Just as the capitalist mode of production promotes the development of
the productive powers of social labour, on the one hand, so does it whip
on to economy in the employment of constant capital on the other.

However, it is not only the alienation and indifference that arise
between the labourer, the bearer of living labour, and the economical,
i.e., rational and thrifty, use of the material conditions of his
labour. In line with its contradictory and antagonistic nature, the
capitalist mode of production proceeds to count the prodigious
dissipation of the labourer's life and health, and the lowering of his
living conditions, as an economy in the use of constant capital and
thereby as a means of raising the rate of profit.

Since the labourer passes the greater portion of his life in the process
of production, the conditions of the production process are largely the
conditions of his active living process, or his living conditions, and
economy in these living conditions is a method of raising the rate of
profit; just as we saw earlier [English edition: Vol. I, pp. 231-302. —
_Ed_.] that overwork, the transformation of the labourer into a work
horse, is a means of increasing capital, or speeding up the production
of surplus-value. Such economy extends to overcrowding close and
unsanitary premises with labourers, or, as capitalists put it, to space
saving; to crowding dangerous machinery into close quarters without
using safety devices; to neglecting safety rules in production processes
pernicious to health, or, as in mining, bound up with danger, etc. Not
to mention the absence of all provisions to render the production
process human, agreeable, or at least bearable. From the capitalist
point of view this would be quite a useless and senseless waste. The
capitalist mode of production is generally, despite all its
niggardliness, altogether too prodigal with its human material, just as,
conversely, thanks to its method of distribution of products through
commerce and manner of competition, it is very prodigal with its
material means, and loses for society what it gains for the individual
capitalist.

Just as capital has the tendency to reduce the direct employment of
living labour to no more than the necessary labour, and always to cut
down the labour required to produce a commodity by exploiting the social
productiveness of labour and thus to save a maximum of directly applied
living labour, so it has also the tendency to employ this labour,
reduced to a minimum, under the most economical conditions, i.e., to
reduce to its minimum the value of the employed constant capital. If it
is the necessary labour-time which determines the value of commodities,
instead of all the labour-time contained in them, so it is the capital
which realises this determination and, at the same time, continually
reduces the labour-time socially necessary to produce a given commodity.
The price of the commodity is thereby lowered to its minimum since every
portion of the labour required for its production is reduced to its
minimum.

We must make a distinction in economy as regards use of constant
capital. If the quantity, and consequently the sum of the value of
employed capital, increases, this is primarily only a concentration of
more capital in a single hand. Yet it is precisely this greater quantity
applied by a single source — attended, as a rule, by an absolutely
greater but relatively smaller amount of employed labour — which permits
economy of constant capital. To take an individual capitalist, the
volume of the necessary investment of capital, especially of its fixed
portion, increases. But its value decreases relative to the mass of
worked-up materials and exploited labour.

This is now to be briefly illustrated by a few examples. We shall begin
at the end — the economy in the conditions of production, in so far as
these also constitute the living conditions of the labourer.

II. Savings In Labour Conditions At The Expense Of The Labourers.

_Coal mines. Neglect of indisputable outlays._

"Under the competition which exists among the coal-owners and
coal-proprietors ... no more outlay is incurred than is sufficient to
overcome the most obvious physical difficulties; and under that which
prevails among the labouring colliers, who are ordinarily more numerous
than the work to be done requires, a large amount of danger and exposure
to the most noxious influences will gladly be encountered for wages a
little in advance of the agricultural population round them, in an
occupation, in which they can moreover make a profitable use of their
children. This double competition is quite sufficient ... to cause a
large proportion of the pits to be worked with the most imperfect
drainage and ventilation; often with ill-constructed shafts, bad
gearing, incompetent engineers, and ill-constructed and ill-prepared
bays and roadways; causing a destruction of life, and limb, and health,
the statistics of which would present an appalling picture." (First
Report on Children's Employment in Mines and Collieries, etc., April 21,
1829, p. 102.)

About 1860, a weekly average of 15 men lost their lives in the English
collieries. According to the report on Coal Mines Accidents (February 6,
1862), a total of 8,466 were killed in the ten years 1852-61. But the
report admits that this number is far too low, because in the first few
years, when the inspectors had just been installed and their districts
were far too large, a great many accidents and deaths were not reported.
The very fact that the number of accidents, though still very high, has
decreased markedly since the inspection system was established, and this
in spite of the limited powers and insufficient numbers of the
inspectors, demonstrates the natural tendency of capitalist
exploitation.— These human sacrifices are mostly due to the inordinate
avarice of the mine owners. Very often they had only one shaft sunk, so
that apart from the lack of effective ventilation there was no escape
were this shaft to become obstructed.

Capitalist production, when considered in isolation from the process of
circulation and the excesses of competition, is very economical with the
materialised labour incorporated in commodities. Yet, more than any
other mode of production, it squanders human lives, or living-labour,
and not only blood and flesh, but also nerve and brain. Indeed, it is
only by dint of the most extravagant waste of individual development
that the development of the human race is at all safeguarded and
maintained in the epoch of history immediately preceding the conscious
reorganisation of society. Since all of the economising here discussed
arises from the social nature of labour, it is indeed just this directly
social nature of labour which causes the waste of life and health. The
following question suggested by factory inspector R. Baker is
characteristic in this respect:

"The whole question is one for serious consideration, and in what way
_this sacrifice of infant life occasioned by congregational labour_ can
be best averted?" (Reports of Insp. of Fact., October 1863, p. 157.)

_Factories_. Under this heading there is covered the disregard for
safety measures to ensure the security, comfort, and health of labourers
also in the actual factories. It is to blame for a large portion of the
casualty lists containing the wounded and killed industrial workers (cf.
the annual factory reports). Similarly, lack of space, ventilation, etc.

As far back as October 1855, Leonard Horner complained about the
resistance of very many manufacturers to the legal requirements
concerning safety devices on horizontal shafts, although the danger was
continually emphasised by accidents, many of them fatal, and although
these safety devices did not cost much and did not interfere with
production. (Reports of Insp. of Fact., October 1855, p. 6.) In their
resistance against these and other legal requirements the manufacturers
were openly seconded by the unpaid justices of the peace, who were
themselves mostly manufacturers or friends of manufacturers, and handed
down their decisions accordingly. What sort of verdicts these gentlemen
handed down was revealed by Superior Judge Campbell, who said with
reference to one of them, against which an appeal had been made to him:

"It is not an interpretation of the Act of Parliament, it is a repeal of
the Act of Parliament" (_loc. cit_., p. 11).

Horner states in the same report that in many factories labourers are
not warned when machinery is about to be started up. Since there is
always something to be done about machinery even when it is not
operating, fingers and hands are always occupied with it, and accidents
happen continually due to the mere omission of a warning signal (_loc.
cit_., p. 44). The manufacturers had a trades-union at the time to
oppose factory legislation, the so-called National Association for the
Amendment of the Factory Laws in Manchester, which in March 1855
collected more than £50,000 by assessing 2 shillings per horse-power, to
pay for the court proceedings against its members started by factory
inspectors, and to conduct the cases in the name of the union. It was a
matter of proving that killing was no murder [Allusion to the pamphlet
'Killing no Murder' which appeared in England in 1657. Its author was
the leveller Edward Sexby. — _Ed_.] when it occurred for the sake of
profit. A factory inspector for Scotland, Sir John Kincaid, tells about
a certain firm in Glasgow which used the iron scrap at its factory to
make protective shields for all its machinery, the cost amounting to £9
1s. Joining the manufacturers' union would have cost it an assessment of
£11 for its 110 horse-power, which was more than the cost of all its
protective appliances. But the National Association had been organised
in 1854 for the express purpose of opposing the law which prescribed
such protection. The manufacturers had not paid the least heed to it
during the whole period from 1844 to 1854. When the factory inspectors,
at instructions from Palmerston, then informed the manufacturers that
the law would be enforced in earnest, the manufacturers instantly
founded their association, many of whose most prominent members were
themselves justices of the peace and in this capacity were supposed to
enforce the law. When in April 1855 the new Minister of the Interior,
Sir George Grey, offered a compromise under which the government would
be content with practically nominal safety appliances the Association
indignantly rejected even this. In various lawsuits the famous engineer
William Fairbairn threw the weight of his reputation behind the
principle of economy and in defence of the freedom of capital which had
been violated. The head of factory inspection, Leonard Horner, was
persecuted and maligned by the manufacturers in every conceivable
manner.

But the manufacturers did not rest until they obtained a writ of the
Court of Queen's Bench, according to which the Law of 1844 did not
prescribe protective devices for horizontal shafts installed more than
seven feet above the ground and, finally, in 1856 they succeeded in
securing an Act of Parliament entirely satisfactory to them in the
circumstances, through the services of the bigot Wilson Patten, one of
those pious souls whose display of religion is always ready to do the
dirty work for the knights of the money-bag. This Act practically
deprived the labourers of all special protection and referred them to
the common courts for compensation in the event of industrial accidents
(sheer mockery in view of the excessive cost of English lawsuits), while
it made it almost impossible for the manufacturer to lose the lawsuit by
providing in a finely-worded clause for expert testimony. The result was
a rapid increase of accidents. In the six months from May to October
1858, Inspector Baker reported that accidents increased by 21% compared
with the preceding half-year. In his opinion 36.7% of these accidents
might have been avoided. It is true that the number of accidents in 1858
and 1859 was considerably below that of 1845 and 1846. It was actually
29% less although the number of labourers in the industries subject to
inspection had increased 20%. But what was the reason for this? In so
far as this issue has been settled now (1865), it was mainly
accomplished through the introduction of new machinery already provided
with safety devices to which the manufacturer did not object because
they cost him no extra expense. Furthermore, a few labourers succeeded
in securing heavy damages for their lost arms, and had this judgement
upheld even by the highest courts. (Reports of Insp. of Fact., April 30,
1861, p. 31, ditto April 1862, p. 17.)

So much for economy in devices protecting the life and limbs of
labourers (among whom many children) against the dangers of handling and
operating machinery.

_Work in enclosed places generally_. It is well known to what extent
economy of space, and thus of buildings, crowds labourers into close
quarters. In addition, there is also economy in means of ventilation.
Coupled with the long working-hours, the two cause a large increase in
diseases of the respiratory organs, and an attendant increase in the
death-rate. The following illustrations have been taken from Reports on
Public Health, 6th report, 1863. This report was compiled by Dr. John
Simon, well known from our Book I.

Just as combination and co-operation of labour permits large-scale
employment of machinery, concentration of means of production, and
economy in their use, it is this very working together _en masse_ in
enclosed places and under conditions rather determined by ease of
manufacture than by health requirements — it is this mass concentration
in one and the same workshop that acts, on the one hand, as a source of
greater profits for the capitalist and, on the other, unless
counteracted by a reduced number of hours and special precautions, as
the cause of the squandering of the lives and health of the labourers.

Dr. Simon formulates the following rule and backs it up with abundant
statistics:

"In proportion as the people of a district are attracted to any
collective indoor occupation, in such proportion, other things being
equal, the district death-rate by lung diseases will be increased" (p.
23). The cause is bad ventilation. "And probably in all England there is
no exception to the rule, that, in every district which has a large
indoor industry, the increased mortality of the workpeople is such as to
colour the death-return of the whole district with a marked excess of
lung disease" (p. 23).

Mortality figures for industries carried on in enclosed places,
collected by the Board of Health in 1860 and 1861, indicate that for the
same number of men between the ages of 15 and 55, for which the
death-rate from consumption and other pulmonary diseases in English
agricultural districts is 100, the death-rate in Coventry is 163, in
Blackburn and Skipton 167, Congleton and Bradford 168, Leicester 171,
Leek 182, Macclesfield 184, Bolton 190, Nottingham 192, Rochdale 193,
Derby 198, Salford and Ashton-under-Lyne 203, Leeds 218, Preston 220,
and Manchester 263 (p. 24). The following table presents a still more
striking illustration.

District

Chief industry

Deaths from pulmonary diseases between the ages of 15 and 25,
per 100,000 population

Men

Women

Berkhampstead

Straw plaiting (women)

219

578

Leighton Buzzard

Straw plaiting (women)

309

554

Newport Pagnell

Lace manufacture (women)

301

617

Towcester

Lace manufacture (women)

239

577

Yeovil

Manufacture of gloves (mainly women)

280

409

Leek

Silk industry (predominantly women)

437

856

Congleton

Silk industry (predominantly women)

566

790

Macclesfield

Silk industry (predominantly women)

593

890

Healthy country district

Agriculture

331

333

It shows the death-rate for pulmonary diseases separately for both sexes
between the ages of 15 and 25 computed for every 100,000 population. In
the districts selected only women are employed in industries carried on
in enclosed places, while men work in all other possible lines.

In the silk districts, where more men are employed in the factory, their
mortality is also higher. The death-rate from consumption, etc., for
both sexes, reveals, as the report says,

"the atrocious sanitary circumstances under which much of our silk
industry is conducted".

And it is in this same silk industry that the manufacturers, pleading
exceptionally favourable and sanitary conditions in their
establishments, demanded by way of an exception, and partially obtained,
long working-hours for children under 13 years of age (Buch I, Kap.
VIII, 6, S. 296/286) [English edition: Ch. X, 6, p. 293. — _Ed_.]

"Probably no industry which has yet been investigated has afforded a
worse picture than that which Dr. Smith gives of tailoring: — 'Shops
vary much in their sanitary conditions, but almost universally are
overcrowded and ill-ventilated, and in a high degree unfavourable to
health.... Such rooms are necessarily warm; but when the gas is lit, as
during the day-time on foggy days, and at night during the winter, the
heat increases to 80° and even to upwards of 90°, causing profuse
perspiration, and condensation of vapour upon the panes of glass, so
that it runs down in streams or drops from the roof, and the operatives
are compelled to keep some windows open, at whatever risk to themselves
of taking cold.' And he gives the following account of what he found in
16 of the most important West End shops.— 'The largest cubic space in
these ill-ventilated rooms allowed to each operative is 270 feet, and
the least 105 feet, and in the whole averages only 156 feet per man. In
one room, with a gallery running round it, and lighted only from the
roof, from 92 to upwards of 100 men are employed, where a large number
of gaslights burn, and where the urinals are in the closest proximity,
the cubic space does not exceed 150 feet per man. In another room, which
can only be called a kennel in a yard, lighted from the roof, and
ventilated by a small skylight opening, five to six men work in a space
of 112 cubic feet per man.' ... Tailors, in those atrocious workshops
which Dr. Smith describes, work generally for about 12 or 13 hours a
day, and at some times the work will be continued for 15 or 16 hours"
(pp. 25, 26, 28)

Numbers of persons employed

Branches of industry and locality

Death-rate per 100,000 between the ages of

25-35

35-45

45-55

958,265

Agriculture, England and Wales

743

805

1,145

22,301 men and

Tailoring, London

958

1,262

2,093

12,377 women

13,803

Type-setters and printers, London

894

1,747

2,367

(p. 30). It must be noted, and has in fact been remarked by John Simon,
chief of the Medical Department and author of the report, that the
mortality-rate for tailors, type-setters, and printers of London between
the ages of 25 and 35 was cited lower than the real figure, because
London employers in both lines of business have a large number of young
people (probably up to 30 years of age) from the country engaged as
apprentices and "improvers", i.e., men getting additional training.
These swell the number of hands for which the London industrial
death-rates are computed. But they do not proportionally contribute to
the number of deaths in London because their stay there is only
temporary. If they fall ill during this period, they return to their
homes in the country, where their death is registered if they die. This
circumstance affects the earlier ages still more and renders the London
death-rates for these age groups completely valueless as indexes of the
ill-effects of industry on health (p. 30).

The case of the type-setters is similar to that of the tailors. In
addition to lack of ventilation, to poisoned air, etc., there is still
night-work to be mentioned. Their regular working-time is 12 to 13
hours, sometimes 15 to 16.

"Great heat and foulness which begin when the gas-jets are lit. ... It
not infrequently happens that fumes from a foundry, or foul odours from
machinery or sinks, rise from the lower room, and aggravate the evils of
the upper one. The heated air of the lower rooms always tends to heat
the upper by warming the floor, and when the rooms are low, and the
consumption of gas great, this is a serious evil, and one only surpassed
in the case where the steam-boilers are placed in the lower room, and
supply unwished-for heat to the whole house.... As a general expression,
it may be stated that universally the ventilation is defective, and
quite insufficient to remove the heat and the products of the combustion
of gas in the evening and during the night, and that in many offices,
and particularly in those made from dwelling-houses, the condition is
most deplorable. ... And in some offices (especially those of weekly
newspapers) there will be work — work too, in which boys between 12 and
16 years of age take equal part of or almost uninterrupted periods of
two days and a night at a time; — while, in other printing-offices which
lay themselves out for the doing of 'urgent' business, Sunday gives no
relaxation to the workman, and his working-days become seven instead of
six in every week" (pp. 26, 28).

The milliners and dress-makers have already attracted our attention in
Book I (Kap. VIII, 3, S. 249/241) [English edition: Ch. X, 3, pp.
254-55. — _Ed_.] in respect to overwork. Their workshops are described
in our report by Dr. Ord. Even if better during the day, they become
overheated, foul, and unhealthy during the hours in which gas is burned.
Dr. Ord found in 34 shops of the better sort that the average number of
cubic feet per worker was as follows:

"... In four cases more than 500, in four other cases from 400 to 500,
... in seven others from 200 to 250, in four others from 150 to 200, and
in nine others only from 100 to 150. The largest of these allowances
would but be scanty for continuous work, unless the space were
thoroughly well ventilated; and, except with extraordinary ventilation,
its atmosphere could not be tolerably wholesome during gas-light."

And here is Dr. Ord's remark about one of the minor workshops which he
visited, operated for the account of a middleman:

"One room area in cubical feet, 1,280; persons present, 14; area to
each, in cubical feet, 91.5. The women here were weary-looking and
squalid; their earnings were stated to be 7s. to 15s. a week, and their
tea. ... Hours 8 a. m. to 8 p. m. The small room into which these 14
persons were crowded was ill-ventilated. There were two movable windows
and a fire-place, but the latter was blocked up and there was no special
ventilation of any kind" (p. 27).

The same report states with reference to the overwork of milliners and
dress-makers:

"... The overwork of the young women in fashionable dress-making
establishments does not, for more than about four months of the year,
prevail in that monstrous degree which has on many occasions excited
momentary public surprise and indignation; but for the indoor hands
during these months it will, as a rule, be of full 14 hours a day, and
will, when there is pressure, be, for days together, of 17 or even 18
hours. At other times of the year the work of the indoor hands ranges
probably from 10 to 14 hours; and uniformly the hours for outdoor hands
are 12 or 13. For mantle-makers, collar-makers, shirt-makers, and
various other classes of needleworkers (including persons who work at
the sewing-machine) the hours spent in the common workroom are fewer —
generally not more than 10 to 12 hours; but, says Dr. Ord, the regular
hours of work are subject to considerable extension in certain houses at
certain times, by the practice of working extra hours for extra pay, and
in other houses by the practice of taking work away from houses of
business, to be done after hours at home, both practices being, it may
be added, often compulsory" (p. 28).

John Simon remarks in a footnote to this page:

"Mr. Radcliffe, ... the Honorary Secretary of the Epidemiological
Society, ... happening to have unusual opportunities for questioning the
young women employed in first-class houses of business ... has found
that in only one out of twenty girls examined who called themselves
'quite well' could the state of health be pronounced good; the rest
exhibiting in various degrees evidences of depressed physical power,
nervous exhaustion, and numerous functional disorders thereupon
dependent. He attributes these conditions in the first place to the
length of the hours of work — the minimum of which he estimates at 12
hours a day out of the season; and secondarily to ... crowding and bad
ventilation of workrooms, gas-vapours, insufficiency or bad quality of
food, and inattention to domestic comfort."

The conclusion arrived at by the chief of the English Board of Health is
that

"it is practically impossible for workpeople to insist upon that which
in theory is their first sanitary right — the right that whatever work
their employer assembles them to do, shall, so far as depends upon him,
be, at his cost, divested of all needlessly unwholesome circumstances;
... while workpeople are practically unable to exact that sanitary
justice for themselves, they also (notwithstanding the presumed
intentions of the law) cannot expect any effectual assistance from the
appointed administrators of the Nuisances Removal Acts" (p. 29).—
"Doubtless there may be some small technical difficulty in defining the
exact line at which employers shall become subject to regulation. But
... in principle, the sanitary claim is universal. And in the interest
of myriads of labouring men and women, whose lives are now needlessly
afflicted and shortened by the infinite physical suffering which their
mere employment engenders, I would venture to express my hope, that
universally the sanitary circumstances of labour may, at least so far,
be brought within appropriate provisions of law, that the effective
ventilation of all indoor workplaces may be ensured, and that in every
naturally insalubrious occupation the specific health-endangering
influence may as far as practicable be reduced" (p. 31).

III. Economy In The Generation And Transmission Of Power, And In Buildings

In his October 1852 report L. Horner quotes a letter of the famous
engineer James Nasmyth of Patricroft, the inventor of the steam-hammer,
which, among other things, contains the following:

"...The public are little aware of the vast increase in driving power
which has been obtained by such changes of system and improvements (of
steam-engines) as I allude to. The engine power of this district
(Lancashire) lay under the incubus of timid and prejudiced traditions
for nearly forty years, but now we are happily emancipated. During the
last fifteen years, but more especially in the course of the last four
years (since 1848), some very important changes have taken place in the
system of working condensing steam-engines. ... The result ... has been
to realise a much greater amount of duty or work performed by the
identical engines, and that again at a very considerable reduction of
the expenditure of fuel. ... For a great many years after the
introduction of steam-power into the mills and manufactories of the
above-named districts, the velocity of which, it was considered proper
to work condensing steam-engines was about 220 feet per minute of the
piston; that is to say, an engine with a 5-feet stroke was restricted by
'rule' to make 22 revolutions of the crankshaft per minute. Beyond this
speed it was not considered prudent or desirable to work the engine; and
as all the mill gearing ... were made suitable to this 220 feet per
minute speed of piston, this slow and absurdly restricted velocity ruled
the working of such engines for many years. However, at length, either
through fortunate ignorance of the 'rule', or by better reasons on the
part of some bold innovator, a greater speed was tried, and as the
result was highly favourable, others followed the example, by, as it is
termed, 'letting the engine away', namely, by so modifying the
proportions of the first motion wheels of the mill gearing as to permit
the engine to run at 300 feet and upwards per minute, while the mill
gearing generally was kept at its former speed.... This 'letting the
engine away'... has led to the almost universal 'speeding' of engines,
because it was proved that not only was there available power gained
from the identical engines, but also as the higher velocity of the
engine yielded a greater momentum in the fly-wheel the motion was found
to be much more regular.... We ... obtain more power from a steam-engine
by simply permitting its piston to move at a higher velocity (pressure
of steam and vacuum in the condenser remaining the same).... Thus, for
example, suppose any given engine yields 40 horse-power when its piston
is travelling at 200 feet per minute, if by suitable arrangement or
modification we can permit this same engine to run at such a speed as
that its piston will travel through space at 400 feet per minute
(pressure of steam and vacuum, as before said, remaining the same), we
shall then have just double the power ... and as the pressure by steam
and vacuum is the same in both cases, the strain upon the parts of this
engine will be no greater at 400 than at 200 feet speed of piston, so
that the risk of 'break-down' does not materially increase with the
increase of speed. All the difference is, that we shall in such case
consume steam at a rate proportional to the speed of piston, or nearly
so; and there will he some small increase in the wear and tear of 'the
brasses' or rubbing-parts, but so slight as to be scarcely worth
notice.... But in order to obtain increase of power from the same engine
by permitting its piston to travel at a higher velocity it is requisite
... to bum more coal per hour under the same boiler, or employ boilers
of greater evaporating capabilities, i.e., greater steam-generating
powers. This accordingly was done, and boilers of greater
steam-generating or water-evaporating powers were supplied to the old
'speeded' engines, and in many cases near 100 per cent more work was got
out of the identical engines by means of such changes as above named.
About ten years ago the extraordinary economical production of power as
realised by the engines employed in the mining operations of Cornwall
began to attract attention; and as competition in the spinning trade
forced manufacturers to look to 'savings' as the chief source of
profits, the remarkable difference in the consumption of coal per
horsepower per hour, as indicated by the performance of the Cornish
engines, as also the extraordinary economical performance of Woolf's
double-cylinder engines, began to attract increased attention to the
subject of economy of fuel in this district, and as the Cornish and
double-cylinder engines gave a horse-power for every 3½ to 4 lbs of coal
per hour, while the generality of cotton-mill engines were consuming 8
or 12 pounds per horse per hour, so remarkable a difference induced
mill-owners and engine-makers in this district to endeavour to realise,
by the adoption of similar means, such extraordinary economical results
as were proved to be common in Cornwall and France, where the high price
of coal had compelled manufacturers to look more sharply to such costly
departments of their establishments. The result of this increased
attention to economy of fuel has been most important in many respects.
In the first place, many boilers, the half of whose surface had been in
the good old times of high profits left exposed quite naked to the cold
air, began to get covered with thick blankets of felt, and brick and
plaster, and other modes and means whereby to prevent the escape of that
heat from their exposed surface which had cost so much fuel to maintain.
Steam-pipes began to be 'protected' in the same manner, and the outside
of the cylinder of the engine felted and cased in with wood in like
manner. Next came the use of 'high steam', namely, instead of having the
safety-valve loaded so as to blow off at 4, 6, or 8 lbs to the square
inch, it was found that by raising the pressure to 14 or 20 lbs ... a
very decided economy of fuel resulted; in other words, the work of the
mill was performed by a very notable reduced consumption of coals, ...
and those who had the means and the boldness carried the increased
pressure and 'expansion system' of working to the full extent, by
employing properly constructed boilers to supply steam of 30, 40, 50,
60, and 70 lbs to the square inch; pressures which would have frightened
an engineer of the old school out of his wits. But as the economic
results of so increasing the pressure of steam... soon appeared in most
unmistakable £ s. d. forms, the use of high-pressure steam-boilers for
working condensing engines became almost general. And those who desired
to go to the full extent ... soon adopted the employment of the Woolf
engine in its full integrity, and most of our mills lately built are
worked by the Woolf engines, namely, those on which there are two
cylinders to each engine, in one of which the high-pressure steam from
the boiler exerts or yields power by its excess of pressure over that of
the atmosphere, which, instead of the said high-pressure steam being let
pass off at the end of each stroke free into the atmosphere, is caused
to pass into a low-pressure cylinder of about four times the area of the
former, and after due expansion passes to the condenser, the economic
result obtained from engines of this class is such that the consumption
of fuel is at the rate of from 3½ to 4 lbs. of coal per horse per hour;
while in the engines of the old system the consumption used to be on the
average from 12 to 14 lbs. per horse per hour. By an ingenious
arrangement, the Woolf system of double cylinder or combined low- and
high-pressure engine has been introduced extensively to already existing
engines, whereby their performance has been increased both as to power
and economy of fuel. The same result ... has been in use these eight or
ten years, by having a high-pressure engine so connected with a
condensing engine as to enable the waste steam of the former to pass on
to and work the latter. This system is in many cases very convenient.

"It would not be very easy to get an exact return as to the increase of
performance or work done by the identical engines to which some or all
of these improvements have been applied; I am confident, however, ...
that from the same weight of steam-engine machinery we are now obtaining
at least 50 per cent more duty or work performed on the average, and
that in many cases, the identical steam-engines which in the days of the
restricted speed of 220 feet per minute yielded 50 horse-power, are now
yielding upwards of 100. The very economical results derived from the
employment of high-pressure steam in working condensing steam-engines,
together with the much higher power required by mill extensions from the
same engines, has within the last three years led to the adoption of
tubular boilers, yielding a much more economical result than those
formerly employed in generating steam for mill engines." (Reports of
Insp. of Fact., October 1852, pp. 23-27.)

What applies to power generation also applies to power transmission and
working machinery.

"The rapid strides with which improvement in machinery has advanced
within these few years have enabled manufacturers to increase production
without additional moving power. The more economical application of
labour has been rendered necessary by the diminished length of the
working-day, and in most well-regulated mills an intelligent mind is
always considering in what manner production can be increased with
decreased expenditure. I have before me a statement, kindly prepared by
a very intelligent gentleman in my district, showing the number of hands
employed, their ages, the machines at work, and the wages paid from 1840
to the present time. In October 1840, his firm employed 600 hands, of
whom 200 were under 13 years of age. In October last, 350 hands were
employed, of whom 60 only were under 13; the same number of machines,
within very few, were at work, and the same sum in wages was paid at
both periods. " (Redgrave's Report in Reports of Insp. of Fact., Oct.
1852, pp. 58-59.)

These improvements of the machinery do not show their full effect until
they are used in new, appropriately arranged factories.

"As regards the improvement made in machinery, I may say in the first
place that a great advance has been made in the construction of mills
adapted to receive improved machinery.... In the bottom room I double
all my yarn, and upon that single floor I shall put 29,000 doubling
spindles. I effect a saving of labour in the room and shed of at least
10 per cent, not so much from any improvement in the principle of
doubling yarn, but from a concentration of machinery under a single
management; and I am enabled to drive the said number of spindles by one
single shaft, a saving in shafting, compared with what other firms have
to use to work the same number of spindles, of 60 per cent, in some
cases 80 per cent. There is a large saving in oil, and shafting, and in
grease.... With superior mill arrangements and improved machinery, at
the lowest estimate I have effected a saving in labour of 10 per cent, a
great saving in power, coal, oil, tallow, shafting and strapping."
(Evidence of a cotton spinner, Reports of Insp. of Fact., Oct. 1863, pp.
109, 110.)

IV. Utilisation Of The Excretions Of Production

The capitalist mode of production extends the utilisation of the
excretions of production and consumption. By the former we mean the
waste of industry and agriculture, slid by the latter partly the
excretions produced by the natural exchange of matter in the human body
and partly the form of objects that remains after their consumption. In
the chemical industry, for instance, excretions of production are such
by-products as are wasted in production on a smaller scale; iron filings
accumulating in the manufacture of machinery and returning into the
production of iron as raw material, etc. Excretions of consumption are
the natural waste matter discharged by the human body, remains of
clothing in the form of rags, etc. Excretions of consumption are of the
greatest importance for agriculture. So far as their utilisation is
concerned, there is an enormous waste of them in the capitalist economy.
In London, for instance, they find no better use for the excretion of
four and a half million human beings than to contaminate the Thames with
it at heavy expense.

Rising prices of raw materials naturally stimulate the utilisation of
waste products.

The general requirements for the re-employment of these excretions are:
large quantities of such waste, such as are available only in
large-scale production; improved machinery whereby materials, formerly
useless in their prevailing form, are put into a state fit for new
production; scientific progress, particularly of chemistry, which
reveals the useful properties of such waste. It is true that great
savings of this sort are also observed in small-scale agriculture, as
prevails in, say, Lombardy, southern China, and Japan. But on the whole,
the productivity of agriculture under this system obtains from the
prodigal use of human labour-power, which is withheld from other spheres
of production.

The so-called waste plays an important role in almost every industry.
Thus, the Factory Report for December 1863 mentions as one of the
principal reasons why the English and many of the Irish farmers do not
like to grow flax, or do so but rarely,

"the great waste ... which has taken place at the little water scutch
mills ... the waste in cotton is comparatively small, but in flax very
large. The efficiency of water steeping and of good machine scutching
will reduce this disadvantage very considerably.... Flax, scutched in
Ireland in a most shameful way, and a large percentage actually lost by
it, equal to 28 or 30 per cent" (Reports of Insp. of Fact., Dec. 1863,
pp. 139, 142)

whereas all this might be avoided through the use of better machinery.
So much tow fell by the wayside that the factory inspector reports:

"I have been informed with regard to some of the scutch mills in
Ireland, that the waste made at them has often been used by the
scutchers to burn on their fires at home, and yet it is very valuable"
(p. 140 of the above report).

We shall speak of cotton waste later, when we deal with the price
fluctuations of raw materials.

The wool industry was shrewder than the flax manufacturers.

"It was once the common practice to decry the preparation of waste and
woollen rags for re-manufacture, but the prejudice has entirely subsided
as regards the shoddy trade, which has become an important branch of the
woollen trade of Yorkshire, and doubtless the cotton waste trade will be
recognised in the same manner as supplying an admitted want. Thirty
years since, woollen rags, i.e., pieces of cloth, old clothes, etc., of
nothing but wool, would average about £4 4s. per ton in price: within
the last few years they have become worth £44 per ton, and the demand
for them has so increased that means have been found for utilising the
rags of fabrics of cotton and wool mixed by destroying the cotton and
leaving the wool intact, and now thousands of operatives are engaged in
the manufacture of shoddy, from which the consumer has greatly benefited
in being able to purchase cloth of a fair and average quality at a very
moderate price." (Reports of Insp. of Fact., Oct. 1863, p. 107.)

By the end of 1862 the rejuvenated shoddy made up as much as one-third
of the entire consumption of wool in English industry. (Reports of Insp.
of Fact., October 1862, p. 81.) The "big benefit" for the "consumer" is
that his shoddy clothes wear out in just one-third of the previous time
and turn threadbare in one-sixth of this time.

The English silk industry moved along the same downward path. The
consumption of genuine raw silk decreased somewhat between 1839 and
1862, while that of silk waste doubled. Improved machinery helped to
manufacture a silk useful for many purposes from this otherwise rather
worthless stuff.

The most striking example of utilising waste is furnished by the
chemical industry. It utilises not only its own waste, for which it
finds new uses, but also that of many other industries. For instance, it
converts the formerly almost useless gas-tar into aniline dyes,
alizarin, and, more recently, even into drugs.

This economy of the excretions of production through their re-employment
is to be distinguished from economy through the prevention of waste,
that is to say, the reduction of excretions of production to a minimum,
and the immediate utilisation to a maximum of all raw and auxiliary
materials required in production.

Reduction of waste depends in part on the quality of the machinery in
use. Economy in oil, soap, etc., depends on how well the mechanical
parts are machined and polished. This refers to the auxiliary materials.
In part, however, and this is most important, it depends on the quality
of the employed machines and tools whether a larger or smaller portion
of the raw material is turned into waste in the production process.
Finally, this depends on the quality of the raw material itself. This,
in turn, depends partly on the development of the extractive industry
and agriculture which produce the raw material (strictly speaking on the
progress of civilisation), and partly on the improvement of processes
through which raw materials pass before they enter into manufacture.

"Parmentier has demonstrated that the art of grinding grain has improved
very materially in France since a none too distant epoch, for instance
the time of Louis XIV, so that the new mills, compared to the old, can
make up to half as much more bread from the same amount of grain. The
annual consumption of a Parisian, indeed, has first been estimated at 4
_setiers_ of grain, then at 3, finally at 2, while nowadays it is only
1⅓ _setiers_, or about 342 lbs per capita.... In the Perche, where I
have lived for a long time, the crude mills of granite and trap rock
millstones have been mostly rebuilt according to the rules of mechanics
which has made such rapid progress in the last 30 years. They have been
provided with good millstones from La Ferté, have ground the grain
twice, the milling sack has been given a circular motion, and the output
of flour from the same amount of grain has increased 1/6. The enormous
discrepancy between the daily grain consumption of the Romans and
ourselves is therefore easily explained. It is due simply to imperfect
methods of milling and bread-making. This is the way I feel I must
explain a remarkable observation made by Pliny, XVIII, Ch. 20, 2: ..,
'The flour was sold in Rome, depending on its quality, at 40, 48 or 96
_as_ per modius. These prices, so high in proportion to the
contemporaneous grain prices, are due to the imperfect state of the
mills of that period, which were still in their infancy, and the
resultant heavy cost of milling."' (Dureau de la Malle, _Économie
Politique des Romains_, Paris, 1840, I, pp. 280-81.)

V. Economy Through Inventions

These savings in the application of fixed capital are, we repeat, due to
the employment of the conditions of labour on a large scale; in short,
are due to the fact that these serve as conditions of directly social,
or socialised labour or direct co-operation within the process of
production. On the one hand, this is the indispensable requirement for
the utilisation of mechanical and chemical inventions without increasing
the price of the commodity, and this is always the _conditio sine qua
non_. On the other hand, only production on a large scale permits the
savings derived from co-operative productive consumption. Finally, it is
only the experience of the combined labourer which discovers and reveals
the where and how of saving, the simplest methods of applying the
discoveries, and the ways to overcome the practical frictions arising
from carrying out the theory — in its application to the production
process — etc.

Incidentally, a distinction should be made between universal labour and
co-operative labour. Both kinds play their role in the process of
production, both flow one into the other, but both are also
differentiated. Universal labour is all scientific labour, all discovery
and all invention. This labour depends partly on the co-operation of the
living, and partly on the utilisation of the labours of those who have
gone before. Co-operative labour, on the other hand, is the direct
co-operation of individuals.

The foregoing is corroborated by frequent observation, to wit:

1) The great difference in the cost of the first model of a new machine
and that of its reproduction (regarding which, see Ure [_The Philosophy
of Manufactures_, Second edition, London, 1855. — _Ed_.] and Babbage
[_On the Economy of Machinery and Manufactures_, London, 1832, pp.
280-81. — _Ed_.]).

2) The far greater cost of operating an establishment based on a new
invention as compared to later establishments arising _ex suis ossibus_.
This is so very true that the trail-blazers generally go bankrupt, and
only those who later buy the buildings, machinery, etc., at a cheaper
price, make money out of it. It is, therefore, generally the most
worthless and miserable sort of money-capitalists who draw the greatest
profit out of all new developments of the universal labour of the human
spirit and their social application through combined labour.

Notes

11. "Since in all factories there is a very large amount of fixed
capital in buildings and machinery, the greater the number of hours that
machinery can be kept at work the greater will be the return." (Reports
of Insp. of Fact., 31st October, 1858, p. 8.)

12. Cf. Ure on the progress in factory construction.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

_Transcribed for the Internet by Hinrich Kuhls_

 

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 6. The Effect of Price Fluctuation

 

I. Fluctuations in the Price of Raw Materials, and their Direct Effects on the Rate of Profit

The assumption in this case, as in previous ones, is that no change
takes place in the rate of surplus-value. It is necessary to analyse the
case in its pure form. However, it might be possible for a specific
capital, whose rate of surplus-value remains unchanged, to employ an
increasing or decreasing number of labourers, in consequence of
contraction or expansion caused by such fluctuations in the price of raw
materials as we are to analyse here. In that case the quantity of
surplus-value might vary, while the rate of surplus-value remains the
same. Yet this should also be disregarded here as a side-issue. If
improvements of machinery and changes in the price of raw materials
simultaneously influence either the number of labourers employed by a
definite capital, or the level of wages, one has but to put together 1)
the effect caused by the variations of constant capital on the rate of
profit, and 2) the effect caused by variations in wages on the rate of
profit. The result is then obtained of itself.

But in general, it should be noted here, as in the previous case, that
if variations take place, either due to savings in constant capital, or
due to fluctuations in the price of raw materials, they always affect
the rate of profit, even if they leave the wage, hence the rate and
amount of surplus-value, untouched. They change the magnitude of C in s'
(v/C), and thus the value of the whole fraction. It is therefore
immaterial, in this case as well — in contrast to what we found in our
analysis of surplus-value — in which sphere of production these
variations occur; whether or not the production branches affected by
them produce necessities for labourers, or constant capital for the
production of such necessities. The deductions made here are equally
valid for variations occurring in the production of luxury articles, and
by luxury articles we here mean all production that does not serve the
reproduction of labour-power.

The raw materials here include auxiliary materials as well, such as
indigo, coal, gas, etc. Furthermore, so far as machinery is concerned
under this head, its own raw material consists of iron, wood, leather,
etc. Its own price is therefore affected by fluctuations in the price of
raw materials used in its construction. To the extent that its price is
raised through fluctuations, either in the price of the raw materials of
which it consists, or of the auxiliary materials consumed in its
operation, the rate of profit falls _pro tanto_. And vice versa.

In the following analysis we shall confine ourselves to fluctuations in
the price of raw materials, not so far as they go to make up the raw
materials of machinery serving as means of labour or as auxiliary
materials applied in its operation, but in so far as they enter the
process in which commodities are produced. There is just one thing to be
noted here: the natural wealth in iron, coal, wood, etc., which are the
principal elements used in the construction and operation of machinery,
presents itself here as a natural fertility of capital and is a factor
determining the rate of profit irrespective of the high or low level of
wages.

Since the rate of profit is s/C, or s/(c + v), it is evident that every
thing causing a variation in the magnitude of c, and thereby of C, must
also bring about a variation in the rate of profit, even if s and v, and
their mutual relation, remain unaltered. Now, raw materials are one of
the principal components of constant capital. Even in industries which
consume no actual raw materials, these enter the picture as auxiliary
materials or components of machinery, etc., and their price fluctuations
thus accordingly influence the rate of profit. Should the price of raw
material fall by an amount = d, then s/C, or s/(c + v) becomes s/(C -
d), or s/((c - d) + v). Thus, the rate of profit rises. Conversely, if
the price of raw material rises, then s/C, or s/(c + v), becomes s/(C +
d), or s/((c + d) + v), and the rate of profit falls. Other conditions
being equal, the rate of profit, therefore, falls and rises inversely to
the price of raw material. This shows, among other things, how important
the low price of raw material is for industrial countries, even if
fluctuations in the price of raw materials are not accompanied by
variations in the sales sphere of the product, and thus quite aside from
the relation of demand to supply. It follows furthermore that foreign
trade influences the rate of profit, regardless of its influence on
wages through the cheapening of the necessities of life. The point is
that it affects the prices of raw or auxiliary materials consumed in
industry and agriculture. It is due to an as yet imperfect understanding
of the nature of the rate of profit and of its specific difference from
the rate of surplus-value that, on the one hand, economists (like
Torrens [R. Torrens, _An Essay on the Production of Wealth_, London,
1821, p. 28 et seq. — _Ed_.]) wrongly explain the marked influence of
the prices of raw material on the rate of profit, which they note
through practical experience, and that, on the other, economists like
Ricardo [D. Ricardo, _On the Principles of Political Economy, and
Taxation_, Third edition, London, 1821, pp. 131-138. — _Ed_.], who cling
to general principles, do not recognise the influence of, say, world
trade on the rate of profit.

This makes clear the great importance to industry of this elimination or
reduction of customs duties on raw materials. The rational development
of the protective tariff system made the utmost reduction of import
duties on raw materials one of its cardinal principles. This, and the
abolition of the duty on corn, was the main object of the English
free-traders, who were primarily concerned with having the duty on
cotton lifted as well.

The use of flour in the cotton industry may serve as an illustration of
the importance of a price reduction for an article which is not strictly
a raw material but an auxiliary and at the same time one of the
principal elements of nourishment. As far back as 1837, R. H. Greg
^([13]) calculated that the 100,000 power-looms and 250,000 hand-looms
then operating in the cotton-mills of Great Britain annually consumed 41
million lbs of flour to smooth the warp. He added a third of this
quantity for bleaching and other processes, and estimated the total
annual value of the flour so consumed at £342,000 for the preceding ten
years. A comparison with flour prices on the continent showed that the
higher flour price forced upon manufacturers by corn tariffs alone
amounted to £170,000 per year. Greg estimated the sum at a minimum of
£200,000 for 1837 and cited a firm for which the flour price difference
amounted to £1,000 annually. As a result,

"great manufacturers, thoughtful, calculating men of business, have said
that ten hours' labour would be quite sufficient, if the Corn Laws were
repealed". (Reports of Insp. of Fact., Oct. 1848, p. 98.)

The Corn Laws were repealed. So were the duties on cotton and other raw
materials. But no sooner had this been accomplished than the opposition
of the manufacturers to the Ten Hours' Bill became more violent than
ever. And when the ten-hour factory day nevertheless became a law soon
after, the first result was a general attempt to reduce wages.

The value of raw and auxiliary materials passes entirely and all at one
time into the value of the product in the manufacture of which they are
consumed, while the elements of fixed capital transfer their value to
the product only gradually in proportion to their wear and tear. It
follows that the price of the product is influenced far more by the
price of raw materials than by that of fixed capital, although the rate
of profit is determined by the total value of the capital applied no
matter how much of it is consumed in the making of the product. But it
is evident — although we merely mention it in passing, since we here
still assume that commodities are sold at their values, so that price
fluctuations caused by competition do not as yet concern us — that the
expansion or contraction of the market depends on the price of the
individual commodity and is inversely proportional to the rise or fall
of this price. It actually develops, therefore, that the price of the
product does not rise in proportion to that of the raw material, and
that it does not fall in proportion to that of raw material.
Consequently, the rate of profit falls lower in one instance, and rises
higher in the other than would have been the case if products were sold
at their value.

Further, the quantity and value of the employed machinery grows with the
development of labour productivity but not in the same proportion as
this productivity, i. e., not in the proportion in which this machinery
increases its output. In those branches of industry, therefore, which do
consume raw materials, i. e., in which the subject of labour is itself a
product of previous labour, the growing productivity of labour is
expressed precisely in the proportion in which a larger quantity of raw
material absorbs a definite quantity of labour, hence in the increasing
amount of raw material converted in, say, one hour into products, or
processed into commodities. The value of raw material, therefore, forms
an ever-growing component of the value of the commodity-product in
proportion to the development of the productivity of labour, not only
because it passes wholly into this latter value, but also because in
every aliquot part of the aggregate product the portion representing
depreciation of machinery and the portion formed by the newly added
labour — both continually decrease. Owing to this falling tendency, the
other portion of the value representing raw material increases
proportionally, unless this increase is counterbalanced by a
proportionate decrease in the value of the raw material arising from the
growing productivity of the labour employed in its own production.

Further, raw and auxiliary materials, just like wages, form parts of the
circulating capital and must, therefore, be continually replaced in
their entirety through the sale of the product, while only the
depreciation is to be renewed in the case of machinery, and first of all
in the form of a reserve fund. It is, moreover, in no way essential for
each individual sale to contribute its share to this reserve fund, so
long as the total annual sales contribute their annual share. This shows
again how a rise in the price of raw material can curtail or arrest the
entire process of reproduction if the price realised by the sale of the
commodities should not suffice to replace all the elements of these
commodities. Or, it may make it impossible to continue the process on
the scale required by its technical basis, so that only a part of the
machinery will remain in operation, or all the machinery will work for
only a fraction of the usual time.

Finally, the expense incurred through waste varies in direct proportion
to the price fluctuations of the raw material, rising, when they rise
and falling when they fall. But there is a limit here as well. The
Factory Report for April 1850 maintained:

"One source of considerable loss arising from an advance in the price of
the raw material would hardly occur to any one but a practical spinner,
viz., that from waste. I am informed that when cotton advances, the cost
to the spinner, of the lower qualities especially, is increased in a
ratio beyond the advance actually paid, because the waste made in
spinning coarse yarns is fully 15 per cent; and this rate, while it
causes a loss of ½d. per lb. on cotton at 3½d. per lb., brings up the
loss to 1d. per lb. when cotton advances to 7d." (Reports of Insp. of
Fact., April 1850, p. 17.)

But when, as a result of the American Civil War, the price of cotton
rose to a level unequalled in almost 100 years, the report read
differently:

"The price now given for waste, and its re-introduction in the factory
in the shape of cotton waste, go some way to compensate for the
difference in the loss by waste, between Surat cotton and American
cotton, about 12½ per cent.

"The waste in working Surat cotton being 25 per cent, the cost of the
cotton to the spinner is enhanced one-fourth before he has manufactured
it. The loss by waste used not to be of much moment when American cotton
was 5d. or 6d. per lb., for it did not exceed ¾d. per lb., but it is now
of great importance when upon every lb. of cotton which costs 2s. there
is a loss by waste equal to 6d." ^([14]) (Reports of Insp. of Fact.,
Oct. 1863, p. 106.)

II. APPRECIATION, DEPRECIATION, RELEASE AND TIE-UP OF CAPITAL

The phenomena analysed in this chapter require for their full
development the credit system and competition on the world-market, the
latter being the basis and the vital element of capitalist production.
These more definite forms of capitalist production can only be
comprehensively presented, however, after the general nature of capital
is understood. Furthermore, they do not come within the scope of this
work and belong to its eventual continuation. Nevertheless the phenomena
listed in the above title may be discussed in a general way at this
stage. They are interrelated, first with one another and, secondly, also
with the rate and amount of profit. They are to be briefly discussed
here if only because they create the impression that not only the rate,
but also the amount of profit — which is actually identical with the
amount of surplus-value — could increase or decrease independently of
the movements of the quantity or rate of surplus-value.

Are we to consider release and tie-up of capital, on the one hand, and
its appreciation and depreciation, on the other, as different phenomena?

The question is what we mean by release and tie-up of capital?
Appreciation and depreciation are self-explanatory. All they mean is
that a given capital increases or decreases in value as a result of
certain general economic conditions, for we are not discussing the
particular fate of an individual capital. All they mean, therefore, is
that the value of a capital invested in production rises or falls,
irrespective of its self-expansion by virtue of the surplus-labour
employed by it.

By tie-up of capital we mean that certain portions of the total value of
the product must be reconverted into elements of constant and variable
capital if production is to proceed on the same scale. By release of
capital we mean that a portion of the total value of the product which
had to be reconverted into constant or variable capital up to a certain
time, becomes disposable and superfluous, should production continue on
the previous scale. This release or tie-up of capital is different from
the release or tie-up of revenue. If the annual surplus-value of an
individual capital C is, let us say, equal to x, then a reduction in the
price of commodities consumed by the capitalists would make x — a
sufficient to procure the same enjoyments, etc., as before. A portion of
the revenue = a is released, therefore, and may serve either to increase
consumption or to be reconverted into capital (for the purpose of
accumulation). Conversely, if x + a is needed to continue to live as
before, then this standard of living must either be reduced or a portion
of the previously accumulated income = a, expended as revenue.

Appreciation and depreciation may affect either constant or variable
capital, or both, and in the case of constant capital it may, in turn,
affect either the fixed, or the circulating portion, or both.

Under constant capital we must consider the raw and auxiliary materials,
including semi-finished products, all of which we here include under the
term of raw materials, machinery, and other fixed capital.

In the preceding analysis we referred especially to variations in the
price, or the value, of raw materials in respect to their influence on
the rate of profit, and determined the general law that with other
conditions being equal, the rate of profit is inversely proportional to
the value of the raw materials. This is absolutely true for capital
newly invested in a business enterprise, in which the investment, i. e.,
the conversion of money into productive capital, is only just taking
place.

But aside from this capital, which is being newly invested, a large
portion of the already functioning capital is in the sphere of
circulation, while another portion is in the sphere of production. One
portion is in the market in the shape of commodities waiting to be
converted into money; another is on hand as money, in whatever form,
waiting to be reconverted into elements of production; finally, a third
portion is in the sphere of production, partly in its original form of
means of production such as raw and auxiliary materials, semi-finished
products purchased in the market, machinery and other fixed capital, and
partly in the form of products which are in the process of manufacture.
The effect of appreciation or depreciation depends here to a great
extent on the relative proportion of these component parts. Let us, for
the sake of simplicity, leave aside all fixed capital and consider only
that portion of constant capital which consists of raw and auxiliary
materials, and semi-finished products, and both finished commodities in
the market and commodities still in the process of production.

If the price of raw material, for instance of cotton, rises, then the
price of cotton goods — both semi-finished goods like yarn and finished
goods like cotton fabrics — manufactured while cotton was cheaper, rises
also. So does the value of the unprocessed cotton held in stock, and of
the cotton in the process of manufacture. The latter because it comes to
represent more labour-time in retrospect and thus adds more than its
original value to the product which it enters, and more than the
capitalist paid for it.

Hence, if the price of raw materials rises, and there is a considerable
quantity of available finished commodities in the market, no matter what
the stage of their manufacture, the value of these commodities rises,
thereby enhancing the value of the existing capital. The same is true
for the supply of raw materials, etc., in the hands of the producer.
This appreciation of value may compensate, or more than compensate, the
individual capitalist, or even an entire separate sphere of capitalist
production, for the drop in the rate of profit attending a rise in the
price of raw materials. Without entering into the detailed effects of
competition, we might state for the sake of thoroughness that 1) if
available supplies of raw material are considerable, they tend to
counteract the price increase which occurred at the place of their
origin; 2) if the semi-finished and finished goods press very heavily
upon the market, their price is thereby prevented from rising
proportionately to the price of their raw materials.

The reverse takes place when the price of raw material falls. Other
circumstances remaining the same, this increases the rate of profit. The
commodities in the market, the articles in the process of production,
and the available supplies of raw material, depreciate in value and
thereby counteract the attendant rise in the rate of profit.

The effect of price variations for raw materials is the more pronounced,
the smaller the supplies available in the sphere of production and in
the market at, say, the close of a business year, i.e., after the
harvest in agriculture, when great quantities of raw materials are
delivered anew.

We proceed in this entire analysis from the assumption that the rise or
fall in prices expresses actual fluctuations in value. But since we are
here concerned with the effects such price variations have on the rate
of profit, it matters little what is at the bottom of them. The present
statements apply equally if prices rise or fall under the influence of
the credit system, competition, etc., and not on account of fluctuations
in value.

Since the rate of profit equals the ratio of the excess over the value
of the product to the value of the total capital advanced, a rise caused
in the rate of profit by a depreciation of the advanced capital would be
associated with a loss in the value of capital. Similarly, a drop caused
in the rate of profit by an appreciation of the advanced capital might
possibly be associated with a gain.

As for the other portion of constant capital, such as machinery and
fixed capital in general, the appreciation of value taking place in it
with respect mainly to buildings, real estate, etc., cannot be discussed
without the theory of ground-rent, and does not therefore belong in this
chapter. But of a general importance to the question of depreciation
are:

The continual improvements which lower the use-value, and therefore the
value, of existing machinery, factory buildings, etc. This process has a
particularly dire effect during the first period of newly introduced
machinery, before it attains a certain stage of maturity, when it
continually becomes antiquated before it has time to reproduce its own
value. This is one of the reasons for the flagrant prolongation of the
working-time usual in such periods, for alternating day and
night-shifts, so that the value of the machinery may be reproduced in a
shorter time without having to place the figures for wear and tear too
high. If, on the other hand, the short period in which the machinery is
effective (its short life vis-à-vis the anticipated improvements) is not
compensated in this manner, it gives up so much of its value to the
product through moral depreciation that it cannot compete even with
hand-labour.^([15])

After machinery, equipment of buildings, and fixed capital in general,
attain a certain maturity, so that they remain unaltered for some length
of time at least in their basic construction, there arises a similar
depreciation due to improvements in the methods of reproducing this
fixed capital. The value of the machinery, etc., falls in this case not
so much because the machinery is rapidly crowded out and depreciated to
a certain degree by new and more productive machinery, etc., but because
it can be reproduced more cheaply. This is one of the reasons why large
enterprises frequently do not flourish until they pass into other hands,
i. e., after their first proprietors have been bankrupted, and their
successors, who buy them cheaply, therefore begin from the outset with a
smaller outlay of capital.

It leaps to the eye, particularly in the case of agriculture, that the
causes which raise or lower the price of a product, also raise or lower
the value of capital, since the latter consists to a large degree of
this product, whether as grain, cattle, etc. (Ricardo [D. Ricardo, _On
the Principles of Political Economy, and Taxation_, Third edition,
London, 1821, Chapter II. — _Ed_.]).

------------------------------------------------------------------------

There is still variable capital to be considered.

Inasmuch as the value of labour-power rises because there is a rise in
the value of the means of subsistence required for its reproduction, or
falls because there is a reduction in their value — and the appreciation
and depreciation of variable capital are really nothing more than
expressions of these two cases — a drop in surplus-value corresponds to
such appreciation and an increase in surplus-value to such depreciation,
provided the length of the working-day remains the same. But other
circumstances — the release and tie-up of capital — may also be
associated with such cases, and since we have not analysed them so far,
we shall briefly mention them now.

If wages fall in consequence of a depreciation in the value of
labour-power (which may even be attended by a rise in the real price of
labour), a portion of the capital hitherto invested in wages is
released. Variable capital is set free. In the case of new investments
of capital, this has simply the effect of its operating with a higher
rate of surplus-value. It takes less money than before to set in motion
the same amount of labour, and in this way the unpaid portion of labour
increases at the expense of the paid portion. But in the case of already
invested capital, not only does the rate of surplus-value rise but a
portion of the capital previously invested in wages is also released.
Until this time it was tied up and formed a regular portion which had to
be deducted from the proceeds for the product and advanced for wages,
acting as variable capital if the business were to continue on its
former scale. Now this portion is set free and may be used as a new
investment, be it to extend the same business or to operate in some
other sphere of production.

Let us assume, for instance, that £500 per week were required at first
to employ 500 labourers, and that now only £400 are needed for the same
purpose. If the quantity of value produced in either case = £1,000, the
amount of weekly surplus-value in the first case = £500 and the rate of
surplus-value 500/500 = 100%. But after the wage reduction the quantity
of surplus-value £1,000 - £400 = £600, and its rate 600/400 = 150%. And
this increase in the rate of surplus-value is the only effect for one
who starts a new enterprise in this sphere of production with a variable
capital of £400 and a corresponding constant capital. But when this
takes place in a business already in operation, the depreciation of the
variable capital does not only increase the quantity of surplus-value
from £500 to £600, and the rate of surplus-value from 100 to 150%, but
releases £100 of the variable capital for the further exploitation of
labour. Hence, the same amount of labour is exploited to greater
advantage, and, what is more, the release of £100 makes it possible to
exploit more labourers than before at the higher rate with the same
variable capital of £500.

Now the reverse situation. Suppose, with 500 employed labourers, the
original proportion in which the product is divided = 400v + 600s =
1,000, making the rate of surplus-value = 150%. In that case, the
labourer receives £4/5 , or 16 shillings per week. Should 500 labourers
cost £500 per week, due to an appreciation of variable capital, each one
of them will receive a weekly wage = £1, and £400 can employ only 400
labourers. If the same number of labourers as before is put to work,
therefore, we have 500_(v) + 500_(s) = 1,000. The rate of surplus-value
would fall from 150 to 100%, which is ⅓. In the case of new capital the
only effect would be this lower rate of surplus-value. Other conditions
being equal, the rate of profit would also have fallen accordingly,
although not in the same proportion. For instance, if c = 2,000, we have
in the one case 2,000_(c) + 400_(v) + 600_(s) = 3,000. The rate of
surplus-value = 150%, the rate of profit = 600/2,400 = 25%. In the
second case, 2,000_(c) + 500_(v) + 500_(s) = 3,000. The rate of
surplus-value = 100%, the rate of profit = 500/2,500 = 20%. In the case
of already invested capital, however, there would be a dual effect. Only
400 labourers could be employed with a £400 variable capital, and that
at a rate of surplus-value of 100%. They would therefore produce an
aggregate surplus-value of only £400. Furthermore, since a constant
capital of £2,000 requires 500 labourers for its operation, 400
labourers can put into motion only a constant capital of £1,600. For
production to continue on the same scale, so that 1/5 of the machinery
does not stand idle, £100 must be added to the variable capital in order
to employ 500 labourers as before. And this can be accomplished only by
tying up hitherto disposable capital, so that part of the accumulation
intended to extend production serves merely to stop a gap, or a portion
reserved for revenue is added to the old capital. Then a variable
capital increased by £100 produces £100 less surplus-value. More capital
is required to employ the same number of labourers, and at the same time
the surplus-value produced by each labourer is reduced.

The advantages resulting from a release and the disadvantages resulting
from a tie-up of variable capital both exist only for capital already
engaged and reproducing itself under certain given conditions. For newly
invested capital the advantages on the one hand, and the disadvantages
on the other, are confined to an increase or drop in the rate of
surplus-value, and to a corresponding, if in no way proportionate,
change in the rate of profit.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The release and tie-up of variable capital, just analysed, is the result
of a depreciation or appreciation of the elements of variable capital,
that is, of the cost of reproducing labour-power.

But variable capital could also be released if, with the wage rate
unchanged, fewer labourers were required due to the development of
labour productivity to set in motion the same amount of constant
capital. In like manner, there may reversely be a tie-up of additional
variable capital if more labourers are required for the same quantity of
constant capital due to a drop in productivity. If, on the other hand, a
portion of capital formerly employed as variable capital is employed in
the form of constant capital, so that merely a different distribution
exists between the components of the same capital, this has an influence
on both the rate of surplus-value and the rate of profit, but does not
belong under the heading of tie-up and release of capital, which is here
being discussed.

We have already seen that constant capital may also be tied up or
released by the appreciation or depreciation of its component elements.
Aside from this, it can be tied up only if the productive power of
labour increases (provided a portion of the variable is not converted
into constant capital), so that the same amount of labour creates a
greater product and therefore sets in motion a larger constant capital.
The same may occur under certain circumstances if productivity
decreases, for instance in agriculture, so that the same quantity of
labour requires more means of production, such as seeds or manure,
drainage, etc., in order to produce the same output. Constant capital
may be released without depreciation if improvements, utilisation of the
forces of Nature, etc., enable a constant capital of smaller value to
technically perform the same services as were formerly performed by a
constant capital of greater value.

We have seen in Book II [English edition: Vol. II, Part III. — _Ed_.]
that once commodities have been converted into money, or sold, a certain
portion of this money must be reconverted into the material elements of
constant capital, and in the proportions required by the technical
nature of the particular sphere of production. In this respect, the most
important element in all branches — aside from wages, i. e., variable
capital — is raw material, including auxiliary material, which is
particularly important in such lines of production as do not involve raw
materials in the strict sense of the term, for instance in mining and
the extractive industries in general. That portion of the price which is
to make good the wear and tear of machinery enters the accounts chiefly
nominally so long as the machinery is at all in an operating condition.
It does not greatly matter whether it is paid for and replaced by money
one day or the next, or at any other stage of the period of turnover of
the capital. It is quite different in the case of the raw material. If
the price of raw material rises, it may be impossible to make it good
fully out of the price of the commodities after wages are deducted.
Violent price fluctuations therefore cause interruptions, great
collisions, even catastrophes, in the process of reproduction. It is
especially agricultural produce proper, i. e., raw materials taken from
organic nature, which — leaving aside the credit system for the present
— is subject to such fluctuations of value in consequence of changing
yields, etc. Due to uncontrollable natural conditions, favourable or
unfavourable seasons, etc., the same quantity of labour may be
represented in very different quantities of use-values, and a definite
quantity of these use-values may therefore have very different prices.
If the value x is represented by 100 lbs of the commodity a, then the
price of one lb. of a = x/100; if it is represented by 1,000 lbs of a,
the price of one lb. of a = x/1,000, etc. This is therefore one of the
elements of these fluctuations in the price of raw materials. A second
element, mentioned at this point only for the sake of completeness —
since competition and the credit system are still outside the scope of
our analysis — is this: It is, in the nature of things that vegetable
and animal substances whose growth and production are subject to certain
organic laws and bound up with definite natural time periods, cannot be
suddenly augmented in the same degree as, for instance, machines and
other fixed capital, or coal, ore, etc., whose reproduction can,
provided the natural conditions do not change, be rapidly accomplished
in an industrially developed country. It is therefore quite possible,
and under a developed system of capitalist production even inevitable,
that the production and increase of the portion of constant capital
consisting of fixed capital, machinery, etc., should considerably
outstrip the portion consisting of organic raw materials, so that demand
for the latter grows more rapidly than their supply, causing their price
to rise. Rising prices actually cause 1) these raw materials to be
shipped from greater distances, since the mounting prices suffice to
cover greater freight rates; 2) an increase in their production, which
circumstance, however, will probably not, for natural reasons, multiply
the quantity of products until the following year; 3) the use of various
previously unused substitutes and greater utilisation of waste. When
this rise of prices begins to exert a marked influence on production and
supply it indicates in most cases that the turning point has been
reached at which demand drops on account of the protracted rise in the
price of the raw material and of all commodities of which it is an
element, causing a reaction in the price of raw material. Aside from the
convulsions which this causes in various forms through depreciation of
capital, there are also other circumstances, which we shall mention
shortly.

But so much is already evident from the foregoing: The greater the
development of capitalist production, and, consequently, the greater the
means of suddenly and permanently increasing that portion of constant
capital consisting of machinery, etc., and the more rapid the
accumulation (particularly in times of prosperity), so much greater the
relative over-production of machinery and other fixed capital, so much
more frequent the relative under-production of vegetable and animal raw
materials, and so much more pronounced the previously described rise of
their prices and the attendant reaction. And so much more frequent are
the convulsions caused as they are by the violent price fluctuations of
one of the main elements in the process of reproduction.

If, however, a collapse of these high prices occurs because their rise
caused a drop in demand on the one hand, and, on the other, an expansion
of production in one place and in another importation from remote and
previously less resorted to, or entirely ignored, production areas, and,
in both cases, a supply of raw materials exceeding the demand —
particularly at the old high prices — then the result may be considered
from different points of view. The sudden collapse of the price of raw
materials checks their reproduction, and the monopoly of the original
producing countries, which enjoy the most favourable conditions of
production, is thereby restored — possibly with certain limitations, but
restored nevertheless. True, due to the impetus it has had, reproduction
of raw material proceeds on an extended scale, especially in those
countries which more or less possess a monopoly of this production. But
the basis on which production carries on after the extension of
machinery, etc., and which, after some fluctuations, is to serve as the
new normal basis, the new point of departure, is very much extended by
the developments in the preceding cycle of turnover. In the meantime,
the barely increased reproduction again experiences considerable
impediments in some of the secondary sources of supply. For instance, it
is easily demonstrated on the basis of the export tables that in the
last thirty years (up to 1865) the production of cotton in India
increases whenever there has been a drop in American production, and
subsequently it drops again more or less permanently. During the period
in which raw materials become dear, industrial capitalists join hands
and form associations to regulate production. They did so after the rise
of cotton prices in 1848 in Manchester, for example, and similarly in
the case of flax production in Ireland. But as soon as the immediate
impulse is over and the general principle of competition to "buy in the
cheapest market" (instead of stimulating production in the countries of
origin, as the associations attempt to do, without regard to the
immediate price at which these may happen at that time to be able to
supply their product) — as soon as the principle of competition again
reigns supreme, the regulation of the supply is left once again to
"prices". All thought of a common, all-embracing and far-sighted control
of the production of raw materials gives way once more to the faith that
demand and supply will mutually regulate one another. And it must be
admitted that such control is on the whole irreconcilable with the laws
of capitalist production, and remains for ever a pious wish, or is
limited to exceptional co-operation in times of great stress and
confusion.^([16]) The superstition of the capitalists in this respect is
so deep that in their reports even factory inspectors again and again
throw up their hands in astonishment. The alternation of good and bad
years naturally also provides for cheaper raw materials. Aside from the
direct effect this has on raising the demand, there is also the added
stimulus of the previously mentioned influence on the rate of profit.
The aforesaid process of production of raw materials being gradually
overtaken by the production of machinery, etc., is then repeated on a
larger scale. An actual improvement of raw materials satisfying not only
the desired quantity, but also the quality desired, such as cotton from
India of American quality, would require a prolonged, regularly growing
and steady European demand (regardless of the economic conditions under
which the Indian producer labours in his country). As it is, however,
the sphere of production of raw materials is, by fits, first suddenly
enlarged, and then again violently curtailed. All this, and the spirit
of capitalist production in general, may be very well studied in the
cotton shortage of 1861-65, further characterised as it was by the fact
that a raw material, one of the principal elements of reproduction, was
for a time entirely unavailable. To be sure, the price may also rise in
the event of an abundant supply, provided the conditions for this
abundance are more knotty. Or, there may be an actual shortage of raw
material. It was this last situation which originally prevailed in the
cotton crisis.

The closer we approach our own time in the history of production, the
more regularly do we find, especially in the essential lines of
industry, the ever-recurring alternation between relative appreciation
and the subsequent resulting depreciation of raw materials obtained from
organic nature. What we have just analysed will be illustrated by the
following examples taken from reports of factory inspectors.

The moral of history, also to be deduced from other observations
concerning agriculture, is that the capitalist system works against a
rational agriculture, or that a rational agriculture is incompatible
with the capitalist system (although the latter promotes technical
improvements in agriculture), and needs either the hand of the small
farmer living by his own labour or the control of associated producers.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Herewith follow the illustrations referred to above, taken from the
English Factory Reports.

"The state of trade is better; but the cycle of good and bad times
diminishes as machinery increases, and the changes from the one to the
other happen oftener, as the demand for raw materials increases with
it... At present, confidence is not only restored after the panic of
1857, but the panic itself seems to be almost forgotten. Whether this
improvement will continue or not depends greatly upon the price of raw
materials. There appear to me evidences already, that in some instances
the maximum has been reached, beyond which their manufacture becomes
gradually less and less profitable, till it ceases to be so altogether.
If we take, for instance, the lucrative years in the worsted trade of
1849 and 1850, we see that the price of English combing wool stood at
1s. 1d., and of Australian at between 1s. 2d. and 1s. 5d. per lb., and
that on the average of the ten years from 1841 to 1850, both inclusive,
the average price of English wool never exceeded 1s. 2d. and of
Australian wool 1s. 5d. per lb. But that in the commencement of the
disastrous year of 1857, the price of Australian wool began with 1s.
11d., falling to 1s. 6d. in December, when the panic was at its height,
but has gradually risen again to 1s. 9d. through 1858, at which it now
stands; whilst that of English wool, commencing with 1s. 8d., and rising
in April and September 1857 to 1s. 9d., falling in January 1858 to 1s.
2d., has since risen to 1s. 5d., which is 3d. per lb. higher than the
average of the ten years to which I have referred... This shows, I
think, one of three things — either that the bankruptcies which similar
prices occasioned in 1857 are forgotten; or that there is barely the
wool grown which the existing spindles are capable of consuming; or
else, that the prices of manufactured articles are about to be
permanently higher... And as in past experience I have seen spindles and
looms multiply both in numbers and speed in an incredibly short space of
time, and our exports of wool to France increase in an almost equal
ratio, and as both at home and abroad the age of sheep seems to be
getting less and less, owing to increasing populations and to what the
agriculturalists call 'a quick return in stock', so I have often felt
anxious for persons whom, without this knowledge, I have seen embarking
skill and capital in undertakings, wholly reliant for their success on a
product which can only be increased according to organic laws. ... The
same state of supply and demand of all raw materials ... seems to
account for many of the fluctuations in the cotton trade during past
periods, as well as for the condition of the English wool market in the
autumn of 1857, with its overwhelming consequences." ^([17]) (R. Baker
in Reports of Insp. of Fact., Oct. 1858, pp. 56-61.)

The halcyon days of the West-Riding worsted industry, of Yorkshire, were
1849-50. This industry employed 29,246 persons in 1838; 37,000 persons
in 1843; 48,097 in 1845; and 74,891 in 1850. The same district had 2,768
mechanical looms in 1838; 11,458 in 1841; 16,870 in 1843; 19,121 in 1845
and 29,539 in 1850. (Reports of Insp. of Fact., 1850, p. 60.) This
prosperity of the carded wool industry excited certain forebodings as
early as October 1850. In his report for April 1851, Sub-Inspector Baker
said in regard to Leeds and Bradford:

"The state of trade is, and has been for some time, very unsatisfactory.
The worsted spinners are fast losing the profits of 1850, and, in the
majority of cases, the manufacturers are not doing much good. I believe,
at this moment, there is more woollen machinery standing than I have
almost ever known at one time, and the flax spinners are also turning
off hands and stopping frames. The cycles of trade, in fact, in the
textile fabrics, are now extremely uncertain, and I think we shall
shortly find to be true ... that there is no comparison made between the
producing power of the spindles, the quantity of raw material, and the
growth of the population" (p. 52).

The same is true of the cotton industry. In the cited report for October
1858, we read:

"Since the hours of labour in factories have been fixed, the amounts of
consumption, produce, and wages in all textile fabrics have been reduced
to a rule of three. ... I quote from a recent lecture delivered by ...
the present Mayor of Blackburn, Mr. Baynes, on the cotton trade, who by
such means has reduced the cotton statistics of his own neighbourhood to
the closest approximation: —

"'Each real and mechanical horse-power will drive 450 self-acting mule
spindles with preparation, or 200 throstle spindles, or 15 looms for 40
inches cloth, with winding, warping, and sizing. Each horse-power in
spinning will give employment to 2½ operatives, but in weaving to 10
persons, at wages averaging full 10s. 6d. a week to each person. ... The
average counts of yarn spun and woven are from 30s. to 32s. twist, and
34s. to 36s. weft yarns; and taking the spinning production at 13 ounces
per spindle per week, will give 824,700 lbs yarn spun per week,
requiring 970,000 lbs or 2,300 bales of cotton, at a cost of £28,300...
The total cotton consumed in this district (within a five-mile radius
round Blackburn) per week is 1,530,000 lbs, or 3,650 bales, at a cost of
£44,625... This is one-eighteenth of the whole cotton spinning of the
United Kingdom, and one-sixth of the whole power-loom weaving.'

"Thus we see that, according to Mr. Baynes's calculations, the total
number of cotton spindles in the United Kingdom is 28,800,000, and
supposing these to be always working full time, that the annual
consumption of cotton ought to be 1,432,080,000 lbs. But as the import
of cotton, less the export in 1856 and 1857, was only 1,022,576,832 lbs,
there must necessarily be a deficiency of supply equal to 409,503,168
lbs. Mr. Baynes, however, who has been good enough to communicate with
me on this subject, thinks that an annual consumption of cotton based
upon the quantity used in the Blackburn district would be liable to be
overcharged, owing to the difference, not only in the counts spun, but
in the excellence of the machinery. He estimates the total annual
consumption of cotton in the United Kingdom at 1,000,000,000 lbs. But if
he is right, and there really is an excess of supply equal to 22,576,832
lbs, supply and demand seem to be nearly balanced already, without
taking into consideration those additional spindles and looms which Mr.
Baynes speaks of as getting ready for work in his own district, and, by
parity of reasoning, probably in other districts also" (pp. 59, 60).

III. GENERAL ILLUSTRATION. THE COTTON CRISIS OF 1861-65
PRELIMINARY HISTORY. 1845-60

_1845_. The golden age of cotton industry. Price of cotton very low. L.
Horner says on this point:

"For the last eight years I have not known so active a state of trade as
has prevailed during the last summer and autumn, particularly in cotton
spinning. Throughout the half-year I have been receiving notices every
week of new investments of capital in factories, either in the form of
new mills being built, of the few that were untenanted finding
occupiers, of enlargements of existing mills, of new engines of
increased power, and of manufacturing machinery." (Reports of Insp. of
Fact., Oct. 1845, p. 13.)

_1846_. The complaints begin:

"For a considerable time past I have heard from the occupiers of cotton
mills very general complaints of the depressed state of their trade...
for within the last six weeks several mills have begun to work short
time, usually eight hours a day instead of twelve; this appears to be on
the increase... There has been a great advance in the price of the raw
material... there has been not only no advance in the manufactured
articles, but ... prices are lower than they were before the rise in
cotton began. From the great increase in the number of cotton mills
within the last four years, there must have been, on the one hand, a
greatly increased demand for the raw material, and, on the other, a
greatly increased supply in the market of the manufactured articles;
causes that must concurrently have operated against profits, supposing
the supply of the raw material and the consumption of the manufactured
article to have remained unaltered; but, of course, in the greater ratio
by the late short supply of cotton, and the falling off in the demand
for the manufactured articles in several markets, both home and foreign.
(Reports of Insp. of Fact., Oct. 1846, p. 10.)

The rising demand for raw materials naturally went hand in hand with a
market flooded with manufactures. By the way, the expansion of industry
at that time and the subsequent stagnation were not confined to the
cotton districts. The carded wool district of Bradford had only 318
factories in 1836 and 490 in 1846. These figures do not by any means
express the actual growth of production, since the existing factories
were also considerably enlarged. This was particularly true of the flax
spinning-mills.

"All have contributed more or less, during the last ten years, to the
overstocking of the market, to which a great part of the present
stagnation of trade must be attributed... The depression... naturally
results from such rapid increase of mills and machinery." (Reports of
Insp. of Fact., Oct. 1846, p. 30.)

_1847_. In October, a money panic. Discount 8%. This was preceded by the
debacle of the railway swindle and the East Indian speculation in
accommodation bills. But:

"Mr. Baker enters into very interesting details respecting the increased
demand, in the last few years, for cotton, wool, and flax, owing to the
great extension of these trades. He considers the increased demand for
these raw materials, occurring, as it has, at a period when the produce
has fallen much below an average supply, as almost sufficient, even
without reference to the monetary derangement, to account for the
present state of these branches. This opinion is fully confirmed, by my
own observations, and conversation with persons well acquainted with
trade. Those several branches were all in a very depressed state, while
discounts were readily obtained at and under 5 per cent. The supply of
raw silk has, on the contrary, been abundant, the prices moderate, and
the trade, consequently, very active, till ... the last two or three
weeks, when there is no doubt the monetary derangement has affected not
only the persons actually engaged in the manufacture, but more
extensively still, the manufacturers of fancy goods, who were great
customers to the throwster. A reference to published returns shows that
the cotton trade had increased nearly 27 per cent in the last three
years. Cotton has consequently increased, in round numbers, from 4d. to
6d. per lb., while twist, in consequence of the increased supply, is yet
only a fraction above its former price. The woollen trade began its
increase in 1836, since which Yorkshire has increased its manufacture of
this article 40 per cent, but Scotland exhibits a yet greater increase.
The increase of the worsted trade ^([18]) is still larger. Calculations
give a result of upwards of 74 per cent increase within the same period.
The consumption of raw wool has therefore been immense. Flax has
increased since 1839 about 25 per cent in England, 22 per cent in
Scotland, and nearly 90 per cent in Ireland ^([19]); the consequence of
this, in connexion with bad crops, has been that the raw material has
gone up £10 per ton, while the price of yarn has fallen 6d. a bundle."
(Reports of Insp. of Fact., Oct. 1847, pp. 30-31.)

_1849_. Since late in 1848 business revived.

"The price of flax which has been so low as to almost guarantee a
reasonable profit under any future circumstances, has induced the
manufacturers to carry on their work very steadily.... The woollen
manufacturers were exceedingly busy for a while in the early part of the
year.... I fear that consignments of woollen goods often take the place
of real demand, and that periods of apparent prosperity, i. e., of full
work, are not always periods of legitimate demand. In some months the
worsted has been exceedingly good, in fact flourishing.... At the
commencement of the period referred to, wool was exceedingly low; what
was bought by the spinners was well bought, and no doubt in considerable
quantities. When the price of wool rose with the spring wool sales, the
spinner had the advantage, and the demand for manufactured goods
becoming considerable and imperative, they kept it. " (Reports of Insp.
of Fact., April 1849, p. 42.)

"If we look at the variations in the state of trade, which have occurred
in the manufacturing districts of the kingdom for a period now of
between three and four years, I think we must admit the existence of a
great disturbing cause somewhere ... but may not the immensely
productive power of increased machinery have added another element to
the same cause?" (Reports of Insp. of Fact., April 1849, pp. 42, 43.)

In November 1848, and in May and summer of 1849, right up to October,
business flourished.

"The worsted stuff of trade, of which Bradford and Halifax are the great
hives of industry, has been the one most active; this trade has never
before reached anything like the extent, to which it has now attained.
Speculation, and uncertainty as to the probable supply of cotton wool,
have ever had the effect of causing greater excitement, and more
frequent alterations in the state of that branch of manufacture, than
any other. There is ... at present an accumulation in stock of the
coarser kinds of cotton goods, which creates anxiety on the part of the
smaller spinners, and is already acting to their detriment, having
caused several of them to work their mills short time. " (Reports of
Insp. of Fact., Oct. 1849, pp. 64-65.)

_1850_. April. Business continued brisk. The exception:

"The great depression in a part of the cotton trade ... attributable to
the scarcity in the supply of the raw material more especially adapted
to the branch engaged in spinning low numbers of cotton yarns, or
manufacturing heavy cotton goods. A fear is entertained that the
increased machinery built recently for the worsted trade, may be
followed with a similar reaction. Mr. Baker computes that in the year
1849 alone the worsted looms have increased their produce 40 per cent,
and the spindles 25 or 30 per cent, and they are still increasing at the
same rate. " (Reports of Insp. of Fact., April 1850, p. 54.)

_1850_. October.

"The high price of raw cotton continues ... to cause a considerable
depression in this branch of manufacture, especially in those
descriptions of goods in which the raw material constitutes a
considerable part of the cost of production.... The great advance in the
price of raw silk has likewise caused a depression in many branches of
that manufacture." (Reports. of Insp. of Fact., Oct. 1850, p. 14.)

And on pages 31 and 33 of the same report we learn that the Committee of
the Royal Society for the Promotion and Improvement of the Growth of
Flax in Ireland predicted that the high price of flax, together with the
low level of prices for other agricultural products, ensured a
considerable increase in flax production in the ensuing year.

_1853_. April. Great prosperity. L. Horner says in his report:

"At no period during the last seventeen years that I have been
officially acquainted with the manufacturing districts in Lancashire
have I known such general prosperity; the activity in every branch is
extraordinary." (Reports of Insp. of Fact., April 1853, p. 19.)

_1853_. October. Depression in the cotton industry. "Over-production."
(Reports of Insp. of Fact., Oct. 1853, p. 15.)

_1854_. April.

"The woollen trade, although not brisk, has given full employment to all
the factories engaged upon that fabric, and a similar remark applies to
the cotton factories. The worsted trade generally has been in an
uncertain and unsatisfactory condition during the whole of the last
half-year. The manufacture of flax and hemp are more likely to be
seriously impeded, by reason of the diminished supplies of the raw
materials from Russia due to the Crimean war." (Reports of Insp. of
Fact., April 1854, p. 37.)

_1859_.

"The trade in the Scottish flax districts still continues depressed —
the raw material being scarce, as well as high in price; and the
inferior quality of the last year's crop in the Baltic, from whence come
our principal supplies, will have an injurious effect on the trade of
the district; jute, however, which is gradually superseding flax in many
of the coarser fabrics, is neither unusually high in price, nor scarce
in quantity ... about one-half of the machinery in Dundee is now
employed in jute spinning." (Reports of Insp. of Fact., April 1859, p.
19.) — "Owing to the high price of the raw material, flax spinning is
still far from remunerating, and while all the other mills are going
full time, there are several instances of the stoppage of flax
machinery.... Jute spinning is ... in a rather more satisfactory state,
owing to the recent decline in the price of material, which has now
fallen to a very moderate point." (Reports of Insp. of Fact., Oct. 1859,
p. 20.)

1861-64. AMERICAN CIVIL WAR. COTTON FAMINE. THE GREATEST EXAMPLE OF AN
INTERRUPTION IN THE PRODUCTION PROCESS THROUGH SCARCITY AND DEARNESS OF
RAW MATERIAL

_1860_. April.

"With respect to the state of trade, I am happy to be able to inform you
that, notwithstanding the high price of raw material, all the textile
manufactures, with the exception of silk, have been fairly busy during
the past half-year.... In some of the cotton districts hands have been
advertised for, and have migrated thither from Norfolk and other rural
counties. There appears to be, in every branch of trade, a great
scarcity of raw material. It is ... the want of it alone, which keeps us
within bounds. In the cotton trade, the erection of new mills, the
formation of new systems of extension, and the demand for hands, can
scarcely, I think, have been at any time exceeded. Everywhere there are
new movements in search of raw material." (Reports of Insp. of Fact.,
April 1860, p. 57.)

_1860_. October.

"The state of trade in the cotton, woollen, and flax districts as been
good; indeed in Ireland, it is stated to have been 'very good' for now
more than a year; and that it would have been still better, but for the
high price of raw material. The flax spinners appear to be looking with
more anxiety than ever to the opening out of India by railways, and to
the development of its agriculture, for a supply of flax which may be
commensurate with their wants." (Reports of Insp. of Fact., Oct. 1860,
p. 37.)

_1861_. April.

"The state of trade is at present depressed.... A few cotton mills are
running short time, and many silk mills are only partially employed. Raw
material is high. In almost every branch of textile manufacture it is
above the price at which it can be manufactured for the masses of the
consumers." (Reports of Insp. of Fact., April 1861, p. 33.)

It had become evident that in 1860 the cotton industry had overproduced.
The effect of this made itself felt during the next few years.

"It has taken between two and three years to absorb the over-production
of 1860 in the markets of the world." (Reports of Insp. of Fact.,
December 1863, p. 127.) "The depressed state of the markets for cotton
manufactures in the East, early in 1860, had a corresponding effect upon
the trade of Blackburn, in which 30,000 power-looms are usually employed
almost exclusively in the production of cloth to be consumed in the
East. There was consequently but a limited demand for labour for many
months prior to the effects of the cotton blockade being felt....
Fortunately this preserved many of the spinners and manufacturers from
being involved in the common ruin. Stocks increased in value so long as
they were held, and there had been consequently nothing like that
alarming depreciation in the value of property which might not
unreasonably have been looked for in such a crisis." (Reports of Insp.
of Fact., Oct. 1862, pp. 29, 31.)

_1861_. October.

"Trade has been for some time in a very depressed state. It is not
improbable indeed that during the winter months many establishments will
be found to work very short time. This might, however, have been
anticipated ... irrespective of the causes which have interrupted our
usual supplies of cotton from America and our exports, short time must
have been kept during the ensuing winter in consequence of the great
increase of production during the last three years, and the unsettled
state of the Indian and Chinese markets." (Reports of Insp. of Fact.,
Oct. 1861, p. 19.)

_Cotton Waste. East Indian Cotton (Surat). Influence on the Wages of
Labourers. Improvement of Machinery. Adding Starch Flour and Mineral
Substitutes to Cotton. Effect of Starch Flour Sizing on Labourers.
Manufacturers of Finer Yarn Grades. Manufacturers' Fraud_

"A manufacturer writes to me thus: 'As to estimates of consumption per
spindle, I doubt if you take sufficiently into calculation the fact that
when cotton is high in price, every spinner of ordinary yarns (say up to
40s.) (principally 12s. to 32s.) will raise his counts as much as he
can, that is, will spin 16s. where he used to spin 12s., or 22s. in the
place of 16s., and so on; and the manufacturer using these fine yarns
will make his cloth the usual weight by the addition of so much more
size. The trade is availing itself of this resource at present to an
extent which is even discreditable. I have heard on good authority of
ordinary export shirting weighing 8 lbs which was made of 5¼ lbs. cotton
and 2¾ lbs size.... In cloths of other descriptions as much as 50 per
cent size is sometimes added; so that a manufacturer may and does truly
boast that he is getting rich by selling cloth for less money per pound
than he paid for the mere yarn of which they are composed."' (Reports of
Insp. of Fact., April 1864, p. 27.)

"I have also received statements that the weavers attribute increased
sickness to the size which is used in dressing the warps of Surat
cotton, and which is not made of the same material as formerly, viz.,
flour. This substitute for flour is said, however, to have the very
important advantage of increasing greatly the weight of the cloth
manufactured, making 15 lbs of the raw material to weigh 20 lbs when
woven into cloth." (Reports of Insp. of Fact., Oct. 1863. This
substitute was ground talcum, called China clay, or gypsum, called
French chalk.) "The earnings of the weavers (meaning the operatives) are
much reduced from the employment of substitutes for flour as sizing for
warps. This sizing, which gives weight to the yarn, renders it hard and
brittle. Each thread of the warp in the loom passes through a part of
the loom called 'a heald', which consists of strong threads to keep the
warp in its proper place, and the hard state of the warp causes the
threads of the heald to break frequently; and it is said to take a
weaver five minutes to tie up the threads every time they break; and a
weaver has to piece these ends at least ten times as often as formerly,
thus reducing the productive powers of the loom in the working-hours. "
(_Ibid_., pp. 42-43.)

"In Ashton, Stalybridge, Mossley, Oldham, etc., the reduction of the
time has been fully one-third, and the hours are lessening every
week.... Simultaneously with this diminution of time there is also a
reduction of wages in many departments." (Reports of Insp. of Fact.,
Oct. 1861, pp. 12-13.)

Early in 1861 there was a strike among the mechanical weavers in some
parts of Lancashire. Several manufacturers had announced a wage
reduction of 5 to 7.5%. The operatives insisted that the wage scale
remain the same while working-hours were reduced. This was not granted,
and a strike was called. A month later, the operatives had to give in.
But then they got both.

"In addition to the reduction of wages to which the operatives at last
consented, many mills are now running short time." (Reports of Insp. of
Fact., April 1861, p. 23:)

_1862_. April.

"The sufferings of the operatives since the date of my last report have
greatly increased; but at no period of the history of manufactures, have
sufferings so sudden and so severe been borne with so much silent
resignation and so much patient self-respect." (Reports of Insp. of
Fact., April 1862, p. 10.) "The proportionate number of operatives
wholly out of employment at this date appears not to be much larger than
it was in 1848, when there was an ordinary panic of sufficient
consequences to excite alarm amongst the manufacturers, so much as to
warrant the collection of similar statistics of the state of the cotton
trade as are now issued weekly.... In May 1848, the proportion of cotton
operatives out of work in Manchester out of the whole number usually
employed was 15 per cent, on short time 12 per cent, whilst 70 per cent
were in full work. On the 28th of May of the present year, of the whole
number of persons usually employed 15 per cent were out of work, 35 per
cent were on short time, and 49 per cent were working full time.... In
some other places, Stockport for example, the averages of short time and
of non-employment are higher, whilst those of full time are less",
because coarser numbers are spun there than in Manchester (p. 16).

_1862_. October.

"I find by the last return to Parliament that there were 2,887 cotton
factories in the United Kingdom in 1861, 2,109 of them being in my
district (Lancashire and Cheshire). I was aware that a very large
proportion of the 2,109 factories in my district were small
establishments, giving employment to few persons, but I have been
surprised to find how large that proportion is. In 392, or 19 per cent,
the steam-engine or waterwheel is under 10 horse-power; in 345, or 16
per cent, the horsepower is above 10 and under 20; and in 1,372 the
power is 20 horses and more.... A very large proportion of these small
manufacturers — being more than a third of the whole number — were
operatives themselves at no distant period; they are men without command
of capital. The brunt of the burden then would have to be borne by the
remaining two-thirds." (Reports of Insp. of Fact., Oct. 1862, pp. 18,
19.)

According to the same report, 40,146, or 11.3%, of the cotton employees
in Lancashire and Cheshire were then working full time; 134,767, or 38%,
were working short time; and 179,721, or 50.7%, were unemployed. After
deducting the returns from Manchester and Bolton, where mainly fine
grades were spun, a line relatively little affected by the cotton
famine, the matter looks still more unfavourable; namely, fully employed
8.5%, partly employed 38%, and unemployed 53.5% (pp. 19 and 20).

"Working up good or bad cotton makes a material difference to the
operative. In the earlier part of the year, when manufacturers were
endeavouring to keep their mills at work by using up all the moderately
priced cotton they could obtain, much bad cotton was brought into mills
in which good cotton was ordinarily used, and the difference to the
operatives in wages was so great that many strikes took place on the
ground that they could not make a fair day's wages at the old rates....
In some cases, although working full time, the difference in wages from
working bad cotton was as much as one-half" (p. 27).

_1863_. April.

"During the present year there will not be full employment for much more
than one-half of the cotton operatives in the country." (Reports of
Insp. of Fact., April 1863, p. 14.)

"A very serious objection to the use of Surat cotton, as manufacturers
are now compelled to use it, is that the speed of the machinery must be
greatly reduced in the processes of manufacture. For some years past
every effort has been made to increase the speed of machinery, in order
to make the same machinery produce more work; and the reduction of the
speed becomes therefore a question which affects the operative as well
as the manufacturer; for the chief part of the operatives are paid by
the work done; for instance, spinners are paid per lb. for the yarn
spun, weavers per piece for the number of pieces woven; and even with
the other classes of operatives paid by the week there would be a
diminution of wages in consideration of the less amount of goods
produced. From inquiries I have made, and statements placed in my hands,
of the earnings of cotton operatives during the present year, I find
there is a diminution averaging 20 per cent upon their former earnings,
in some instances the diminution has been as much as 50 per cent,
calculated upon the same rate of wages as prevailed in 1861" (p. 13).
"...The sum earned depends upon ... the nature of the material operated
upon.... The position of the operatives in regard to the amount of their
earnings is very much better now (October 1863) than it was this time
last year. Machinery has improved, the material is better understood,
and the operatives are able better to overcome the difficulties they had
to contend with at first. I remember being in a sewing school (a charity
institution for unemployed) at Preston last spring, when two young
women, who had been sent to work at a weaving shed the day before, upon
the representation of the manufacturer that they could earn 4s. per
week, returned to the school to be readmitted, complaining that they
could not have earned 1s. per week. I have been informed of 'self-acting
minders' ... men who manage a pair of self-acting mules, earning at the
end of a fortnight's full work 8s. 11d., and that from this sum was
deducted the rent of the house, the manufacturer, however, returning
half the rent as a gift. (How generous!) The minders took away the sum
of 6s. 11d. In many places the self-acting minders ranged from 5s. to
9s. per week, and the weavers from 2s. to 6s. per week in the last
months of 1862.... At the present time a much more healthy state of
things exists, although there is still a great decrease in the earnings
in most districts.... There are several causes which have tended to the
reduction of earnings, besides the shorter staple of the Surat cotton
and its dirty condition; for instance, it is now the practice to mix
'waste' largely with Surat, which consequently increases the
difficulties of the spinner or minder. The threads, from their shortness
of fibre, are more liable to break in the drawing out of the mule and in
the twisting of the yarn, and the mule cannot be kept so continuously in
motion.... Then, from the great attention required in watching the
threads in weaving, many weavers can only mind one loom, and very few
can mind more than two looms.... There has been a direct reduction of 5,
7½ and 10 per cent upon the wages of the operatives.... In the majority
of cases the operative has to make the best of his material, and to earn
the best wages he can at the ordinary rates.... Another difficulty the
weavers have sometimes to contend with is, that they are expected to
produce well-finished cloth from inferior materials, and are subject to
fine for the flaws in their work." (Reports of Insp. of Fact., Oct.
1863, pp. 41-43.)

Wages were miserable, even where work was full time. The cotton workers
willingly offered themselves for all public works such as drainage,
road-building, stone-breaking and street-paving, in which they were
employed, to get their keep from the authorities (although this
practically amounted to assistance to the manufacturer. See Book I, S.
598/589 [English edition: pp. 574-75. — _Ed_.]). The whole bourgeoisie
stood guard over the labourers. Were the worst dog's wages offered, and
a labourer refused to accept them, the Relief Committee would strike him
from its lists. It was in a way a golden age for the manufacturers, for
the labourers had either to starve or work at a price most profitable
for the bourgeois. The Relief Committees acted as watch-dogs. At the
same time, the manufacturers acted in secret agreement with the
government to hinder emigration as much as possible, partly to retain in
readiness the capital invested in the flesh and blood of the labourers,
and partly to safeguard the house-rent squeezed out of the labourers.

"The Relief Committees acted with great strictness upon this point. If
work was offered, the operatives to whom it was proposed were struck off
the lists, and thus compelled to accept the offer. When they objected to
accept work... the cause has been that their earnings would have been
merely nominal, and the work exceedingly severe." (Reports of Insp. of
Fact., Oct. 1863, p. 97.)

The operatives were willing to perform any work given to them under the
Public Works Act.

"The principle upon which industrial employments were organised varied
considerably in different towns, but in those places even in which the
outdoor work was not absolutely a labour test the manner in which labour
was remunerated by its being paid for either at the exact rate of
relief, or closely approximating the rate, it became in fact a labour
test" (p. 69). "The Public Works Act of 1863 was intended to remedy this
inconvenience, and to enable the operative to earn his day's wages as an
independent labourer. The purpose of this Act was three-fold: firstly,
to enable local authorities to borrow money of the Exchequer Loan
Commissioners (with consent of the President of the Central Relief
Committee); secondly, to facilitate the improvement of the towns of the
cotton districts; thirdly, to provide work and remunerative wages to the
unemployed operatives."

Loans to the amount of £883,700 had been granted under this Act up to
the end of October 1863 (p. 70). The works undertaken were mainly
canalisation, road-building, street-paving, water-works reservoirs, etc.

Mr. Henderson, president of the committee in Blackburn, wrote with
reference to this to factory inspector Redgrave:

"Nothing in my experience, during the present period of suffering and
distress, has struck me more forcibly or given me more satisfaction,
than the cheerful alacrity with which the unemployed operatives of this
district have accepted of the work offered to them through the adoption
of the Public Works Act, by the Corporation of Blackburn. A greater
contrast than that presented between the cotton spinner as a skilled
workman in a factory, and as a labourer in a sewer 14 or 18 feet deep,
can scarcely be conceived."

(Depending on the size of his family, he earned 4 to 12s. per week, this
enormous amount providing sometimes for a family of eight. The towns-men
derived a double profit from this. In the first place, they secured
money to improve their smoky and neglected cities at exceptionally low
interest rates. In the second place, they paid the labourers far less
than the regular wage.)

"Accustomed as he had been to a temperature all but tropical, to work at
which agility and delicacy of manipulation availed him infinitely more
than muscular strength and to double and sometimes treble the
remuneration which it is possible for him now to obtain, his ready
acceptance of the proffered employment involved an amount of self-denial
and consideration the exercise of which is most creditable. In Blackburn
the men have been tested at almost every variety of outdoor work; in
excavating a stiff heavy clay soil to a considerable depth, in draining,
in stone-breaking, in road-making, and in excavating for street sewers
to a depth of 14, 16, and sometimes 20 feet. In many cases while thus
employed they are standing in mud and water to the depth of 10 or 12
inches, and in all they are exposed to a climate which, for chilly
humidity is not surpassed I suppose, even if it is equalled, by that of
any district in England" (pp. 91-92). "The conduct of the operatives has
been almost blameless, and their readiness to accept and make the best
of outdoor labour" (p. 69).

_1864_. April.

"Complaints are occasionally made in different districts at the scarcity
of hands, but this deficiency is chiefly felt in particular departments,
as, for instance of weavers.... These complaints have their origin as
much from the low rate of wages which the hands can earn owing to the
inferior qualities of yarn used, as from any positive scarcity of
work-people even in that particular department. Numerous differences
have taken place during the past month between the masters of particular
mills and their operatives in respect of the wages. Strikes, I am sorry
to say, are but too frequently resorted to. ... The effect of the Public
Works Act is felt as a competition by the mill-owners. The local
committee at Bacup has suspended operations, for although all the mills
are not running, yet a scarcity of hands has been experienced." (Reports
of Insp. of Fact., April 1864, pp. 9, 10.)

It was indeed high time for the manufacturers. Due to the Public Works
Act the demand for labour grew so strong that many a factory hand was
earning 4 to 5 shillings daily in the quarries of Bacup. And so the
public works were gradually suspended — this new edition of the
_Ateliers nationaux_ of 1848, but this time instituted in the interests
of the bourgeoisie.

Experiments in corpore vili

"Although I have given the actual earnings of the operatives (fully
employed) in several mills, it does not follow that they earn the same
amount week by week. The operatives are subject to great fluctuation,
from the constant experimentalising of the manufacturers upon different
kinds and proportions of cotton and waste in the same mill, the
'mixings' as it is called, being frequently changed; and the earnings of
the operatives rise and fall with the quality of the cotton mixings;
sometimes they have been within 15 per cent of former earnings, and then
in a week or two, they have fallen from 50 to 60 per cent."

Inspector Redgrave, who makes this report, then proceeds to cite wage
figures taken from actual practice, of which the following examples may
suffice:

A, weaver, family of 6, employed 4 days a week, 6s. 8.5d.; B, twister,
employed 4.5 days a week, 6s.; C, weaver, family of 4, employed 5 days a
week, 5s. 1d.; D, slubber, family of 6, employed 4 days a week, 7s.
10d.; E, weaver, family of 7, employed 3 days a week, 5s., etc. Redgrave
continues:

"The above returns are deserving of consideration, for they show that
work would become a misfortune in many a family, as it not merely
reduces the income, but brings it so low as to be utterly insufficient
to provide more than a small portion of the absolute wants, were it not
that supplemental relief is granted to operatives when the wages of the
family do not reach the sum that would be given to them as relief, if
they were all unemployed." (Reports of Insp. of Fact., Oct. 1863, pp.
50-53.)

"In no week since the 5th of June last was there more than two days
seven hours and a few minutes employment for all the workers." (_Ibid_.,
p. 121.)

From the beginning of the crisis to March 25, 1863, nearly three million
pounds sterling were expended by the guardians, the Central Relief
Committee, and the Mansion House Committee. (_Ibid_., p. 13.)

"In a district in which the finest yarn is spun ... the spinners suffer
an indirect reduction of 15 per cent in consequence of the change from
South Sea Island to Egyptian cotton. In an extensive district, in many
parts of which waste is largely used as a mixture with Surat ... the
spinners have had a reduction of 5 per cent, and have lost from 20 to 30
per cent in addition, through working Surat and waste. The weavers are
reduced from 4 looms to 2 looms. In 1860, they averaged 5s. 7d. per
loom, in 1863, only 3s. 4d. The fines, which formerly varied from 3d. to
6d. (for the weaver) on American, now run up to from 1s. to 3s. 6d."

In one district, where Egyptian cotton was used with an admixture of
East Indian

"the average of the mule spinners, which was in 1860 18s. to 25s., now
averages from 10s. to 18s. per week, caused, in addition to inferior
cotton, by the reduction of the speed of the mule to put an extra amount
of twist in the yarn, which in ordinary times would be paid for
according to list" (pp. 43, 44). "Although the Indian cotton may have
been worked to profit by the manufacturer, it will be seen (see the wage
list on p. 53) that the operatives are sufferers compared with 1861, and
if the use of Surat be confirmed, the operatives will want to earn the
wages of 1861, which would seriously affect the profits of the
manufacturer, unless he obtain compensation either in the price of the
raw cotton or of his products" (p. 105).

_House-Rent_.

"The rent is frequently deducted from the wages of operatives, even when
working short time, by the manufacturers whose cottages they may be
occupying. Nevertheless the value of this class of property has
diminished, and houses may be obtained at a reduction of from 25 to 50
per cent upon the rent of the houses in ordinary times; for instance, a
cottage which would have cost 3s. 6d. per week can now be had for 2s.
4d. per week, and sometimes even for less" (p. 57).

_Emigration_. The employers were naturally opposed to emigration of
labourers, because, on the one hand,

"looking forward to the recovery of the cotton trade from its present
depression, they keep within their reach the means whereby their mills
can be worked in the most advantageous manner". On the other hand, "many
manufacturers are owners of the houses in which operatives employed in
their mills reside, and some unquestionably expect to obtain a portion
of the back rent owing" (p. 96).

Mr. Bernall Osborne said in a speech to his parliamentary constituents
on October 22, 1864, that the labourers of Lancashire had behaved like
the ancient philosophers — (Stoics). Not like sheep?

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

13. _The Factory Question and the Ten Hours' Bill_ by R. H. Greg,
London, 1837, p. 115.

14. The report errs in the final sentence. Instead of 6d. it should be
3d. for loss through waste. This loss amounts to 25% in the case of
Surat, and only 12½ to 15% in the case of American cotton, and this
latter is meant, the same percentage having been correctly calculated
for the price of 5 to 6d. It is true, however, that also in the case of
American cotton brought to Europe during the latter years of the Civil
War the proportion of waste often rose considerably higher than before.
— _F. E._

15. For examples see Babbage [_On the Economy of Machinery and
Manufactures_, London, 1832, pp. 280-81.—_Ed_. ], among others. The
usual expedient — a reduction of wages — is also employed in this
instance, so that this continual depreciation acts quite contrary to the
dreams of Mr. Carey's "harmonious brain".

16. Since the above was written (1865), competition on the world-market
has been considerably intensified by the rapid development of industry
in all civilised countries, especially in America and Germany. The fact
that the rapidly and enormously expanding productive forces today
outgrow the control of the laws of the capitalist mode of commodity
exchange, within which they are supposed to operate, impresses itself
more and more even on the minds of the capitalists. This is disclosed
especially by two symptoms. First, by the new general mania for a
protective tariff, which differs from the old protectionism in that now
articles fit for export are those best protected. And secondly, by the
trusts of manufacturers of whole spheres of production which regulate
production, and thus prices and profits. It goes without saying that
these experiments are practicable only so long as the economic climate
is relative favourable. The first storm must upset them and prove that,
although production assuredly needs regulation, it is certainly not the
capitalist class which is fitted for that task. Meanwhile, the trusts
have no other mission but to see to it that the little fish are
swallowed by the big fish still more rapidly than before. — _F.E._

17. It goes without saying that we do not, like Mr. Baker, _explain_ the
wool crisis of 1857 on the basis of the disproportion between the prices
of raw material and product. This disproportion was itself but a
symptom, and the crisis was a general one. — _F.E._

18. A sharp distinction is made in England between woollen manufacture,
which spins carded yarn from short wool and weaves it (main centre
Leeds), and worsted manufacture, which makes worsted yarn from long wool
and weaves it (main seat Bradford, in Yorkshire). — _F.E._

19. This rapid expansion of output of machine-made linen yarn in Ireland
dealt a death-blow to exports of linen made of hand-made yarn in Germany
(Silesia, Lusatia, and Westphalia). — _F.E._

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

_Transcribed for the Internet by Hinrich Kuhls_

 

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 7. Supplementary Remarks

 

Suppose, as is assumed in this part, the amount of profit in any
particular sphere of production equals the sum of the surplus-value
produced by the total capital invested in that sphere. Even then the
bourgeois will not consider his profit as identical with surplus-value,
i. e., with unpaid surplus-labour, and, to be sure, for the following
reasons:

1) In the process of circulation he forgets the process of production.
He thinks that surplus-value is made when he realises the value of
commodities, which includes realisation of their surplus-value. [A blank
space which follows in the manuscript, indicates that Marx intended to
dwell in greater detail on this point. – _F. E._]

2) Assuming a uniform degree of exploitation, we have seen that
regardless of all modifications originating in the credit system,
regardless of the capitalists' efforts to outwit and cheat one another,
and, lastly, regardless of any favourable choice of the market – the
rate of profit may differ considerably, depending on the low or high
prices of raw materials and the experience of the buyer, on the relative
productivity, efficiency and cheapness of the machinery, on the greater
or lesser efficiency of the aggregate arrangement in the various stages
of the productive process, elimination of waste, the simplicity and
efficiency of management and supervision, etc. In short, given the
surplus-value for a certain variable capital, it still depends very much
on the individual business acumen of the capitalist, or of his managers
and salesmen, whether this same surplus-value is expressed in a greater
or smaller rate of profit, and accordingly yields a greater or smaller
amount of profit. Let the same surplus-value of £1,000, the product of
£1,000 in wages, obtain in enterprise A for a constant capital of
£9,000, and in enterprise B for £11,000. In case A we have p' =
1,000/10,000 or 10%. In case B we have p' = 1,000/12,000, or 8⅓%. The
total capital produces relatively more profit in enterprise A than in B,
because of a higher rate of profit, although the variable capital
advanced in both cases = £1,000 and the surplus-value produced by each
likewise = £1,000, so that in both cases there exists the same degree of
exploitation of the same number of labourers. This difference in the
presentation of the same mass of surplus-value, or the difference in the
rates of profit, and therefore in the profit itself, while the
exploitation of labour is the same, may also be due to other causes.
Still, it may also be due wholly to a difference in the business acumen
with which both establishments are run. And this circumstance misleads
the capitalist, convinces him that his profits are not due to exploiting
labour, but, at least in part, to other independent circumstances, and
particularly his individual activity.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The analyses in this first part demonstrate the incorrectness of the
view (Rodbertus [_Sociale Briefe an von Kirchmann, Dritter Brief:
Widerlegung der Ricardo'schen Lehre von der Grundrente und Begründung
einer neuen Rententheorie_, Berlin, 1851, S. 125. – _Ed_.]) according to
which (as distinct from ground-rent, in which case, for example, the
area of real estate remains the same and yet the rent rises) a change in
the magnitude of an individual capital is supposed to have no influence
on the ratio of profit to capital, and thus on the rate of profit,
because if the mass of profit should grow, so does the mass of capital
upon which it is calculated, and vice versa.

This is true only in two cases. First, when – assuming that all other
circumstances, especially the rate of surplus-value, remain unchanged –
there is a change in the value of that commodity which is a
money-commodity. (The same occurs in a merely nominal change of value,
the rise or fall of more tokens of value, other conditions being equal.)
Let the total capital = £100, and the profit = £20, the rate of profit
being = 20%. Should gold fall by half, or double, the same capital
previously worth only £100, will be worth £200 if it falls and the
profit will be worth £40, i. e., it will be expressed in so much money
instead of the former £20; if it rises, the capital of £100 will be
worth only £50, and the profit will be represented by a product, whose
value will be £10. But in either case 200:40 = 50:10 = 100:20 = 20%. In
all these examples there would, however, have been no actual change in
the magnitude of capital-value, and only in the money-expression of the
same value and the same surplus-value. For this reason s/C, or the rate
of profit, could not be affected.

In the second case there is an actual change of magnitude in the value,
but unaccompanied by a change in the ratio of v to c; in other words,
with a constant rate of surplus-value the relation of capital invested
in labour-power (variable capital considered as an index of the amount
of labour-power set in motion) to the capital invested in means of
production remains the same. Under these circumstances, no matter
whether we have C, or nC, or C/n, e.g., 1,000, or 2,000, or 500, and the
rate of profit being 20%, the profit = 200 in the first case, = 400 in
the second, and = 100 in the third. But 200:1,000 = 400:2,000 = 100:500
= 20%. That is to say, the rate of profit is unchanged, because the
composition of capital remains the same and is not affected by the
change in magnitude. Therefore, an increase or decrease in the amount of
profit shows merely an increase or decrease in the magnitude of the
invested capital.

In the first case there is, therefore, but the appearance of a change in
the magnitude of the employed capital, while in the second case there is
an actual change in magnitude, but no change in the organic composition
of the capital, i. e., in the relative proportions of its variable and
constant portions. But with the exception of these two cases, a change
in the magnitude of the employed capital is either the _result_ of a
preceding change in the value of one of its components, and therefore of
a change in the relative magnitude of these components (as long as the
surplus-value itself does not change with the variable capital); or,
this change of magnitude (as in labour-processes on a large scale,
introduction of new machinery, etc.) is the _cause_ of a change in the
relative magnitude of its two organic components. In all these cases,
other circumstances remaining the same, a change in the magnitude of the
employed capital must therefore be accompanied simultaneously by a
change in the rate of profit.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

A rise in the rate of profit is always due to a relative or absolute
increase of the surplus-value in relation to its cost of production, i.
e., to the advanced total capital, or to a decrease in the difference
between the rate of profit and the rate of surplus-value.

Fluctuations in the rate of profit may occur irrespective of changes in
the organic components of the capital, or of the absolute magnitude of
the capital, through a rise or fall in the value of the fixed or
circulating advanced capital caused by an increase or a reduction of the
working-time required for its reproduction, this increase or reduction
taking place independently of the already existing capital. The value of
every commodity – thus also of the commodities making up the capital –
is determined not by the necessary labour-time contained in it, but by
the social labour-time required for its reproduction. This reproduction
may take place under unfavourable or under propitious circumstances,
distinct from the conditions of original production. If, under altered
conditions, it takes double or, conversely, half the time, to reproduce
the same material capital, and if the value of money remains unchanged,
a capital formerly worth £100 would be worth £200, or £50 respectively.
Should this appreciation or depreciation affect all parts of capital
uniformly, then the profit would also be accordingly expressed in
double, or half, the amount of money. But if it involves a change in the
organic composition of the capital, if the ratio of the variable to the
constant portion of capital rises or falls, then, other circumstances
remaining the same, the rate of profit will rise with a relatively
rising variable capital and fall with a relatively falling one. If only
the money-value of the advanced capital rises or falls (in consequence
of a change in the value of money), then the money-expression of the
surplus-value rises, or falls, in the same proportion. The rate of
profit remains unchanged.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Transcribed for the Internet by Hinrich Kuhls

 

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III



PART II. CONVERSION OF PROFIT INTO AVERAGE PROFIT


 


Chapter 8. Different Compositions of Capitals in Different Branches of Production and Resulting Differences in Rates of Profit

 

In the preceding part we demonstrated, among other things, that the rate
of profit may vary — rise or fall — while the rate of surplus-value
remains the same. In the present chapter we assume that the intensity of
labor exploitation, and therefore the rate of surplus-value and the
length of the working-day, are the same in all the spheres of production
into which the social labor of a given country is divided. Adam Smith
has already comprehensively shown that the numerous differences in the
exploitation of labor in various spheres of production balance one
another by means of all kinds of existing compensations, or
compensations accepted as such on the basis of current prejudice, so
that they are merely evanescent distinctions and are of no moment in a
study of the general relations. Other differences, for instance those in
the wage scale, rest largely on the difference between simple and
complicated labor mentioned in the beginning of Book I (p. 19), and have
nothing to do with the intensity of exploitation in the different
spheres of production, although they render the lot of the laborer in
those spheres very unequal. For instance, if the labor of a goldsmith is
better paid than that of a day-laborer, the former's surplus-labor
produces proportionately more surplus-value than the latter's. And
although the equalizing of wages and working-days, and thereby of the
rates of surplus-value, among different spheres of production, and even
among different investments of capital in the same sphere of production,
is checked by all kinds of local obstacles, it is nevertheless taking
place more and more with the advance of capitalist production and the
subordination of all economic conditions to this mode of production. The
study of such frictions, while important to any special work on wages,
may be dispensed with as incidental and irrelevant in a general analysis
of capitalist production. In a general analysis of this kind it is
usually always assumed that the actual conditions correspond to their
conception, or, what is the same, that actual conditions are represented
only to the extent that they are typical of their own general case.

The difference in the rates of surplus-value in different countries, and
consequently the national differences in the degree of exploitation of
labor, are immaterial for our present analysis. What we want to show in
this part is precisely the way in which a general rate of profit takes
shape in any given country. It is evident, however, that a comparison of
the various national rates of profit requires only a collation of the
previously studied with that which is here to be studied. First one
should consider the differences in the national rates of surplus-value,
and then, on the basis of these given rates, a comparison should be made
of the differences in the national rates of profit. In so far as those
differences are not due to differences in the national rates of
surplus-value, they must be due to circumstances in which the
surplus-value is assumed, just as in the analysis of this chapter, to be
universally the same, i. e., constant.

We demonstrated in the preceding chapter that, assuming the rate of
surplus-value to be constant, the rate of profit obtaining for a given
capital may rise or fall in consequence of circumstances which raise or
lower the value of one or the other portion of constant capital, and so
affect the proportion between the variable and constant components of
capital. We further observed that circumstances which prolong or reduce
the time of turnover of an individual capital may similarly influence
the rate of profit. Since the mass of the profit is identical with the
mass of the surplus-value, and with the surplus-value itself, it was
also seen that the _mass_ of the profit — as distinct from the _rate_ of
profit — is not affected by the aforementioned fluctuations of value.
They only modify the rate in which a given surplus-value, and therefore
a profit of a given magnitude, express themselves; in other words, they
modify only the relative magnitude of profit, i. e., its magnitude
compared with the magnitude of the advanced capital. Inasmuch as capital
was tied up or released by such fluctuations of value, it was not only
the rate of profit, but the profit itself, which was likely to be
affected in this indirect manner. However, this has then always applied
only to such capital as was already invested, and not to new
investments. Besides, the increase or reduction of profit always
depended on the extent to which the same capital could, in consequence
of such fluctuation of value, set in motion more or less labor; in other
words, it depended on the extent to which the same capital could, with
the rate of surplus-value remaining the same, obtain a larger or smaller
amount of surplus-value. Far from contradicting the general rule, or
from being an exception to it, this seeming exception was really but a
special case in the application of the general rule.

It was seen in the preceding part that, the degree of exploitation
remaining constant, changes in the value of the component parts of
constant capital and in the time of turnover of capital are attended by
changes in the rate of profit. The obvious conclusion is that the rates
of profit in different spheres of production existing side by side have
to differ when, other circumstances remaining unchanged, the time of
turnover of capitals employed in the different spheres differs, or when
the value-relation of the organic components of these capitals differs
in the various branches of production. What we previously regarded as
changes occurring successively with one and the same capital is now to
be regarded as simultaneous differences among capital investments
existing side by side in different spheres of production.

In these circumstances we shall have to analyze: 1) the difference in
the _organic composition_ of capitals, and 2) the difference in their
period of turnover.

The premise in this entire analysis is naturally that by speaking of the
composition or turnover of a capital in a certain line of production we
always mean the average normal proportions of capital invested in this
sphere, and generally the average in the total capital employed in that
particular sphere, and not the accidental differences of the individual
capitals.

Since it is further assumed that the rate of surplus-value and the
working-day are constant, and since this assumption also implies
constant wages, a certain quantity of variable capital represents a
definite quantity of labor-power set in motion, and therefore a definite
quantity of materialized labor. If, therefore, £100 represent the weekly
wage of 100 laborers, indicating 100 actual labor-powers, then n times
£100 indicate the labour-powers of n times 100 laborers, and £100/n
those of 100/n laborers. The variable capital thus serves here (as is
always the case when the wage is given) as an index of the amount of
labor set in motion by a definite total capital. Differences in the
magnitude of the employed variable capitals serve, therefore, as indexes
of the difference in the amount of employed labor-power. If £100
indicate 100 laborers per week, and represent 6,000 working-hours at 60
working-hours per week, then £200 represent 12,000, and £50 only 3,000
working-hours.

By composition of capital we mean, as stated in Book I, the proportion
of its active and passive components, i. e., of variable and constant
capital. Two proportions enter into consideration under this heading.
They are not equally important, although they may produce similar
effects under certain circumstances.

The first proportion rests on a technical basis, and must be regarded as
given at a certain stage of development of the productive forces. A
definite quantity of labor-power represented by a definite number of
laborers is required to produce a definite quantity of products in, say,
one day, and — what is self-evident — thereby to consume productively,
i. e., to set in motion, a definite quantity of means of production,
machinery, raw materials, etc. A definite number of laborers corresponds
to a definite quantity of means of production, and hence a definite
quantity of living labor to a definite quantity of labor materialized in
means of production. This proportion differs greatly in different
spheres of production, and frequently even in different branches of one
and the same industry, although it may by coincidence be entirely or
approximately the same in entirely separate lines of industry.

This proportion forms the technical composition of capital and is the
real basis of its organic composition.

However, it is also possible that this first proportion may be the same
in different lines of industry, provided variable capital is merely an
index of labor-power and constant capital merely an index of the mass of
means of production set in motion by this labor-power. For instance,
certain work in copper and iron may require the same ratio of
labor-power to mass of means of production. But since copper is more
expensive than iron, the value-relation between variable and constant
capital is different in each case, and hence also the value-composition
of the two total capitals. The difference between the technical
composition and the value composition is manifested in each branch of
industry in that the value-relation of the two portions of capital may
vary while the technical composition is constant, and the value-relation
may remain the same while the technical composition varies. The latter
case will, of course, be possible only if the change in the ratio of the
employed masses of means of production and labor-power is compensated by
a reverse change in their values.

The value-composition of capital, inasmuch as it is determined by, and
reflects, its technical composition, is called the _organic_ composition
of capital.

In the case of variable capital, therefore, we assume that it is the
index of a definite quantity of labor-power, or of a definite number of
laborers, or a definite quantity of living labor set in motion. We have
seen in the preceding part that a change in the magnitude of the value
of variable capital might eventually indicate nothing but a higher or
lower price of the same mass of labor. But here, where the rate of
surplus-value and the working-day are taken to be constant, and the
wages for a definite working period are given, this is out of the
question. On the other hand, a difference in the magnitude of the
constant capital may likewise be an index of a change in the mass of
means of production set in motion by a definite quantity of labor-power.
But it may also stem from a difference in value between the means of
production set in motion in one sphere and those of another. Both points
of view must therefore be examined here.

Finally, we must take note of the following essential facts:

Let £100 be the weekly wage of 100 laborers. Let the weekly
working-hours = 60. Furthermore, let the rate of surplus-value = 100%.
In this case, the laborers work 30 of the 60 hours for themselves and 30
hours gratis for the capitalist. In fact, the £100 of wages represent
just the 30 working-hours of 100 laborers, or altogether 3,000
working-hours, while the other 3,000 hours worked by the laborers are
incorporated in the £100 of surplus-value, or in the profit pocketed by
the capitalist. Although the wage of £100 does not, therefore, express
the value in which the weekly labor of the 100 laborers is materialized,
it indicates nevertheless (since the length of the working-day and the
rate of surplus-value are given) that this capital sets in motion 100
laborers for 6,000 working-hours. The capital of £100 indicates this,
first, because it indicates the number of laborers set in motion, with
£1 = 1 laborer per week, hence £100 = 100 laborers; and, secondly,
because, since the rate of surplus-value is given as 100%, each of these
laborers performs twice as much work as is contained in his wages, so
that £1, i. e., his wage, which is the expression of half a week of
labor, actuates a whole week's labor, just as £100 sets in motion 100
weeks of labor, although it contains only 50. A very essential
distinction is thus to be made in regard to variable capital laid out in
wages. Its value as the sum of wages, i. e., as a certain amount of
materialised labour, is to be distinguished from its value as a mere
index of the mass of living labour which it sets in motion. The latter
is always greater than the labour which it incorporates, and is,
therefore, represented by a greater value than that of the variable
capital. This greater value is determined, on the one hand, by the
number of labourers set in motion by the variable capital and, on the
other, by the quantity of surplus-labour performed by them.

It follows from this manner of looking upon variable capital that:

When a capital invested in production sphere A expends only 100 in
variable capital for each 700 of total capital, leaving 600 for constant
capital, while a capital invested in production sphere B expends 600 for
variable and only 100 for constant capital, then capital A of 700 sets
in motion only 100 of labour-power, or, in the terms of our previous
assumption, 100 weeks of labour, or 6,000 hours of living labour, while
the same amount of capital B will set in motion 600 weeks of labour, or
36,000 hours of living labour. The capital in A would then appropriate
only 50 weeks of labour, or 3,000 hours of surplus-labour, while the
same amount of capital in B would appropriate 300 weeks of labour, or
18,000 hours. Variable capital is not only the index of the labour
embodied in it. When the rate of surplus-value is known it is also an
index of the amount of labour set in motion over and above that embodied
in itself, i. e., of surplus-labour. Assuming the same intensity of
exploitation, the profit in the first case would be 100/700 = 1/7 = 14
2/7%, and in the second case, 600/700 = 6/7 = 85 5/7%, or a six-fold
rate of profit. In this case, the profit itself would actually be six
times as great, 600 in B as against 100 in A, because the same capital
set in motion six times as much living labour, which at the same level
of exploitation means six times as much surplus value, and thus six
times as much profit.

But if the capital invested in A were not 700 but £7,000, while that
invested in B were only £700, and the organic composition of both were
to remain the same, then the capital in A would employ £1,000 of the
£7,000 as variable capital, that is, 1,000 labourers per week = 60,000
hours of living labour, of which 30,000 would be surplus-labour. Yet
each £700 of the capital in A would continue to set in motion only 1/6
as much living labour, and hence only 1/6 as much surplus-labour, as the
capital in B, and would produce only 1/6 as much profit. If we consider
the rate of profit, then in A 1000/7000 = 100/700 = 14 2/7%, as compared
with 600/700, or 85 5/7%, in B. Taking equal amounts of capital, the
rates of profit differ because, owing to the different masses of living
labour set in motion, the masses of surplus-value, and thus of profit,
differ, although the rates of surplus-value are the same.

We get practically the same result if the technical conditions are the
same in both spheres of production, but the value of the elements of the
employed constant capital is greater or smaller in the one than in the
other. Let us assume that both invest £100 as variable capital and
therefore employ 100 labourers per week to set in motion the same
quantity of machinery and raw materials. But let the latter be more
expensive in B than in A. For instance, let the £100 of variable capital
set in motion £200 of constant capital in A, and £400 in B. With the
same rate of surplus-value, of 100%, the surplus-value produced is in
either case equal to £100. Hence, the profit is also equal to £100 in
both. But the rate of profit in A is 100/(200_(c) + 100_(v)) = ⅓ = 33⅓%,
while in B it is 100/(400_(c) + 100_(v)) = 1/5 = 20%. In fact, if we
select a certain aliquot part of the total capital in either case, we
find that in every £100 of B only £20, or 1/5, constitute variable
capital, while in every £100 of A £33⅓, or ⅓, form variable capital. B
produces less profit for each £100, because it sets in motion less
living labour than A. The difference in the rates of profit thus
resolves itself once more, in this case, into a difference of the masses
of profit, because of the masses of surplus-value, produced by each 100
of invested capital.

The difference between this second example and the first is just this:
The equalisation between A and B in the second case would require only a
change in the value of the constant capital of either A or B, provided
the technical basis remained the same. But in the first case the
technical composition itself is different in the two spheres of
production and would have to be completely changed to achieve an
equalisation.

The different organic composition of various capitals is thus
independent of their absolute magnitude. It is always but a question of
how much of every 100 is variable and how much constant capital.

Capitals of different magnitude, calculated in percentages, or, what
amounts to the same in this case, capitals of the same magnitude
operating for the same working-time and with the same degree of
exploitation may produce very much different amounts of profit, because
of surplus-value, for the reason that a difference in the organic
composition of capital in different spheres of production implies a
difference in their variable part, thus a difference in the quantities
of living labour set in motion by them, and therefore also a difference
in the quantities of surplus-labour appropriated by them. And this
surplus-labour is the substance of surplus-value, and thus of profit. In
different spheres of production equal portions of the total capital
comprise unequal sources of surplus-value, and the sole source of
surplus-value is living labour. Assuming the same degree of labour
exploitation, the mass of labour set in motion by a capital of 100, and
consequently the mass of surplus-labour appropriated by it, depend on
the magnitude of its variable component. If a capital, consisting in per
cent of 90_(c) + 10_(v), produced as much surplus-value, or profit, at
the same degree of exploitation as a capital consisting of 10_(c) +
90_(v), it would be as plain as day that the surplus-value, and thus
value in general, must have an entirely different source than labour,
and that political economy would then be deprived of every rational
basis. If we are to assume all the time that £1 stands for the weekly
wage of a labourer working 60 hours, and that the rate of surplus-value
is 100%, then it is evident that the total value product of one labourer
in a week, is £2. Ten labourers would then produce no more than £20. And
since £10 of the £20 replace the wages, the ten labourers cannot produce
more surplus-value than £10. On the other hand, 90 labourers, whose
total product is £180, and whose wages amount to £90, would produce a
surplus-value of £90. The rate of profit in the first case would thus be
10%, and in the other 90% . If this were not so, then value and
surplus-value would be something else than materialised labour. Since
capitals in different spheres of production viewed in percentages — or
as capitals of equal magnitude — are divided differently into variable
and constant capital, setting in motion unequal quantities of living
labour and producing different surplus-values, and therefore profits, it
follows that the rate of profit, which consists precisely of the ratio
of surplus-value to total capital in per cent, must also differ.

Now, if capitals in different spheres of production, calculated in per
cent, i. e., capitals of equal magnitude, produce unequal profits in
consequence of their different organic composition, then it follows that
the profits of unequal capitals in different spheres of production
cannot be proportional to their respective magnitudes, or that profits
in different spheres of production are not proportional to the magnitude
of the respective capitals invested in them. For if profits were to grow
_pro rata_ to the magnitude of invested capital, it would mean that in
per cent the profits would be the same, so that in different spheres of
production capitals of equal magnitude would have equal rates of profit,
in spite of their different organic composition. It is only in the same
sphere of production, where we have a given organic composition of
capital, or in different spheres with the same organic composition of
capital, that the amounts of profits are directly proportional to the
amounts of invested capitals. To say that the profits of unequal
capitals are proportional to their magnitudes would only mean that
capitals of equal magnitude yield equal profits, or that the rate of
profit is the same for all capitals, whatever their magnitude and
organic composition.

These statements hold good on the assumption that the commodities are
sold at their values. The value of a commodity is equal to the value of
the constant capital contained in it, plus the value of the variable
capital reproduced in it, plus the increment — the surplus-value
produced — of this variable capital. At the same rate of surplus-value,
its quantity evidently depends on the quantity of the variable capital.
The value of the product of an individual capital of 100 is, in one
case, 90_(c) + 10_(v) + 10_(s) = 110; and in the other, 10_(c) + 90_(v)
+ 90_(s) = l90. If the commodities go at their values, the first product
is sold at 110, of which 10 represent surplus-value, or unpaid labour,
and the second at 190, of which 90 represent surplus-value, or unpaid
labour.

This is particularly important in comparing rates of profit in different
countries. Let us assume that the rate of surplus-value in one European
country is 100%, so that the labourer works half of the working-day for
himself and the other half for his employer. Let us further assume that
the rate of profit in an Asian country is 25%, so that the labourer
works 4/5 of the working-day for himself, and 1/5 for his employer. Let
84_(c) + l6_(v) be the composition of the national capital in the
European country, and 16_(c) + 84_(v) in the Asian country, where little
machinery, etc., is used, and where a given quantity of labour-power
consumes relatively little raw material productively in a given time.
Then we have the following calculation:

In the European country the value of the product = 84_(c) + 16_(v) +
16_(s) = 116; rate of profit = 16/100 = 16%.

In the Asian country the value of the product = 16_(c) + 84_(v) + 21_(s)
= 121; rate of profit = 21/100 = 21%.

The rate of profit in the Asian country is thus more than 25% higher
than in the European country, although the rate of surplus-value in the
former is one-fourth that of the latter. Men like Carey, Bastiat, and
_tutti quanti_, would arrive at the very opposite conclusion.

By the way, different national rates of profit are mostly based on
different national rates of surplus-value. But in this chapter we
compare unequal rates of profit derived from the same rate of
surplus-value.

Aside from differences in the organic composition of capitals, and
therefore aside from the different masses of labour — and consequently,
other circumstances remaining the same, from different masses of
surplus-labour set in motion by capitals of the same magnitude in
different spheres of production, there is yet another source of
inequality in rates of profit. This is the different period of turnover
of capital in different spheres of production. We have seen in Chapter
IV that, other conditions being equal, the rates of profit of capitals
of the same organic composition are inversely proportional to their
periods of turnover. We have also seen that the same variable capital
turned over in different periods of time produces different quantities
of annual surplus-value. The difference in the periods of turnover is
therefore another reason why capitals of equal magnitude in different
spheres of production do not produce equal profits in equal periods, and
why, consequently, the rates of profit in these different spheres
differ.

As far as the ratio of the fixed and circulating capital in the
composition of capitals is concerned, however, it does not in itself
affect the rate of profit in the least. It can affect the rate of profit
only if in one case, this difference in composition coincides with a
different ratio of the variable and constant parts, so that the
difference in the rate of profit is due to this latter difference, and
not to the different ratio of fixed and circulating capital; and, in the
other case, if the difference in the ratio of the fixed and circulating
parts of capital is responsible for a difference in the period of
turnover in which a certain profit is realised. If capitals are divided
into fixed and circulating capital in different proportions, this will
naturally always influence the period of turnover and cause differences
in it. But this does not imply that the period of turnover, in which the
same capitals realise certain profits, is different. For instance, A may
continually have to convert the greater part of its product into raw
materials, etc., while B may use the same machinery, etc., for a longer
time, and may need less raw material, but both A and B, being occupied
in production, always have a part of their capital engaged, the one in
raw materials, i. e., in circulating capital, and the other in
machinery, etc., or in fixed capital. A continually converts a portion
of its capital from the form of commodities into that of money, and the
latter again into the form of raw material, while B employs a portion of
its capital for a longer time as an instrument of labour without any
such conversions. If both of them employ the same amount of labour, they
will indeed sell quantities of products of unequal value in the course
of the year, but both quantities of products will contain equal amounts
of surplus-value, and their rates of profit, calculated on the entire
capital invested, will be the same, although their composition of fixed
and circulating capital, and their periods of turnover, are different.
Both capitals realise equal profits in equal periods, although their
periods of turnover are different.^([1]\ ) The difference in the period
of turnover is in itself of no importance, except so far as it affects
the mass of surplus-labour appropriated and realised by the same capital
in a given time. If, therefore, a different division into fixed and
circulating capital does not necessarily imply a different period of
turnover, which would in its turn imply a different rate of profit, it
is evident that if there is any such difference in the rates of profit,
it is not due to a different ratio of fixed to circulating capital as
such, but rather to the fact that this different ratio indicates an
inequality in the periods of turnover affecting the rate of profit.

It follows, therefore, that the different composition of constant
capital in respect to its fixed and circulating portions in various
branches of production has in itself no bearing on the rate of profit,
since it is the ratio of variable to constant capital which decides this
question, while the value of the constant capital, and therefore also
its magnitude in relation to the variable is entirely unrelated to the
fixed or circulating nature of its components. Yet it may be found — and
this often leads to incorrect conclusions — that wherever fixed capital
is considerably advanced this but expresses the fact that production is
on a large scale, so that constant capital greatly outweighs the
variable, or that the living labour-power it employs is small compared
to the mass of the means of production which it operates.

We have thus demonstrated that different lines of industry have
different rates of profit, which correspond to differences in the
organic composition of their capitals and, within indicated limits, also
to their different periods of turnover; given the same time of turnover,
the law (as a general tendency) that profits are related to one another
as the magnitudes of the capitals, and that, consequently, capitals of
equal magnitude yield equal profits in equal periods, applies only to
capitals of the same organic composition, even with the same rate of
surplus-value. These statements hold good on the assumption which has
been the basis of all our analyses so far, namely that the commodities
are sold at their values. There is no doubt, on the other hand, that
aside from unessential, incidental and mutually compensating
distinctions, differences in the average rate of profit in the various
branches of industry do not exist in reality, and could not exist
without abolishing the entire system of capitalist production. It would
seem, therefore, that here the theory of value is incompatible with the
actual process, incompatible with the real phenomena of production, and
that for this reason any attempt to understand these phenomena should be
given up.

It follows from the first part of this volume that the cost-prices of
products in different spheres of production are equal if equal portions
of capital have been advanced for their production, however different
the organic composition of such capitals. The distinction between
variable and constant capital escapes the capitalist in the cost-price.
A commodity for whose production he must advance £100 costs him just as
much, whether he invests 90_(c) + 10_(v), or 10_(c) + 90_(v). It costs
him £100 in either case — no more and no less. The cost-prices are the
same for equal capitals in different spheres, no matter how much the
produced values and surplus-values may differ. The equality of
cost-prices is the basis for competition among invested capitals,
whereby an average profit is brought about.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. [It follows from Chapter IV that the above statement correctly
applies only when capitals A and B are differently composed in respect
to their values, but that the percentages of their variable parts are
proportionate to their periods of turnover, i. e., inversely
proportionate to their number of turnovers. Let capital A have the
following percentages of composition: 20_(c) fixed + 70_(c) circulating
and thus 90_(c) + 10_(v) = 100. At a rate of surplus-value of 100% the
l0_(v) produces 10_(s) in one turnover, yielding a rate of profit for
one turnover = 10%. Let capital B = 60_(c) fixed + 20_(c) circulating,
and thus 80_(c) + 20_(v) = 100. The 20_(v) produce 20_(s) in one
turnover at the above rate of surplus-value, yielding a rate of profit
for one turnover = 20%, which is double that of A. But if A is turned
over twice per year, and B only once, then 2 × 10 also make 20_(s) per
year, and the annual rate of profit is the same for both, namely 20%. —
_F.E._]

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 9. Formation of a General Rate of Profit (Average Rate of Profit) and Transformation of the Values of Commodities into Prices of Production

 

The organic composition of capital depends at any given time on two
circumstances: first, on the technical relation of labour power employed
to the mass of the means of production employed; secondly, on the price
of these means of production. This composition, as we have seen, must be
examined on the basis of percentage ratios. We express the organic
composition of a certain capital consisting 4/5 of constant and 1/5 of
variable capital, by the formula 80_(c) + 20_(v). It is furthermore
assumed in this comparison that the rate of surplus-value is
unchangeable. Let it be any rate picked at random; say, 100%. The
capital of 80_(c) + 20_(v) then produces a surplus-value of 20_(s), and
this yields a rate of profit of 20% on the total capital. The magnitude
of the actual value of its product depends on the magnitude of the fixed
part of the constant capital, and on the portion which passes from it
through wear and tear into the product. But since this circumstance has
absolutely no bearing on the rate of profit, and hence, in the present
analysis, we shall assume, for the sake of simplicity, that the constant
capital is everywhere uniformly and entirely transferred to the annual
product of the capitals. It is further assumed that the capitals in the
different spheres of production annually realise the same quantities of
surplus-value proportionate to the magnitude of their variable parts.
For the present, therefore, we disregard the difference which may be
produced in this respect by variations in the duration of turnovers.
This point will be discussed later.

Let us take five different spheres of production, and let the capital in
each have a different organic composition as follows:

  ---------------------- --------------- ---------- ---------- ---------
  Capitals               Rate of         Surplus-   Value of   Rate of
                         Surplus-Value   Value      Product    Profit

  I. 80_(c) + 20_(v)     100%            20         120        20%

  II. 70_(c) + 30_(v)    100%            30         130        30%

  III. 60_(c) + 40_(v)   100%            40         140        40%

  IV. 85_(c) + 15_(v)    100%            15         115        15%

  V. 95_(c) + 5_(v)      100%            5          105        5%
  ---------------------- --------------- ---------- ---------- ---------

Here, in different spheres of production with the same degree of
exploitation, we find considerably different rates of profit
corresponding to the different organic composition of these capitals.

The sum total of the capitals invested in these five spheres of
production = 500; the sum total of the surplus-value produced by them =
110; the aggregate value of the commodities produced by them = 610. If
we consider the 500 as a single capital, and capitals I to V merely as
its component parts (as, say, different departments of a cotton mill,
which has different ratios of constant to variable capital in its
carding, preparatory spinning, spinning, and weaving shops, and in which
the average ratio for the factory as a whole has still to be
calculated), the mean composition of this capital of 500 would = 390_(c)
+ 110_(v), or, in per cent, = 78_(c) + 22_(v). Should each of the
capitals of 100 be regarded as 1/5 of the total capital, its composition
would equal this average of 78_(c) + 22_(v); for every 100 there would
be an average surplus-value of 22; thus, the average rate of profit
would = 22%, and, finally, the price of every fifth of the total product
produced by the 500 would = 122. The product of each fifth of the
advanced total capital would then have to be sold at 122.

But to avoid entirely erroneous conclusions it must not be assumed that
all cost-prices = 100.

With 80_(c) + 20_(v) and a rate of surplus-value = 100%, the total value
of commodities produced by capital I = 100 would be 80_(c) + 20_(v) +
20_(s) = 120, provided the entire constant capital went into the annual
product. Now, this may under certain circumstances be the case in some
spheres of production. But hardly in cases where the proportion of c : v
= 4 : 1. We must, therefore, remember in comparing the values produced
by each 100 of the different capitals, that they will differ in
accordance with the different composition of c as to its fixed and
circulating parts, and that, in turn, the fixed portions of each of the
different capitals depreciate slowly or rapidly as the case may be, thus
transferring unequal quantities of their value to the product in equal
periods of time. But this is immaterial to the rate of profit. No matter
whether the 80_(c) give up a value of 80, or 50, or 5, to the annual
product, and the annual product consequently = 80_(c) + 20_(v) + 20_(s)
= 120, or 50_(c) + 20_(v) + 20_(s) = 90, or 5_(v) + 20_(v) + 20_(s) =
45; in all these cases the redundance of the product's value over its
cost-price = 20, and in calculating the rate of profit these 20 are
related to the capital of 100 in all of them. The rate of profit of
capital I, therefore, is 20% in every case. To make this still plainer,
we let different portions of constant capital go into the value of the
product of the same five capitals in the following table:

  ---------------------- --------------- ---------- --------- ------ ------------- ------- ---------
  Capitals               Rate of         Surplus-   Rate of   Used   Value of      Cost-    
                         Surplus-Value   Value      Profit    up c   commodities   Price   

  I. 80_(c) + 20_(v)     100%            20         20%       50     90            70       

  II. 70_(c) + 30_(v)    100%            30         30%       51     111           81       

  III. 60_(c) + 40_(v)   100%            40         40%       51     131           91       

  IV. 85_(c) + 15_(v)    100%            15         15%       40     70            55       

  V. 95_(c) + 5_(v)      100%            5          5%        10     20            15       

  390_(c) + 110_(v)      —               110        110%      —      —             —       Total

  78_(c) + 22_(v)        —               22         22%       —      —             —       Average
  ---------------------- --------------- ---------- --------- ------ ------------- ------- ---------

If we now again consider capitals I to V as a single total capital, we
shall see that, in this case as well, the composition of the sums of
these five capitals = 500 = 390_(c) + 110_(v), so that we get the same
average composition = 78_(c) + 22_(v), and, similarly, the average
surplus-value remains 22. If we divide this surplus-value uniformly
among capitals I to V, we get the following commodity-prices:

  ---------------------- ---------- ------------- --------------- ------------- --------- ------------------
  Capitals               Surplus-   Value of      Cost-Price of   Price of      Rate of   Deviation of
                         Value      Commodities   Commodities     Commodities   Profit    Price from Value

  I. 80_(c) + 20_(v)     20         90            70              92            22%       +2

  II. 70_(c) + 30_(v)    30         111           81              103           22%       -8

  III. 60_(c) + 40_(v)   40         131           91              113           22%       -18

  IV. 85_(c) + 15_(v)    15         70            55              77            22%       +7

  V. 95_(c) + 5_(v)      5          20            15              37            22%       +17
  ---------------------- ---------- ------------- --------------- ------------- --------- ------------------

Taken together, the commodities are sold at 2 + 7 + 17 = 26 above, and 8
+ 18 = 26 below their value, so that the deviations of price from value
balance out one another through the uniform distribution of
surplus-value, or through addition of the average profit of 22 per 100
units of advanced capital to the respective cost-prices of the
commodities I to V. One portion of the commodities is sold above its
value in the same proportion in which the other is sold below it. And it
is only the sale of the commodities at such prices that enables the rate
of profit for capitals I to V to be uniformly 22%, regardless of their
different organic composition. The prices which obtain as the average of
the various rates of profit in the different spheres of production added
to the cost-prices of the different spheres of production, constitute
the prices of production. They have as their prerequisite the existence
of a general rate of profit, and this, again, presupposes that the rates
of profit in every individual sphere of production taken by itself have
previously been reduced to just as many average rates. These particular
rates of profit = s/c in every sphere of production, and must, as occurs
in Part I of this book, be deduced out of the values of the commodities.
Without such deduction the general rate of profit (and consequently the
price of production of commodities) remains a vague and senseless
conception. Hence, the price of production of a commodity is equal to
its cost-price plus the profit, allotted to it in per cent, in
accordance with the general rate of profit, or, in other words, to its
cost-price plus the average profit.

Owing to the different organic compositions of capitals invested in
different lines of production, and, hence, owing to the circumstance
that — depending on the different percentage which the variable part
makes up in a total capital of a given magnitude — capitals of equal
magnitude put into motion very different quantities of labour, they also
appropriate very different quantities of surplus-labour or produce very
different quantities of surplus-value. Accordingly, the rates of profit
prevailing in the various branches of production are originally very
different. These different rates of profit are equalized by competition
to a single general rate of profit, which is the average of all these
different rates of profit. The profit accruing in accordance with this
general rate of profit to any capital of a given magnitude, whatever its
organic composition, is called the average profit. The price of a
commodity, which is equal to its cost-price plus the share of the annual
average profit on the total capital invested (not merely consumed) in
its production that falls to it in accordance with the conditions of
turnover, is called its price of production. Take, for example, a
capital of 500, of which 100 is fixed capital, and let 10% of this wear
out during one turnover of the circulating capital of 400. Let the
average profit for the period of turnover be 10%. In that case the
cost-price of the product created during this turnover will be 10_(c)
for wear plus 400 (c + v) circulating capital = 410, and its price of
production will be 410 cost-price plus (10% profit on 500) 50 = 460.

Thus, although in selling their commodities the capitalists of the
various spheres of production recover the value of the capital consumed
in their production, they do not secure the surplus-value, and
consequently the profit, created in their own sphere by the production
of these commodities. What they secure is only as much surplus-value,
and hence profit, as falls, when uniformly distributed, to the share of
every aliquot part of the total social capital from the total social
surplus-value, or profit, produced in a given time by the social capital
in all spheres of production. Every 100 of an invested capital, whatever
its composition, draws as much profit in a year, or any other period of
time, as falls to the share of every 100, the Nth part of the total
capital, during the same period. So far as profits are concerned, the
various capitalists are just so many stockholders in a stock company in
which the shares of profit are uniformly divided per 100, so that
profits differ in the case of the individual capitalists only in
accordance with the amount of capital invested by each in the aggregate
enterprise, i. e., according to his investment in social production as a
whole, according to the number of his shares. Therefore, the portion of
the price of commodities which replaces the elements of capital consumed
in the production of these commodities, the portion, therefore, which
will have to be used to buy back these consumed capital-values, i. e.,
their cost-price, depends entirely on the outlay of capital within the
respective spheres of production. But the other element of the price of
commodities, the profit added to this cost-price, does not depend on the
amount of profit produced in a given sphere of production by a given
capital in a given period of time. It depends on the mass of profit
which falls as an average for any given period to each individual
capital as an aliquot part of the total social capital invested in
social production.

When a capitalist sells his commodities at their price of production,
therefore, he recovers money in proportion to the value of the capital
consumed in their production and secures profit in proportion to this
advanced capital as the aliquot part in the total social capital. His
cost-prices are specific. But the profit added to them is independent of
his particular sphere of production, being a simple average per 100
units of invested capital.

Let us assume that the five different investments I to V of the
foregoing illustration belong to one man. The quantity of variable and
constant capital consumed per 100 of the invested capital in each of the
departments I to V in the production of commodities I to V would,
needless to say, make up a part of their price, since at least this
price is required to recover the advanced and consumed portions of the
capital. These cost-prices would therefore be different for each class
of the commodities I to V, and would as such be set differently by the
owner. But as regards the different quantities of surplus-value, or
profit, produced by I to V, they might easily be regarded by the
capitalist as profit on his advanced aggregate capital, so that each 100
units would get their definite aliquot part. Hence, the cost-prices of
the commodities produced in the various departments I to V would be
different; but that portion of their selling price derived from the
profit added per 100 capital would be the same for all these
commodities. The aggregate price of the commodities I to V would
therefore equal their aggregate value, i. e., the sum of the cost-prices
I to V plus the sum of the surplus-values, or profits, produced in I to
V. It would hence actually be the money-expression of the total quantity
of past and newly applied labour incorporated in commodities I to V. And
in the same way the sum of the prices of production of all commodities
produced in society — the totality of all branches of production — is
equal to the sum of their values.

This statement seems to conflict with the fact that under capitalist
production the elements of productive capital are, as a rule, bought on
the market, and that for this reason their prices include profit which
has already been realised, hence, include the price of production of the
respective branch of industry together with the profit contained in it,
so that the profit of one branch of industry goes into the cost-price of
another. But if we place the sum of the cost-prices of the commodities
of an entire country on one side, and the sum of its surplus-values, or
profits, on the other, the calculation must evidently be right. For
instance, take a certain commodity A. Its cost-price may contain the
profits of B, C, D, etc., just as the cost-prices of B, C, D, etc., may
contain the profits of A. Now, as we make our calculation the profit of
A will not be included in its cost-price, nor will the profits of B, C,
D, etc., be included in theirs. Nobody ever includes his own profit in
his cost-price. If there are, therefore, n spheres of production, and if
each makes a profit amounting to p, then their aggregate cost-price = k
- np. Considering the calculation as a whole we see that since the
profits of one sphere of production pass into the cost-price of another,
they are therefore included in the calculation as constituents of the
total price of the end-product, and so cannot appear a second time on
the profit side. If any do appear on this side, however, then only
because the commodity in question is itself an ultimate product, whose
price of production does not pass into the cost-price of some other
commodity.

If the cost-price of a commodity includes a sum = p, which stands for
the profits of the producers of the means of production, and if a profit
= p₁ is added to this cost-price, the aggregate profit P = p + p₁. The
aggregate cost-price of the commodity, considered without the profit
portions, is then its own cost-price minus P. Let this cost-price be k.
Then, obviously, k + p = k + p + p₁. In dealing with surplus-values, we
have seen in Book I that the product of every capital may be so treated,
as though a part of it replaces only capital, while the other part
represents only surplus-value. In applying this approach to the
aggregate product of society, we must make some rectifications. Looking
upon society as a whole, the profit contained in, say, the price of flax
cannot appear twice — not both as a portion of the linen price and as
the profit of the flax.

There is no difference between surplus-value and profit, as long as,
e.g., A's surplus-value passes into B's constant capital. It is, after
all, quite immaterial to the value of the commodities, whether the
labour contained in them is paid or unpaid. This merely shows that B
pays for A's surplus-value. A's surplus-value cannot be entered twice in
the total calculation.

But the difference is this: Aside from the fact that the price of a
particular product, let us say that of capital B, differs from its value
because the surplus-value realised in B may be greater or smaller than
the profit added to the price of the products of B, the same
circumstance applies also to those commodities which form the constant
part of capital B, and indirectly also its variable part, as the
labourers' necessities of life. So far as the constant portion is
concerned, it is itself equal to the cost-price plus the surplus-value,
here therefore equal to cost-price plus profit, and this profit may
again be greater or smaller than the surplus-value for which it stands.
As for the variable capital, the average daily wage is indeed always
equal to the value produced in the number of hours the labourer must
work to produce the necessities of life. But this number of hours is in
its turn obscured by the deviation of the prices of production of the
necessities of life from their values. However, this always resolves
itself to one commodity receiving too little of the surplus-value while
another receives too much, so that the deviations from the value which
are embodied in the prices of production compensate one another. Under
capitalist production, the general law acts as the prevailing tendency
only in a very complicated and approximate manner, as a never
ascertainable average of ceaseless fluctuations.

Since the general rate of profit is formed by taking the average of the
various rates of profit for each 100 of capital invested in a definite
period, e.g., a year, it follows that in it the difference brought about
by different periods of turnover of different capitals is also effaced.
But these differences have a decisive bearing on the different rates of
profit in the various spheres of production whose average forms the
general rate of profit.

In the preceding illustration concerning the formation of the average
rate of profit we assumed each capital in each sphere of production =
100, and we did so to show the difference in the rates of profit in per
cent, and thus also the difference in the values of commodities produced
by equal amounts of capital. But it goes without saying that the actual
amounts of surplus-value produced in each sphere of production depend on
the magnitude of the invested capitals, since the composition of capital
is given in each sphere of production. Yet the actual rate of profit in
any particular sphere of production is not affected by the fact that the
capital invested is 100, or m times 100, or xm times 100. The rate of
profit remains 10%, whether the total profit is 10:100, or 1,000:10,000.

However, since the rates of profit differ in the various spheres of
production, with very much different quantities of surplus-value, or
profit, being produced in them, depending on the proportion of the
variable to the total capital, it is evident that the average profit per
100 of the social capital, and hence the average, or general, rate of
profit, will differ considerably in accordance with the respective
magnitudes of the capitals invested in the various spheres. Let us take
four capitals A, B, C, D. Let the rate of surplus-value for all = 100%.
Let the variable capital for each 100 of the total be 25 in A, 40 in B,
15 in C, and 10 in D. Then each 100 of the total capital would yield a
surplus-value, or profit, of 25 in A, 40 in B, 15 in C, and 10 in D.
This would total 90, and if these four capitals are of the same
magnitude, the average rate of profit would then be 90/4 or 22½%.

Suppose, however, the total capitals are as follows: A = 200, B = 300, C
= 1,000, D = 4,000. The profits produced would then respectively = 50,
120, 150, and 400. This makes a profit of 720, and an average rate of
profit of 13 1/11% for 5,500, the sum of the four capitals.

The masses of the total value produced differ in accordance with the
magnitudes of the total capitals invested in A, B, C, D, respectively.
The formation of the average rate of profit is, therefore, not merely a
matter of obtaining the simple average of the different rates of profit
in the various spheres of production, but rather one of the relative
weight which these different rates of profit have in forming this
average. This, however, depends on the relative magnitude of the capital
invested in each particular sphere, or on the aliquot part which the
capital invested in each particular sphere forms in the aggregate social
capital. There will naturally be a very great difference, depending on
whether a greater or smaller part of the total capital produces a higher
or lower rate of profit. And this, again, depends on how much capital is
invested in spheres, in which the variable capital is relatively small
or large compared to the total capital. It is just like the average
interest obtained by a usurer who lends various quantities of capital at
different interest rates; for instance, at 4, 5, 6, 7%, etc. The average
rate will depend entirely on how much of his capital he has loaned out
at each of the different rates of interest.

The general rate of profit is, therefore, determined by two factors:
1) The organic composition of the capitals in the different spheres of
production, and thus, the different rates of profit in the individual
spheres.
2) The distribution of the total social capital in these different
spheres, and thus, the relative magnitude of the capital invested in
each particular sphere at the specific rate of profit prevailing in it;
i. e., the relative share of the total social capital absorbed by each
individual sphere of production.

In Books I and II we dealt only with the _value_ of commodities. On the
one hand, the _cost-price_ has now been singled out as a part of this
value, and, on the other, the _price of production_ of commodities has
been developed as its converted form.

Suppose the composition of the average social capital is 80_(c) + 20_(v)
and the annual rate of surplus-value, s', is 100%. In that case the
average annual profit for a capital of 100 = 20, and the general annual
rate of profit = 20%. Whatever the cost-price, k, of the commodities
annually produced by a capital of 100, their price of production would
then be k + 20. In those spheres of production in which the composition
of capital would = (80 - x)_(c) + (20 + x)_(v), the actually produced
surplus-value, or the annual profit produced in that particular sphere,
would be 20 + x, that is, greater than 20, and the value of the produced
commodities = k + 20 + x, that is, greater than k + 20, or greater than
their price of production. In those spheres, in which the composition of
the capital=(80 + x)_(c) + (20 - x)_(v), the annually produced
surplus-value, or profit, would = 20 - x, or less than 20, and
consequently the value of the commodities k + 20 - x less than the price
of production, which = k + 20. Aside from possible differences in the
periods of turnover, the price of production of the commodities would
then equal their value only in spheres, in which the composition would
happen to be 80_(c) + 20_(v).

The specific development of the social productivity of labour in each
particular sphere of production varies in degree, higher or lower,
depending on how large a quantity of means of production are set in
motion by a definite quantity of labour, hence in a given working-day by
a definite number of labourers, and, consequently, on how small a
quantity of labour is required for a given quantity of means of
production. Such capitals as contain a larger percentage of constant and
a smaller percentage of variable capital than the average social capital
are, therefore, called capitals of _higher_ composition, and,
conversely, those capitals in which the constant is relatively smaller,
and the variable relatively greater than in the average social capital,
are called capitals of _lower_ composition. Finally, we call those
capitals whose composition coincides with the average, capitals of
average composition. Should the average social capital be composed in
per cent of 80_(c) + 20_(v), then a capital of 90_(c) + 10_(v) is
_higher_, and a capital of 70_(c) + 30_(v)_lower_ than the social
average. Generally speaking, if the composition of the average social
capital=mc + nv, in which m and n are constant magnitudes and m + n =
100, the formula (m + x)_(c) + (n - x)_(v) represents the higher
composition, and (m - x)_(c) + (n + x)_(v) the lower composition of an
individual capital or group of capitals. The way in which these capitals
perform their functions after establishment of an average rate of profit
and assuming one turnover per year, is shown in the following
tabulation, in which I represents the average composition with an
average rate of profit of 20%.

  ------------------------------------------------------
  I) 80_(v) + 20_(v) + 20_(s). Rate of profit = 20%.
  Price of product = 120. Value = 120.
  II) 90_(c) + 10_(v) + 10_(s). Rate of profit = 20%.
  Price of product = 120. Value = 110.
  III) 70_(c) + 30_(v) + 30_(s). Rate of profit = 20%.
  Price of product = 120. Value = 130.
  ------------------------------------------------------

The value of the commodities produced by capital II would, therefore, be
smaller than their price of production, the price of production of the
commodities of III smaller than their value, and only in the case of
capital I in branches of production in which the composition happens to
coincide with the social average, would value and price of production be
equal. In applying these terms to any particular cases note must,
however, be taken whether a deviation of the ratio between c and v is
simply due to a change in the value of the elements of constant capital,
rather than to a difference in the technical composition.

The foregoing statements have at any rate modified the original
assumption concerning the determination of the cost-price of
commodities. We had originally assumed that the cost-price of a
commodity equalled the value of the commodities consumed in its
production. But for the buyer the price of production of a specific
commodity is its cost-price, and may thus pass as cost-price into the
prices of other commodities. Since the price of production may differ
from the value of a commodity, it follows that the cost-price of a
commodity containing this price of production of another commodity may
also stand above or below that portion of its total value derived from
the value of the means of production consumed by it. It is necessary to
remember this modified significance of the cost-price, and to bear in
mind that there is always the possibility of an error if the cost-price
of a commodity in any particular sphere is identified with the value of
the means of production consumed by it. Our present analysis does not
necessitate a closer examination of this point. It remains true,
nevertheless, that the cost-price of a commodity is always smaller than
its value. For no matter how much the cost-price of a commodity may
differ from the value of the means of production consumed by it, this
past mistake is immaterial to the capitalist. The cost-price of a
particular commodity is a definite condition which is given, and
independent of the production of our capitalist, while the result of his
production is a commodity containing surplus-value, therefore an excess
of value over and above its cost-price. For all other purposes, the
statement that the cost-price is smaller than the value of a commodity
has now changed practically into the statement that the cost-price is
smaller than the price of production. As concerns the total social
capital, in which the price of production is equal to the value, this
statement is identical with the former, namely that the cost-price is
smaller than the value. And while it is modified in the individual
spheres of production, the fundamental fact always remains that in the
case of the total social capital the cost-price of the commodities
produced by it is smaller than their value, or, in the case of the total
mass of social commodities, smaller than their price of production,
which is identical with their value. The cost-price of a commodity
refers only to the quantity of paid labour contained in it, while its
value refers to all the paid and unpaid labour contained in it. The
price of production refers to the sum of the paid labour plus a certain
quantity of unpaid labour determined for any particular sphere of
production by conditions over which it has no control.

The formula that the price of production of a commodity = k + p, i. e.,
equals its cost-price plus profit, is now more precisely defined with p
= kp' (p' being the general rate of profit). Hence the price of
production = k + kp'. If k = 300 and p' = 15%, then the price of
production is k + kp' = 300 + 300 × 15/100, or 345.

The price of production of the commodities in any particular sphere may
change in magnitude:

1) If the general rate of profit changes independently of this
particular sphere, while the value of the commodities remains the same
(the same quantities of congealed and living labour being consumed in
their production as before).

2) If there is a change of value, either in this particular sphere in
consequence of technical changes, or in consequence of a change in the
value of those commodities which form the elements of its constant
capital, while the general rate of profit remains unchanged.

3) Finally, if a combination of the two aforementioned circumstances
takes place.

In spite of the great changes occurring continually, as we shall see, in
the actual rates of profit within the individual spheres of production,
any real change in the general rate of profit, unless brought about by
way of an exception by extraordinary economic events, is the belated
effect of a series of fluctuations extending over very long periods,
fluctuations which require much time before consolidating and equalising
one another to bring about a change in the general rate of profit. In
all shorter periods (quite aside from fluctuations of market-prices), a
change in the prices of production is, therefore, always traceable
_prima facie_ to actual changes in the value of commodities, i. e., to
changes in the total amount of labour-time required for their
production. Mere changes in the money-expression of the same values are,
naturally, not at all considered here.

On the other hand, it is evident that from the point of view of the
total social capital the value of the commodities produced by it (or,
expressed in money, their price) = value of constant capital + value of
variable capital + surplus-value. Assuming the degree of labour
exploitation to be constant, the rate of profit cannot change so long as
the mass of surplus-value remains the same, unless there is a change in
either the value of the constant capital, the value of the variable
capital, or the value of both, so that C changes, and thereby s/C, which
represents the general rate of profit. In each case, therefore, a change
in the general rate of profit implies a change in the value of
commodities which form the elements of the constant or variable capital,
or of both.

Or, the general rate of profit may change, while the value of the
commodities remains the same, when the degree of labour exploitation
changes.

Or, if the degree of labour exploitation remains the same, the general
rate of profit may change through a change in the amount of labour
employed relative to the constant capital as a result of technical
changes in the labour-process. But such technical changes must always
show themselves in, and be attended by, a change in the value of the
commodities, whose production would then require more or less labour
than before.

We saw in Part I that surplus-value and profit are identical from the
standpoint of their mass. But the rate of profit is from the very outset
distinct from the rate of surplus-value, which appears at first sight as
merely a different form of calculating. But at the same time this
serves, also from the outset, to obscure and mystify the actual origin
of surplus-value, since the rate of profit can rise or fall while the
rate of surplus-value remains the same, and vice versa, and since the
capitalist is in practice solely interested in the rate of profit. Yet
there was difference of magnitude only between the rate of surplus-value
and the rate of profit and not between the surplus-value itself and
profit. Since in the rate of profit the surplus-value is calculated in
relation to the total capital and the latter is taken as its standard of
measurement, the surplus-value itself appears to originate from the
total capital, uniformly derived from all its parts, so that the organic
difference between constant and variable capital is obliterated in the
conception of profit. Disguised as profit, surplus-value actually denies
its origin, loses its character, and becomes unrecognisable. However,
hitherto the distinction between profit and surplus-value applied solely
to a qualitative change, or change of form, while there was no real
difference of magnitude in this first stage of the change between
surplus-value and profit, but only between the rate of profit and the
rate of surplus-value.

But it is different, as soon as a general rate of profit, and thereby an
average profit corresponding to the magnitude of invested capital given
in the various spheres of production, have been established.

It is then only an accident if the surplus-value, and thus the profit,
actually produced in any particular sphere of production, coincides with
the profit contained in the selling price of a commodity. As a rule,
surplus-value and profit and not their rates alone, are then different
magnitudes. At a given degree of exploitation, the mass of surplus-value
produced in a particular sphere of production is then more important for
the aggregate average profit of social capital, and thus for the
capitalist class in general, than for the individual capitalist in any
specific branch of production. It is of importance to the latter only in
so far as the quantity of surplus-value produced in his branch helps to
regulate the average profit. But this is a process which occurs behind
his back, one he does not see, nor understand, and which indeed does not
interest him. The actual difference of magnitude between profit and
surplus-value — not merely between the rate of profit and the rate of
surplus-value — in the various spheres of production now completely
conceals the true nature and origin of profit not only from the
capitalist, who has a special interest in deceiving himself on this
score, but also from the labourer. The transformation of values into
prices of production serves to obscure the basis for determining value
itself. Finally, since the mere transformation of surplus-value into
profit distinguishes the portion of the value of a commodity forming the
profit from the portion forming its cost-price, it is natural that the
conception of value should elude the capitalist at this juncture, for he
does not see the total labour put into the commodity, but only that
portion of the total labour for which he has paid in the shape of means
of production, be they living or not, so that his profit appears to him
as something outside the immanent value of the commodity. Now this idea
is fully confirmed, fortified, and ossified in that, from the standpoint
of his particular sphere of production, the profit added to the
cost-price is not actually determined by the limits of the formation of
value within his own sphere, but through completely outside influences.

The fact that this intrinsic connection is here revealed for the first
time; that up to the present time political economy, as we shall see in
the following and in Book IV, either forcibly abstracted itself from the
distinctions between surplus-value and profit, and their rates, so it
could retain value determination as a basis, or else abandoned this
value determination and with it all vestiges of a scientific approach,
in order to cling to the differences that strike the eye in this
phenomenon — this confusion of the theorists best illustrates the utter
incapacity of the practical capitalist, blinded by competition as he is,
and incapable of penetrating its phenomena, to recognise the inner
essence and inner structure of this process behind its outer appearance.

In fact, all the laws evolved in Part I concerning the rise and fall of
the rate of profit have the following two-fold meaning:

1) On the one hand, they are the laws of the general rate of profit. In
view of the many different causes which make the rate of profit rise or
fall one would think, after everything that has been said and done, that
the general rate of profit must change every day. But a trend in one
sphere of production compensates for that in another, their effects
cross and paralyse one another. We shall later examine to which side
these fluctuations ultimately gravitate. But they are slow. The
suddenness, multiplicity, and different duration of the fluctuations in
the individual spheres of production make them compensate for one
another in the order of their succession in time, a fall in prices
following a rise, and vice versa, so that they remain limited to local,
i. e., individual, spheres. Finally, the various local fluctuations
neutralise one another. Within each individual sphere of production,
there take place changes, i. e., deviations from the general rate of
profit, which counterbalance one another in a definite time on the one
hand, and thus have no influence upon the general rate of profit, and
which, on the other, do not react upon it, because they are balanced by
other simultaneous local fluctuations. Since the general rate of profit
is not only determined by the average rate of profit in each sphere, but
also by the distribution of the total social capital among the different
individual spheres, and since this distribution is continually changing,
it becomes another constant cause of change in the general rate of
profit. But it is a cause of change which mostly paralyses itself, owing
to the uninterrupted and many-sided nature of this movement.

2) Within each sphere, there is some room for play for a longer or
shorter space of time, in which the rate of profit of this sphere may
fluctuate, before this fluctuation consolidates sufficiently after
rising or falling to gain time for influencing the general rate of
profit and therefore assuming more than local importance. The laws of
the rate of profit, as developed in Part I of this book, likewise remain
applicable within these limits of space and time.

The theoretical conception concerning the first transformation of
surplus-value into profit, that every part of a capital yields a uniform
profit, expresses a practical fact. Whatever the composition of an
industrial capital, whether it sets in motion one quarter of congealed
labour and three-quarters of living labour, or three-quarters of
congealed labour and one-quarter of living labour, whether in one case
it absorbs three times as much surplus-labour, or produces three times
as much surplus-value than in another — in either case it yields the
same profit, given the same degree of labour exploitation and leaving
aside individual differences, which, incidentally, disappear because we
are dealing in both cases with the average composition of the entire
sphere of production. The individual capitalist (or all the capitalists
in each individual sphere of production), whose outlook is limited,
rightly believes that his profit is not derived solely from the labour
employed by him, or in his line of production. This is quite true, as
far as his average profit is concerned. To what extent this profit is
due to the aggregate exploitation of labour on the part of the total
social capital, i. e., by all his capitalist colleagues — this
interrelation is a complete mystery to the individual capitalist; all
the more so, since no bourgeois theorists, the political economists,
have so far revealed it. A saving of labour — not only labour necessary
to produce a certain product, but also the number of employed labourers
— and the employment of more congealed labour (constant capital), appear
to be very sound operations from the economic standpoint and do not seem
to exert the least influence on the general rate of profit and the
average profit. How could living labour be the sole source of profit, in
view of the fact that a reduction in the quantity of labour required for
production appears not to exert any influence on profit? Moreover, it
even seems in certain circumstances to be the nearest source of an
increase of profits, at least for the individual capitalist.

If in any particular sphere of production there is a rise or fall of the
portion of the cost-price which represents the value of constant
capital, this portion comes from the circulation and, either enlarged or
reduced, passes from the very outset into the process of production of
the commodity. If, on the other hand, the same number of labourers
produces more or less in the same time, so that the quantity of labour
required for the production of a definite quantity of commodities varies
while the number of labourers remains the same, that portion of the
cost-price which represents the value of the variable capital may remain
the same, i. e., contribute the same amount to the cost-price of tho
total product. But every one of the individual commodities whose sum
makes up the total product, shares in more or less labour (paid and
therefore also unpaid), and shares consequently in the greater or
smaller outlay for this labour, i. e., a 1arger or smaller portion of
the wage. The total wages paid by the capitalist remain the same, but
wages differ if calculated per piece of the commodity. Thus, there is a
change in this portion of the cost-price of the commodity. But no matter
whether the cost-price of the individual commodity (or, perhaps, the
cost-price of the sum of commodities produced by a capital of a given
magnitude) rises or falls, be it due to such changes in its own value,
or in that of its elements, the average profit of, e.g., 10% remains
10%. Still, 10% of an individual commodity may represent very different
amounts, depending on the change of magnitude caused in the cost-price
of the individual commodity by such changes of value as we have assumed.

So far as the variable capital is concerned — and this is most
important, because it is the source of surplus-value, and because
anything which conceals its relation to the accumulation of wealth by
the capitalist serves to mystify the entire system — matters get cruder
or appear to the capitalist in the following light: A variable capital
of £100 represents the weekly wage of, say, 100 labourers. If these 100
labourers weekly produce 200 pieces of a commodity = 200C, in a given
working-time, then 1C — abstracted from that portion of its cost-price
which is added by the constant capital, costs £100/200 = 10 shillings,
since £100 = 200C. Now suppose that a change occurs in the
productiveness of labour. Suppose it doubles, so that the same number of
labourers now produces twice 200C in the time which it previously took
to produce 200C. In that case (considering only that part of the
cost-price which consists of wages) 1C = £100/400 = 5 shillings, since
now £100 = 400C. Should the productiveness decrease one-half, the same
labour would produce only 200C/2 and since £100 = 200C/2, 1C = £200/2 =
£1. The changes in the labour-time required for the production of the
commodities, and hence the changes in their value, thus appear in regard
to the cost-price, and hence to the price of production, as a different
distribution of the same wage for more or fewer commodities, depending
on the greater or smaller quantity of commodities produced in the same
working-time for the same wage. What the capitalist, and consequently
also the political economist, see is that the part of the paid labour
per piece of commodity changes with the productivity of labour, and that
the value of each piece also changes accordingly. What they do not see
is that the same applies to unpaid labour contained in very piece of the
commodity, and this is perceived so much less since the average profit
actually is only accidentally determined by the unpaid labour absorbed
in the sphere of the individual capitalist. It is only in such crude and
meaningless form that we can glimpse that the value of commodities is
determined by the labour contained in them.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 10. Equalisation of the General Rate of Profit Through Competition. Market-Prices and Market-Values. Surplus-Profit

 

The capital invested in some spheres of production has a mean, or
average, composition, that is, it has the same, or almost the same
composition as the average social capital.

In these spheres the price of production is exactly or almost the same
as the value of the produced commodity expressed in money. If there were
no other way of reaching a mathematical limit, this would be the one.
Competition so distributes the social capital among the various spheres
of production that the prices of production in each sphere take shape
according to the model of the prices of production in these spheres of
average composition, i.e., they = k + kp' (cost-price plus the average
rate of profit multiplied by the cost price). This average rate of
profit, however, is the percentage of profit in that sphere of average
composition in which profit, therefore, coincides with surplus-value.
Hence, the rate of profit is the same in all spheres of production, for
it is equalized on the basis of those average spheres of production
which has the average composition of capital. Consequently, the sum of
the profits in all spheres of production must equal the sum of the
surplus-values, and the sum of the prices of production of the total
social product equal the sum of its value. But it is evident that the
balance among spheres of production of different composition must tend
to equalize them with the spheres of average composition, be it exactly
or only approximately the same as the social average. Between the
spheres more or less approximating the average there is again a tendency
toward equalization, seeking the ideal average, i.e., an average that
does not really exist, i.e., a tendency to take this ideal as a
standard. In this way the tendency necessarily prevails to make the
prices of production merely converted forms of value, or to turn profits
into mere portions of surplus-value. However, these are not distributed
in proportion to the surplus-value produced in each special sphere of
production, but rather in proportion to the mass of capital employed in
each sphere, so that equal masses of capital, whatever their
composition, receive equal aliquot shares of the total surplus-value
produced by the total social capital.

In the case of capitals of average, or approximately average,
composition, the price of production is thus the same or almost the same
as the value, and the profit the same as the surplus-value produced by
them. All other capitals, of whatever composition, tend toward this
average under pressure of competition. But since the capitals of average
composition are of the same, or approximately the same, structure as the
average social capital, all capitals have the tendency, regardless of
the surplus-value produced by them, to realize the average profit,
rather than their own surplus-value in the price of their commodity,
i.e., to realize the prices of production.

On the other hand, it may be said that wherever an average profit, and
therefore a general rate of profit, is produced — no matter by what
means — such an average profit cannot be anything but the profit on the
average social capital, whose sum is equal to the sum of surplus-value.
Moreover, the prices obtained by adding this average profit to the
cost-prices cannot be anything but the values transmuted into prices of
production. Nothing would be altered if capitals in certain spheres of
production would not, for some reason, be subject to the process of
equalization. The average profit would then be computed on that portion
of the social capital which enters the equalization process. It is
evident that the average profit can be nothing but the total mass of
surplus-values allotted to the various quantities of capital
proportionally to their magnitudes in their different spheres of
production. It is the total realized unpaid labour, and this total mass,
like the paid, congealed or living, labour, obtains in the total mass of
commodities and money that falls to the capitalists.

The really difficult question is this: how is this equalization of
profits into a general rate of profit brought about, since it is
obviously a result rather than a point of departure?

To begin with, an estimate of the values of commodities, for instance in
terms of money, can obviously only be the result of their exchange. If,
therefore, we assume such an estimate, we must regard it as the outcome
of an actual exchange of commodity-value for commodity-value. But how
does this exchange of commodities at their real value come about?

Let us first assume that all commodities in the different branches of
production are sold at their real values. What would then be the
outcome? According to the foregoing, very different rates of profit
would then reign in the various spheres of production. It is _prima
facie_ two entirely different matters whether commodities are sold at
their values (i.e., exchanged in proportion to the value contained in
them at prices corresponding to their value), or whether they are sold
at such prices that their sale yields equal profits for equal masses of
the capital advanced for their respective production.

The fact that capitals employing unequal amounts of living labour
produce unequal amounts of surplus-value, presupposes at least to a
certain extent that the degree of exploitation or the rate of
surplus-value are the same, or that any existing differences in them are
equalized by real or imaginary (conventional) grounds of compensation.
This would assume competition among labourers and equalization through
their continual migration from one sphere of production to another. Such
a general rate of surplus-value — viewed as a tendency, like all other
economic laws — has been assumed by us for the sake of theoretical
simplification. But in reality it is an actual premise of the capitalist
mode of production, although it is more or less obstructed by practical
frictions causing more or less considerable local differences, such as
the settlement laws for farm-labourers in Britain. But in theory it is
assumed that the laws of capitalist production operate in their pure
form. In reality there exists only approximation; but, this
approximation is the greater, the more developed the capitalist mode of
production and the less it is adulterated and amalgamated with survivals
of former economic conditions.

The whole difficulty arises from the fact that commodities are not
exchanged simply as _commodities_, but as _products of capitals_, which
claim participation in the total amount of surplus-value, proportional
to their magnitude, or equal if they are of equal magnitude. And this
claim is to be satisfied by the total price for commodities produced by
a given capital in a certain space of time. This total price is,
however, only the sum of the prices of the individual commodities
produced by this capital.

The _punctum saliens_ will be best brought if we approach the matter as
follows: suppose, the labourers themselves are in possession of their
respective means of production and exchange their commodities with one
another. In that case these commodities would not be products of
capital. The value of the various means of labour and raw materials
would differ in accordance with the technical nature of the labours
performed in the different branches of production. Furthermore, aside
from the unequal value of the means of production employed by them, they
would require different quantities of means of production for given
quantities of labour, depending on whether a certain commodity can be
finished in one hour, another in one day, and so forth. Also suppose the
labourers work an equal average length of time, allowing for
compensations that arise from the different labour intensities, etc. In
such a case, two labourers would, first, both have replaced their
outlays, the cost-prices of the consumed means of production, in the
commodities which make up the product of their day's work. These outlays
would differ, depending on the technical nature of their labour.
Secondly, both of them would have created equal amounts of new value,
namely the working-day added by them to the means of production. This
would comprise their wages plus the surplus-value, the latter
representing surplus-labour over and above their necessary wants, the
product of which would however belong to them. To put it the capitalist
way, both of them receive the same wages plus the same profit, or the
same value, expressed, say, by the product of a ten-hour working-day.
But in the first place, the values of their commodities would have to
differ. In commodity I, for instance, the portion of value corresponding
to the consumed means of production might be higher than in commodity
II. And, to introduce all possible differences, we might assume right
now that commodity I absorbs more living labour, and consequently
requires more labour-time to be produced, than commodity II. The values
of commodities I and II are, therefore, very different. So are the sums
of the values of the commodities, which represent the product of the
labour performed by labourers I and II in a given time. The rates of
profit would also differ considerably for I and II if we take the rate
of profit to be the proportion of the surplus-value to the total value
of the invested means of production. The means of subsistence daily
consumed by I and II during production, which take the place of wages,
here form the part of the invested means of production ordinarily called
variable capital. But for equal working periods the surplus values would
be the same for I and II, or, more precisely, since I and II each
receive the value of the product of a day's work, both of them receive
equal values after the value of the invested "constant" elements has
been deducted, and one portion of those equal values may be regarded as
a substitute for the means of subsistence consumed in production, and
the other as surplus-value in excess of it. If labourer I has greater
expenses, they are made good by a greater portion of the value of his
commodity, which replaces this "constant " part, and he therefore has to
reconvert a larger portion of the total value of his product into the
material elements of this constant part, while labourer II, though
receiving less for this, has so much less to reconvert. In these
circumstances, a difference in the rates of profit would therefore be
immaterial, just as it is immaterial to the wage-labourer today what
rate of profit may express the amount of surplus-value filched from him,
and just as in international commerce the difference in the various
national rates of profit is immaterial to commodity exchange.

The exchange of commodities at their values, or approximately at their
values, thus requires a much lower stage than their exchange at their
prices of production, which requires a definite level of capitalist
development.

Whatever the manner in which the prices of various commodities are first
mutually fixed or regulated, their movements are always governed by the
law of value. If the labour-time required for their production happens
to shrink, prices fall; if it increases, prices rise, provided other
conditions remain the same.

Apart from the domination of prices and price movement by the law of
value, it is quite appropriate to regard the values of commodities as
not only theoretically but also historically _prius_ to the prices of
production. This applies to conditions in which the labourer owns his
means of production, and this is the condition of the land-owning farmer
living off his own labour and the craftsman, in the ancient as well as
in the modern world. This agrees also with the view we expressed
previously that the evolution of products into commodities arises
through exchange between different communities, not between the members
of the same community. It holds not only for this primitive condition,
but also for subsequent conditions, based on slavery and serfdom, and
for the guild organisation of handicrafts, so long as the means of
production involved in each branch of production can be transferred from
one sphere to another only with difficulty and therefore the various
spheres of production are related to one another, within certain limits,
as foreign countries or communist communities.

For prices at which commodities are exchanged to approximately
correspond to their values, nothing more is necessary than 1) for the
exchange of the various commodities to cease being purely accidental or
only occasional; 2) so far as direct exchange of commodities is
concerned, for these commodities to be produced on both sides in
approximately sufficient quantities to meet mutual requirements,
something learned from mutual experience in trading and therefore a
natural outgrowth of continued trading; and 3) so far as selling is
concerned, for no natural or artificial monopoly to enable either of the
contracting sides to sell commodities above their value or to compel
them to undersell. By accidental monopoly we mean a monopoly which a
buyer or seller acquires through an accidental state of supply and
demand.

The assumption that the commodities of the various spheres of production
are sold at their value merely implies, of course, that their value is
the centre of gravity around which their prices fluctuate, and their
continual rises and drops tend to equalise. There is also the
_market-value_ — of which later — to be distinguished from the
individual value of particular commodities produced by different
producers. The individual value of some of these commodities will be
below their market-value (that is, less labour time is required for
their production than expressed is the market value) while that of
others will exceed the market-value. On the one hand, market-value is to
be viewed as the average value of commodities produced in a single
sphere, and, on the other, as the individual value of the commodities
produced under average conditions of their respective sphere and forming
the bulk of the products of that sphere. It is only in extraordinary
combinations that commodities produced under the worst, or the most
favourable, conditions regulate the market-value, which, in turn, forms
the centre of fluctuation for market-prices. The latter, however, are
the same for commodities of the same kind. If the ordinary demand is
satisfied by the supply of commodities of average value, hence of a
value midway between the two extremes, then the commodities whose
individual value is below the market-value realise an extra
surplus-value, or surplus-profit, while those, whose individual value
exceeds the market-value, are unable to realise a portion of the
surplus-value contained in them.

It does no good to say that the sale of commodities produced under the
least favourable conditions proves that they are required to satisfy the
demand. If in the assumed case the price were higher than the average
market-value, the demand would be smaller. At a certain price, a
commodity occupies just so much place on the market. This place remains
the same in case of a price change only if the higher price is
accompanied by a drop in the supply of the commodity, and a lower price
by an increase of supply. And if the demand is so great that it does not
contract when the price is regulated by the value of commodities
produced under the least favourable conditions, then these determine the
market-value. This is not possible unless demand is greater than usual,
or if supply drops below the usual level. Finally, if the mass of the
produced commodities exceeds the quantity disposed of at average
market-values, the commodities produced under the most favourable
conditions regulate the market-value. They may, for example, be sold
exactly or approximately at their individual value, in which case the
commodities produced under the least favourable conditions may not even
realise their cost-price, while those produced under average conditions
realise only a portion of the surplus-value contained in them. What has
been said here of market-value applies to the price of production as
soon as it takes the place of market-value. The price of production is
regulated in each sphere, and likewise regulated by special
circumstances. And this price of production is, in its turn, the centre
around which the daily market-prices fluctuate and tend to equalise one
another within definite periods. (See Ricardo on determining the price
of production through those working under the least favourable
conditions.)

No matter how the prices are regulated, we arrive at the following:

1) The law of value dominates price movements with reductions or
increases in required labour-time making prices of production fall or
rise. It is in this sense that Ricardo (who doubtlessly realised that
his prices of production deviated from the value of commodities) says
that "the inquiry to which I wish to draw the reader's attention relates
to the effect of the variations in the relative value of commodities,
and not in their absolute value".

2 ) The average profit determining the prices of production must always
be approximately equal to that quantity of surplus-value which falls to
the share of individual capital in its capacity of an aliquot part of
the total social capital. Suppose that the general rate of profit, and
therefore the average profit, are expressed by money-value greater than
the money-value of the actual average surplus-value. So far as the
capitalists are concerned, it is then immaterial whether they
reciprocally charge 10 or 15% profit. Neither of these percentages
covers more actual commodity-value than the other, since the overcharge
in money is mutual. As for the labourer (the assumption being that he
receives his normal wage and the rise in the average profit does not
therefore imply an actual deduction from his wage, i.e., it expresses
something entirely different from the normal surplus-value of the
capitalist), the rise in commodity-prices caused by an increase of the
average profit must correspond to the rise of the money-expression of
the variable capital. Such a general nominal increase in the rate of
profit and the average profit above the limit provided by the ratio of
the actual surplus-value to the total invested capital is not, in
effect, possible without causing an increase in wages, and also an
increase in the prices of commodities forming the constant capital. The
reverse is true in case of a reduction. Since the total value of the
commodities regulates the total surplus-value, and this in turn
regulates the level of average profit and thereby the general rate of
profit — as a general law or a law governing fluctuations — it follows
the law of value regulates the prices of production.

What competition, first in a single sphere, achieves is a single
market-value and market-price derived from the various individual values
of commodities. And it is competition of capitals in different spheres,
which first brings out the price of production equalizing the rates of
profit in the different spheres. The latter process requires a higher
development of capitalist production that the previous one.

For commodities of the same sphere of production, the same kind, and
approximately the same quality, to be sold at their values, the
following two requirements are necessary:

_First_, the different individual values must be equalized at one social
value, the above-named market value, and this implies competition among
producers of the same kind of commodities and, likewise, the existence
of a common market in which they offer their articles for sale. For the
market-price of identical commodities, each, however, produced under
different individual circumstances, to correspond to the market-value
and not to deviate from it either by rising above or falling below it,
it is necessary that the pressure exerted by different sellers upon one
another be sufficient to bring enough commodities to market to fill the
social requirements, i.e., a quantity for which society is capable of
paying the market-value. Should the mass of products exceed this demand,
the commodities would have to be sold below their market-value; and
conversely, above their market-value if the mass of products were not
large enough to meet the demand, or, what amounts to the same, if the
pressure of competition among sellers were not strong enough to bring
this mass of products to market. Should the market-value change, this
would also entail a change in the conditions on which the total mass of
commodities could be sold. Should the market-value fall, this would
entail a rise in the average social demand (this always taken to mean
the effective demand), which could, within certain limits, absorb larger
masses of commodities. Should the market-value rise, this would entail a
drop in the social demand, and a smaller mass of commodities would be
absorbed. Hence, if supply and demand regulate the market-price, or
rather the deviations of the market-price from the market-value, then,
in turn, the market-value regulates the ratio of supply to demand, or
the centre round which fluctuations of supply and demand cause
market-prices to oscillate.

Looking closer, we find that the conditions applicable to the value of
an individual commodity are here reproduced as conditions governing the
value of the aggregate of a certain kind of commodity. Capitalist
production is mass production from the very outset. But even in other,
less developed, modes of production that which is produced in relatively
small quantities as a common product by small-scale, even if numerous,
producers, is concentrated in large quantities — at least in the case of
the vital commodities — in the hands of relatively few merchants. The
latter accumulate them and sell them as the common product of an entire
branch of production, or of a more or less considerable contingent of
it.

It should be here noted in passing that the "social demand," i.e., the
factor which regulates the principle of demand, is essentially subject
to the mutual relationship of the different classes and their respective
economic position, notably therefore to, firstly, the ratio of total
surplus-value to wages, and, secondly, to the relation of the various
parts into which surplus-value is split up (profit, interest,
ground-rent, taxes, etc.). And this thus again shows how absolutely
nothing can be explained by the relation of supply to demand before
ascertaining the basis on which this relation rests.

Although both commodity and money represent a unity of exchange-value
and use-value, we have already seen that in buying and selling both of
these functions are polarised at the two extremes, the commodity
(seller) representing the use-value, and the money (buyer) representing
the exchange-value. One of the first premises of selling was that a
commodity should have use-value and should therefore satisfy a social
need. The other premise was that the quantity of labour contained in the
commodity should represent socially necessary labour, i.e., its
individual value (and, what amounts to the same under the present
assumption, its selling price) should coincide with its social value.

Let us apply this to the mass of commodities available in the market,
which represents the product of a whole sphere.

The matter will be most readily pictured by regarding this whole mass of
commodities, produced by _one_ branch of industry, as _one_ commodity,
and the sum of the prices of the many identical commodities as _one_
price. Then, whatever has been said of a single commodity applies
literally to the mass of commodities of an entire branch of production
available in the market. The requirement that the individual value of a
commodity should correspond to its social value is now realised, or
further determined, in that the mass contains social labour necessary
for its production, and that the value of this mass is equal to its
market-value.

Now suppose that the bulk of these commodities is produced under
approximately similar normal social conditions, so that this value is at
the same time the individual value of the individual commodities which
make up this mass. If a relatively small portion of these commodities
may now have been produced below, and another above, these conditions,
so that the individual value of one portion is greater, and that of the
other smaller, than the average value of the bulk of the commodities,
but in such proportions that these extremes balance one another, so that
the average value of the commodities at these extremes is equal to the
value of commodities in the centre, then the market-value is determined
by the value of the commodities produced under average conditions. The
value of the entire mass of commodities is equal to the actual sum of
the values of all individual commodities taken together, whether
produced under average conditions, or under conditions above or below
the average. In that case, the market-value, or social value, of the
mass of commodities — the necessary labour-time contained in them — is
determined by the value of the preponderant mean mass.

Suppose, on the contrary, that the total mass of the commodities in
question brought to market remains the same, while the value of the
commodities produced under less favourable conditions fails to balance
out the value of commodities produced under more favourable conditions,
so that the part of the mass produced under less favourable conditions
forms a relatively weighty quantity as compared with the average mass
and with the other extreme. In that case, the mass produced under less
favourable conditions regulates the market, or social, value.

Suppose, finally, that the mass of commodities produced under better
than average conditions considerably exceeds that produced under worse
conditions, and is large even compared with that produced under average
conditions. In that case, the part produced under the most favourable
conditions determines the market-value. We ignore here the overstocked
market, in which the part produced under most favourable conditions
always regulates the market-price. We are not dealing here with the
market-price, in so far as it differs from the market-value, but with
the various determinations of the market-value itself. ^([1])

In fact, strictly speaking (which, of course, occurs in reality only in
approximation and with a thousand modifications) the market-value of the
entire mass, regulated as it is by the average values, is in case I
equal to the sum of their individual values; although in the case of the
commodities produced at the extremes, this value is represented as an
average value which is forced upon them. Those who produce at the worst
extreme must then sell their commodities below the individual value;
those producing at the best extreme sell them above it.

In case II the individual lots of commodity-values produced at the two
extremes do not balance one another. Rather, the lot produced under the
worse conditions decides the issue. Strictly speaking, the average
price, or the market-value, of each individual commodity, or each
aliquot part of the total mass, would now be determined by the total
value of the mass as obtained by adding up the values of the commodities
produced under different conditions, and in accordance with the aliquot
part of this total value falling to the share of each individual
commodity. The market-value thus obtained would exceed the individual
value not only of the commodities belonging to the favourable extreme,
but also of those belonging to the average lot. Yet it would still be
below the individual value of those commodities produced at the
unfavourable extreme. How close the market-value approaches, or finally
coincides with, the latter would depend entirely on the volume occupied
by commodities produced at the unfavourable extreme of the commodity
sphere in question. If demand is only slightly greater than supply, the
individual value of the unfavourably produced commodities regulates the
market-price.

Finally, if the lot of commodities produced at the favourable extreme
occupies greater place than the other extreme, and also than the average
lot, as it does in case III, then the market-value falls below the
average value. The average value, computed by adding the sums of values
at the two extremes and at the middle, stands here below the value of
the middle, which it approaches, or vice versa, depending on the
relative place occupied by the favourable extreme. Should demand be
weaker than supply, the favourably situated part, whatever its size,
makes room for itself forcibly by paring its price down to its
individual value. The market-value cannot ever coincide with this
individual value of the commodities produced under the most favourable
conditions, except when supply far exceeds demand.

This mode of determining market-values, which we have here outlined
_abstractly_, is promoted in the real market by competition among the
buyers, provided the demand is large enough to absorb the mass of
commodities at values so fixed. And this brings us to the other point.

_Second_, to say that a commodity has a use-value is merely to say that
it satisfies some social want. So long as we dealt with individual
commodities only, we could assume that there was a need for a particular
commodity — its quantity already implied by its price without inquiring
further into the quantity required to satisfy this want. This quantity
is, however, of essential importance, as soon as the product of an
entire branch of production is placed on one side, and the social need
for it on the other. It then becomes necessary to consider the extent,
i.e., the amount of this social want.

In the foregoing determinations of market-value it was assumed that the
mass of the produced commodities is given, i.e., remains the same, and
that there is a change only in the proportions of its constituent
elements, which are produced under different conditions, and that,
hence, the market-value of the same mass of commodities is differently
regulated. Suppose, this mass corresponds in size to the usual supply,
leaving aside the possibility that a portion of the produced commodities
may be temporarily withdrawn from the market. Should demand for this
mass now also remain the same, this commodity will be sold at its
market-value, no matter which of the three aforementioned cases
regulates this market-value. This mass of commodities does not merely
satisfy a need, but satisfies it to its full social extent. Should their
quantity be smaller or greater, however, than the demand for them, there
will be deviations of the market-price from the market-value. And the
first deviation is that if the supply is too small, the market-value is
always regulated by the commodities produced under the least favourable
circumstances and, if the supply is too large, always by the commodities
produced under the most favourable conditions; that therefore it is one
of the extremes which determines the market-value, in spite of the fact
that in accordance with the mere proportion of the commodity masses
produced under different conditions, a different result should obtain.
If the difference between demand and the available quantity of the
product is more considerable, the market-price will likewise be
considerably above or below the market-value. Now, the difference
between the quantity of the produced commodities and that quantity of
them at which they are sold at market-value may be due to two reasons.
Either the quantity itself changes, becoming too small or too large, so
that reproduction would have taken place on a different scale than that
which regulated the given market-value. In that case, the supply
changed, although demand remained the same, and there was, therefore,
relative over-production or under-production. Or else reproduction, and
thus supply, remained the same, while demand shrank or increased, which
may be due to several reasons. Although the absolute magnitude of the
supply was the same, its relative magnitude, its magnitude relative to,
or measured by, the demand, had changed. The effect is the same as in
the first case, but in the reverse direction. Finally, if changes take
place on both sides, but either in reverse directions, or, if in the
same direction, then not to the same extent, if therefore there are
changes on both sides, but these alter the former proportion between the
two sides, then the final result must always lead to one of the two
above-mentioned cases.

The real difficulty in formulating the general definition of supply and
demand is that it seems to take on the appearance of a tautology. First
consider the supply — the product available in the market, or that which
can be delivered to it. To avoid dwelling upon useless detail, we shall
here consider only the mass annually reproduced in every given branch of
production and ignore the greater or lesser faculty possessed by the
different commodities to be withdrawn from the market and stored away
for consumption, say, until next year. This annual reproduction is
expressed by a certain quantity — in weight or numbers — depending on
whether this mass of commodities is measured in discrete elements or
continuously. They are not only use-values satisfying human wants, but
these use-values are available in the market in definite quantities.
Secondly, however, this quantity of commodities has a specific
market-value, which may be expressed by a multiple of the market-value
of the commodity, or of its measure, which serves as unit. Thus, there
is no necessary connection between the quantitative volume of the
commodities in the market and their market-value, since, for instance,
many commodities have a specifically high value, and others a
specifically low value, so that a given sum of values may be represented
by a very large quantity of one commodity, and a very small quantity of
another. There is only the following connection between the quantity of
the articles available in the market and the market-value of these
articles: On a given basis of labour productivity the production of a
certain quantity of articles in every particular sphere of production
requires a definite quantity of social labour-time; although this
proportion varies in different spheres of production and has no inner
relation to the usefulness of these articles or the special nature of
their use-values. Assuming all other circumstances to be equal, and a
certain quantity a of some commodity to cost b labour-time, a quantity
na of the same commodity will cost nb labour-time. Further, if society
wants to satisfy some want and have an article produced for this
purpose, it must pay for it. Indeed, since commodity-production
necessitates a division of labour, society pays for this article by
devoting a portion of the available labour-time to its production.
Therefore, society buys it with a definite quantity of its disposable
labour-time. That part of society which through the division of labour
happens to employ its labour in producing this particular article, must
receive an equivalent in social labour incorporated in articles which
satisfy its own wants. However, there exists an accidental rather than a
necessary connection between the total amount of social labour applied
to a social article, i.e., between the aliquot part of society's total
labour-power allocated to producing this article, or between the volume
which the production of this article occupies in total production, on
the one hand, and the volume whereby society seeks to satisfy the want
gratified by the article in question, on the other. Every individual
article, or every definite quantity of a commodity may, indeed, contain
no more than the social labour required for its production, and from
this point of view the market-value of this entire commodity represents
only necessary labour, but if this commodity has been produced in excess
of the existing social needs, then so much of the social labour-time is
squandered and the mass of the commodity comes to represent a much
smaller quantity of social labour in the market than is actually
incorporated in it. (It is only where production is under the actual,
predetermining control of society that the latter establishes a relation
between the volume of social labour-time applied in producing definite
articles, and the volume of the social want to be satisfied by these
articles.) For this reason, these commodities must be sold below their
market-value, and a portion of them may even be altogether unsaleable.
The reverse applies if the quantity of social labour employed in the
production of a certain kind of commodity is too small to meet the
social demand for that commodity. But if the quantity of social labour
expended in the production of a certain article corresponds to the
social demand for that article, so that the produced quantity
corresponds to the usual scale of reproduction and the demand remains
unchanged, then the article is sold at its market-value. The exchange,
or sale, of commodities at their value is the rational state of affairs,
i.e., the natural law of their equilibrium. It is this law that explains
the deviations, and not vice versa, the deviations that explain the law.

Now let us look at the other side — the demand.

Commodities are bought either as means of production or means of
subsistence to enter productive or individual consumption. It does not
alter matters that some commodities may serve both purposes. There is,
then, a demand for them on the part of producers (here capitalists,
since we have assumed that means of production have been transformed
into capital) and of consumers. Both appear at first sight to presuppose
a given quantity of social want on the side of demand, corresponding on
the other side to a definite quantity of social output in the various
lines of production. If the cotton industry is to accomplish its annual
reproduction on a given scale, it must have the usual supply of cotton,
and, other circumstances remaining the same, an additional amount of
cotton corresponding to the annual extension of reproduction caused by
the accumulation of capital. This is equally true with regard to means
of subsistence. The working-class must find at least the same quantity
of necessities on hand if it is to continue living in its accustomed
average way, although they may be more or less differently distributed
among the different kinds of commodities. Moreover, there must be an
additional quantity to allow for the annual increase of population. The
same, with more or less modification, applies to other classes.

It would seem, then, that there is on the side of demand a certain
magnitude of definite social wants which require for their satisfaction
a definite quantity of a commodity on the market. But quantitatively,
the definite social wants are very elastic and changing. Their fixedness
is only apparent. If the means of subsistence were cheaper, or
money-wages higher, the labourers would buy more of them, and a greater
social need would arise for them, leaving aside the paupers, etc., whose
demand is even below the narrowest limits of their physical wants. On
the other hand, if cotton were cheaper, for example, the capitalists'
demand for it would increase, more additional capital would be thrown
into the cotton industry, etc. We must never forget that the demand for
productive consumption is, under our assumption, a demand of the
capitalist, whose essential purpose is the production of surplus-value,
so that he produces a particular commodity to this sole end. Still, this
does not hinder the capitalist, so long as he appears in the market as a
buyer of, say, cotton, from representing the need for this cotton, just
as it is immaterial to the seller of cotton whether the buyer converts
it into shirting or gun-cotton, or whether he intends to turn it into
wads for his own, and the world's, ears. But this does exert a
considerable influence on the kind of buyer the capitalist is. His
demand for cotton is substantially modified by the fact that it
disguises his real need for making profit. The limits within which the
need for commodities in the _market_, the demand, differs quantitatively
from the _actual social need_, naturally vary considerably for different
commodities; what I mean is the difference between the demanded quantity
of commodities and the quantity which would have been in demand at other
money-prices or other money or living conditions of the buyers.

Nothing is easier than to realise the inconsistencies of demand and
supply, and the resulting deviation of market-prices from market-values.
The real difficulty consists in determining what is meant by the
equation of supply and demand.

Supply and demand coincide when their mutual proportions are such that
the mass of commodities of a definite line of production can be sold at
their market-value, neither above nor below it. That is the first thing
we hear.

The second is this: If commodities are sold at their market-values,
supply and demand coincide.

If supply equals demand, they cease to act, and for this very reason
commodities are sold at their market-values. Whenever two forces operate
equally in opposite directions, they balance one another, exert no
outside influence, and any phenomena taking place in these circumstances
must be explained by causes other than the effect of these two forces.
If supply and demand balance one another, they cease to explain
anything, do not affect market-values, and therefore leave us so much
more in the dark about the reasons why the market-value is expressed in
just this sum of money and no other. It is evident that the real inner
laws of capitalist production cannot be explained by the interaction of
supply and demand (quite aside from a deeper analysis of these two
social motive forces, which would be out of place here), because these
laws cannot be observed in their pure state, until supply and demand
cease to act, i.e., are equated. In reality, supply and demand never
coincide, or, if they do, it is by mere accident, hence scientifically =
0, and to be regarded as not having occurred. But political economy
assumes that supply and demand coincide with one another. Why? To be
able to study phenomena in their fundamental relations, in the form
corresponding to their conception, that is, is to study them independent
of the appearances caused by the movement of supply and demand. The
other reason is to find the actual tendencies of their movements and to
some extent to record them. Since the inconsistencies are of an
antagonistic nature, and since they continually succeed one another,
they balance out one another through their opposing movements, and their
mutual contradiction. Since, therefore, supply and demand never equal
one another in any given case, their differences follow one another in
such a way — and the result of a deviation in one direction is that it
calls forth a deviation in the opposite direction — that supply and
demand are always equated when the whole is viewed over a certain
period, but only as an average of past movements, and only as the
continuous movement of their contradiction. In this way, the
market-prices which have deviated from the market-values adjust
themselves, as viewed from the standpoint of their average number, to
equal the market-values, in that deviations from the latter cancel each
other as plus and minus. And this average is not merely of theoretical,
but also of practical importance to capital, whose investment is
calculated on the fluctuations and compensations of a more or less fixed
period.

On the one hand, the relation of demand and supply, therefore, only
explains the deviations of market-prices from market-values. On the
other, it explains the tendency to eliminate these deviations, i.e., to
eliminate the effect of the relation of demand and supply. (Such
exceptions as commodities which have a price without having a value are
not considered here.) Supply and demand may eliminate the effect caused
by their difference in many different ways. For instance, if the demand,
and consequently the market-price, fall, capital may be withdrawn, thus
causing supply to shrink. It may also be that the market-value itself
shrinks and balances with the market-price as a result of inventions
which reduce the necessary labour-time. Conversely, if the demand
increases, and consequently the market-price rises above the
market-value, this may lead to too much capital flowing into this line
of production and production may swell to such an extent that the
market-price will even fall below the market-value. Or, it may lead to a
price increase, which cuts the demand. In some lines of production it
may also bring about a rise in the market-value itself for a shorter or
longer period, with a portion of the desired products having to be
produced under worse conditions during this period.

Supply and demand determine the market-price, and so does the
market-price, and the market-value in the further analysis, determine
supply and demand. This is obvious in the case of demand, since it moves
in a direction opposite to prices, swelling when prices fall, and vice
versa. But this is also true of supply. Because the prices of means of
production incorporated in the offered commodities determine the demand
for these means of production, and thus the supply of commodities whose
supply embraces the demand for these means of production. The prices of
cotton are determinants in the supply of cotton goods.

To this confusion — determining prices through demand and supply, and,
at the same time, determining supply and demand through prices — must be
added that demand determines supply, just as supply determines demand,
and production determines the market, as well as the market determines
production. ^([2])

Even the ordinary economist (see footnote) agrees that the proportion
between supply and demand may vary in consequence of a change in the
market-value of commodities, without a change being brought about in
demand or supply by extraneous circumstances. Even he must admit that,
whatever the market-value, supply and demand must coincide in order for
it to be established. In other words, the ratio of supply to demand does
not explain the market-value, but conversely, the latter rather explains
the fluctuations of supply and demand. The author of the _Observations_
continues after the passage quoted in the footnote:

"This proportion" (between demand and supply), "however, if we still
mean by 'demand' and 'natural price', what we meant just now, when
referring to Adam Smith, must always be a proportion of equality; for it
is only when the supply is equal to the effectual demand, that is, to
that demand which will neither more nor less than pay the natural price,
that the natural price is in fact paid; consequently, there may be two
very different natural prices, at different times, for the same
commodity, and yet the proportion, which the supply bears to the demand,
be in both cases the same, namely, the proportion of equality."

It is admitted, then, that with two different natural prices of the same
commodity, at different times, demand and supply are always able to, and
must, balance one another if the commodity is to be sold at its natural
price in both instances. Since there is no difference in the ratio of
supply to demand in either case, but a difference in the magnitude of
the natural price itself, it follows that this price is obviously
determined independently of demand and supply, and thus that it can
least of all be determined by them.

For a commodity to be sold at its market-value, i.e., proportionally to
the necessary social labour contained in it, the total quantity of
social labour used in producing the total mass of this commodity must
correspond to the quantity of the social want for it, i.e., the
effective social want. Competition, the fluctuations of market-prices
which correspond to the fluctuations of demand and supply, tend
continually to reduce to this scale the total quantity of labour devoted
to each kind of commodity.

The proportion of supply and demand recapitulates, first, the relation
of use-value to exchange-value, of commodity to money, and of buyer to
seller; and, second, that of producer to consumer, although both of them
may be represented by third parties, the merchants. In considering buyer
and seller, it suffices to counterpose them individually in order to
present their relationship. Three individuals are enough for the
complete metamorphosis of a commodity, and therefore for the process of
sale and purchase taken as a whole. A converts his commodity into the
money of B, to whom he sells his commodity, and reconverts his money
again into commodities, when he uses it to make purchases from C; the
whole process takes place among these three. Further, in the study of
money it had been assumed that the commodities are sold at their values
because there was absolutely no reason to consider prices divergent from
values, it being merely a matter of changes of form which commodities
undergo in their transformation into money and their reconversion from
money into commodities. As soon as a commodity has been sold and a new
commodity bought with the receipts, we have before us the entire
metamorphosis, and to this process as such it is immaterial whether the
price of the commodity lies above or below its value. The value of the
commodity remains important as a basis, because the concept of money
cannot be developed on any other foundation, and price, in its general
meaning, is but value in the form of money. At any rate, it is assumed
in the study of money as a medium of circulation that there is not just
one metamorphosis of a certain commodity. It is rather the social
interrelation of these metamorphoses which is studied. Only thus do we
arrive at the circulation of money and the development of its function
as a medium of circulation. But however important this connection may be
for the conversion of money into a circulating medium, and for its
resulting change of form, it is of no moment to the transaction between
individual buyers and sellers.

In the case of supply and demand, however, the supply is equal to the
sum of sellers, or producers, of a certain kind of commodity, and the
demand equals the sum of buyers or consumers (both productive and
individual) of the same kind of commodity. The sums react on one another
as units, as aggregate forces. The individual counts here only as part
of a social force, as an atom of the mass, and it is in this form that
competition brings out the _social_character of production and
consumption.

The side of competition which happens for the moment to be weaker is
also the side in which the individual acts independently of, and often
directly against, the mass of his competitors, and precisely in this
manner is the dependence of one upon the other impressed upon them,
while the stronger side acts always more or less as a united whole
against its antagonist. If the demand for this particular kind of
commodity is greater than the supply, one buyer outbids another — within
certain limits — and so raises the price of the commodity for all of
them above the market-value, while on the other hand the sellers unite
in trying to sell at a high market-price. If, conversely, the supply
exceeds the demand, one begins to dispose of his goods at a cheaper rate
and the others must follow, while the buyers unite in their efforts to
depress the market-price as much as possible below the market-value. The
common interest is appreciated by each only so long as he gains more by
it than without it. And unity of action ceases the moment one or the
other side becomes the weaker, when each tries to extricate himself on
his own as advantageously as he possibly can. Again, if one produces
more cheaply and can sell more goods, thus possessing himself of a
greater place in the market by selling below the current market-price,
or market-value, he will do so, and will thereby begin a movement which
gradually compels the others to introduce the cheaper mode of
production, and one which reduces the socially necessary labour to a
new, and lower, level. If one side has the advantage, all belonging to
it gain. It is as though they exerted their common monopoly. If one side
is weaker, then one may try on his own hook to become the stronger (for
instance, one who works with lower costs of production), or at least to
get off as lightly as possible, and in such cases each for himself and
the devil take the hindmost, although his actions affect not only
himself, but also all his boon companions. ^([3])

Demand and supply imply the conversion of value into market-value, and
so far as they proceed on a capitalist basis, so far as the commodities
are products of capital, they are based on capitalist production
processes, i.e., on quite different relationships than the mere purchase
and sale of goods. Here it is not a question of the formal conversion of
the value of commodities into prices, i.e., not of a mere change of
form. It is a question of definite deviations in quantity of the
market-prices from the market-values, and, further, from the prices of
production. In simple purchase and sale it suffices to have the
producers of commodities as such counterposed to one another. In further
analysis supply and demand presuppose the existence of different classes
and sections of classes which divide the total revenue of a society and
consume it among themselves as revenue, and, therefore, make up the
demand created by revenue. While on the other hand it requires an
insight into the over-all structure of the capitalist production process
for an understanding of the supply and demand created among themselves
by producers as such.

Under capitalist production it is not merely a matter of obtaining an
equal mass of value in another form — be it that of money or some other
commodity — for a mass of values thrown into circulation in the form of
a commodity, but it is rather a matter of realising as much
surplus-value, or profit, on capital advanced for production, as any
other capital of the same magnitude, or _pro rata_ to its magnitude in
whichever line it is applied. It is, therefore, a matter, at least as a
minimum, of selling the commodities at prices which yield the average
profit, i.e., at prices of production. In this form capital becomes
conscious of itself as a _social power_ in which every capitalist
participates proportionally to his share in the total social capital.

First, capitalist production is in itself indifferent to the particular
use-value, and distinctive features of any commodity it produces. In
every sphere of production it is only concerned with producing
surplus-value, and appropriating a certain quantity of unpaid labour
incorporated in the product of labour. And it is likewise in the nature
of the wage-labour subordinated by capital that it is indifferent to the
specific character of its labour and must submit to being transformed in
accordance with the requirements of capital and to being transferred
from one sphere of production to another.

Second, one sphere of production is, in fact, just as good or just as
bad as another. Every one of them yields the same profit, and every one
of them would be useless if the commodities it produced did not satisfy
some social need.

Now, if the commodities are sold at their values, then, as we have
shown, very different rates of profit arise in the various spheres of
production, depending on the different organic composition of the masses
of capital invested in them. But capital withdraws from a sphere with a
low rate of profit and invades others, which yield a higher profit.
Through this incessant outflow and influx, or, briefly, through its
distribution among the various spheres, which depends on how the rate of
profit falls here and rises there, it creates such a ratio of supply to
demand that the average profit in the various spheres of production
becomes the same, and values are, therefore, converted into prices of
production. Capital succeeds in this equalisation, to a greater or
lesser degree, depending on the extent of capitalist development in the
given nation; i.e., on the extent the conditions in the country in
question are adapted for the capitalist mode of production. With the
progress of capitalist production, it also develops its own conditions
and subordinates to its specific character and its immanent laws all the
social prerequisites on which the production process is based.

The incessant equilibration of constant divergences is accomplished so
much more quickly, 1) the more mobile the capital, i.e., the more easily
it can be shifted from one sphere and from one place to another; 2) the
more quickly labour-power can be transferred from one sphere to another
and from one production locality to another. The first condition implies
complete freedom of trade within the society and the removal of all
monopolies with the exception of the natural ones, those, that is, which
naturally arise out of the capitalist mode of production. It implies,
furthermore, the development of the credit system, which concentrates
the inorganic mass of the disposable social capital vis-a-vis the
individual capitalist. Finally, it implies the subordination of the
various spheres of production to the control of capitalists. This last
implication is included in our premises, since we assumed that it was a
matter of converting values into prices of production in all
capitalistically exploited spheres of production. But this equilibration
itself runs into greater obstacles, whenever numerous and large spheres
of production not operated on a capitalist basis (such as soil
cultivation by small farmers), filter in between the capitalist
enterprises and become linked with them. A great density of population
is another requirement.— The second condition implies the abolition of
all laws preventing the labourers from transferring from one sphere of
production to another and from one local centre of production to
another; indifference of the labourer to the nature of his labour; the
greatest possible reduction of labour in all spheres of production to
simple labour; the elimination of all vocational prejudices among
labourers; and last but not least, a subjugation of the labourer to the
capitalist mode of production. Further reference to this belongs to a
special analysis of competition.

It follows from the foregoing that in each particular sphere of
production the individual capitalist, as well as the capitalists as a
whole, take direct part in the exploitation of the total working-class
by the totality of capital and in the degree of that exploitation, not
only out of general class sympathy, but also for direct economic
reasons. For, assuming all other conditions — among them the value of
the total advanced constant capital — to be given, the average rate of
profit depends on the intensity of exploitation of the sum total of
labour by the sum total of capital.

The average profit coincides with the average surplus-value produced for
each 100 of capital, and so far as the surplus-value is concerned the
foregoing statements apply as a matter of course. In the case of the
average profit the value of the advanced capital becomes an additional
element determining the rate of profit. In fact, the direct interest
taken by the capitalist, or the capital, of any individual sphere of
production in the exploitation of the labourers who are directly
employed is confined to making an extra gain, a profit exceeding the
average, either through exceptional overwork, or reduction of the wage
below the average, or through the exceptional productivity of the labour
employed. Aside from this, a capitalist who would not in his line of
production employ any variable capital, and therefore any labourer (in
reality an exaggerated assumption), would nonetheless be as much
interested in the exploitation of the working-class by capital, and
would derive his profit quite as much from unpaid surplus-labour, as,
say, a capitalist who would employ only variable capital (another
exaggeration), and who would thus invest his entire capital in wages.
But the degree of exploitation of labour depends on the average
intensity of labour if the working-day is given, and on the length of
the working-day if the intensity of exploitation is given. The degree of
exploitation of labour determines the rate of surplus-value, and
therefore the mass of surplus-value for a given total mass of variable
capital, and consequently the magnitude of the profit. The individual
capitalist, as distinct from his sphere as a whole, has the same special
interest in exploiting the labourers he personally employs as the
capital of a particular sphere, as distinct from the total social
capital, has in exploiting the labourers directly employed in that
sphere.

On the other hand, every particular sphere of capital, and every
individual capitalist, have the same interest in the productivity of the
social labour employed by the sum total of capital. For two things
depend on this productivity: First, the mass of use-values in which the
average profit is expressed; and this is doubly important, since this
average profit serves as a fund for the accumulation of new capital and
as a fund for revenue to be spent for consumption. Second, the value of
the total capital invested (constant and variable), which, the amount of
surplus-value, or profit, for the whole capitalist class being given,
determines the rate of profit, or the profit on a certain quantity of
capital. The special productivity of labour in any particular sphere, or
in any individual enterprise of this sphere, is of interest only to
those capitalists who are directly engaged in it, since it enables that
particular sphere, vis-a-vis the total capital, or that individual
capitalist, vis-a-vis his sphere, to make an extra profit.

Here, then, we have a mathematically precise proof why capitalists form
a veritable freemason society vis-a-vis the whole working-class, while
there is little love lost between them in competition among themselves.

The price of production includes the average profit. We call it price of
production. It is really what Adam Smith calls _natural price_, Ricardo
calls _price of production_, or _cost of production_, and the
physiocrats call _prix nécessaire_, because in the long run it is a
prerequisite of supply, of the reproduction of commodities in every
individual sphere. But none of them has revealed the difference between
price of production and value. We can well understand why the same
economists who oppose determining the value of commodities by
labour-time, i.e., by the quantity of labour contained in them, why they
always speak of prices of production as centres around which
market-prices fluctuate. They can afford to do it because the price of
production is an utterly external and _prima facie_ meaningless form of
the value of commodities, a form as it appears in competition, therefore
in the mind of the vulgar capitalist, and consequently in that of the
vulgar economist.

 Our analysis has revealed how the market-value (and everything said
concerning it applies with appropriate modifications to the price of
production) embraces a surplus-profit for those who produce in any
particular sphere of production under the most favourable conditions.
With the exception of crises, and of overproduction in general, this
applies to all market-prices, no matter how much they may deviate from
market-values or market-prices of production. For the market-price
signifies that the same price is paid for commodities of the same kind,
although they may have been produced under very different individual
conditions and hence may have different cost-prices. (We do not speak at
this point of any surplus-profits due to monopolies in the usual sense
of the term, whether natural or artificial.)

A surplus-profit may also arise if certain spheres of production are in
a position to evade the conversion of the values of their commodities
into prices of production, and thus the reduction of their profits to
the average profit. We shall devote more attention to the further
modifications of these two forms of surplus-profit in the part dealing
with ground-rent.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. The controversy between Storch and Ricardo with regard to ground-rent
(a controversy pertaining only to the subject; in fact, the two
opponents pay no attention to one another), whether the market-value (or
rather what they call market-price and price of production respectively)
was regulated by the commodities produced under unfavourable conditions
(Ricardo) [_On the Principles of Political Economy, and Taxation, Third
edition, London, 1821, pp. 661. — Ed._ ], or by those produced under
favourable conditions (Storch) [_Cours d'economie politique, ou
exposition des principes, qudeterminent la prosperite des nations, tome
II, St.-Petersbourg, 1815, pp. 78-79. — Ed._ ], resolves itself in the
final analysis in that both are right and both wrong, and that both of
them have failed to consider the average case. Compare Corbet [_An
Inquiry into the Causes and Modes of the Wealth of Individuals, London,
1841, pp. 42-44. — Ed._ ] on the cases in which the price is regulated
by commodities produced under the most favourable conditions. — "It is
not meant to be asserted by him (Ricardo) that two particular lots of
two different articles, as a hat and a pair of shoes, exchange with one
another when those two particular lots were produced by equal quantities
of labour. By 'commodity' we must here understand the 'description of
commodity', not a particular individual hat, pair of shoes etc. The
whole labour which produces all the hats in England is to be considered,
to this purpose, as divided among all the hats. This seems to me not to
have been expressed at first, and in the general statement of this
doctrine." (_Observations on Certain Verbal Disputes in Political
Economy, etc., London, 1821, pp. 53-54._)

2. The following subtility is sheer nonsense: "Where the quantity of
wages, capital, and land, required to produce an article, are become
different from what they were, that which Adam Smith calls the natural
price of it is also different, and that price, which was previously its
natural price becomes, with reference to this alteration, its
market-price; because, though neither the supply, nor the quantity
wanted, may have been changed" — both of them change here, just because
the market-value, or, in the case of Adam Smith, the price of
production, changes in consequence of a change of value — "that supply
is not now exactly enough for those persons who are able and willing to
pay what is now the cost of production, but is either greater or less
than that; so that the proportion between the supply and what is with
reference to the new cost of production the effectual demand, is
different from what it was. An alteration in the rate of supply will
then take place if there is no obstacle in the way of it, and at last
bring the commodity to its new natural price. It may then seem good to
some persons to say that as the commodity gets to its natural price by
an alteration in its supply, the natural price is as much owing to one
proportion between the demand and supply, as the market-price is to
another; and consequently, that the natural price, just as much as the
market-price, depends on the proportion that demand and supply bear to
each other." ("The great principle of demand and supply is called into
action to determine what A. Smith calls natural prices as well as
market-prices." — Malthus.) [_Principles of Political Economy, London,
1820, p. 75. — Ed_.] (_Observations on Certain Verbal Disputes, etc.,_
London, 1821, pp. 60-61.) The good man does not grasp the fact that it
is precisely the change in the cost of production, and thus in the value
which caused a change in the demand, in the present case, and thus in
the proportion between demand and supply, and that this change in the
demand may bring about a change in the supply. This would prove just the
reverse of what our good thinker wants to prove. It would prove that the
change in the cost of production is by no means due to the proportion of
demand and supply, but rather regulates this proportion."

3. "If each man of a class could never have more than a given share, or
aliquot part, of the gains and possessions of the whole, he would
readily combine to raise the gain"; (he does it as soon as the
proportion of demand to supply permits it ) "this is monopoly. But where
each man thinks that he may anyway increase the absolute amount of his
own share, though by a process which lessens the whole amount, he will
often do it; this is competition." (_An Inquiry into Those Principles
Respecting the Nature of Demand, etc,_, London, 1821, p. 105.)

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 11. Effects of General Wage Fluctuations on Prices of Production

 

Let the average composition of social capital be 80_(c) + 20_(v), and
the profit 20%. The rate of surplus-value is then 100%. A general
increase of wages, all else remaining the same, is tantamount to a
reduction in the rate of surplus-value. In the case of average capital,
profit and surplus-value are identical. Let wages rise 25%. Then the
same quantity of labour, formerly set in motion with 20, will cost 25.
We shall then have a turnover value of 80_(c) + 25_(v) + 15_(p), instead
of 80_(c) + 20_(v) + 20_(p). As before, the labour set in motion by the
variable capital produces a value of 40. If v rises from 20 to 25, the
surplus s, or p, will amount to only 15. The profit of 15 on a capital
of 105 is 14 2/7%, and this would be the new average rate of profit.
Since the price of production of commodities produced by the average
capital coincides with their value, the price of production of these
commodities would have remained unchanged. A wage increase would
therefore have caused a drop in profit, but no change in the value and
price of the commodities. Formerly, as long as the average profit was
20%, the price of production of commodities produced in one period of
turnover was equal to their cost-price plus a profit of 20% on this
cost-price, therefore = k + kp' = k + 20k/100. In this formula k is a
variable magnitude, changing in accordance with the value of the means
of production that go into the commodities, and with the amount of
depreciation given up by the fixed capital to the product. The price of
production would then amount to k + 14 2/7 k/100. Let us now select a
capital, whose composition is lower than the original composition of the
average social capital of 80_(c) + 20_(v) (which has now changed into 76
4/21_(c) + 23 17/21_(v)); say, 50_(c) + 50_(v). In this case, the price
of production of the annual product before the wage increase would have
been 50_(c) + 50_(v) + 20p = 120, assuming for the sake of simplicity
that the entire fixed capital passes through depreciation into the
product and that the period of turnover is the same as in the first
case. For the same quantity of labour set in motion a wage increase of
25% means an increase of the variable capital from 50 to 62½. If the
annual product were sold at the former price of production of 120, this
would give us 50_(c) + 62½_(v) + 7½_(p), or a rate of profit of 6⅔%. But
the new average rate of profit is 14 2/7%, and since we assume all other
circumstances to remain the same, the capital of 50_(c) + 62½ _(v) must
also make this profit. Now a capital of 112½ makes a profit of 16 1/14
at a rate of profit of 14 2/7%. Therefore, the price of production of
the commodities produced by this capital is now 50_(c) + 62½ _(v) +
16¼_(p) = 128 8/14. Owing to a wage rise of 255, the price of production
of the same quantity of the same commodities, therefore, has here risen
from 120 to 128 8/14, or more than 7%.

Conversely, suppose we take a sphere of production of a higher
composition than the average capital; say, 92_(c) + 8_(v). The original
average profit in this case would still be 20, and if we again assume
that the entire fixed capital passes into the annual product and that
the period of turnover is the same as in cases I and II, the price of
production of the commodity is here also 120.

Owing to the rise in wages of 25% the variable capital for the same
quantity of labour rises from 8 to 10, the cost-price of the commodities
from 100 to 102, while the average rate of profit falls from 20% to 14
2/7%. But 100:14 2/7 = 102:14 4/7. The profit now falling to the share
of 102 is therefore 14 4/7. For this reason, the total product sells at
k + kp' = 102 + 14 4/7 = 116 4/7. The price of production has therefore
fallen from 120 to 116 4/7, or 3 3/7.

Consequently, if wages are raised 25%:
1) the price of production of the commodities of a capital of average
social composition does not change;
2) the price of production of the commodities of a capital of lower
composition rises, but not in proportion to the fall in profit;
3) the price of production of the commodities of a capital of higher
composition falls, but also not in the same proportion as profit.

Since the price of production of the commodities of the average capital
remained the same, equal to the value of the product, the sum of the
prices of production of the products of all capitals remained the same
as well, and equal to the sum total of the values produced by the
aggregate capital. The increase on one side and the decrease on the
other balance for the aggregate capital on the level of the average
social capital.

If the price of production rises in case II and falls in case III, these
opposite effects alone, which are brought about by a fall in the rate of
surplus-value or by a general wage increase, show that this cannot be a
matter of compensation in the price for the rise in wages, since the
fall in the price of production in case III cannot compensate the
capitalist for the fall in profit, and since the rise of the price in
case II does not prevent a fall in profit. Rather, in either case,
whether the price rises or falls, the profit remains the same as that of
the average capital, in which case the price remains unchanged. It is
the same average profit which has fallen by 5 5/7, or somewhat over 25%,
in the case of II as well as III. It follows from this that if the price
did not rise in II and fall in III, II would have to sell below and III
above the new reduced average profit. It is self-evident that, depending
on whether 50, 25, or 10 per 100 units of capital are laid out for
wages, the effect of a wage increase on a capitalist who has invested
1/10 of his capital in wages must be quite different from that on one
who has invested ¼ or ½. An increase in the price of production on the
one side, a fall on the other, depending on a capital being below or
above the average social composition, occurs solely by virtue of the
process of levelling the profit to the new reduced average profit.

How would a general reduction in wages, and a corresponding general rise
of the rate of profit, and thus of the average profit, now affect the
prices of production of commodities produced by capitals deviating in
opposite directions from the average social composition? We have but to
reverse the foregoing exposition to obtain the result (which Ricardo
fails to analyse).

I. Average capital = 80_(c) + 20_(v) = 100; rate of surplus-value =
100%; price of production=value of commodities = 80_(c) + 20_(v) +
20_(p) = 120; rate of profit = 20%. Suppose wages fall by one-fourth.
Then the same constant capital is set in motion by 15_(v), instead of
20_(v). Then the value of commodities = 80_(c) + 15_(v) + 25_(p) = 120.
The quantity of labour performed by v remains unchanged, except that the
value newly created by it is distributed differently between the
capitalist and the labourer. The surplus-value rises from 20 to 25 and
the rate of surplus-value from 20/20 to 25/15, or from 100% to 166⅔%.
The profit on 95 now = 25, so that the rate of profit per 100 = 26 6/19.
The new composition of the capital in per cent is now 84 4/19_(c) + 15
15/19_(v) = 100.

II. Lower composition. Originally 50_(c) + 50_(v), as above. Due to the
fall of wages by one-fourth v is reduced to 37½, and consequently the
advanced total capital to 50_(c) + 37½ _(v) = 87½. If we apply the new
rate of profit of 26 6/19% to this, we get 100:26 6/19 = 87½:23 1/38.
The same mass of commodities which formerly cost 120, now costs 87½ + 23
1/38 = 110 10/19, this being a price reduction of almost 10%.

III. Higher composition. Originally 92_(c) + 8_(v) = 100. The reduction
of wages by one-fourth reduces 8_(v) to 6_(v), and the total capital to
98. Consequently, 100:26 6/19 = 98:25 16/19. The price of production of
the commodity, formerly 100 + 20 = 120, is now, after the fall in wages,
98 + 25 15/19 = 123 15/19, this being a rise of almost 4.

It is evident, therefore, that we have but to follow the same
development in the opposite direction with the appropriate
modifications; that a general reduction of wages is attended by a
general rise of surplus-value, of the rate of surplus-value and, other
circumstances remaining the same, of the rate of profit, even if
expressed in a different proportion; a fall in the prices of production
for commodities produced by capitals of lower composition, and a rise in
the prices of production for commodities produced by capitals of higher
composition. The result is just the reverse of that observed for a
general rise of wages.^([1]\ ) In both cases — rise or fall of wages —
it is assumed that the working-day remains the same, and also the prices
of the means of subsistence. In these circumstances a fall in wages is
possible only if they stood higher than the normal price of labour, or
if they are depressed below this price. The way in which the matter is
modified if the rise or fall of wages is due to a change in value, and
consequently the price of production of commodities usually consumed by
the labourer, will be analysed at some length in the part dealing with
ground-rent. At this point, however, the following remarks are to be
made once and for all:

Should the rise or fall in wages be due to a change in the value of the
necessities of life, a modification of the foregoing findings can take
place only to the extent that commodities, whose change of price raises
or lowers the variable capital, also go into the constant capital as
constituent elements and therefore affect more than just the wages
alone. But if they affect only wages, the above analysis contains all
that needs to be said.

In this entire chapter, the establishment of the general rate of profit
and the average profit, and consequently, the transmutation of values
into prices of production, are assumed as given. The question merely
was, how a general rise or fall in wages affected the assumed prices of
production of commodities. This is but a very secondary question
compared with the other important points analysed in this part. But it
is the only relevant question treated by Ricardo, and, as we shall see,
he treated it one-sidedly and unsatisfactorily.

Notes

1. It is very peculiar that Ricardo [On the Principles of Political
Economy, and Taxation, Third edition, London, 1821, pp. 36-41.— Ed.]
(who naturally proceeds differently from us, since he did not understand
the levelling of values to prices of production) did not once consider
this eventuality, but only the first case, that of a wage rise and its
influence on the prices of production of commodities. And the _servum
pecus imitatorum_ [Horace, Epistles, Book I, Epistle 19.— Ed.] did not
even attempt to make this extremely self-evident, actually tautological,
practical application.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 12. Supplementary Remarks

 

I. Causes Implying a Change in the Price of Production

There are just two causes that can change the price of production of a
commodity:

_First_. A change in the general rate of profit. This can solely be due
to a change in the average rate of surplus-value, or, if the average
rate of surplus-value remains the same, to a change in the ratio of the
sum of the appropriated surplus-values to the sum of the advanced total
social capital.

If the change in the rate of surplus-value is not due to a depression of
wages below normal, or their rise above normal — and movements of that
kind are to be regarded merely as oscillations — it can only occur
either through a rise, or fall, in the value of labour-power, the one
being just as impossible as the other unless there is a change in the
productivity of the labour producing means of subsistence, i.e., in the
value of commodities consumed by the labourer.

Or, through a change in the proportion of the sum of appropriated
surplus-values to the advanced total capital of society. Since the
change in this case is not caused by the rate of surplus-value, it must
be caused by the total capital, or rather its constant part. The mass of
this part, technically considered, increases or decreases in proportion
to the quantity of labour-power bought by the variable capital, and the
mass of its value thus increases or decreases with the increase or
decrease of its own mass. It also increases or decreases, therefore,
proportionately to the mass of the value of the variable capital. If the
same labour sets more constant capital in motion, it has become more
productive. If the reverse, then less productive. Thus, there has been a
change in the productivity of labour, and there must have occurred a
change in the value of certain commodities.

The following law, then, applies to both cases: If the price of
production of a commodity changes in consequence of a change in the
general rate of profit, its own value may have remained unchanged.
However, a change must have occurred in the value of other commodities.

_Second_. The general rate of profit remains unchanged. In this case the
price of production of a commodity can change only if its own value has
changed. This may be due to more, or less, labour being required to
reproduce the commodity in question, either because of a change in the
productivity of labour which produces this commodity in its final form,
or of the labour which produces those commodities that go into its
production. The price of production of cotton yarn may fall, either
because raw cotton is produced cheaper than before, or because the
labour of spinning has become more productive due to improved machinery.

The price of production, as we have seen, = k + p, equal to cost-price
plus profit. This, however, = k + kp', in which k, the cost-price, is a
variable magnitude, which changes for different spheres of production
and is everywhere equal to the value of the constant and variable
capital consumed in the production of the commodity, and p' is the
average rate of profit in percentage form. If k = 200, and p' = 20%, the
price of production k + kp' = 200 + 200 × 20/100 = 200 + 40 = 240. This
price of production may clearly remain the same, in spite of a change in
the value of the commodities.

All changes in the price of production of commodities are reduced, in
the last analysis, to changes in value. But not all changes in the value
of commodities need express themselves in changes in the price of
production. The price of production is not determined by the value of
any one commodity alone, but by the aggregate value of all commodities.
A change in commodity A may therefore be balanced by an opposite change
in commodity B, so that the general relation remains the same.

II. Price of Production of Commodities of Average Composition

We have seen how a deviation in prices of production from values arises
from: 1) adding the average profit instead of the surplus-value
contained in a commodity to is cost-price; 2) the price of production,
which so deviates from the value of a commodity, entering into the
cost-price of other commodities as one of its elements, so that the
cost-price of a commodity may already contain a deviation from value in
those means of production consumed by it, quite aside from a deviation
of its own which may arise through a difference between the average
profit and the surplus-value.

It is therefore possible that even the cost-price of commodities
produced by capitals of average composition may differ from the sum of
the values of the elements which make up this component of their price
of production. Suppose, the average composition is 80_(c) + 20_(v). Now,
it is possible that in the actual capitals of this composition 80_(c)
may be greater or smaller than the value of c, i.e., the constant
capital, because this c may be made up of commodities whose price of
production differs from their value. In the same way, 20_(v) might
diverge from its value if the consumption of the wage includes
commodities whose price of production diverges from their value; in
which case the labourer would work a longer, or shorter, time to buy
them back (to replace them) and would thus perform more, or less,
necessary labour than would be required if the price of production of
such necessities of life coincided with their value.

However, this possibility does not detract in the least from the
correctness of the theorems demonstrated which hold for commodities of
average composition. The quantity of profit falling to these commodities
is equal to the quantity of surplus-value contained in them. For
instance, in a capital of the given composition 80_(c) + 20_(v), the
most important thing in determining surplus-value is not whether these
figures are expressions of actual values, but how they are related to
one another, i.e., whether v = l/5 of the total capital, and c = 4/5.
Whenever this is the case, the surplus-value produced by v is, as was
assumed, equal to the average profit. On the other hand, since it equals
the average profit, the price of production = cost-price plus profit = k
+ p = k + s; i.e., in practice it is equal to the value of the
commodity. This implies that a rise or fall in wages would not change
the price of production, k + p, any more than it would change the value
of the commodities, and would merely effect a corresponding opposite
movement, a fall or a rise, in the rate of profit. For if a rise or fall
of wages were here to bring about a change in the price of commodities,
the rate of profit in these spheres of average composition would rise
above, or fall below, the level prevailing in other spheres. The sphere
of average composition maintains the same level of profit as the other
spheres only so long as the price remains unchanged. The practical
result is therefore the same as it would be if its products were sold at
their real value. For if commodities are sold at their actual values, it
is evident that, other conditions being equal, a rise, or fall, in wages
will cause a corresponding fall or rise in profit, but no change in the
value of commodities, and that under all circumstances a rise or fall in
wages can never affect the value of commodities, but only the magnitude
of the surplus-value.

III. The Capitalist's Grounds for Compensating

It has been said that competition levels the rates of profit of the
different spheres of production into an average rate of profit and
thereby turns the values of the products of these different spheres into
prices of production. This occurs through the continual transfer of
capital from one sphere to another, in which, for the moment, the profit
happens to lie above average. The fluctuations of profit caused by the
cycle of fat and lean years succeeding one another in any given branch
of industry within given periods must, however, receive due
consideration. This incessant outflow and inflow of capital between the
different spheres of production creates trends of rise and fall in the
rate of profit, which equalise one another more or less and thus have a
tendency to reduce the rate of profit everywhere to the same common and
general level.

This movement of capitals is primarily caused by the level of
market-prices, which lift profits above the general average in one place
and depress them below it in another. Merchant's capital is left out of
consideration as it is irrelevant at this point, for we know from the
sudden paroxysms of speculation appearing in certain popular articles
that it can withdraw masses of capital from one line of business with
extraordinary rapidity and throw them with equal rapidity into another.
Yet with respect to each sphere of actual production — industry,
agriculture, mining, etc. — the transfer of capital from one sphere to
another offers considerable difficulties, particularly on account of the
existing fixed capital. Experience shows, moreover, that if a branch of
industry, such as, say, the cotton industry, yields unusually high
profits at one period, it makes very little profit, or even suffers
losses, at another, so that in a certain cycle of years the average
profit is much the same as in other branches. And capital soon learns to
take this experience into account.

What competition does _not_ show, however, is the determination of
value, which dominates the movement of production; and the values that
lie beneath the prices of production and that determine them in the last
instance. Competition, on the other hand, shows: 1) the average profits,
which are independent of the organic composition of capital in the
different spheres of production, and therefore also of the mass of
living labour appropriated by any given capital in any given sphere of
exploitation; 2) the rise and fall of prices of production caused by
changes in the level of wages, a phenomenon which at first glance
completely contradicts the value relation of commodities; 3) the
fluctuations of market-prices, which reduce the average market-price of
commodities in a given period of time, not to the market-_value_, but to
a very different market-price of production, which diverges considerably
from this market-value. All these phenomena _seem_ to contradict the
determination of value by labour-time as much as the nature of
surplus-value consisting of unpaid surplus-labour. _Thus everything
appears reversed in competition_. The final pattern of economic
relations as seen on the surface, in their real existence and
consequently in the conceptions by which the bearers and agents of these
relations seek to understand them, is very much different from, and
indeed quite the reverse of, their inner but concealed essential pattern
and the conception corresponding to it.

Further. As soon as capitalist production reaches a certain level of
development, the equalisation of the different rates of profit in
individual spheres to general rate of profit no longer proceeds solely
through the play of attraction and repulsion, by which market-prices
attract or repel capital. After average prices, and their corresponding
market-prices, become stable for a time it reaches the _consciousness_
of the individual capitalists that this equalisation balances _definite
differences_, so that they include these in their mutual calculations.
The differences exist in the mind of the capitalists and are taken into
account as grounds for compensating.

Average profit is the basic conception, the conception that capitals of
equal magnitude must yield equal profits in equal time spans. This,
again, is based on the conception that the capital in each sphere of
production must share _pro rata_ to its magnitude in the total
surplus-value squeezed out of the labourers by the total social capital;
or, that every individual capital should be regarded merely as a part of
the total social capital, and every capitalist actually as a shareholder
in the total social enterprise, each sharing in the total profit _pro
rata_ to the magnitude of his share of capital.

This conception serves as a basis for the capitalist's calculations, for
instance, that a capital whose turnover is slower than another's,
because its commodities take longer to be produced, or because they are
sold in remoter markets, nevertheless charges the profit it loses in
this way, and compensates itself by raising the price. Or else, that
investments of capital in lines exposed to greater hazards, for instance
in shipping, are compensated by higher prices. As soon as capitalist
production, and with it the insurance business, are developed, the
hazards are, in effect, made equal for all spheres of production (cf.
Corbet); but the more hazardous lines pay higher insurance rates, and
recover them in the prices of their commodities. In practice all this
means that every circumstance, which renders one line of production —
and all of them are considered equally necessary within certain limits —
less profitable, and another more profitable, is taken into account once
and for all as valid ground for compensation, without always requiring
the renewed action of competition to justify the motives or factors for
calculating this compensation. The capitalist simply forgets — or rather
fails to see, because competition does not point it out to him — that
all these grounds for compensation mutually advanced by capitalists in
calculating the prices of commodities of different lines of production
merely come down to the fact that they all have an equal claim, _pro
rata_ to the magnitude of their respective capitals, to the common loot,
the total surplus-value. It rather _seems_ to them that since the profit
pocketed by them differs from the surplus-value they appropriated, these
grounds for compensation do not level out their participation in the
total surplus-value, but _create the profit itself_, which seems to be
derived from the additions made on one or another ground to the
cost-price of their commodities.

In other respects the statements made in Chapter VII concerning the
capitalists' assumptions as to the source of surplus-value, apply also
to average profit. The present case appears different only in so far as
a saving in cost-price depends on individual business acumen, alertness,
etc., assuming the market-price of commodities and the exploitation of
labour to be given.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III



PART III. THE LAW OF THE TENDENCY OF THE RATE OF PROFIT TO FALL


 


Chapter 13. The Law As Such

 

Assuming a given wage and working-day, a variable capital, for instance
of 100, represents a certain number of employed labourers. It is the
index of this number. Suppose £100 are the wages of 100 labourers for,
say, one week. If these labourers perform equal amounts of necessary and
surplus-labour, if they work daily as many hours for themselves, _i.e._,
for the reproduction of their wage, as they do for the capitalist,
_i.e._, for the production of surplus-value, then the value of their
total product = £200, and the surplus-value they produce would amount to
£100. The rate of surplus-value, s/v, would = 100%. But, as we have
seen, this rate of surplus-value would nonetheless express itself in
very different rates of profit, depending on the different volumes of
constant capital c and consequently of the total capital C, because the
rate of profit = s/C. The rate of surplus-value is 100%:

If c = 50, and v = 100, then p' = 100/150 = 66⅔%;
c = 100, and v = 100, then p' = 100/200 = 50%;
c = 200, and v = 100, then p' = 100/300 = 33⅓%;
c = 300, and v = 100, then p' = 100/400 = 25%;
c = 400, and v = 100, then p' = 100/500 = 20%.

This is how the same rate of surplus-value would express itself under
the same degree of labour exploitation in a falling rate of profit,
because the material growth of the constant capital implies also a
growth — albeit not in the same proportion — in its value, and
consequently in that of the total capital.

If it is further assumed that this gradual change in the composition of
capital is not confined only to individual spheres of production, but
that it occurs more or less in all, or at least in the key spheres of
production, so that it involves changes in the average organic
composition of the total capital of a certain society, then the gradual
growth of constant capital in relation to variable capital must
necessarily lead to _a gradual fall of the general rate of profit_, so
long as the rate of surplus-value, or the intensity of exploitation of
labour by capital, remain the same. Now we have seen that it is a law of
capitalist production that its development is attended by a relative
decrease of variable in relation to constant capital, and consequently
to the total capital set in motion. This is just another way of saying
that owing to the distinctive methods of production developing in the
capitalist system the same number of labourers, _i.e._, the same
quantity of labour-power set in motion by a variable capital of a given
value, operate, work up and productively consume in the same time span
an ever-increasing quantity of means of labour, machinery and fixed
capital of all sorts, raw and auxiliary materials — and consequently a
constant capital of an ever-increasing value. This continual relative
decrease of the variable capital vis-a-vis the constant, and
consequently the total capital, is identical with the progressively
higher organic composition of the social capital in its average. It is
likewise just another expression for the progressive development of the
social productivity of labour, which is demonstrated precisely by the
fact that the same number of labourers, in the same time, _i.e._, with
less labour, convert an ever-increasing quantity of raw and auxiliary
materials into products, thanks to the growing application of machinery
and fixed capital in general. To this growing quantity of value of the
constant capital — although indicating the growth of the real mass of
use-values of which the constant capital materially consists only
approximately — corresponds a progressive cheapening of products. Every
individual product, considered by itself, contains a smaller quantity of
labour than it did on a lower level of production, where the capital
invested in wages occupies a far greater place compared to the capital
invested in means of production. The hypothetical series drawn up at the
beginning of this chapter expresses, therefore, the actual tendency of
capitalist production. This mode of production produces a progressive
relative decrease of the variable capital as compared to the constant
capital, and consequently a continuously rising organic composition of
the total capital. The immediate result of this is that the rate of
surplus-value, at the same, or even a rising, degree of labour
exploitation, is represented by a continually falling general rate of
profit. (We shall see later [Present edition: Ch. XIV. — _Ed_.] why this
fall does not manifest itself in an absolute form, but rather as a
tendency toward a progressive fall.) The progressive tendency of the
general rate of profit to fall is, therefore, just _an expression
peculiar to the capitalist mode of production_ of the progressive
development of the social productivity of labour. This does not mean to
say that the rate of profit may not fall temporarily for other reasons.
But proceeding from the nature of the capitalist mode of production, it
is thereby proved logical necessity that in its development the general
average rate of surplus-value must express itself in a falling general
rate of profit. Since the mass of the employed living labour is
continually on the decline as compared to the mass of materialised
labour set in motion by it, _i.e._, to the productively consumed means
of production, it follows that the portion of living labour, unpaid and
congealed in surplus-value, must also be continually on the decrease
compared to the amount of value represented by the invested total
capital. Since the ratio of the mass of surplus-value to the value of
the invested total capital forms the rate of profit, this rate must
constantly fall.

Simple as this law appears from the foregoing statements, all of
political economy has so far had little success in discovering it, as we
shall see in a later part. [K. Marx, _Theorien über den Mehrwert_. K.
Marx/F. Engels, _Werke_, Band 26, Teil 2, S. 435-66, 541-43_. — Ed._]
The economists perceived the phenomenon and cudgelled their brains in
tortuous attempts to interpret it. Since this law is of great importance
to capitalist production, it may be said to be a mystery whose solution
has been the goal of all political economy since Adam Smith, the
difference between the various schools since Adam Smith having been in
the divergent approaches to a solution. When we consider, on the other
hand, that up to the present political economy has been running in
circles round the distinction between constant and variable capital, but
has never known how to define it accurately; that it has never separated
surplus-value from profit, and never even considered profit in its pure
form as distinct from its different, independent components, such as
industrial profit, commercial profit, interest, and ground-rent; that it
has never thoroughly analysed the differences in the organic composition
of capital, and, for this reason, has never thought of analysing the
formation of the general rate of profit — if we consider all this, the
failure to solve this riddle is no longer surprising.

We intentionally present this law before going on to the division of
profit into different independent categories. The fact that this
analysis is made independently of the division of profit into different
parts, which fall to the share of different categories of people, shows
from the outset that this law is, in its entirety, independent of this
division, and just as independent of the mutual relations of the
resultant categories of profit. The profit to which we are here
referring is but another name for surplus-value itself, which is
presented only in its relation to total capital rather than to variable
capital, from which it arises. The drop in the rate of profit,
therefore, expresses the falling relation of surplus-value to advanced
total capital, and is for this reason independent of any division
whatsoever of this surplus-value among the various categories.

We have seen that at a certain stage of capitalist development, where
the organic composition of capital c : v was 50 : 100, a rate of
surplus-value of 100% was expressed in a rate of profit of 66⅔%, and
that at a higher stage, where c : v was 400 : 100, the same rate of
surplus-value was expressed in a rate of profit of only 20%. What is
true of different successive stages of development in one country, is
also true of different coexisting stages of development in different
countries. In an undeveloped country, in which the former composition of
capital is the average, the general rate of profit would = 66⅔%, while
in a country with the latter composition and a much higher stage of
development it would = 20%.

The difference between the two national rates of profit might disappear,
or even be reversed, if labour were less productive in the less
developed country, so that a larger quantity of labour were to be
represented in a smaller quantity of the same commodities, and a larger
exchange-value were represented in less use-value. The labourer would
then spend more of his time in reproducing his own means of subsistence,
or their value, and less time in producing surplus-value; consequently,
he would perform less surplus-labour, with the result that the rate of
surplus-value would be lower. Suppose, the labourer of the less
developed country were to work ⅔ of the working-day for himself and ⅓
for the capitalist; in accordance with the above illustration, the same
labour-power would then be paid with 133⅓ and would furnish a surplus of
only 60⅔. A constant capital of 50 would correspond to a variable
capital of 433⅓. The rate of surplus-value would amount to 66⅔ : 133⅓ =
50%, and the rate of profit to 66⅔ : 133⅓, or approximately 36%.

Since we have not so far analysed the different component parts of
profit, _i.e._, they do not for the present exist for us, we make the
following remarks beforehand merely to avoid misunderstanding: In
comparing countries in different stages of development it would be a big
mistake to measure the level of the national rate of profit by, say, the
level of the national rate of interest, namely when comparing countries
with a developed capitalist production with countries in which labour
has not yet been formally subjected to capital, although in reality the
labourer is exploited by the capitalist (as, for instance, in India,
where the ryot manages his farm as an independent producer whose
production as such is not, therefore, as yet subordinated to capital,
although the usurer may not only rob him of his entire surplus-labour by
means of interest, but may also, to use a capitalist term, hack off a
part of his wage). This interest comprises all the profit, and more than
the profit, instead of merely expressing an aliquot part of the produced
surplus-value, or profit, as it does in countries with a developed
capitalist production. On the other hand, the rate of interest is, in
this case, mostly determined by relations (loans granted by usurers to
owners of larger estates who draw ground-rent) which have nothing to do
with profit, and rather indicate to what extent usury appropriates
ground-rent.

As regards countries possessing different stages of development of
capitalist production, and consequently capitals of different organic
composition, a country where the normal working-day is shorter than
another's may have a higher rate of surplus-value (one of the factors
which determines the rate of profit). _First,_ if the English ten-hour
working-day is, on account of its higher intensity, equal to an Austrian
working-day of 14 hours, then, dividing the working-day equally in both
instances, 5 hours of English surplus-labour may represent a greater
value on the world-market than 7 hours of Austrian surplus-labour.
_Second,_ a larger portion of the English working-day than of the
Austrian may represent surplus-labour.

The law of the falling rate of profit, which expresses the same, or even
a higher, rate of surplus-value, states, in other words, that any
quantity of the average social capital, say, a capital of 100, comprises
an ever larger portion or means of labour, and an ever smaller portion
of living labour. Therefore, since the aggregate mass of living labour
operating the means of production decreases in relation to the value of
these means of production, it follows that the unpaid labour and the
portion of value in which it is expressed must decline as compared to
the value of the advanced total capital. Or: An ever smaller aliquot
part of invested total capital is converted into living labour, and this
total capital, therefore, absorbs in proportion to its magnitude less
and less surplus-labour, although the unpaid part of the labour applied
may at the same time grow in relation to the paid part. The relative
decrease of the variable and increase of the constant capital, however
much both parts may grow in absolute magnitude, is, as we have said, but
another expression for greater productivity of labour.

Let a capital of 100 consist of 80_(c) + 20_(v), and the latter = 20
labourers. Let the rate of surplus-value be 100%, _i.e._, the labourers
work half the day for themselves and the other half for the capitalist.
Now let the capital of 100 in a less developed country = 20_(c) +
80_(v), and let the latter = 80 labourers. But these labourers require
2/3 of the day for themselves, and work only 1/3 for the capitalist.
Everything else being equal, the labourers in the first case produce a
value of 40, and in the second of 120. The first capital produces 80_(c)
+ 20_(v) + 20_(s) = 120; rate of profit = 20%. The second capital,
20_(c) + 80_(v) + 40_(s) = 140; rate of profit 40%. In the second case
the rate of profit is, therefore, double the first, although the rate of
surplus-value in the first = 100%, which is double that of the second,
where it is only 50%. But then, a capital of the same magnitude
appropriates the surplus-labour of only 20 labourers in the first case,
and of 80 labourers in the second case.

The law of the progressive falling of the rate of profit, or the
relative decline of appropriated surplus-labour compared to the mass of
materialised labour set in motion by living labour, does not rule out in
any way that the absolute mass of exploited labour set in motion by the
social capital, and consequently the absolute mass of the surplus-labour
it appropriates, may grow; nor, that the capitals controlled by
individual capitalists may dispose of a growing mass of labour and,
hence, of surplus-labour, the latter even though the number of labourers
they employ does not increase.

Take a certain working population of, say, two million. Assume,
furthermore, that the length and intensity of the average working-day,
and the level of wages, and thereby the proportion between necessary and
surplus-labour, are given. In that case the aggregate labour of these
two million, and their surplus-labour expressed in surplus-value, always
produces the same magnitude of value. But with the growth of the mass of
the constant (fixed and circulating) capital set in motion by this
labour, this produced quantity of value declines in relation to the
value of this capital, which value grows with its mass, even if not in
quite the same proportion. This ratio, and consequently the rate of
profit, shrinks in spite of the fact that the mass of commanded living
labour is the same as before, and the same amount of surplus-labour is
sucked out of it by the capital. It changes because the mass of
materialised labour set in motion by living labour increases, and not
because the mass of living labour has shrunk. It is a relative decrease,
not an absolute one, and has, in fact, nothing to do with the absolute
magnitude of the labour and surplus-labour set in motion. The drop in
the rate of profit is not due to an absolute, but only to a relative
decrease of the variable part of the total capital, _i.e._, to its
decrease in relation to the constant part.

What applies to any given mass of labour and surplus-labour, also
applies to a growing number of labourers, and, thus, under the above
assumption, to any growing mass of commanded labour in general, and to
its unpaid part, the surplus-labour, in particular. If the working
population increases from two million to three, and if the variable
capital invested in wages also rises to three million from its former
two million, while the constant capital rises from four million to
fifteen million, then, under the above assumption of a constant
working-day and a constant rate of surplus-value, the mass of
surplus-labour, and of surplus-value, rises by one-half, _i.e._, 50%,
from two million to three. Nevertheless, in spite of this growth of the
absolute mass of surplus-labour, and hence of surplus-value, by 50%, the
ratio of variable to constant capital would fall from 2 : 4 to 3 : 15,
and the ratio of surplus-value to total capital would be (in millions)

I. 4_(c) + 2_(v) + 2_(s); C = 6, p' = 33⅓%.

II. 15_(c) + 3_(v) + 3_(s); C = 18, p' = 16⅔%.

While the mass of surplus-value has increased by one-half, the rate of
profit has fallen by one-half. However, the profit is only the
surplus-value calculated in relation to the total social capital, and
the mass of profit, its absolute magnitude, is socially equal to the
absolute magnitude of the surplus-value. The absolute magnitude of the
profit, its total amount, would, therefore, have grown by 50%, in spite
of its enormous relative decrease compared to the advanced total
capital, or in spite of the enormous decrease in the general rate of
profit. The number of labourers employed by capital, hence the absolute
mass of the labour set in motion by it, and therefore the absolute mass
of surplus-labour absorbed by it, the mass of the surplus-value produced
by it, and therefore the absolute mass of the profit produced by it,
_can,_ consequently, increase, and increase progressively, in spite of
the progressive drop in the rate of profit. And this not only _can_ be
so. Aside from temporary fluctuations it _must_ be so, on the basis of
capitalist production.

Essentially, the capitalist process of production is simultaneously a
process of accumulation. We have shown that with the development of
capitalist production the mass of values to be simply reproduced, or
maintained, increases as the productivity of labour grows, even if the
labour-power employed should remain constant. But with the development
of social productivity of labour the mass of produced use-values, of
which the means of production form a part, grows still more. And the
additional labour, through whose appropriation this additional wealth
can be reconverted into capital, does not depend on the value, but on
the mass of these means of production (including means of subsistence),
because in the production process the labourers have nothing to do with
the value, but with the use-value, of the means of production.
Accumulation itself, however, and the concentration of capital that goes
with it, is a material means of increasing productiveness. Now, this
growth of the means of production includes the growth of the working
population, the creation of a working population, which corresponds to
the surplus-capital, or even exceeds its general requirements, thus
leading to an over-population of workers. A momentary excess of
surplus-capital over the working population it has commandeered, would
have a two-fold effect. It could, on the one hand, by raising wages,
mitigate the adverse conditions which decimate the offspring of the
labourers and would make marriages easier among them, so as gradually to
increase the population. On the other hand, by applying methods which
yield relative surplus-value (introduction and improvement of machinery)
it would produce a far more rapid, artificial, relative over-population,
which in its turn, would be a breeding-ground for a really swift
propagation of the population, since under capitalist production misery
produces population. It therefore follows of itself from the nature of
the capitalist process of accumulation, which is but one facet of the
capitalist production process, that the increased mass of means of
production that is to be converted into capital always finds a
correspondingly increased, even excessive, exploitable worker
population. As the process of production and accumulation advances
therefore, the mass of available and appropriated surplus-labour, and
hence the absolute mass of profit appropriated by the social capital,
_must_ grow. Along with the volume, however, the same laws of production
and accumulation increase also the value of the constant capital in a
mounting progression more rapidly than that of the variable part of
capital, invested as it is in living labour. Hence, the same laws
produce for the social capital a growing absolute mass of profit, and a
falling rate of profit.

We shall entirely ignore here that with the advance of capitalist
production and the attendant development of the productiveness of social
labour and multiplication of production branches, hence products, the
same amount of value represents a progressively increasing mass of
use-values and enjoyments.

The development of capitalist production and accumulation lifts
labour-processes to an increasingly enlarged scale and thus imparts to
them ever greater dimensions, and involves accordingly larger
investments of capital for each individual establishment. A mounting
concentration of capitals (accompanied, though on a smaller scale, by an
increase in the number of capitalists) is, therefore, one of its
material requirements as well as one of its results. Hand in hand with
it, mutually interacting, there occurs a progressive expropriation of
the more or less direct producers. It is, then, natural for the
individual capitalists to command increasingly large armies of labourers
(no matter how much the variable capital may decrease in relation to the
constant), and natural, too, that the mass of surplus-value, and hence
profit, appropriated by them, should grow simultaneously with, and in
spite of, the fall in the rate of profit. The causes which concentrate
masses of labourers under the command of individual capitalists, are the
very same that swell the mass of the invested fixed capital, and
auxiliary and raw materials, in mounting proportion as compared to the
mass of employed living labour.

It requires no more than a passing remark at this point to indicate
that, given a certain labouring population, the mass of surplus-value,
hence the absolute mass of profit, must grow if the rate of
surplus-value increases, be it through a lengthening or intensification
of the working-day, or through a drop in the value of wages due to an
increase in the productiveness of labour, and that it must do so in
spite of the relative decrease of variable capital in respect to
constant.

The same development of the productiveness of social labour, the same
laws which express themselves in a relative decrease of variable as
compared to total capital, and in the thereby facilitated accumulation,
while this accumulation in its turn becomes a starting-point for the
further development of the productiveness and for a further relative
decrease of variable capital — this same development manifests itself,
aside from temporary fluctuations, in a progressive increase of the
total employed labour-power and a progressive increase of the absolute
mass of surplus-value, and hence of profit.

Now, what must be the form of this double-edged law of a decrease in the
_rate_ of profit and a simultaneous increase in the absolute _mass_ of
profit arising from the same causes? As a law based on the fact that
under given conditions the appropriated mass of surplus-labour, hence of
surplus-value, increases, and that, so far as the total capital is
concerned, or the individual capital as an aliquot part of the total
capital, profit and surplus-value are identical magnitudes?

Let us take an aliquot part of capital upon which we calculate the rate
of profit, _e.g._, 100. These 100 represent the average composition of
the total capital, say, 80_(c) + 20_(v). We have seen in the second part
of this book that the average rate of profit in the various branches of
production is determined not by the particular composition of each
individual capital, but by the average social composition. As the
variable capital decreases relative to the constant, hence the total
capital of 100, the rate of profit, or the relative magnitude of
surplus-value, _i.e._, its ratio to the advanced total capital of 100,
falls even though the intensity of exploitation were to remain the same,
or even to increase. But it is not this relative magnitude alone which
falls. The magnitude of the surplus-value or profit absorbed by the
total capital of 100 also falls absolutely. At a rate of surplus-value
of 100%, a capital of 60_(c) + 40_(v) produces a mass of surplus-value,
and hence of profit, amounting to 40; a capital of 80_(c) + 20_(v) a
mass of profit of 30; and for a capital of 80_(c) + 20_(v) the profit
falls to 20. This falling applies to the mass of surplus-value, and
hence of profit, and is due to the fact that the total capital of 100
employs less living labour, and, the intensity of labour exploitation
remaining the same, sets in motion less surplus-labour, and therefore
produces less surplus-value. Taking any aliquot part of the social
capital, _i.e._, a capital of average composition, as a standard by
which to measure surplus-value — and this is done in all profit
calculations — a relative fall of surplus-value is generally identical
with its absolute fall. In the cases given above, the rate of profit
sinks from 40% to 30% and to 20%, because, in fact, the mass of
surplus-value, and hence of profit, produced by the same capital falls
absolutely from 40 to 30 and to 20. Since the magnitude of the value of
the capital, by which the surplus-value is measured, is given as 100, a
fall in the proportion of surplus-value to this given magnitude can be
only another expression for the decrease of the absolute magnitude of
surplus-value and profit. This is, indeed, a tautology. But, as shown,
the fact that this decrease occurs at all, arises from the nature of the
development of the capitalist process of production.

On the other hand, however, the same causes which bring about an
absolute decrease of surplus-value, and hence profit, on a given
capital, and consequently of the rate of profit calculated in per cent,
produce an increase in the absolute mass of surplus-value, and hence of
profit, appropriated by the social capital (_i.e._, by all capitalists
taken as a whole). How does this occur, what is the only way in which
this can occur, or what are the conditions obtaining in this seeming
contradiction?

If any aliquot part = 100 of the social capital, and hence any 100 of
average social composition, is a given magnitude, for which therefore a
fall in the rate of profit coincides with a fall in the absolute
magnitude of the profit because the capital which here serves as a
standard of measurement is a constant magnitude, then the magnitude of
the social capital like that of the capital in the hands of individual
capitalists, is variable, and in keeping with our assumptions it must
vary inversely with the decrease of its variable portion.

In our former illustration, when the percentage of composition was
60_(c) + 40_(v), the corresponding surplus-value, or profit, was 40, and
hence the rate of profit 40%. Suppose, the total capital in this stage
of composition was one million. Then the total surplus-value, and hence
the total profit, amounted to 400,000. Now, if the composition later =
80_(c) + 20_(v), while the degree of labour exploitation remained the
same, then the surplus-value or profit for each 100 = 20. But since the
absolute mass of surplus-value or profit increases, as demonstrated, in
spite of the decreasing rate of profit or the decreasing production of
surplus-value by every 100 of capital — increases, say, from 400,000 to
440,000, then this occurs solely because the total capital which formed
at the time of this new composition has risen to 2,200,000. The mass of
the total capital set in motion has risen to 220%, while the rate of
profit has fallen by 50%. Had the total capital no more than doubled, it
would have to produce as much surplus-value and profit to obtain a rate
of profit of 20% as the old capital of 1,000,000 produced at 40%. Had it
grown to less than double, it would have produced less surplus-value, or
profit, than the old capital of 1,000,000, which, in its former
composition, would have had to grow from 1,000,000 to no more than
1,100,000 to raise its surplus-value from 400,000 to 440,000.

We again meet here the previously defined law that the relative decrease
of the variable capital, hence the development of the social
productiveness of labour, involves an increasingly large mass of total
capital to set in motion the same quantity of labour-power and squeeze
out the same quantity of surplus-labour. Consequently, the possibility
of a relative surplus of labouring people develops proportionately to
the advances made by capitalist production not because the
productiveness of social labour _decreases,_ but because it _increases_.
It does not therefore arise out of an absolute disproportion between
labour and the means of subsistence, or the means for the production of
these means of subsistence, but out of a disproportion occasioned by
capitalist exploitation of labour, a disproportion between the
progressive growth of capital and its relatively shrinking need for an
increasing population.

Should the rate of profit fall by 50%, it would shrink one-half. If the
mass of profit is to remain the same, the capital must be doubled. For
the mass of profit made at a declining rate of profit to remain the
same, the multiplier indicating the growth of the total capital must be
equal to the divisor indicating the fall of the rate of profit. If the
rate of profit falls from 40 to 20, the total capital must rise
inversely at the rate of 20 : 40 to obtain the same result. If the rate
of profit falls from 40 to 8, the capital would have to increase at the
rate of 8 : 40, or five-fold. A capital of 1,000,000 at 40% produces
400,000, and a capital of 5,000,000 at 8% likewise produces 400,000.
This applies if we want the result to remain the same. But if the result
is to be higher, then the capital must grow at a greater rate than the
rate of profit falls. In other words, for the variable portion of the
total capital not to remain the same in absolute terms, but to increase
absolutely in spite of its falling in percentage of the total capital,
the total capital must grow at a faster rate than the percentage of the
variable capital falls. It must grow so considerably that in its new
composition it should require more than the old portion of variable
capital to purchase labour-power. If the variable portion of a capital =
100 should fall from 40 to 20, the total capital must rise higher than
200 to be able to employ a larger variable capital than 40.

Even if the exploited mass of the working population were to remain
constant, and only the length and intensity of the working-day were to
increase, the mass of the invested capital would have to increase, since
it would have to be greater in order to employ the same mass of labour
under the old conditions of exploitation after the composition of
capital changes.

Thus, the same development of the social productiveness of labour
expresses itself with the progress of capitalist production on the one
hand in a tendency of the rate of profit to fall progressively and, on
the other, in a progressive growth of the absolute mass of the
appropriated surplus-value, or profit; so that on the whole a relative
decrease of variable capital and profit is accompanied by an absolute
increase of both. This two-fold effect, as we have seen, can express
itself only in a growth of the total capital at a pace more rapid than
that at which the rate of profit falls. For an absolutely increased
variable capital to be employed in a capital of higher composition, or
one in which the constant capital has increased relatively more, the
total capital must not only grow proportionately to its higher
composition, but still more rapidly. It follows, then, that as the
capitalist mode of production develops, an ever larger quantity of
capital is required to employ the same, let alone an increased, amount
of labour-power. Thus, on a capitalist foundation, the increasing
productiveness of labour necessarily and permanently creates a seeming
over-population of labouring people. If the variable capital forms just
1/6 of the total capital instead of the former ½, the total capital must
be trebled to employ the same amount of labour-power. And if twice as
much labour-power is to be employed, the total capital must increase
six-fold.

Political economy, which has until now been unable to explain the law of
the tendency of the rate of profit to fall, pointed self-consolingly to
the increasing mass of profit, _i.e._, to the growth of the absolute
magnitude of profit, be it for the individual capitalist or for the
social capital, but this was also based on mere platitude and
speculation.

To say that the mass of profit is determined by two factors — first, the
rate of profit, and, secondly, the mass of capital invested at this
rate, is mere tautology. It is therefore but a corollary of this
tautology to say that there is a possibility for the mass of profit to
grow even though the rate of profit may fall at the same time. It does
not help us one step farther, since it is just as possible for the
capital to increase without the mass of profit growing, and for it to
increase even while the mass of profit falls. For 100 at 25% yields 25,
and 400 at 5% yields only 20.^([1]) But if the same causes which make
the rate of profit fall, entail the accumulation, _i.e._, the formation,
of additional capital, and if each additional capital employs additional
labour and produces additional surplus-value; if, on the other hand, the
mere fall in the rate of profit implies that the constant capital, and
with it the total old capital, have increased, then this process ceases
to be mysterious. We shall see later [K. Marx, _Theorien über den
Mehrwert._ K. Marx/F. Engels, _Werke,_ Band 26, Teil 2,. S. 435-66, 541-
43_. — Ed_] to what deliberate falsifications some people resort in
their calculations to spirit away the possibility of an increase in the
mass of profit simultaneous with a decrease in the rate of profit.

We have shown how the same causes that bring about a tendency for the
general rate of profit to fall necessitate an accelerated accumulation
of capital and, consequently, an increase in the absolute magnitude, or
total mass, of the surplus-labour (surplus-value, profit) appropriated
by it. Just as everything appears reversed in competition, and thus in
the consciousness of the agents of competition, so also this law, this
inner and necessary connection between two seeming contradictions. It is
evident that within the proportions indicated above a capitalist
disposing of a large capital will receive a larger mass of profit than a
small capitalist making seemingly high profits. Even a cursory
examination of competition shows, furthermore, that under certain
circumstances, when the greater capitalist wishes to make room for
himself on the market, and to crowd out the smaller ones, as happens in
times of crises, he makes practical use of this, _i.e._, he deliberately
lowers his rate of profit in order to drive the smaller ones to the
wall. Merchants capital, which we shall describe in detail later, also
notably exhibits phenomena which appear to attribute a fall in profit to
an expansion of business, and thus of capital. The scientific expression
for this false conception will be given later. Similar superficial
observations result from a comparison of rates of profit in individual
lines of business, distinguished either as subject to free competition,
or to monopoly. The utterly shallow conception existing in the minds of
the agents of competition is found in Roscher, namely, that a reduction
in the rate of profit is "more prudent and humane". [Roscher, _Die
Grundlage der Nationalökonomie_, 3 Auflage, 1858, 108, S. 192_. — Ed._]
The fall in the rate of profit appears in this case as an _effect_ of an
increase in capital and of the concomitant calculation of the capitalist
that the mass of profits pocketed by him will be greater at a smaller
rate of profit. This entire conception (with the exception of Adam
Smith's, which we shall mention later) [K. Marx, _Theorien über den
Mehrwert._ K. Marx/F. Engels, _Werke,_ Band 26, Teil 2, S. 214-28. —
_Ed_.] rests on an utter misapprehension of what the general rate of
profit is, and on the crude notion that prices are actually determined
by adding a more or less arbitrary quota of profit to the true value of
commodities. Crude as these ideas are, they arise necessarily out of the
inverted aspect which the immanent laws of capitalist production
represent in competition.

The law that a fall in the rate of profit due to the development of
productiveness is accompanied by an increase in the mass of profit, also
expresses itself in the fact that a fall in the price of commodities
produced by a capital is accompanied by a relative increase of the
masses of profit contained in them and realised by their sale.

Since the development of the productiveness and the correspondingly
higher composition of capital sets in motion an ever-increasing quantity
of means of production through a constantly decreasing quantity of
labour, every aliquot part of the total product, _i.e._, every single
commodity, or each particular lot of commodities in the total mass of
products, absorbs less living labour, and also contains less
materialised labour, both in the depreciation of the fixed capital
applied and in the raw and auxiliary materials consumed. Hence every
single commodity contains a smaller sum of labour materialised in means
of production and of labour newly added during production. This causes
the price of the individual commodity to fall. But the mass of profits
contained in the individual commodities may nevertheless increase if the
rate of the absolute or relative surplus-value grows. The commodity
contains less newly added labour, but its unpaid portion grows in
relation to its paid portion. However, this is the case only within
certain limits. With the absolute amount of living labour newly
incorporated in individual commodities decreasing enormously as
production develops, the absolute mass of unpaid labour contained in
them will likewise decrease, however much it may have grown as compared
to the paid portion. The mass of profit on each individual commodity
will shrink considerably with the development of the productiveness of
labour, in spite of a growth in the rate of surplus-value. And this
reduction, just as the fall in the rate of profit, is only delayed by
the cheapening of the elements of constant capital and by the other
circumstances set forth in the first part of this book, which increase
the rate of profit at a given, or even falling, rate of surplus-value.

That the price of individual commodities whose sum makes up the total
product of capital falls, means simply that a certain quantity of labour
is realised in a larger quantity of commodities, so that each individual
commodity contains less labour than before. This is the case even if the
price of one part of constant capital, such as raw material, etc.,
should rise. Outside of a few cases (for instance, if the productiveness
of labour uniformly cheapens all elements of the constant, and the
variable, capital), the rate of profit will fall, in spite of the higher
rate of surplus-value, 1) because even a larger unpaid portion of the
smaller total amount of newly added labour is smaller than a smaller
aliquot unpaid portion of the former larger amount and 2) because the
higher composition of capital is expressed in the individual commodity
by the fact that the portion of its value in which newly added labour is
materialised decreases in relation to the portion of its value which
represents raw and auxiliary material, and the wear and tear of fixed
capital. This change in the proportion of the various component parts in
the price of individual commodities, _i.e._, the decrease of that
portion of the price in which newly added living labour is materialised,
and the increase of that portion of it in which formerly materialised
labour is represented, is the form which expresses the decrease of the
variable in relation to the constant capital through the price of the
individual commodities. Just as this decrease is absolute for a certain
amount of capital, say of 100, it is also absolute for every individual
commodity as an aliquot part of the reproduced capital. However, the
rate of profit, if calculated merely on the elements of the price of an
individual commodity, would be different from what it actually is. And
for the following reason:

[The rate of profit is calculated on the total capital invested, but for
a definite time, actually a year. The rate of profit is the ratio of the
surplus-value, or profit, produced and realised in a year, to the total
capital calculated in per cent. It is, therefore, not necessarily equal
to a rate of profit calculated for the period of turnover of the
invested capital rather than for a year. It is only if the capital is
turned over exactly in one year that the two coincide.

On the other hand, the profit made in the course of a year is merely the
sum of profits on commodities produced and sold during that same year.
Now, if we calculate the profit on the cost-price of commodities, we
obtain a rate of profit = p/k in which p stands for the profit realised
during one year, and k for the sum of the cost-prices of commodities
produced and sold within the same period. It is evident that this rate
of profit p/k will not coincide with the actual rate of profit p/C, mass
of profit divided by total capital, unless k = C, that is, unless the
capital is turned over in exactly one year.

Let us take three different conditions of an industrial capital.

I. A capital of £8,000 produces and sells annually 5,000 pieces of a
commodity at 30s. per piece, thus making an annual turnover of £7,500.
It makes a profit of 10s. on each piece, or £2,500 per year. Every
piece, then, contains 20s. advanced capital and 10s. profit, so that the
rate of profit per piece is 10/20 = 50%. The turned-over sum of £7,500
contains £5,000 advanced capital and £2,500 profit. Rate of profit per
turnover, p/k, likewise 50%. But calculated on the total capital the
rate of profit p/C = 2,500/8,000 = 31¼%

II. The capital rises to £10,000. Owing to increased productivity of
labour it is able to produce annually 10,000 pieces of the commodity at
a cost-price of 20s. per piece. Suppose the commodity is sold at a
profit of 4s., hence at 24s. per piece. In that case the price of the
annual product = £12,000, of which £10,000 is advanced capital and
£2,000 is profit. The rate of profit p/k = 4/20 per piece, and
2,000/10,000 for the annual turnover, or in both cases = 20%. And since
the total capital is equal to the sum of the cost-prices, namely
£10,000, it follows that p/C, the actual rate of profit, is in this case
also 20%.

III. Let the capital rise to £15,000 owing to a constant growth of the
productiveness of labour, and let it annually produce 30,000 pieces of
the commodity at a cost-price of 13s. per piece, each piece being sold
at a profit of 2s., or at 15s. The annual turnover therefore =
30,000×15s. = £22,500, of which £19,500 is advanced capital and £3,000
profit. The rate of profit p/k then = 2/13 = 3,000/19,500 = 15 5/13%.
But p/C = 3,000/15,000 = 20%.

We see, therefore, that only in case II, where the turned-over
capital-value is equal to the total capital, the rate of profit per
piece, or per total amount of turnover, is the same as the rate of
profit calculated on the total capital. In case I, in which the amount
of the turnover is smaller than the total capital, the rate of profit
calculated on the cost-price of the commodity is higher; and in case
III, in which the total capital is smaller than the amount of the
turnover, it is lower than the actual rate calculated on the total
capital. This is a general rule.

In commercial practice, the turnover is generally calculated
inaccurately. It is assumed that the capital has been turned over once
as soon as the sum of the realised commodity-prices equals the sum of
the invested total capital. But the _capital_ can complete one whole
turnover only when the sum of the _cost-prices_ of the realised
commodities equals the sum of the total capital. — _F.E._]

This again shows how important it is in capitalist production to regard
individual commodities, or the commodity-product of a certain period, as
products of advanced capital and in relation to the total capital which
produces them, rather than in isolation, by themselves, as mere
commodities.

The _rate_ of profit must be calculated by measuring the mass of
produced and realised surplus-value not only in relation to the consumed
portion of capital reappearing in the commodities, but also to this part
plus that portion of unconsumed but applied capital which continues to
operate in production. However, the _mass_ of profit cannot be equal to
anything but the mass of profit or surplus-value, contained in the
commodities themselves, and to be realised by their sale.

If the productivity of industry increases, the price of individual
commodities falls. There is less labour in them, less paid and unpaid
labour. Suppose, the same labour produces, say, triple its former
product. Then ⅔ less labour yields individual product. And since profit
can make up but a portion of the amount of labour contained in an
individual commodity, the mass of profit in the individual commodity
must decrease, and this takes place within certain limits, even if the
rate of surplus-value should rise. In any case, the mass of profit on
the total product does not fall below the original mass of profit so
long as the capital employs the same number of labourers at the same
degree of exploitation. (This may also occur if fewer labourers are
employed at a higher rate of exploitation.) For the mass of profit on
the individual product decreases proportionately to the increase in the
number of products. The mass of profit remains the same, but it is
distributed differently over the total amount of commodities. Nor does
this alter the distribution between the labourers and capitalists of the
amount of value created by newly added labour. The mass of profit cannot
increase so long as the same amount of labour is employed, unless the
unpaid surplus-labour increases, or, should intensity of exploitation
remain the same, unless the number of labourers grows. Or, both these
causes may combine to produce this result. In all these cases — which,
however, in accordance with our assumption, presuppose an increase of
constant capital as compared to variable, and an increase in the
magnitude of total capital — the individual commodity contains a smaller
mass of profit and the rate of profit falls even if calculated on the
individual commodity. A given quantity of newly added labour
materialises in a larger quantity of commodities. The price of the
individual commodity falls. Considered abstractly the rate of profit may
remain the same, even though the price of the individual commodity may
fall as a result of greater productiveness of labour and a simultaneous
increase in the number of this cheaper commodity if, for instance, the
increase in productiveness of labour acts uniformly and simultaneously
on all the elements of the commodity, so that its total price falls in
the same proportion in which the productivity of labour increases,
while, on the other hand, the mutual relation of the different elements
of the price of the commodity remains the same. The rate of profit could
even rise if a rise in the rate of surplus-value were accompanied by a
substantial reduction in the value of the elements of constant, and
particularly of fixed, capital.

But in reality, as we have seen, the rate of profit will fall in the
long run. In no case does a fall in the price of any individual
commodity by itself give a clue to the rate of profit. Everything
depends on the magnitude of the total capital invested in its
production. For instance, if the price of one yard of fabric falls from
3s. to 1⅔s., if we know that before this price reduction it contained
1⅔s. constant capital, yarn, etc., ⅔s. wages, and ⅔s. profit, while
after the reduction it contains 1s. constant capital, $#8531s. wages,
and ⅓s. profit, we cannot tell if the rate of profit has remained the
same or not. This depends on whether, and by how much, the advanced
total capital has increased, and how many yards more it produces in a
given time.

The phenomenon, springing from the nature of the capitalist mode of
production, that increasing productivity of labour implies a drop in the
price of the individual commodity, or of a certain mass of commodities,
an increase in the number of commodities, a reduction in the mass of
profit on the individual commodity and in the rate of profit on the
aggregate of commodities, and an increase in the mass of profit on the
total quantity of commodities — this phenomenon appears on the surface
only in a reduction of the mass of profit on the individual commodity, a
fall in its price, an increase in the mass of profit on the augmented
total number of commodities produced by the total social capital or an
individual capitalist. It then appears as if the capitalist adds less
profit to the price of the individual commodity of his own free will,
and makes up for it through the greater number of commodities he
produces. This conception rests upon the notion of profit upon
alienation, which, in its turn, is deduced from the conception of
merchant capital.

We have previously seen in Book I (4 and 7 Abschnitt) [English edition:
Parts IV and VII. — _Ed_.] that the mass of commodities growing along
with the productivity of labour and the cheapening of the individual
commodity as such (as long as these commodities do not enter the price
of labour-power as determinants) — that this does not affect the
proportion between paid and unpaid labour in the individual commodity,
in spite of the falling price.

Since all things appear distorted, namely, reversed in competition, the
individual capitalist may imagine: 1) that he is reducing his profit on
the individual commodity by cutting its price, but still making a
greater profit by selling a larger quantity of commodities; 2) that he
fixes the price of the individual commodities and that he determines the
price of the total product by multiplication, while the original process
is really one of division (see Book I, Kap. X, S. 281 [English edition:
Ch. XII. — _Ed_]), and multiplication is only correct secondarily, since
it is based on that division. The vulgar economist does practically no
more than translate the singular concepts of the capitalists, who are in
the thrall of competition, into a seemingly more theoretical and
generalised language, and attempt to substantiate the justice of those
conceptions.

The fall in commodity-prices and the rise in the mass of profit on the
augmented mass of these cheapened commodities is, in fact, but another
expression for the law of the falling rate of profit attended by a
simultaneously increasing mass of profit.

The analysis of how far a falling rate of profit may coincide with
rising prices no more belongs here than that of the point previously
discussed in Book I (S. 280-81 [English edition: Ch. XII. — _Ed._]),
concerning relative surplus-value. A capitalist working with improved
but not as yet generally adopted methods of production sells below the
market-price, but above his individual price of production; his rate of
profit rises until competition levels it out. During this equalisation
period the second requisite, expansion of the invested capital, makes
its appearance. According to the degree of this expansion the capitalist
will be able to employ a part of his former labourers, actually perhaps
all of them, or even more, under the new conditions, and hence to
produce the same, or a greater, mass of profit.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. "We should also expect that, however the rate of the profits of stock
might diminish in consequence of the accumulation of capital on the land
and the rise of wages, yet the aggregate amount of profits would
increase. Thus, supposing that, with repeated accumulations of £100,000,
the rate of profit should fall from 20 to 19, to 48, to 17%, a
constantly diminishing rate, we should expect that the whole amount of
profits received by those successive owners of capital would be always
progressive; that it would be greater when the capital was £200,000,
than when £100,000; still greater when £300,000; and so on, increasing,
though at a diminishing rate, with every increase of capital. This
progression, however, is only true for a certain time; thus 19% on
£200,000 is more than 20% on £100,000; again 18% on £300,000 is more
than 19% on £200,000; but after capital has accumulated to a large
amount, and profits have fallen, the further accumulation diminishes the
aggregate of profits. Thus, suppose the accumulation should be
£1,000,000, and the profits 7%, the whole amount of profits will be
£70,000; now if an addition of £100,000 capital be made to the million,
and profits should fall to 6%, £66,000 or a diminution of £4,000 will be
received by the owners of the stock, although the whole amount of stock
will be increased from £1,000,000 to £1,100,000." — Ricardo, _Political
Economy,_ Chap. VI (_Works,_ ed. by MacCulloch, 1852, pp. 68-69). — The
fact is, that the assumption has here been made that the capital
increases from 1,000,000 to 1,100,000, that is, by 10%, while the rate
of profit falls from 7 to 6, hence by 14 2/7 %. _Hinc illae lacrimae!_
['Thus these tears' - Publius, Terence, _Andria,_ Act I, Scene 1. —
_Ed_.]

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 14. Counteracting Influences

 

If we consider the enormous development of the productive forces of
social labour in the last 30 years alone as compared with all preceding
periods; if we consider, in particular, the enormous mass of fixed
capital, aside from the actual machinery, which goes into the process of
social production as a whole, then the difficulty which has hitherto
troubled the economist, namely to explain the falling rate of profit,
gives place to its opposite, namely to explain why this fall is not
greater and more rapid. There must be some counteracting influences at
work, which cross and annul the effect of the general law, and which
give it merely the characteristic of a tendency, for which reason we
have referred to the fall of the general rate of profit as a tendency to
fall.

The following are the most general counterbalancing forces:

I. INCREASING INTENSITY OF EXPLOITATION

The degree of exploitation of labour, the appropriation of
surplus-labour and surplus-value, is raised notably by lengthening the
working-day and intensifying labour. These two points have been
comprehensively treated in Book I as incidental to the production of
absolute and relative surplus-value. There are many ways of intensifying
labour which imply an increase of constant, as compared to variable,
capital, and hence a fall in the rate of profit, such as compelling a
labourer to operate a larger number of machines. In such cases — and in
most procedures serving the production of relative surplus-values — the
same causes which increase the rate of surplus-value, may also, from the
standpoint of given quantities of invested total capital, involve a fall
in the mass of surplus-value. But there are other aspects of
intensification, such as the greater velocities of machinery, which
consume more raw material in the same time, but, so far as the fixed
capital is concerned, wear out the machinery so much faster, and yet do
not in any way affect the relation of its value to the price of the
labour which sets it in motion. But notably, it is prolongation of the
working-day, this invention of modern industry, which increases the mass
of appropriated surplus-labour without essentially altering the
proportion of the employed labour-power to the constant capital set in
motion by it, and which rather tends to reduce this capital relatively.
Moreover, it has already been demonstrated — and this constitutes the
real secret of the tendency of the rate of profit to fall — that the
manipulations to produce relative surplus-value amount, on the whole, to
transforming as much as possible of a certain quantity of labour into
surplus-value, on the one hand, and employing as little labour as
possible in proportion to the invested capital, on the other, so that
the same reasons which permit raising the intensity of exploitation rule
out exploiting the same quantity of labour as before by the same
capital. These are the counteracting tendencies, which, while effecting
a rise in the rate of surplus-value, also tend to decrease the mass of
surplus-value, and hence the rate of profit produced by a certain
capital. Mention should also be made here of the widespread introduction
of female and child labour, in so far as the whole family must now
perform more surplus-labour for capital than before, even when the total
amount of their wages increases, which is by no means always the case. —
Everything that promotes the production of relative surplus-value by
mere improvement in methods, as in agriculture, without altering the
magnitude of the invested capital, has the same effect. The constant
capital, it is true, does not, in such cases, increase in relation to
the variable, inasmuch as we regard the variable capital as an index of
the amount of labour-power employed, but the mass of the product does
increase in proportion to the labour-power employed. The same occurs, if
the productiveness of labour (no matter, whether its product goes into
the labourer's consumption or into the elements of constant capital) is
freed from hindrances in communications, from arbitrary or other
restrictions which have become obstacles in the course of time; from
fetters of all kinds, without directly affecting the ratio of variable
to constant capital.

It might be asked whether the factors that check the fall of the rate of
profit, but that always hasten its fall in the last analysis, whether
these include the temporary, but always recurring, elevations in
surplus-value above the general level, which keep occurring now in this
and now in that line of production redounding to the benefit of those
individual capitalists, who make use of inventions, etc., before these
are introduced elsewhere. This question must be answered in the
affirmative.

The mass of surplus-value produced by a capital of a given magnitude is
the product of two factors — the rate of surplus-value multiplied by the
number of labourers employed at this rate. At a given rate of
surplus-value it therefore depends on the number of labourers, and it
depends on the rate of surplus-value when the number of labourers is
given. Generally, therefore, it depends on the composite ratio of the
absolute magnitudes of the variable capital and the rate of
surplus-value. Now we have seen that, on the average, the same factors
which raise the rate of relative surplus-value lower the mass of the
employed labour-power. It is evident, however, that this will occur to a
greater or lesser extent, depending on the definite proportion in which
this conflicting movement obtains, and that the tendency towards a
reduction in the rate of profit is notably weakened by a rise in the
rate of absolute surplus-value, which originates with the lengthening of
the working-day.

We saw in the case of the rate of profit that a drop in the rate was
generally accompanied by an increase in the mass of profit, due to the
increasing mass of total capital employed. From the standpoint of the
total variable capital of society, the surplus-value it has produced is
equal to the profit it has produced. Both the absolute mass and the rate
of surplus-value have increased; the one because the quantity of
labour-power employed by society has grown, and the other, because the
intensity of exploitation of this labour-power has increased. But in the
case of a capital of a given magnitude, _e.g._, 100, the rate of
surplus-value may increase, while the average mass may decrease; for the
rate is determined by the proportion, in which the variable capital
produces value, while the mass is determined by the proportion of
variable capital to the total capital.

The rise in the rate of surplus-value is a factor which determines the
mass of surplus-value, and hence also the rate of profit, for it takes
place especially under conditions, in which, as we have previously seen,
the constant capital is either not increased at all, or not
proportionately increased, in relation to the variable capital. This
factor does not abolish the general law. But it causes that law to act
rather as a tendency, _i.e._, as a law whose absolute action is checked,
retarded, and weakened, by counteracting circumstances. But since the
same influences which raise the rate of surplus-value (even a
lengthening of the working-time is a result of large-scale industry)
tend to decrease the labour-power employed by a certain capital, it
follows that they also tend to reduce the rate of profit and to retard
this reduction. If one labourer is compelled to perform as much labour
as would rationally be performed by at least two, and if this is done
under circumstances in which this one labourer can replace three, then
this one labourer will perform as much surplus-labour as was formerly
performed by two, and the rate of surplus-value will have risen
accordingly. But he will not perform as much as three had performed, and
the mass of surplus-value will have decreased accordingly. But this
reduction in mass will be compensated, or limited, by the rise in the
rate of surplus-value. If the entire population is employed at a higher
rate of surplus-value, the mass of surplus-value will increase, in spite
of the population remaining the same. It will increase still more if the
population increases. And although this is tied up with a relative
reduction of the number of employed labourers in proportion to the
magnitude of the total capital, this reduction is moderated, or checked,
by the rise in the rate of surplus-value.

Before leaving this point, it is to be emphasised once more that with a
capital of a given magnitude the _rate_ of surplus-value may rise, while
its _mass_ is decreasing, and vice versa. The mass of surplus-value is
equal to the rate multiplied by the number of labourers; however, the
rate is never calculated on the total, but only on the variable capital,
actually only for every working-day. On the other hand, with a given
magnitude of capital-value, the _rate of profit_ can neither rise nor
fall without the _mass of surplus-value_ also rising or falling.

II. DEPRESSION OF WAGES BELOW THE VALUE OF LABOUR-POWER

This is mentioned here only empirically, since, like many other things
which might be enumerated, it has nothing to do with the general
analysis of capital, but belongs in an analysis of competition, which is
not presented in this work. However, it is one of the most important
factors checking the tendency of the rate of profit to fall.

III. CHEAPENING OF ELEMENTS OF CONSTANT CAPITAL

Everything said in Part I of this book about factors which raise the
rate of profit while the rate of surplus-value remains the same, or
regardless of the rate of surplus-value, belongs here. Hence also, with
respect to the total capital, that the value of the constant capital
does not increase in the same proportion as its material volume. For
instance, the quantity of cotton worked up by a single European spinner
in a modern factory has grown tremendously compared to the quantity
formerly worked up by a European spinner with a spinning-wheel. Yet the
value of the worked-up cotton has not grown in the same proportion as
its mass. The same applies to machinery and other fixed capital. In
short, the same development which increases the mass of the constant
capital in relation to the variable reduces the value of its elements as
a result of the increased productivity of labour, and therefore prevents
the value of constant capital, although it continually increases, from
increasing at the same rate as its material volume, _i.e._, the material
volume of the means of production set in motion by the same amount of
labour-power. In isolated cases the mass of the elements of constant
capital may even increase, while its value remains the same, or falls.

The foregoing is bound up with the depreciation of existing capital
(that is, of its material elements), which occurs with the development
of industry. This is another continually operating factor which checks
the fall of the rate of profit, although it may under certain
circumstances encroach on the mass of profit by reducing the mass of the
capital yielding a profit. This again shows that the same influences
which tend to make the rate of profit fall, also moderate the effects of
this tendency.

IV. RELATIVE OVER-POPULATION

Its propagation is inseparable from, and hastened by, the development of
the productivity of labour as expressed by a fall in the rate of profit.
The relative over-population becomes so much more apparent in a country,
the more the capitalist mode of production is developed in it. This,
again, is the reason why, on the one hand, the more or less imperfect
subordination of labour to capital continues in many branches of
production, and continues longer than seems at first glance compatible
with the general stage of development. This is due to the cheapness and
abundance of disposable or unemployed wage-labourers, and to the greater
resistance, which some branches of production, by their very nature,
render to the transformation of manual work into machine production. On
the other hand, new lines of production are opened up, especially for
the production of luxuries, and it is these that take as their basis
this relative over-population, often set free in other lines of
production through the increase of their constant capital. These new
lines start out predominantly with living labour, and by degrees pass
through the same evolution as the other lines of production. In either
case the variable capital makes up a considerable portion of the total
capital and wages are below the average, so that both the rate and mass
of surplus-value in these lines of production are unusually high. Since
the general rate of profit is formed by levelling the rates of profit in
the individual branches of production, however, the same factor which
brings about the tendency in the rate of profit to fall, again produces
a counterbalance to this tendency and more or less paralyses its
effects.

V. FOREIGN TRADE

Since foreign trade partly cheapens the elements of constant capital,
and partly the necessities of life for which the variable capital is
exchanged, it tends to raise the rate of profit by increasing the rate
of surplus-value and lowering the value of constant capital. It
generally acts in this direction by permitting an expansion of the scale
of production. It thereby hastens the process of accumulation, on the
one hand, but causes the variable capital to shrink in relation to the
constant capital, on the other, and thus hastens a fall in the rate of
profit. In the same way, the expansion of foreign trade, although the
basis of the capitalist mode of production in its infancy, has become
its own product, however, with the further progress of the capitalist
mode of production, through the innate necessity of this mode of
production, its need for an ever-expanding market. Here we see once more
the dual nature of this effect. (Ricardo has entirely overlooked this
side of foreign trade. [D. Ricardo, _On the Principles of Political
Economy, and Taxation, Third edition, London, 1824, Ch. VII. — Ed.])_

Another question — really beyond the scope of our analysis because of
its special nature — is this: Is the general rate of profit raised by
the higher rate of profit produced by capital invested in foreign, and
particularly colonial, trade?

Capitals invested in foreign trade can yield a higher rate of profit,
because, in the first place, there is competition with commodities
produced in other countries with inferior production facilities, so that
the more advanced country sells its goods above their value even though
cheaper than the competing countries. In so far as the labour of the
more advanced country is here realised as labour of a higher specific
weight, the rate of profit rises, because labour which has not been paid
as being of a higher quality is sold as such. The same may obtain in
relation to the country, to which commodities are exported and to that
from which commodities are imported; namely, the latter may offer more
materialised labour _in kind_ than it receives, and yet thereby receive
commodities cheaper than it could produce them. Just as a manufacturer
who employs a new invention before it becomes generally used, undersells
his competitors and yet sells his commodity above its individual value,
that is, realises the specifically higher productiveness of the labour
he employs as surplus-labour. He thus secures a surplus-profit. As
concerns capitals invested in colonies, etc., on the other hand, they
may yield higher rates of profit for the simple reason that the rate of
profit is higher there due to backward development, and likewise the
exploitation of labour, because of the use of slaves, coolies, etc. Why
should not these higher rates of profit, realised by capitals invested
in certain lines and sent home by them, enter into the equalisation of
the general rate of profit and thus tend, _pro tanto_, to raise it,
unless it is the monopolies that stand in the way. ^([1]) There is so
much less reason for it, since these spheres of investment of capital
are subject to the laws of free competition. What Ricardo fancies is
mainly this: with the higher prices realised abroad commodities are
bought there in return and sent home. These commodities are thus sold on
the home market, which fact can at best be but a temporary extra
disadvantage of these favoured spheres of production over others. This
illusion falls away as soon as it is divested of its money-form. The
favoured country recovers more labour in exchange for less labour,
although this difference, this excess is pocketed, as in any exchange
between labour and capital, by a certain class. Since the rate of profit
is higher, therefore, because it is generally higher in a colonial
country, it may, provided natural conditions are favourable, go hand in
hand with low commodity-prices. A levelling takes place but not a
levelling to the old level, as Ricardo feels.

This same foreign trade develops the capitalist mode of production in
the home country, which implies the decrease of variable capital in
relation to constant, and, on the other hand, causes over-production in
respect to foreign markets, so that in the long run it again has an
opposite effect.

We have thus seen in a general way that the same influences which
produce a tendency in the general rate of profit to fall, also call
forth counter-effects, which hamper, retard, and partly paralyse this
fall. The latter do not do away with the law, but impair its effect.
Otherwise, it would not be the fall of the general rate of profit, but
rather its relative slowness, that would be incomprehensible. Thus, the
law acts only as a tendency. And it is only under certain circumstances
and only after long periods that its effects become strikingly
pronounced.

Before we go on, in order to avoid misunderstandings, we should recall
two, repeatedly treated, points.

_First_: The same process which brings about a cheapening of commodities
in the course of the development of the capitalist mode of production,
causes a change in the organic composition of the social capital
invested in the production of commodities, and consequently lowers the
rate of profit. We must be careful, therefore, not to identify the
reduction in the relative cost of an individual commodity, including
that portion of it which represents wear and tear of machinery, with the
rise in the value of the constant in relation to variable capital,
although, conversely, every reduction in the relative cost of the
constant capital assuming the volume of its material elements remains
the same, or increases, tends to raise the rate of profit, _i.e._, to
reduce _pro tanto_ the value of the constant capital in relation to the
shrinking proportions of the employed variable capital.

_Second_: The fact that the newly added living labour contained in the
individual commodities, which taken together make up the product of
capital, decreases in relation to the materials they contain and the
means of labour consumed by them; the fact, therefore, that an
ever-decreasing quantity of additional living labour is materialised in
them, because their production requires less labour with the development
of the social productiveness — this fact does not affect the ratio, in
which the living labour contained in the commodities breaks up into paid
and unpaid labour. Quite the contrary. Although the total quantity of
additional living labour contained in the commodities decreases, the
unpaid portion increases in relation to the paid portion, either by an
absolute or a relative shrinking of the paid portion; for the same mode
of production which reduces the total quantity of additional living
labour in a commodity is accompanied by a rise in the absolute and
relative surplus-value. The tendency of the rate of profit to fall is
bound up with a tendency of the rate of surplus-value to rise, hence
with a tendency for the rate of labour exploitation to rise. Nothing is
more absurd, for this reason, than to explain the fall in the rate of
profit by a rise in the rate of wages, although this may be the case by
way of an exception. Statistics is not able to make actual analyses of
the rates of wages in different epochs and countries, until the
conditions which shape the rate of profit are thoroughly understood. The
rate of profit does not fall because labour becomes less productive, but
because it becomes more productive. Both the rise in the rate of
surplus-value and the fall in the rate of profit are but specific forms
through which growing productivity of labour is expressed under
capitalism.

VI. THE INCREASE OF STOCK CAPITAL

The foregoing five points may still be supplemented by the following,
which, however, cannot be more fully treated for the present. With the
progress of capitalist production, which goes hand in hand with
accelerated accumulation, a portion of capital is calculated and applied
only as interest-bearing capital. Not in the sense in which every
capitalist who lends out capital is satisfied with interest, while the
industrial capitalist pockets the investor's profit. This has no bearing
on the level of the general rate of profit, because for the latter
profit = interest + profit of all kinds + ground rent, the division into
these particular categories being immaterial to it. But in the sense
that these capitals, although invested in large productive enterprises,
yield only large or small amounts of interest, so-called dividends,
after all costs have been deducted. In railways, for instance. These do
not therefore go into levelling the general rate of profit, because they
yield a lower than average rate of profit. If they did enter into it,
the general rate of profit would fall much lower. Theoretically, they
may be included in the calculation, and the result would then be a lower
rate of profit than the seemingly existing rate, which is decisive for
the capitalists; it would be lower, because the constant capital
particularly in these enterprises is largest in its relation to the
variable capital.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. Adam Smith was right in this respect, contrary to Ricardo, who said:
"They contend that the equality of profits will be brought about by the
general rise of profits; and I am of the opinion that the profits of the
favoured trade will speedily submit to the general level." (_Work_s:,
ed. by MacCulloch, p. 73.)

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 15. Exposition of the Internal Contradictions of the Law

 

I. General

We have seen in the first part of this book that the rate of profit
expresses the rate of surplus-value always lower than it actually is. We
have just seen that even a rising rate of surplus-value has a tendency
to express itself in a falling rate of profit. The rate of profit would
equal the rate of surplus-value only if c = 0, _i.e._ , if the total
capital were paid out in wages. A falling rate of profit does not
express a falling rate of surplus-value, unless the proportion of the
value of the constant capital to the quantity of labour-power which sets
it in motion remains unchanged or the amount of labour-power increases
in relation to the value of the constant capital.

On the plea of analysing the rate of profit, Ricardo actually analyses
the rate of surplus-value alone, and this only on the assumption that
the working-day is intensively and extensively a constant magnitude.

A fall in the rate of profit and accelerated accumulation are different
expressions of the same process only in so far as both reflect the
development of productiveness. Accumulation, in turn, hastens the fall
of the rate of profit, inasmuch as it implies concentration of labour on
a large scale, and thus a higher composition of capital. On the other
hand, a fall in the rate of profit again hastens the concentration of
capital and its centralisation through expropriation of minor
capitalists, the few direct producers who still have anything left to be
expropriated. This accelerates accumulation with regard to mass,
although the rate of accumulation falls with the rate of profit.

On the other hand, the rate of self-expansion of the total capital, or
the rate of profit, being the goad of capitalist production (just as
self-expansion of capital is its only purpose), its fall checks the
formation of new independent capitals and thus appears as a threat to
the development of the capitalist production process. It breeds
over-production, speculation, crises, and surplus-capital alongside
surplus-population. Those economists, therefore, who, like Ricardo,
regard the capitalist mode of production as absolute, feel at this point
that it creates a barrier itself, and for this reason attribute the
barrier to Nature (in the theory of rent), not to production. But the
main thing about their horror of the falling rate of profit is the
feeling that capitalist production meets in the development of its
productive forces a barrier which has nothing to do with the production
of wealth as such; and this peculiar barrier testifies to the
limitations and to the merely historical, transitory character of the
capitalist mode of production; testifies that for the production of
wealth, it is not an absolute mode, moreover, that at a certain stage it
rather conflicts with its further development.

True, Ricardo and his school considered only industrial profit, which
includes interest. But the rate of ground-rent likewise has a tendency
to fall, although its absolute mass increases, and may also increase
proportionately more than industrial profit. (E. West, [_Essay on the
Application of Capital to Land,_ London, 1815_. — Ed_] who developed the
law of ground-rent _before_ Ricardo.) If we consider the total social
capital C, and use p₁ for the industrial profit that remains after
deducting interest and ground-rent, i for interest, and r for
ground-rent, then s/C = p/C = p₁ + i + r/C = p₁/C + i/C + r/C. We have
seen that while s, the total amount of surplus-value, is continually
increasing in the course of capitalist development, s/C is just as
steadily declining, because C grows still more rapidly than s. Therefore
it is by no means a contradiction for p₁, i, and r to be steadily
increasing, each individually, while s/C = p/C, as well as p₁/C, i/C,
and r/C, should each by itself be steadily shrinking, or that p₁ should
increase in relation to i, or r in relation to p₁ or to p₁ and i. With a
rising total surplus-value or profit s = p, and a simultaneously falling
rate of profit s/C = p/C, the proportions of the parts p₁, i, and r,
which make up s = p, may change at will within the limits set by the
total amount of s without thereby affecting the magnitude of s or s/C.

The mutual variation of p₁, i, and r is merely a varying distribution of
s among different classes. Consequently, p₁/C, i/C, or r/C, the rate of
individual industrial profit, the rate of interest, and the ratio of
ground-rent to the total capital, may rise in relation to one another,
while s/C, the general rate of profit, falls. The only condition is that
the sum of all three = s/C. If the rate of profit falls from 50% to 25%,
because the composition of a certain capital with, say, a rate of
surplus-value = 100% has changed from 50_(c) + 50_(v) to 75_(c) +
25_(v), then a capital of 1,000 will yield a profit of 500 in the first
case, and in the second a Capital of 4,000 will yield a profit of 1,000.
We see that s or p have doubled, while p' has fallen by one-half. And if
that 50% was formerly divided into 20 profit, 10 interest, and 20 rent,
then p₁/C = 20%, i/C = 10%, and r/C = 20%. If the proportions had
remained the same after the change from 50% to 25%, then p₁/C = 10%, i/C
= 5%, and r/C = 10%. If, however, p₁/C should fall to 8% and i/C to 4%,
then r/C would rise to 13%. The relative magnitude of r would have risen
as against p₁ and i, while p would have remained the same. Under both
assumptions, the sum of p₁, i, and r would have increased, because
produced by a capital four times as large. Furthermore, Ricardo's
assumption that originally industrial profit (plus interest) contains
the entire surplus-value is historically and logically false. It is
rather the progress of capitalist production which 1) gives the whole
profit directly to the industrial and commercial capitalists for further
distribution, and 2) reduces rent to the excess over the profit. On this
capitalist basis, again, the rent grows, being a portion of profit
(_i.e._ , of the surplus-value viewed as the product of the total
capital), but not that specific portion of the product, which the
capitalist pockets.

Given the necessary means of production, _i.e._ , a sufficient
accumulation of capital, the creation of surplus-value is only limited
by the labouring population if the rate of surplus-value, _i.e._ , the
intensity of exploitation, is given; and no other limit but the
intensity of exploitation if the labouring population is given. And the
capitalist process of production consists essentially of the production
of surplus-value, represented in the surplus-product or that aliquot
portion of the produced commodities materialising unpaid labour. It must
never be forgotten that the production of this surplus-value — and the
reconversion of a portion of it into capital, or the accumulation, forms
an integrate part of this production of surplus-value — is the immediate
purpose and compelling motive of capitalist production. It will never
do, therefore, to represent capitalist production as something which it
is not, namely as production whose immediate purpose is enjoyment or the
manufacture of the means of enjoyment for the capitalist. This would be
overlooking its specific character, which is revealed in all its inner
essence.

The creation of this surplus-value makes up the direct process of
production, which, as we have said, has no other limits but those
mentioned above. As soon as all the surplus-labour it was possible to
squeeze out has been embodied in commodities, surplus-value has been
produced. But this production of surplus-value completes but the first
act of the capitalist process of production — the direct production
process. Capital has absorbed so and so much unpaid labour. With the
development of the process, which expresses itself in a drop in the rate
of profit, the mass of surplus-value thus produced swells to immense
dimensions. Now comes the second act of the process. The entire mass of
commodities, _i.e._ , the total product, including the portion which
replaces the constant and variable capital, and that representing
surplus-value, must be sold. If this is not done, or done only in part,
or only at prices below the prices of production, the labourer has been
indeed exploited, but his exploitation is not realised as such for the
capitalist, and this can be bound up with a total or partial failure to
realise the surplus-value pressed out of him, indeed even with the
partial or total loss of the capital. The conditions of direct
exploitation, and those of realising it, are not identical. They diverge
not only in place and time, but also logically. The first are only
limited by the productive power of society, the latter by the
proportional relation of the various branches of production and the
consumer power of society. But this last-named is not determined either
by the absolute productive power, or by the absolute consumer power, but
by the consumer power based on antagonistic conditions of distribution,
which reduce the consumption of the bulk of society to a minimum varying
within more or less narrow limits. It is furthermore restricted by the
tendency to accumulate, the drive to expand capital and produce
surplus-value on an extended scale. This is law for capitalist
production, imposed by incessant revolutions in the methods of
production themselves, by the depreciation of existing capital always
bound up with them, by the general competitive struggle and the need to
improve production and expand its scale merely as a means of
self-preservation and under penalty of ruin. The market must, therefore,
be continually extended, so that its interrelations and the conditions
regulating them assume more and more the form of a natural law working
independently of the producer, and become ever more uncontrollable. This
internal contradiction seeks to resolve itself through expansion of the
outlying field of production. But the more productiveness develops, the
more it finds itself at variance with the narrow basis on which the
conditions of consumption rest. It is no contradiction at all on this
self-contradictory basis that there should be an excess of capital
simultaneously with a growing surplus of population. For while a
combination of these two would, indeed, increase the mass of produced
surplus-value, it would at the same time intensify the contradiction
between the conditions under which this surplus-value is produced and
those under which it is realised.

If a certain rate of profit is given, the mass of profit will always
depend on the magnitude of the advanced capital. The accumulation,
however, is then determined by that portion of this mass which is
reconverted into capital. As for this portion, being equal to the profit
minus the revenue consumed by the capitalists, it will depend not merely
on the value of this mass, but also on the cheapness of the commodities
which the capitalist can buy with it, commodities which pass partly into
his consumption, his revenue, and partly into his constant capital.
(Wages are here assumed to be given.)

The mass of capital set in motion by the labourer, whose value he
preserves by his labour and reproduces in his product, is quite
different from the value which he adds to it. If the mass of the capital
= 1,000 and the added labour = 100, the reproduced capital = 1,100. If
the mass = 100 and the added labour = 20, the reproduced capital = 120.
In the first case the rate of profit = 10%, in the second = 20%. And yet
more can be accumulated out of 100 than out of 20. And thus the river of
capital rolls on (aside from its depreciation through increase of the
productiveness), or its accumulation does, not in proportion to the rate
of profit, but in proportion to the impetus it already possesses. So far
as it is based on a high rate of surplus-value, a high rate of profit is
possible when the working-day is very long, although labour is not
highly productive. It is possible, because the wants of the labourers
are very small, hence average wages very low, although the labour itself
is unproductive. The low wages will correspond to the labourers' lack of
energy. Capital then accumulates slowly, in spite of the high rate of
profit. Population is stagnant and the working-time which the product
costs, is great, while the wages paid to the labourer etare small.

The rate of profit does not sink because the labourer is exploited any
less, but because generally less labour is employed in proportion to the
employed capital.

If, as shown, a falling rate of profit is bound up with an increase in
the mass of profit, a larger portion of the annual product of labour is
appropriated by the capitalist under the category of capital (as a
replacement for consumed capital) and a relatively smaller portion under
the category of profit. Hence the fantastic idea of priest Chalmers,
[Th. Chalmers, _On Political Economy in Connexion with the Moral State
and Moral Prospects of Society,_ Second edition, Glasgow, 1832, p. _88.
— Ed_] that the less of the annual product is expended by capitalists as
capital, the greater the profits they pocket. In which case the state
church comes to their assistance, to care for the consumption of the
greater part of the surplus-product, rather than having it used as
capital. The preacher confounds cause with effect. Furthermore, the mass
of profit increases in spite of its slower rate with the growth of the
invested capital. However, this requires a simultaneous concentration of
capital, since the conditions of production then demand employment of
capital on a larger scale. It also requires its centralisation, _i.e._ ,
the swallowing up of the small capitalists by the big and their
deprivation of capital. It is again but an instance of separating —
raised to the second power — the conditions of production from the
producers to whose number these small capitalists still belong, since
their own labour continues to play a role in their case. The labour of a
capitalist stands altogether in inverse proportion to the size of his
capital, _i.e._ , to the degree in which he is a capitalist. It is this
same severance of the conditions of production, on the one hand, from
the producers, on the other, that forms the conception of capital. It
begins with primitive accumulation (Buch I, Kap. XXIV [English edition:
Part _VIII. — Ed._]), appears as a permanent process in the accumulation
and concentration of capital, and expresses itself finally as
centralisation of existing capitals in a few hands and a deprivation of
many of their capital (to which expropriation is now changed). This
process would soon bring about the collapse of capitalist production if
it were not for counteracting tendencies, which have a continuous
decentralising effect alongside the centripetal one.

II. Conflict Between Expansion Of Production And Production Of Surplus-Value

The development of the social productiveness of labour is manifested in
two ways: first, in the magnitude of the already produced productive
forces, the value and mass of the conditions of production under which
new production is carried on, and in the absolute magnitude of the
already accumulated productive capital; secondly, in the relative
smallness of the portion of total capital laid out in wages, _i.e._ , in
the relatively small quantity of living labour required for the
reproduction and self-expansion of a given capital, for mass production.
This also implies concentration of capital.

In relation to employed labour-power the development of the productivity
again reveals itself in two ways: First, in the increase of
surplus-labour, _i.e._ , the reduction of the necessary labour-time
required for the reproduction of labour-power. Secondly, in the decrease
of the quantity of labour-power (the number of labourers) generally
employed to set in motion a given capital.

The two movements not only go hand in hand, but mutually influence one
another and are phenomena in which the same law expresses itself. Yet
they affect the rate of profit in opposite ways. The total mass of
profit is equal to the total mass of surplus-value, the rate of profit =
s/C = surplus-value/advanced total capital. The surplus-value, however,
as a total, is determined first by its rate, and second by the mass of
labour simultaneously employed at this rate, or, what amounts to the
same, by the magnitude of the variable capital. One of these factors,
the rate of surplus-value, rises, and the other, the number of
labourers, falls (relatively or absolutely). Inasmuch as the development
of the productive forces reduces the paid portion of employed labour, it
raises the surplus-value, because it raises its rate; but inasmuch as it
reduces the total mass of labour employed by a given capital, it reduces
the factor of the number by which the rate of surplus-value is
multiplied to obtain its mass. Two labourers, each working 12 hours
daily, cannot produce the same mass of surplus-value as 24 who work only
2 hours, even if they could live on air and hence did not have to work
for themselves at all. In this respect, then, the compensation of the
reduced number of labourers by intensifying the degree of exploitation
has certain insurmountable limits. It may, for this reason, well check
the fall in the rate of profit, but cannot prevent it altogether.

With the development of the capitalist mode of production, therefore,
the rate of profit falls, while its mass increases with the growing mass
of the capital employed. Given the rate, the absolute increase in the
mass of capital depends on its existing magnitude. But, on the other
hand, if this magnitude is given, the proportion of its growth, _i.e._ ,
the rate of its increment, depends on the rate of profit. The increase
in the productiveness (which, moreover, we repeat, always goes hand in
hand with a depreciation of the available capital) can directly only
increase the value of the existing capital if by raising the rate of
profit it increases that portion of the value of the annual product
which is reconverted into capital. As concerns the productivity of
labour, this can only occur (since this productivity has nothing direct
to do with the _value_ of the existing capital) by raising the relative
surplus-value, or reducing the value of the constant capital, so that
the commodities which enter either the reproduction of labour-power, or
the elements of constant capital, are cheapened. Both imply a
depreciation of the existing capital, and both go hand in hand with a
reduction of the variable capital in relation to the constant. Both
cause a fall in the rate of profit, and both slow it down. Furthermore,
inasmuch as an increased rate of profit causes a greater demand for
labour, it tends to increase the working population and thus the
material, whose exploitation makes real capital out of capital.

Indirectly, however, the development of the productivity of labour
contributes to the increase of the value of the existing capital by
increasing the mass and variety of use-values in which the same
exchange-value is represented and which form the material substance,
_i.e._ , the material elements of capital, the material objects making
up the constant capital directly, and the variable capital at least
indirectly. More products which may be converted into capital, whatever
their exchange-value, are created with the same capital and the same
labour. These products may serve to absorb additional labour, hence also
additional surplus-labour, and therefore create additional capital. The
amount of labour which a capital can command does not depend on its
value, but on the mass of raw and auxiliary materials, machinery and
elements of fixed capital and necessities of life, all of which it
comprises, whatever their value may be. As the mass of the labour
employed, and thus of surplus-labour increases, there is also a growth
in the value of the reproduced capital and in the surplus-value newly
added to it.

These two elements embraced by the process of accumulation, however, are
not to be regarded merely as existing side by side in repose, as Ricardo
does. They contain a contradiction which manifests itself in
contradictory tendencies and phenomena. These antagonistic agencies
counteract each other simultaneously.

Alongside the stimulants of an actual increase of the labouring
population, which spring from the increase of the portion of the total
social product serving as capital, there are agencies which create a
merely relative over-population.

Alongside the fall in the rate of profit mass of capitals grows, and
hand in hand with this there occurs a depreciation of existing capitals
which checks the fall and gives an accelerating motion to the
accumulation of capital-values.

Alongside the development of productivity there develops a higher
composition of capital, _i.e._, the relative decrease of the ratio of
variable to constant capital.

These different influences may at one time operate predominantly side by
side in space, and at another succeed each other in time. From time to
time the conflict of antagonistic agencies finds vent in crises. The
crises are always but momentary and forcible solutions of the existing
contradictions. They are violent eruptions which for a time restore the
disturbed equilibrium.

The contradiction, to put it in a very general way, consists in that the
capitalist mode of production involves a tendency towards absolute
development of the productive forces, regardless of the value and
surplus-value it contains, and regardless of the social conditions under
which capitalist production takes place; while, on the other hand, its
aim is to preserve the value of the existing capital and promote its
self-expansion to the highest limit (_i.e._, to promote an ever more
rapid growth of this value). The specific feature about it is that it
uses the existing value of capital as a means of increasing this value
to the utmost. The methods by which it accomplishes this include the
fall of the rate of profit, depreciation of existing capital, and
development of the productive forces of labour at the expense of already
created productive forces.

The periodical depreciation of existing capital — one of the means
immanent in capitalist production to check the fall of the rate of
profit and hasten accumulation of capital-value through formation of new
capital — disturbs the given conditions, within which the process of
circulation and reproduction of capital takes place, and is therefore
accompanied by sudden stoppages and crises in the production process.

The decrease of variable in relation to constant capital, which goes
hand in hand with the development of the productive forces, stimulates
the growth of the labouring population, while continually creating an
artificial over-population. The accumulation of capital in terms of
value is slowed down by the falling rate of profit, to hasten still more
the accumulation of use-values, while this, in its turn, adds new
momentum to accumulation in terms of value.

Capitalist production seeks continually to overcome these immanent
barriers, but overcomes them only by means which again place these
barriers in its way and on a more formidable scale.

The _real barrier_ of capitalist production is _capital itself_. It is
that capital and its self-expansion appear as the starting and the
closing point, the motive and the purpose of production; that production
is only production for _capital_ and not vice versa, the means of
production are not mere means for a constant expansion of the living
process of the _society_ of producers. The limits within which the
preservation and self-expansion of the value of capital resting on the
expropriation and pauperisation of the great mass of producers can alone
move — these limits come continually into conflict with the methods of
production employed by capital for its purposes, which drive towards
unlimited extension of production, towards production as an end in
itself, towards unconditional development of the social productivity of
labour. The means — unconditional development of the productive forces
of society — comes continually into conflict with the limited purpose,
the self-expansion of the existing capital. The capitalist mode of
production is, for this reason, a historical means of developing the
material forces of production and creating an appropriate world-market
and is, at the same time, a continual conflict between this its
historical task and its own corresponding relations of social
production.

III. Excess Capital And Excess Population

A drop in the rate of profit is attended by a rise in the minimum
capital required by an individual capitalist for the productive
employment of labour; required both for its exploitation generally, and
for making the consumed labour-time suffice as the labour-time necessary
for the production of the commodities, so that it does not exceed the
average social labour-time required for the production of the
commodities. Concentration increases simultaneously, because beyond
certain limits a large capital with a small rate of profit accumulates
faster than a small capital with a large rate of profit. At a certain
high point this increasing concentration in its turn causes a new fall
in the rate of profit. The mass of small dispersed capitals is thereby
driven along the adventurous road of speculation, credit frauds, stock
swindles, and crises. The so-called plethora of capital always applies
essentially to a plethora of the capital for which the fall in the rate
of profit is not compensated through the mass of profit — this is always
true of newly developing fresh offshoots of capital — or to a plethora
which places capitals incapable of action on their own at the disposal
of the managers of large enterprises in the form of credit. This
plethora of capital arises from the same causes as those which call
forth relative over-population, and is, therefore, a phenomenon
supplementing the latter, although they stand at opposite poles —
unemployed capital at one pole, and unemployed worker population at the
other.

Over-production of capital, not of individual commodities — although
over-production of capital always includes over-production of
commodities — is therefore simply over-accumulation of capital. To
appreciate what this over-accumulation is (its closer analysis follows
later), one need only assume it to be absolute. When would
over-production of capital be absolute? Overproduction which would
affect not just one or another, or a few important spheres of
production, but would be absolute in its full scope, hence would extend
to all fields of production?

There would be absolute over-production of capital as soon as additional
capital for purposes of capitalist production = 0. The purpose of
capitalist production, however, is self-expansion of capital, _i.e._,
appropriation of surplus-labour, production of surplus-value, of profit.
As soon as capital would, therefore, have grown in such a ratio to the
labouring population that neither the absolute working-time supplied by
this population, nor the relative surplus working-time, could be
expanded any further (this last would not be feasible at any rate in the
case when the demand for labour were so strong that there were a
tendency for wages to rise); at a point, therefore, when the increased
capital produced just as much, or even less, surplus-value than it did
before its increase, there would be absolute over-production of capital;
_i.e._, the increased capital C + ΔC would produce no more, or even
less, profit than capital C before its expansion by ΔC. In both cases
there would be a steep and sudden fall in the general rate of profit,
but this time due to a change in the composition of capital not caused
by the development of the productive forces, but rather by a rise in the
money-value of the variable capital (because of increased wages) and the
corresponding reduction in the proportion of surplus-labour to necessary
labour.

In reality, it would appear that a portion of the capital would lie
completely or partially idle (because it would have to crowd out some of
the active capital before it could expand its own value), and the other
portion would produce values at a lower rate of profit, owing to the
pressure of unemployed or but partly employed capital. It would be
immaterial in this respect if a part of the additional capital were to
take the place of the old capital, and the latter were to take its
position in the additional capital. We should still always have the old
sum of capital on one side, and the sum of additional capital on the
other. The fall in the rate of profit would then be accompanied by an
absolute decrease in the mass of profit, since the mass of employed
labour-power could not be increased and the rate of surplus-value raised
under the conditions we had assumed, so that the mass of surplus-value
could not be increased either. And the reduced mass of profit would have
to be calculated on an increased total capital. But even if it is
assumed that the employed capital continues to self-expand at the old
rate of profit, and the mass of profit hence remains the same, this mass
would still he calculated on an increased total capital, this likewise
implying a fall in the rate of profit. If a total capital of 1,000
yielded a profit of 100, and after being increased to 1,500 still
yielded 100, then, in the second case, 1,000 would yield only 66⅔.
Self-expansion of the old capital, in the absolute sense, would have
been reduced. The capital = 1,000 would yield no more under the new
circumstances than formerly a capital = 666⅔.

It is evident, however, that this actual depreciation of the old capital
could not occur without a struggle, and that the additional capital ΔC
could not assume the functions of capital without a struggle. The rate
of profit would not fall under the effect of competition due to
over-production of capital. It would rather be the reverse; it would be
the competitive struggle which would begin because the fallen rate of
profit and over-production of capital originate from the same
conditions. The part of ΔC in the hands of old functioning capitalists
would be allowed to remain more or less idle to prevent a depreciation
of their own original capital and not to narrow its place in the field
of production. Or they would employ it, even at a momentary loss, to
shift the need of keeping additional capital idle on newcomers and on
their competitors in general.

That portion of ΔC which is in new hands would seek to assume a place
for itself at the expense of the old capital, and would accomplish this
in part by forcing a portion of the old capital to lie idle. It would
compel the old capital to give up its old place and withdraw to join
completely or partially unemployed additional capital.

A portion of the old capital has to lie unused under all circumstances;
it has to give up its characteristic quality as capital, so far as
acting as such and producing value is concerned. The competitive
struggle would decide what part of it would be particularly affected. So
long as things go well, competition effects an operating fraternity of
the capitalist class, as we have seen in the case of the equalisation of
the general rate of profit, so that each shares in the common loot in
proportion to the size of his respective investment. But as soon as it
no longer is a question of sharing profits, but of sharing losses,
everyone tries to reduce his own share to a minimum and to shove it off
upon another. The class, as such, must inevitably lose. How much the
individual capitalist must bear of the loss, _i.e._, to what extent he
must share in it at all, is decided by strength and cunning, and
competition then becomes a fight among hostile brothers. The antagonism
between each individual capitalist's interests and those of the
capitalist class as a whole, then comes to the surface, just as
previously the identity of these interests operated in practice through
competition.

How is this conflict settled and the conditions restored which
correspond to the "sound" operation of capitalist production? The mode
of settlement is already indicated in the very emergence of the conflict
whose settlement is under discussion. It implies the withdrawal and even
the partial destruction of capital amounting to the full value of
additional capital ΔC, or at least a part of it. Although, as the
description of this conflict shows, the loss is by no means equally
distributed among individual capitals, its distribution being rather
decided through a competitive struggle in which the loss is distributed
in very different proportions and forms, depending on special advantages
or previously captured positions, so that one capital is left unused,
another is destroyed, and a third suffers but a relative loss, or is
just temporarily depreciated, etc.

But the equilibrium would be restored under all circumstances through
the withdrawal or even the destruction of more or less capital. This
would extend partly to the material substance of capital, _i.e._, a part
of the means of production, of fixed and circulating capital, would not
operate, not act as capital; some of the operating establishments would
then be brought to a standstill. Although, in this respect, time attacks
and worsens all means of production (except land), the stoppage would in
reality cause far greater damage to the means of production. However,
the main effect in this case would be that these means of production
would cease to function as such, that their function as means of
production would be disturbed for a shorter or longer period.

The main damage, and that of the most acute nature, would occur in
respect to capital, and in so far as the latter possesses the
characteristic of value it would occur in respect to the _values_ of
capitals. That portion of the value of a capital which exists only in
the form of claims on prospective shares of surplus-value, _i.e._,
profit, in fact in the form of promissory notes on production in various
forms, is immediately depreciated by the reduction of the receipts on
which it is calculated. A part of the gold and silver lies unused,
_i.e._, does not function as capital. Part of the commodities on the
market can complete their process of circulation and reproduction only
through an immense contraction of their prices, hence through a
depreciation of the capital which they represent. The elements of fixed
capital are depreciated to a greater or lesser degree in just the same
way. It must be added that definite, presupposed, price relations govern
the process of reproduction, so that the latter is halted and thrown
into confusion by a general drop in prices. This confusion and
stagnation paralyses the function of money as a medium of payment, whose
development is geared to the development of capital and is based on
those presupposed price relations. The chain of payment obligations due
at specific dates is broken in a hundred places. The confusion is
augmented by the attendant collapse of the credit system, which develops
simultaneously with capital, and leads to violent and acute crises, to
sudden and forcible depreciations, to the actual stagnation and
disruption of the process of reproduction, and thus to a real falling
off in reproduction.

But there would have been still other agencies at work at the same time.
The stagnation of production would have laid off a part of the
working-class and would thereby have placed the employed part in a
situation, where it would have to submit to a reduction of wages even
below the average. This has the very same effect on capital as an
increase of the relative or absolute surplus-value at average wages
would have had. Prosperity would have led to more marriages among
labourers and reduced the decimation of offspring. While implying a real
increase in population, this does not signify an increase in the actual
working population. But it affects the relations of the labourer to
capital in the same way as an increase of the number of actually working
labourers would have affected them. On the other hand, the fall in
prices and the competitive struggle would have driven every capitalist
to lower the individual value of his total product below its general
value by means of new machines, new and improved working methods, new
combinations, _i.e._, to increase the productivity of a given quantity
of labour, to lower the proportion of variable to constant capital, and
thereby to release some labourers; in short, to create an artificial
over-population. Ultimately, the depreciation of the elements of
constant capital would itself tend to raise the rate of profit. The mass
of employed constant capital would have increased in relation to
variable, but its value could have fallen. The ensuing stagnation of
production would have prepared — within capitalistic limits — a
subsequent expansion of production.

And thus the cycle would run its course anew. Part of the capital,
depreciated by its functional stagnation, would recover its old value.
For the rest, the same vicious circle would be described once more under
expanded conditions of production, with an expanded market and increased
productive forces.

However, even under the extreme conditions assumed by us this absolute
over-production of capital is not absolute over-production, not absolute
over-production of means of production. It is over-production of means
of production only in so far as the latter serve _as capital,_ and
consequently include a self-expansion of value, must produce an
additional value in proportion to the increased mass.

Yet it would still be over-production, because capital would be unable
to exploit labour to the degree required by a "sound", "normal"
development of the process of capitalist production, to a degree which
would at least increase the mass of profit along with the growing mass
of the employed capital; to a degree which would, therefore, prevent the
rate of profit from falling as much as the capital grows, or even more
rapidly.

Over-production of capital is never anything more than over-production
of means of production — of means of labour and necessities of life —
which may serve as capital, _i.e._, may serve to exploit labour at a
given degree of exploitation; a fall in the intensity of exploitation
below a certain point, however, calls forth disturbances, and stoppages
in the capitalist production process, crises, and destruction of
capital. It is no contradiction that this over-production of capital is
accompanied by more or less considerable relative over-population. The
circumstances which increased the productiveness of labour, augmented
the mass of produced commodities, expanded markets, accelerated
accumulation of capital both in terms of its mass and its value, and
lowered the rate of profit — these same circumstances have also created,
and continuously create, a relative overpopulation, an over-population
of labourers not employed by the surplus-capital owing to the low degree
of exploitation at which alone they could be employed, or at least owing
to the low rate of profit which they would yield at the given degree of
exploitation.

If capital is sent abroad, this is not done because it absolutely could
not be applied at home, but because it can be employed at a higher rate
of profit in a foreign country. But such capital is absolute excess
capital for the employed labouring population and for the home country
in general. It exists as such alongside the relative over-population,
and this is an illustration of how both of them exist side by side, and
mutually influence one another.

On the other hand, a fall in the rate of profit connected with
accumulation necessarily calls forth a competitive struggle.
Compensation of a fall in the rate of profit by a rise in the mass of
profit applies only to the total social capital and to the big, firmly
placed capitalists. The new additional capital operating independently
does not enjoy any such compensating conditions. It must still win them,
and so it is that a fall in the rate of profit calls forth a competitive
struggle among capitalists, not vice versa. To be sure, the competitive
struggle is accompanied by a temporary rise in wages and a resultant
further temporary fall of the rate of profit. The same occurs when there
is an over-production of commodities, when markets are overstocked.
Since the aim of capital is not to minister to certain wants, but to
produce profit, and since it accomplishes this purpose by methods which
adapt the mass of production to the scale of production, not vice versa,
a rift must continually ensue between the limited dimensions of
consumption under capitalism and a production which forever tends to
exceed this immanent barrier. Furthermore, capital consists of
commodities, and therefore over-production of capital implies
over-production of commodities. Hence the peculiar phenomenon of
economists who deny over-production of commodities, admitting
over-production of capital. To say that there is no general
over-production, but rather a disproportion within the various branches
of production, is no more than to say that under capitalist production
the proportionality of the individual branches of production springs as
a continual process from disproportionality, because the cohesion of the
aggregate production imposes itself as a blind law upon the agents of
production, and not as a law which, being understood and hence
controlled by their common mind, brings the productive process under
their joint control. It amounts furthermore to demanding that countries
in which capitalist production is not developed, should consume and
produce at a rate which suits the countries with capitalist production.
If it is said that over-production is only relative, this is quite
correct; but the entire capitalist mode of production is only a relative
one, whose barriers are not absolute. They are absolute only for this
mode, _i.e._, on its basis. How could there otherwise be a shortage of
demand for the very commodities which the mass of the people lack, and
how would it be possible for this demand to be sought abroad, in foreign
markets, to pay the labourers at home the average amount of necessities
of life? This is possible only because in this specific capitalist
interrelation the surplus-product assumes a form in which its owner
cannot offer it for consumption, unless it first reconverts itself into
capital for him. If it is finally said that the capitalists have only to
exchange and consume their commodities among themselves, then the entire
nature of the capitalist mode of production is lost sight of; and also
forgotten is the fact that it is a matter of expanding the value of the
capital, not consuming it. In short, all these objections to the obvious
phenomena of over-production (phenomena which pay no heed to these
objections) amount to the contention that the barriers of _capitalist_
production are not barriers of _production generally,_ and therefore not
barriers of this specific, capitalist mode of production. The
contradiction of the capitalist mode of production, however, lies
precisely in its tendency towards an absolute development of the
productive forces, which continually come into conflict with the
specific _conditions_ of production in which capital moves, and alone
can move.

There are not too many necessities of life produced, in proportion to
the existing population. Quite the reverse. Too little is produced to
decently and humanely satisfy the wants of the great mass.

There are not too many means of production produced to employ the
able-bodied portion of the population. Quite the reverse. In the first
place, too large a portion of the produced population is not really
capable of working, and is through force of circumstances made dependent
on exploiting the labour of others, or on labour which can pass under
this name only under a miserable mode of production. In the second
place, not enough means of production are produced to permit the
employment of the entire able-bodied population under the most
productive conditions, so that their absolute working period could be
shortened by the mass and effectiveness of the constant capital employed
during working-hours.

On the other hand, too many means of labour and necessities of life are
produced at times to permit of their serving as means for the
exploitation of labourers at a certain rate of profit. Too many
commodities are produced to permit of a realisation and conversion into
new capital of the value and surplus-value contained in them under the
conditions of distribution and consumption peculiar to capitalist
production, _i.e._, too many to permit of the consummation of this
process without constantly recurring explosions.

Not too much wealth is produced. But at times too much wealth is
produced in its capitalistic, self-contradictory forms.

The limitations of the capitalist mode of production come to the
surface:

1) In that the development of the productivity of labour creates out of
the falling rate of profit a law which at a certain point comes into
antagonistic conflict with this development and must be overcome
constantly through crises.

2) In that the expansion or contraction of production are determined by
the appropriation of unpaid labour and the proportion of this unpaid
labour to materialised labour in general, or, to speak the language of
the capitalists, by profit and the proportion of this profit to the
employed capital, thus by a definite rate of profit, rather than the
relation of production to social requirements, _i.e._, to the
requirements of' socially developed human beings. It is for this reason
that the capitalist mode of production meets with barriers at a certain
expanded stage of production which, if viewed from the other premise,
would reversely have been altogether inadequate. It comes to a
standstill at a point fixed by the production and realisation of profit,
and not the satisfaction of requirements.

If the rate of profit falls, there follows, on the one hand, an exertion
of capital in order that the individual capitalists, through improved
methods, etc., may depress the value of their individual commodity below
the social average value and thereby realise an extra profit at the
prevailing market-price. On the other hand, there appears swindling and
a general promotion of swindling by recourse to frenzied ventures with
new methods of production, new investments of capital, new adventures,
all for the sake of securing a shred of extra profit which is
independent of the general average and rises above it.

The rate of profit, _i.e._, the relative increment of capital, is above
all important to all new offshoots of capital seeking to find an
independent place for themselves. And as soon as formation of capital
were to fall into the hands of a few established big capitals, for which
the mass of profit compensates for the falling rate of profit, the vital
flame of production would be altogether extinguished. It would die out.
The rate of profit is the motive power of capitalist production. Things
are produced only so long as they can be produced with a profit. Hence
the concern of the English economists over the decline of the rate of
profit. The fact that the bare possibility of this happening should
worry Ricardo, shows his profound understanding of the conditions of
capitalist production. It is that which is held against him, it is his
unconcern about "human beings," and his having an eye solely for the
development of the productive forces, whatever the cost in human beings
and capital-_values_ — it is precisely that which is the important thing
about him. Development of the productive forces of social labour is the
historical task and justification of capital. This is just the way in
which it unconsciously creates the material requirements of a higher
mode of production. What worries Ricardo is the fact that the rate of
profit, the stimulating principle of capitalist production, the
fundamental premise and driving force of accumulation, should be
endangered by the development of production itself. And here the
quantitative proportion means everything. There is, indeed, something
deeper behind it, of which he is only vaguely aware. It comes to the
surface here in a purely economic way — _i.e._, from the bourgeois point
of view, within the limitations of capitalist understanding, from the
standpoint of capitalist production itself — that it has its barrier,
that it is relative, that it is not an absolute, but only a historical
mode of production corresponding to a definite limited epoch in the
development of the material requirements of production.

IV. Supplementary Remarks

Since the development of the productivity of labour proceeds very
disproportionately in the various lines of industry, and not only
disproportionately in degree but frequently also in opposite directions,
it follows that the mass of average profit (= surplus-value) must be
substantially below the level one would naturally expect after the
development of the productiveness in the most advanced branches of
industry. The fact that the development of the productivity in different
lines of industry proceeds at substantially different rates and
frequently even in opposite directions, is not due merely to the anarchy
of competition and the peculiarity of the bourgeois mode of production.
Productivity of labour is also bound up with natural conditions, which
frequently become less productive as productivity grows — inasmuch as
the latter depends on social conditions. Hence the opposite movements in
these different spheres — progress here, and retrogression there.
Consider the mere influence of the seasons, for instance, on which the
bulk of raw materials depends for its mass, the exhaustion of forest
lands, coal and iron mines, etc.

While the circulating part of constant capital, such as raw materials,
etc., continually increases its mass in proportion to the productivity
of labour, this is not the case with fixed capital, such as buildings,
machinery, and lighting and heating facilities, etc. Although in
absolute terms a machine becomes dearer with the growth of its bodily
mass, it becomes relatively cheaper. If five labourers produce ten times
as much of a commodity as before, this does not increase the outlay for
fixed capital ten-fold; although the value of this part of constant
capital increases with the development of the productiveness, it does
not by any means increase in the same proportion. We have frequently
pointed out the difference in the ratio of constant to variable capital
as expressed in the fall of the rate of profit, and the difference in
the same ratio as expressed in relation to the individual commodity and
its price with the development of the productivity of labour.

[The value of a commodity is determined by the total labour-time of past
and living labour incorporated in it. The increase in labour
productivity consists precisely in that the share of living labour is
reduced while that of past labour is increased, but in such a way that
the total quantity of labour incorporated in that commodity declines; in
such a way, therefore, that living labour decreases more than past
labour increases. The past labour contained in the value of a commodity
— the constant part of capital — consists partly of the wear and tear of
fixed, partly of circulating, constant capital entirely consumed by that
commodity, such as raw and auxiliary materials. The portion of value
deriving from raw and auxiliary materials must decrease with the
increased productivity of labour, because with regard to these materials
the productivity expresses itself precisely by reducing their value. On
the other hand, it is most characteristic of rising labour productivity
that the fixed part of constant capital is strongly augmented, and with
it that portion of its value which is transferred by wear and tear to
the commodities. For a new method of production to represent a real
increase in productivity, it must transfer a smaller additional portion
of the value of fixed capital to each unit of the commodity in wear and
tear than the portion of value deducted from it through the saving in
living labour; in short, it must reduce the value of the commodity. It
must obviously do so even if, as it occurs in some cases, an additional
value goes into the value of the commodity for more or dearer raw or
auxiliary materials over and above the additional portion for wear and
tear of the fixed capital. All additions to the value must be more than
offset by the reduction in value resulting from the decrease in living
labour.

This reduction of the total quantity of labour going into a commodity
seems, accordingly, to be the essential criterion of increased
productivity of labour, no matter under what social conditions
production is carried on. Productivity of labour, indeed, would always
be measured by this standard in a society, in which producers regulate
their production according to a preconceived plan, or even under simple
commodity-production. But how does the matter stand under capitalist
production?

Suppose, a certain line of capitalist industry produces a normal unit of
its commodity under the following conditions: The wear and tear of fixed
capital amounts to ½ shilling per piece; raw and auxiliary materials go
into it to the amount of 17½ shillings per piece; wages, 2 shillings;
and surplus-value, 2 shillings at a rate of surplus-value of 100%. Total
value = 22 shillings. We assume for the sake of simplicity that the
capital in this line of production has the average composition of social
capital, so that the price of production of the commodity is identical
with its value, and the profit of the capitalist with the created
surplus-value. Then the cost-price of the commodity = ½ + 17½ + 2 =
20s., the average rate of profit 2/20 = 10%, and the price of production
per piece of the commodity, like its value = 22s.

Suppose a machine is invented which reduces by half the living labour
required per piece of the commodity, but trebles that portion of its
value accounted for by the wear and tear of the fixed capital. In that
case, the calculation is: Wear and tear = 1½ s., raw and auxiliary
materials, as before, 17½s., wages, 1s., surplus-value 1s., total 21s.
The commodity then falls 1s. in value; the new machine has certainly
increased the productivity of labour. But the capitalist sees the matter
as follows: his cost-price is now 1½s. for wear, 17½s. for raw and
auxiliary materials, 1s. for wages, total 20s., as before. Since the
rate of profit is not immediately altered by the new machine, he will
receive 10% over his cost-price, that is, 2s. The price of production,
then, remains unaltered = 22s., but is 1s. above the value. For a
society producing under capitalist conditions the commodity has not
cheapened. The new machine is _no_ improvement for it. The capitalist
is, therefore, not interested in introducing it. And since its
introduction would make his present, not as yet worn-out, machinery
simply worthless, would turn it into scrap-iron, hence would cause a
positive loss, he takes good care not to commit this, what is for him a
utopian, mistake.

The law of increased productivity of labour is not, therefore,
absolutely valid for capital. So far as capital is concerned,
productiveness does not increase through a saving in living labour in
general, but only through a saving in the _paid_ portion of living
labour, as compared to labour expended in the past, as we have already
indicated in passing in Book I (Kap. XI II, 2, 5. 409/398). [English
edition: Ch. XV, 2_. — Ed._] Here the capitalist mode of production is
beset with another contradiction. Its historical mission is
unconstrained development in geometrical progression of the productivity
of human labour. It goes back on its mission whenever, as here, it
checks the development of productivity. It thus demonstrates again that
it is becoming senile and that it is more and more outlived.] ^([1])

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Under competition, the increasing minimum of capital required with the
increase in productivity for the successful operation of an independent
industrial establishment, assumes the following aspect: As soon as the
new, more expensive equipment has become universally established,
smaller capitals are henceforth excluded from this industry. Smaller
capitals can carry on independently in the various spheres of industry
only in the infancy of mechanical inventions. Very large undertakings,
such as railways, on the other hand, which have an unusually high
proportion of constant capital, do not yield the average rate of profit,
but only a portion of it, only an interest. Otherwise the general rate
of profit would have fallen still lower. But this offers direct
employment to large concentrations of capital in the form of stocks.

Growth of capital, hence accumulation of capital, does not imply a fall
in the rate of profit, unless it is accompanied by the aforementioned
changes in the proportion of the organic constituents of capital. Now it
so happens that in spite of the constant daily revolutions in the mode
of production, now this and now that larger or smaller portion of the
total capital continues to accumulate for certain periods on the basis
of a given average proportion of those constituents, so that there is no
organic change with its growth, and consequently no cause for a fall in
the rate of profit. This constant expansion of capital, hence also an
expansion of production, on the basis of the old method of production
which goes quietly on while new methods are already being introduced at
its side, is another reason, why the rate of profit does not decline as
much as the total capital of society grows.

The increase in the absolute number of labourers does not occur in all
branches of production, and not uniformly in all, in spite of the
relative decrease of variable capital laid out in wages. In agriculture,
the decrease of the element of living labour may be absolute.

At any rate, it is but a requirement of the capitalist mode of
production that the number of wage-workers should increase absolutely,
in spite of its relative decrease. Labour-power becomes redundant for it
as soon as it is no longer necessary to employ it for 12 to 15 hours
daily. A development of productive forces which would diminish the
absolute number of labourers, _i.e._, enable the entire nation to
accomplish its total production in a shorter time span, would cause a
revolution, because it would put the bulk of the population out of the
running. This is another manifestation of the specific barrier of
capitalist production, showing also that capitalist production is by no
means an absolute form for the development of the productive forces and
for the creation of wealth, but rather that at a certain point it comes
into collision with this development. This collision appears partly in
periodical crises, which arise from the circumstance that now this and
now that portion of the labouring population becomes redundant under its
old mode of employment. The limit of capitalist production is the excess
time of the labourers. The absolute spare time gained by society does
not concern it. The development of productivity concerns it only in so
far as it increases the surplus labour-time of the working-class, not
because it decreases the labour-time for material production in general.
It moves thus in a contradiction.

We have seen that the growing accumulation of capital implies its
growing concentration. Thus grows the power of capital, the alienation
of the conditions of social production personified in the capitalist
from the real producers. Capital comes more and more to the fore as a
social power, whose agent is the capitalist. This social power no longer
stands in any possible relation to that which the labour of a single
individual can create. It becomes an alienated, independent, social
power, which stands opposed to society as an object, and as an object
that is the capitalist's source of power. The contradiction between the
general social power into which capital develops, on the one hand, and
the private power of the individual capitalists over these social
conditions of production, on the other, becomes ever more
irreconcilable, and yet contains the solution of the problem, because it
implies at the same time the transformation of the conditions of
production into general, common, social, conditions. This transformation
stems from the development of the productive forces under capitalist
production, and from the ways and means by which this development takes
place.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

No capitalist ever voluntarily introduces a new method of production, no
matter how much more productive it may be, and how much it may increase
the rate of surplus-value, so long as it reduces the rate of profit. Yet
every such new method of production cheapens the commodities. Hence, the
capitalist sells them originally above their prices of production, or,
perhaps, above their value. He pockets the difference between their
costs of production and the market-prices of the same commodities
produced at higher costs of production. He can do this, because the
average labour-time required socially for the production of these latter
commodities is higher than the labour-time required for the new methods
of production. His method of production stands above the social average.
But competition makes it general and subject to the general law. There
follows a fall in the rate of profit — perhaps first in this sphere of
production, and eventually it achieves a balance with the rest — which
is, therefore, wholly independent of the will of the capitalist.

It is still to be added to this point, that this same law also governs
those spheres of production, whose product passes neither directly nor
indirectly into the consumption of the labourers, or into the conditions
under which their necessities are produced; it applies, therefore, also
to those spheres of production, in which there is no cheapening of
commodities to increase the relative surplus-value or cheapen
labour-power. (At any rate, a cheapening of constant capital in all
these lines may increase the rate of profit, with the exploitation of
labour remaining the same.) As soon as the new production method begins
to spread, and thereby to furnish tangible proof that these commodities
can actually be produced more cheaply, the capitalists working with the
old methods of production must sell their product below its full price
of production, because the value of this commodity has fallen, and
because the labour-time required by them to produce it is greater than
the social average. In one word — and this appears as an effect of
competition — these capitalists must also introduce the new method of
production, in which the proportion of variable to constant capital has
been reduced.

All the circumstances which lead to the use of machinery cheapening the
price of a commodity produced by it, come down in the last analysis to a
reduction of the quantity of labour absorbed by a single piece of the
commodity; and secondly, to a reduction in the wear-and-tear portion of
the machinery, whose value goes into a single piece of the commodity.
The less rapid the wear of machinery, the more the commodities over
which it is distributed, and the more living labour it replaces before
its term of reproduction arrives. In both cases the quantity and value
of the fixed constant capital increase in relation to the variable.

"All other things being equal, the power of a nation to save from its
profits varies with the rate of profits: is great when they are high,
less, when low; but as the rate of profits declines, all other things do
not remain equal.... A low rate of profits is ordinarily accompanied by
a rapid rate of accumulation, relatively to the numbers of the people,
as in England ... a high rate of profit by a slower rate of
accumulation, relatively to the numbers of the people. Examples: Poland,
Russia, India, etc." (Richard Jones, _An Introductory Lecture on
Political Economy,_ London, 1833, p. 50 ff.)

Jones emphasises correctly that in spite of the falling rate of profit
the inducements and faculties to accumulate are augmented; first, on
account of the growing relative overpopulation; second, because the
growing productivity of labour is accompanied by an increase in the mass
of use-values represented by the same exchange-value, hence in the
material elements of capital; third, because the branches of production
become more varied; fourth, due to the development of the credit system,
the stock companies, etc., and the resultant case of converting money
into capital without becoming an industrial capitalist; fifth, because
the wants and the greed for wealth increase; and, sixth, because the
mass of investments in fixed capital grows, etc.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Three cardinal facts of capitalist production:

1) Concentration of means of production in few hands, whereby they cease
to appear as the property of the immediate labourers and turn into
social production capacities. Even if initially they are the private
property of capitalists. These are the trustees of bourgeois society,
but they pocket all the proceeds of this trusteeship.

2) Organisation of labour itself into social labour: through
co-operation, division of labour, and the uniting of labour with the
natural sciences.

In these two senses, the capitalist mode of production abolishes private
property and private labour, even though in contradictory forms.

3) Creation of the world-market.

The stupendous productivity developing under the capitalist mode of
production relative to population, and the increase, if not in the same
proportion, of capital-values (not just of their material substance),
which grow much more rapidly than the population, contradict the basis,
which constantly narrows in relation to the expanding wealth, and for
which all this immense productiveness works. They also contradict the
conditions under which this swelling capital augments its value. Hence
the crises.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. The foregoing is placed in brackets, because, though a rehash of the
notes of the original manuscript, it goes in some points beyond the
scope of the material found in the original. — _F.E._

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III



PART IV. CONVERSION OF COMMODITY-CAPITAL AND MONEY-CAPITAL INTO COMMERCIAL CAPITAL AND MONEY-DEALING CAPITAL (MERCHANT'S CAPITAL)


 


Chapter 16. Commercial Capital

 

Merchant's, or trading, capital breaks up into two forms or
sub-divisions, namely, commercial capital and money-dealing capital,
which we shall now define more closely, in so far as this is necessary
for our analysis of capital in its basic structure. This is all the more
necessary, because modern political economy, even in the persons of its
best exponents, throws trading capital and industrial capital
indiscriminately together and, in effect, wholly overlooks the
characteristic peculiarities of the former.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The movements of commodity-capital have been analysed in Book II. To
take the total capital of society, one part of it — always made up of
different elements and even changing in magnitude — always exists in the
form of commodities on the market, to be converted into money. Another
part exists on the market in the form of money, to be converted into
commodities. It is always in the process of this transition, of this
formal metamorphosis. Inasmuch as this function of capital in the
process of circulation is at all set apart as a special function of a
special capital, as a function established by virtue of the division of
labour to a special group of capitalists, commodity-capital becomes
commercial capital.

We have explained (Book II, Chapter VI, "The Costs of Circulation,") to
what extent the transport industry, storage and distribution of
commodities in a distributable form, may be regarded as production
processes continuing within the process of circulation. These episodes
incidental to the circulation of commodity-capital are sometimes
confused with the distinct functions of merchant's or commercial
capital. Sometimes they are, indeed, practically bound up with these
distinct, specific functions, although with the development of the
social division of labour the function of merchant's capital evolves in
a pure form, _i.e._, divorced from those real functions, and independent
of them. Those functions are therefore irrelevant to our purpose, which
is to define the specific difference of this special form of capital. In
so far as capital solely employed in the circulation process, special
commercial capital, partly combines those functions with its specific
ones, it does not appear in its pure form. We obtain its pure form after
stripping it of all these incidental functions.

We have seen that the existence of capital as commodity-capital and the
metamorphosis it undergoes within the sphere of circulation in the
market as commodity-capital — a metamorphosis which resolves itself into
buying and selling, converting commodity-capital into money-capital and
money-capital into commodity-capital — that this forms a phase in the
reproduction process of industrial capital, hence in its process of
production as a whole. We have also seen, however, that it is
distinguished in its function as a capital of circulation from its
function as productive capital. These are two different and separate
forms of existence of the same capital. One portion of the total social
capital is continually on the market in the form of capital of
circulation, passing through this process of transmutation, although for
each individual capital its existence as commodity-capital, and its
metamorphosis as such, merely represent ever-vanishing and ever renewed
nodal points — _i.e._, stages of transition in the continuity of its
production process, and although the elements of commodity-capital in
the market vary continuously for this reason, being constantly withdrawn
from the commodity-market and equally periodically returned to it as new
products of the process of production.

Commercial capital is nothing but a transmuted form of a part of this
capital of circulation constantly to be found in the market, ever in the
process of its metamorphosis, and always encompassed by the sphere of
circulation. We say a part, because a part of the selling and buying of
commodities always takes place directly between industrial capitalists.
We leave this part entirely out of consideration in this analysis,
because it contributes nothing to defining the conception, or to
understanding the specific nature of merchant's capital, and because it
has furthermore been exhaustively treated for our purpose in Book II.

The dealer in commodities, as a capitalist generally, appears on the
market primarily as the representative of a certain sum of money, which
be advances as a capitalist, _i.e._, which he wants to turn from x (its
original value) into x + Dx (the original sum plus profit). But it is
evident to him — not being just a capitalist in general, but rather a
special dealer in commodities — that his capital must first enter the
market in the form of money-capital, for he does not produce
commodities. He merely trades in them, expedites their movement, and to
operate with them he must first buy them, and, therefore, must be in
possession of money-capital.

Suppose that a dealer in commodities owns £3,000 which he invests as a
trading capital. With these £3,000 he buys, say, 30,000 yards of linen
from some linen manufacturer at 2s. per yard. He then sells the 30,000
yards. If the annual average rate of profit = 10% and he makes an annual
profit of 10% after deducting all incidental expenses, then by the end
of the year he has converted his £3,000 into £3,300. How he makes this
profit is a question which we shall discuss later. At present, we intend
to consider solely the form of the movements of his capital. With his
£3,000 he keeps buying linen and selling it; he constantly repeats this
operation of buying in order to sell, M — C — M', the simple form of
capital as it obtains entirely in the process of circulation,
uninterrupted by the production process, which lies outside its own
movement and function.

What is now the relation of this commercial capital to commodity-capital
as a mere form of existence of industrial capital? So far as the linen
manufacturer is concerned, he has realised the value of his linen with
the merchant's money and thereby completed the first phase in the
metamorphosis of his commodity-capital — its conversion into money.
Other conditions being equal, he can now proceed to reconvert this money
into yarn, coal, wages, etc., and into means of existence, etc., for the
consumption of his revenue. Hence, leaving aside the revenue
expenditure, he can go on with his process of reproduction.

But while the sale of the linen, its metamorphosis into money, has taken
place for him, as producer, it has not yet taken place for the linen
itself. It is still on the market as commodity-capital awaiting to
undergo its first metamorphosis — to be sold. Nothing has happened to
this linen besides a change in the person of its owner. As concerns its
purpose, as concerns its place in the process, it is still
commodity-capital, a saleable commodity, with the only difference that
it is now in the merchant's hands instead of the manufacturer's. The
function of selling it, of effecting the first phase of its
metamorphosis, has passed from the manufacturer to the merchant, has
become the special business of the merchant, whereas previously it was a
function which the producer had to perform himself after having
completed the function of its production.

Let us assume that the merchant fails to sell the 30,000 yards of linen
during the interval required by the linen manufacturer to bring another
30,000 yards to market at a value of £3,000. The merchant cannot buy
them again, because he still has in stock the unsold 30,000 yards which
have not as yet been reconverted into money-capital. A stoppage ensues,
_i.e._, an interruption of reproduction. The linen producer might, of
course, have additional money-capital at his disposal, which he could
convert into productive capital, regardless of the sale of the 30,000
yards, in order to continue the production process. But this would not
alter the situation. So far as the capital tied up in the 30,000 yards
of linen is concerned, its process of reproduction is, and remains,
interrupted. It is, indeed, easily seen here that the merchant's
operations are really nothing but operations that must be performed at
all events to convert the producer's commodity-capital into money. They
are operations which effect the functions of commodity-capital in the
circulation and reproduction processes. If it devolved upon the
producer's clerk to attend exclusively to the sale, and also the
purchase, instead of an independent merchant, this connection would not
be obscured for a single moment.

Commercial capital is, therefore, nothing but the producer's commodity —
capital which has to undergo the process of conversion into money — to
perform its function of commodity-capital on the market — the only
difference being that instead of representing an incidental function of
the producer, it is now the exclusive operation of a special kind of
capitalist, the merchant, and is set apart as the business of a special
investment of capital.

This becomes evident, furthermore, in the specific form of circulation
of commercial capital The merchant buys a commodity and then sells it: M
— C — M'. In the simple circulation of commodities, or even in the
circulation of commodities as it appears in the circulation process of
industrial capital, C' — M — C, circulation is effected by each piece of
money changing hands twice. The linen manufacturer sells his
commodity-linen, converting it into money; the buyer's money passes into
his hands. With this same money he buys yarn, coal, labour, etc. —
expends the money for reconverting the value of linen into the
commodities which make up its production elements. The commodity he buys
is not the same commodity, not the same kind of commodity which he
sells. He has sold products and bought means of production. But it is
different with respect to the movements of merchant's capital. With his
£3,000 the linen merchant buys 30,000 yards of linen; he sells the same
30,000 yards of linen in order to retrieve his money-capital (£3,000 and
the profit) from circulation. It is not the same pieces of money, but
rather the same commodity which here changes places twice; the commodity
passes from the seller into the hands of the buyer, and from the hands
of the buyer, who now becomes seller, into those of another buyer. It is
sold twice, and may be sold repeatedly through the medium of a series of
merchants. And it is precisely through this repeated sale, through this
two-fold change of place of the same commodity, that the money advanced
for its purchase by the first buyer is retrieved, its reflux to him
effected. In one case, C' — M — C effects the two-fold change of place
of the same money, the sale of a commodity in one form and the purchase
of a commodity in another. In the other case, M — C — M' effects the
two-fold change of place of the same commodity, the withdrawal of
advanced money from circulation. It is evident that the commodity has
not been finally sold when it passes from the producer into the hands of
the merchant, in that the latter merely carries on the operation of
selling — or effects the function of commodity-capital. But at the same
time it is evident that what is C — M, a mere function of his capital in
its transient form of commodity-capital for the productive capitalist,
is M — C — M', a specific increase in the value of his advanced
money-capital, for the merchant. One phase of the metamorphosis of
commodities appears here in respect to the merchant in the form of M — C
— M', hence as evolution of a distinct kind of capital.

The merchant finally sells his commodity, that is, the linen, to the
consumer, be it a productive consumer (for instance, a bleacher), or an
individual who acquires the linen for his private use. The merchant
thereby recovers his advanced capital (with a profit), and can repeat
his operation anew. Had the money served merely as a means of payment in
purchasing the linen, so that the merchant would have had to pay only
after six weeks, and had he succeeded in selling before this term was
out, he could have paid the linen manufacturer without advancing any
money-capital of his own. Had he not sold it, he would have had to
advance his £3,000 on the date of expiration, instead of on delivery of
the linen. And if a drop in the market-prices had compelled him to sell
below the purchase price, he would have had to make good the shortage
out of his own capital.

What is it, then, that lends to commercial capital the character of an
independently operating capital, whereas in the hands of the producer
who does his own selling it is obviously merely a special form of his
capital in a specific phase of the reproduction process during its
sojourn in the sphere of circulation?

_First_: The fact that commodity-capital is finally converted into
money, that it performs its initial metamorphosis, _i.e._, its
appropriate function on the market qua commodity-capital while in the
hands of an agent other than the producer, and that this function of
commodity-capital is effected by the merchant in his operations, his
buying and selling, so that these operations assume the appearance of a
separate undertaking distinct from the other functions of industrial
capital — and hence of an independent undertaking. It is a distinct form
of the social division of labour, so that part of the function
ordinarily performed as a special phase of the reproduction process of
capital, in this case — circulation, appears as the exclusive function
of specific circulation agent distinct from the producer. But this alone
would by no means give this particular business the aspect of a function
of a specific capital distinct from, and independent of, industrial
capital engaged in the process of reproduction; indeed, it does not so
appear in cases where trade is carried on by travelling salesmen or
other direct agents of the industrial capitalist. Therefore, there must
be a second element involved.

_Second_: This arises from the fact that in his capacity as an
independent circulation agent, the merchant advances money-capital (his
own or borrowed). The transaction which for industrial capital in the
reproduction process amounts merely to C — M, _i.e._, converting
commodity-capital into money-capital, or mere sale, assumes for the
merchant the form of M — C — M', or purchase and sale of the same
commodity, and thus of a reflux of money-capital which leaves him in the
purchase, and returns to him in the sale.

It is always C — M, the conversion of commodity-capital into
money-capital, which for the merchant assumes the form of M — C — M,
inasmuch as he advances capital to purchase commodities from their
producers; it is always the first metamorphosis of commodity-capital,
although for a producer, or for industrial capital in process of
reproduction, the same transaction may amount to M — C, to a
reconversion of money into commodities (means of production), to the
second phase of the metamorphosis. For the linen producer, the first
metamorphosis was C — M, the conversion of his commodity-capital into
money-capital. For the merchant the same act appears as M — C, as a
conversion of his money-capital into commodity-capital. Now, if he sells
this linen to a bleacher, it will mean M — C, _i.e._, the conversion of
money capital into productive capital, this being the second
metamorphosis of his commodity-capital for the bleacher, while for the
merchant it means C — M, the sale of the linen he had bought. But in
fact it is only at this point that the commodity-capital produced by the
linen manufacturer has been finally sold. In other words, this M — C — M
of the merchant represents no more than a middleman's function for C — M
between two manufacturers. Or let us assume that the linen manufacturer
buys yarn from a yarn dealer with a portion of the value of the sold
linen. This is M — C for him. But for the merchant selling the yarn it
is C — M, the resale of the yarn. As concerning the yarn in its capacity
of commodity-capital, it is no more than its final sale, whereby it
passes from the sphere of circulation into that of consumption; it is C
— M, the consummation of its first metamorphosis. Whether the merchant
buys, or sells to the industrial capitalist, his M — C — M, the circuit
of merchant's capital, always expresses what is just C — M, or simply
the completion of its first metamorphosis, with regard to the
commodity-capital, a transient form of industrial capital in process of
reproduction. The M — C of merchant's capital is C — M only for the
industrial capitalist, not for the commodity-capital produced by him. It
is but the transfer of commodity-capital from the industrial capitalist
to the circulation agent. It is not until the merchant's capital closes
C — M that functioning commodity-capital performs its final C — M. M — C
— M amounts solely to two C — M's of the same commodity-capital, two
successive sales of it, which merely effect its last and final sale.

Thus, commodity-capital assumes in commercial capital the form of an
independent type of capital because the merchant advances money-capital,
which is realised and functions as capital only by serving exclusively
to mediate the metamorphosis of commodity-capital, its function as
commodity-capital, _i.e._, its conversion into money, and it
accomplishes this by the continual purchase and sale of commodities.
This is its exclusive operation. This activity of effecting the
circulation process of industrial capital is the exclusive function of
the money-capital with which the merchant operates. By means of this
function he converts his money into money-capital, moulds his M into M —
C — M, and by the same process converts commodity-capital into
commercial capital.

So long and so far as commercial capital exists in the form of
commodity-capital, it is obviously nothing else — from the standpoint of
the reproduction process of the total social capital — but a portion of
industrial capital in the market in process of metamorphosis, which
exists and functions as commodity-capital. It is therefore only the
_money_-capital advanced by the merchant which is exclusively destined
for purchase and sale and for this reason never assumes any other form
but that of commodity-capital and money-capital, never that of
productive capital, and is always confined to the sphere of circulation
of capital — it is only this money-capital which is now to be regarded
with reference to the entire reproduction process of capital.

As soon as the producer, the linen manufacturer, has sold his 30,000
yards to the merchant for £3,000, he uses the money so obtained to buy
the necessary means of production, so that his capital returns to the
production process. His process of production continues without
interruption. So far as he is concerned, the conversion of his commodity
into money is accomplished. But for the linen itself, as we have seen,
its metamorphosis has not yet taken place. It has not yet been finally
reconverted into money, has not yet passed as a use-value into either
productive or individual consumption. It is now the linen merchant who
represents on the market the same commodity-capital originally
represented by the linen manufacturer. For the latter the process of
transformation has been curtailed, only to be continued in the
merchant's hands.

Had the linen producer been obliged to wait until his linen had really
ceased being a commodity, until it has passed into the hands of its
ultimate buyer, its productive or individual consumer, his process of
reproduction would have been interrupted. Or, to avoid interrupting it,
he would have had to curtail his operations, to convert a smaller
portion of his linen into yarn, coal, labour, etc., in short, into the
elements of productive capital, and to retain a larger portion of it as
a money reserve, so that with one portion of his capital on the market
in the shape of commodities, another would continue the process of
production; one portion would be on the market in the form of
commodities, while the other returned in the form of money. This
division of his capital is not abolished by the merchant's intervention.
But without it the portion of money reserve in the capital of
circulation would always have to be greater in relation to the part
employed in the form of productive capital, and the scale of
reproduction would have to be restricted accordingly. Instead, however,
the manufacturer is enabled to constantly employ a larger portion of his
capital in the actual process of production, and a smaller portion as
money reserve.

On the other hand, however, another portion of the social capital, in
the form of merchant's capital, is kept continually within the sphere of
circulation. It is employed all the time for the sole purpose of buying
and selling. Hence there seems to have been no more than a replacement
of persons holding this capital in their hands.

If, instead of buying £3,000 worth of linen with the purpose of selling
it again, the merchant had applied these £3,000 productively, the
productive capital of society would have increased. True, the linen
manufacturer would then have been obliged to hold back a larger portion
of his capital as money reserve, and likewise the merchant, now
transformed into an industrial capitalist. On the other hand, if the
merchant remains merchant, the manufacturer saves time in selling, which
he can devote to supervising the production process, while the merchant
must apply all his time to selling.

If merchant's capital does not overstep its necessary proportions, it is
to be inferred,

1) that as a result of the division of labour the capital devoted
exclusively to buying and selling (and this includes not only the money
required to buy commodities, but also the money which must be invested
in labour to maintain the merchant's establishment, and in his constant
capital-the storehouses, transport, etc.) is smaller than it would be if
the industrial capitalist were constrained to carry on the entire
commercial part of his business on his own;

2) that because the merchant devotes all his time exclusively to this
business, the producer is able to convert his commodities more rapidly
into money, and, moreover, the commodity-capital itself passes more
rapidly through its metamorphosis than it would in the hands of the
producer;

3) that in viewing the aggregate merchant's capital in its relation to
industrial capital, one turnover of merchant's capital may represent not
only the turnovers of many capitals in one sphere of production, but the
turnovers of a number of capitals in different spheres of production.
The former is the case when, for instance, the linen merchant, after
buying the product of some linen manufacturer with his £3,000, sells it
before the same manufacturer brings another lot of the same quantity to
market, and buys, and again sells, the product of another, or several
other, linen manufacturers, thus effecting the turnovers of different
capitals in the same sphere of production. The latter is the case if,
for example, the merchant after selling his linen buys silk, thus
effecting the turnover of a capital in a different sphere of production.

In general, it may be noted that the turnover of industrial capital is
limited not by the time of circulation alone, but also by the time of
production. The turnover of merchant's capital dealing in one kind of
commodity is not merely limited by the turnover of a single industrial
capital, but by that of all industrial capitals in the same branch of
production. After the merchant has bought and sold the linen of one
producer he can buy and sell that of another, before the first brings
another lot to the market. The same merchant's capital may, therefore,
successively promote the different turnovers of capitals invested in a
certain branch of production, with the effect that its turnover is not
identical with the turnovers of a sole industrial capital, and does not
therefore replace just the single money reserve which that one
industrial capitalist would have had to hold _in petto_. The turnover of
merchant's capital in one sphere of production is naturally restricted
by the total production of that sphere. But it is not restricted by the
scale of production, or the period of turnover, of any one capital of
the same sphere, so far as its period of turnover is qualified by its
time of production. Suppose, A supplies a commodity requiring three
months for its production. After the merchant has bought and sold it,
say, in one month, he can buy and sell the same product of some other
manufacturer. Or after he has sold, say, the corn of one farmer, he can
buy and sell that of another with the same money, etc. The turnover of
his capital is restricted by the mass of corn he is able to buy and sell
successively within a certain period, for instance, in one year, while
the turnover of the farmer's capital is, regardless of the time of
turnover, restricted by the time of production, which lasts one year.

However, the turnover of the same merchant's capital may equally well
effect the turnovers of capitals in different branches of production.

In so far as the same merchant's capital serves in different turnovers
to transform different commodity-capitals successively into money,
buying and selling them one after another, it performs the same function
in its capacity of money-capital with regard to commodity-capital, which
money in general performs by means of the number of its turnovers in a
given period with regard to commodities.

The turnover of merchant's capital is not identical with the turnover,
or a single reproduction, of an industrial capital of equal size; it is
rather equal to the sum of the turnovers of a number of such capitals,
whether in the same or in different spheres of production. The more
quickly merchant's capital is turned over, the smaller the portion of
total money-capital serving as merchant's capital; and conversely, the
more slowly it is turned over, the larger this portion. The less
developed production, the larger the sum of merchant's capital in its
relation to the sum of the commodities thrown into circulation; but the
smaller in absolute terms, or in comparison with more developed
conditions, and vice versa. In such undeveloped conditions, therefore,
the greater part of the actual money-capital is in the hands of
merchants, whose fortune constitutes money wealth vis-à-vis the others.

The velocity of circulation of the money-capital advanced by the
merchant depends 1) on the speed with which the process of production is
renewed and the different processes of production are linked together;
and 2) on the velocity of consumption.

To accomplish the turnover we have examined above, merchant's capital
does not first have to buy commodities for its full amount of value, and
then to sell them. Instead, the merchant performs both movements
simultaneously. His capital then breaks up into two parts. One of them
consists of commodity-capital, and the other of money-capital. He buys
and converts his money into commodities at one place. Elsewhere, he
sells and converts another part of his commodity-capital into money. On
one side, his capital returns to him in the form of money-capital, while
on the other he gets commodity-capital. The larger the portion in one
form, the smaller the portion in the other. This alternates and balances
itself. If the use of money as a medium of circulation combines with its
use as a means of payment and the attendant development of the credit
system, then the money-capital part of merchant's capital is reduced
still more in relation to the volume of the transactions this merchant's
capital effects. If I buy £3,000 worth of wine on three months' credit
and sell all the wine for cash before this term expires, I do not need
to advance a single penny for these transactions. In this case it is
also quite obvious that the money-capital, which here acts as merchant's
capital, is nothing more than industrial capital in its money-capital
form, in its process of reflux in the form of money. (The fact that the
manufacturer who sold £3,000 worth of wine on three months' credit may
discount his promissory note at the banker's does not alter the matter
at all and has nothing to do with the merchant's capital.) If
market-prices should fall in the meantime by, say, 1/10, the merchant,
far from making a profit, would recover only £2,700 instead of £3,000.
He would have to put up £300 out of his own pocket. These £300 would
serve merely as a reserve to balance the difference in price. But the
same applies to the manufacturer. If he himself had sold at falling
prices, he would likewise have lost £300, and would not be able to
resume production on the same scale without reserve capital.

The linen merchant buys £3,000 worth of linen from the manufacturer. The
latter pays, say, £2,000 of the £3,000 for yarn. He buys this yarn from
a yarn dealer. The money which the manufacturer pays to the yarn dealer
is not the linen dealer's money, for the latter has received commodities
to this amount. It is the money-form of the manufacturer's own capital.
Now in the hands of the yarn dealer these £2,000 appear as returned
money-capital. But to what extent are they that as distinct from the
£2,000 representing the discarded money-form of the linen and the
assumed money-form of the yarn? If the yarn dealer bought on credit and
sold for cash before the expiration of his term of payment, then these
£2,000 do not contain one penny of merchant's capital as distinct from
the money-form which the industrial capital itself assumes in the course
of its circuit. In so far as commercial capital is not, therefore, just
a form of industrial capital in the merchant's hands as commodity- or
money-capital, it is nothing but that portion of money-capital which
belongs directly to the merchant and circulates in the purchase and sale
of commodities. On a reduced scale this portion represents that part of
capital advanced for production which should always have to be in the
hands of the industrialist as money reserve and means of purchase, and
which should always have to circulate as his money-capital. This
portion, on a reduced scale, is now in the hands of merchant capitalists
and performs its functions as such in the process of circulation. It is
that portion of the total capital which, aside from what is expended as
revenue, must continually circulate on the market as a means of purchase
in order to maintain the continuity of the process of reproduction. The
more rapid the process of reproduction, and the more developed the
function of money as a means of payment, _i.e._, the more developed the
credit system, ^([1]) the smaller that portion is in relation to the
total capital.

Merchant's capital is simply capital functioning in the sphere of
circulation. The process of circulation is a phase of the total process
of reproduction. But no value is produced in the process of circulation,
and, therefore, no surplus-value. Only changes of form of the same mass
of value take place. In fact, nothing occurs there outside the
metamorphosis of commodities, and this has nothing to do as such either
with the creation or change of values. If a surplus-value is realised in
the sale of produced commodities, then this is only because it already
existed in them. In the second act, the re-exchange of money-capital
against commodities (elements of production), the buyer therefore does
not realise any surplus-value either. He merely initiates the production
of surplus-value through exchanging his money for means of production
and labour-power. But so far as these metamorphoses require circulation
time — time during which capital does not produce at all, least of all
surplus-value — it restricts the creation of values, and the
surplus-value expresses itself through the rate of profit in inverse
ratio to the duration of the circulation period. Merchant's capital,
therefore, does not create either value or surplus-value, at least not
directly. In so far as it contributes to shortening the time of
circulation, it may help indirectly to increase the surplus-value
produced by the industrial capitalists. In so far as it helps to expand
the market and effects the division of labour between capitals, hence
enabling capital to operate on a larger scale, its function promotes the
productivity of industrial capital, and its accumulation. In so far as
it shortens circulation time, it raises the ratio of surplus-value to
advanced capital, hence the rate of profit. And to the extent that it
confines a smaller portion of capital to the sphere of circulation in
the form of money-capital, it increases that portion of capital which is
engaged directly in production.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1]. To be able to classify merchant's capital as productive capital,
Ramsay confounds it with the transportation industry and calls commerce
"the transport of commodities from one place to another." _(An Essay on
the Distribution of Wealth_, p. 19.) The same confusion by Verri
(_Meditazioni sulla Economia Politica_, § 4 [In: _Scrittori Classici
Italiani di Economia Politica._ Parte Moderna, t. XV, p.32. — _Ed._])
and by Say (_Traité d'économie politique_, I, 14, 15). In his _Elements
of Political Economy_ (Andover and New York, 1835) S.P. Newman says: "In
the existing economical arrangements of society, the very act, which is
performed by the merchant, of standing between the producer and the
consumer, advancing to the former capital and receiving products in
return, and then handing over these products to the latter, receiving
back capital in return, is a transaction which both facilitates the
economical processes of the community, and adds value to the products in
relation to which it is performed" (p. 174). Producer and consumer thus
save time and money through the intervention of the merchant. This
service requires an advance of capital and labour, and must be rewarded,
"since it adds value to products, for the same products in the hands of
consumers are worth more than in the hands of producers." And so
commerce appears to him, as it does to M. Say, as "strictly an act of
production" (p. 175). This Newman's view is fundamentally wrong. The
_use-value_ of a commodity is greater in the hands of the consumer than
in those of the producer, because it is first realised by the consumer.
For the use-value of a commodity does not serve its end, does not begin
to function until the commodity enters the sphere of consumption. So
long as it is in the hands of the producer, it exists only in potential
form. But one does not pay twice for a commodity — first for its
exchange-value, and then for its use-value. By paying for its
exchange-value, I appropriate its use-value. And its exchange-value is
not in the least augmented by transferring the commodity from the
producer or middleman to the consumer.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 17. Commercial Profit

 

We have seen in Book II that the pure functions of capital in the sphere
of Circulation — the operations which the industrial capitalist must
perform, first, to realise the value of his commodities, and second, to
reconvert this value into elements of production, operations effecting
the metamorphosis of commodity-capital, C' — M — C, hence the acts of
selling and buying-produce neither value nor surplus-value. It was
rather seen that the time required for this purpose, objectively in
regard to commodities and subjectively in regard to the capitalist, sets
the limit to the production of value and surplus-value. What is true of
the metamorphosis of commodity-capital in general, is, of course, not in
the least altered by the fact that a part of it may assume the shape of
commercial capital, or that the operations, effecting the metamorphosis
of commodity-capital, appear as the special concern of a special group
of capitalists, or as the exclusive function of a portion of the
money-capital. If selling and buying commodities — and that is what the
metamorphosis of commodity-capital C' — M — C amounts to — by industrial
capitalists themselves are not operations which create value or
surplus-value, they will certainly not create either of these when
carried out by persons other than the industrial capitalists.
Furthermore, if that portion of the total social capital, which must
continually be on hand as money-capital, in order that the process of
reproduction is not interrupted by the process of circulation and
proceeds continuously — if this money-capital creates neither value nor
surplus-value, it cannot acquire the properties of creating them by
being continually thrown into circulation by some section of capitalists
other than the industrial capitalists, to perform the same function. We
have already indicated to what extent merchant's capital may be
indirectly productive, and we shall later discuss this point at greater
length.

Commercial capital, therefore — stripped of all heterogeneous functions,
such as storing, expressing, transporting, distributing, retailing,
which may be connected with it, and confined to its true function of
buying in order to sell — creates neither value nor surplus-value, but
acts as middleman in their realisation and thereby simultaneously in the
actual exchange of commodities, _i.e._, in their transfer from hand to
hand, in the social metabolism. Nevertheless, since the circulation
phase of industrial capital is just as much a phase of the reproduction
process as production is, the capital operating independently in the
process of circulation must yield the average annual profit just as well
as capital operating in the various branches of production. Should
merchant's capital yield a higher percentage of average profit than
industrial capital, then a portion of the latter would transform itself
into merchant's capital. Should it yield a lower average profit, then
the converse would result. A portion of the merchant's capital would
then be transformed into industrial capital. No species of capital
changes its purpose, or function, with greater ease than merchant's
capital.

Since merchant's capital does not itself produce surplus-value, it is
evident that the surplus-value which it pockets in the form of average
profit must be a portion of the surplus-value produced by the total
productive capital. But now the question arises: How does merchant's
capital attract its share of the surplus-value or profit produced by the
productive capital?

It is just an illusion that commercial profit is a mere addition to, or
a nominal rise of, the prices of commodities in excess of their value.

It is plain that the merchant can draw his profit only out of the price
of the commodities he sells, and plainer still that the profit he makes
in selling his commodities must be equal to the difference between his
purchase price and his selling price, _i.e._, equal to the excess of the
latter over the former.

It is possible that additional costs (costs of circulation) may enter
into the commodities after their purchase and before their sale, and it
is also possible that this may not happen. If such costs should occur,
it is plain that the excess of the selling price over the purchase price
would not be all profit. To simplify the analysis, we shall assume at
this point that no such costs occur.

For the industrial capitalist the difference between the selling price
and the purchase price of his commodities is equal to the difference
between their price of production and their cost-price, or, from the
standpoint of the total social capital, equal to the difference between
the value of the commodities and their cost-price for the capitalists,
which again comes down to the difference between the total quantity of
labour and the quantity of paid labour incorporated in them. Before the
commodities bought by the industrial capitalist are thrown back on the
market as saleable commodities, they pass through the process of
production, in which alone the portion of their price to be realised as
profit is created. But it is different with the merchant. The
commodities are in his hands only so long as they are in the process of
circulation. He merely continues their sale, the realisation of their
price which was begun by the productive capitalist, and therefore does
not cause them to pass through any intermediate process in which they
could again absorb surplus-value. While the industrial capitalist merely
realises the previously produced surplus-value, or profit, in the
process of circulation, the merchant has not only to realise his profit
during and through circulation, but must first make it. There appears to
be no other way of doing this outside of selling the commodities bought
by him from the industrial capitalist at their prices of production, or,
from the standpoint of the total commodity-capital, at their values in
excess of their prices of production, making a nominal extra charge to
their prices, hence, selling them, from the standpoint of the total
commodity-capital, above their value, and pocketing this excess of their
nominal value over their real value; in short, selling them for more
than they are worth.

This method of adding an extra charge is easy to grasp. For instance,
one yard of linen costs 2s. If I want to make a 10% profit in reselling
it, I must add 1/10 to the price, hence sell the yard at 2s. 2 2/5 d.
The difference between its actual price of production and its selling
price is then = 2 2/5d., and this represents a profit of 10% on 2s. This
amounts to my selling the yard to the buyer at a price which is in
reality the price of 1 1/10 yard. Or, what amounts to the same, it is as
though I sold to the buyer only 10/11 of a yard for 2s. and kept 1/11 of
a yard for myself. In fact I can buy back 1/11 of a yard for 2 2/5d. at
the price of 2s. 2 2/5d. per yard. This would, therefore, be just a
roundabout way of sharing in the surplus-value and surplus-product by a
nominal rise in the price of commodities.

This is realisation of commercial profit by raising the price of
commodities, as it appears at first glance. And, indeed, this whole
notion that profit originates from a nominal rise in the price of
commodities, or from their sale above their value, springs from the
observations of commercial capital.

But it is quickly apparent on closer inspection that this is mere
illusion. Assuming capitalist production to be predominant, commercial
profit cannot be realised in this manner. (It is here always a question
of averages, not of isolated cases.) Why do we assume that the merchant
can realise a profit of no more than, say, 10% on his commodities by
selling them 10% above their price of production? Because we assume that
the producer of these commodities, the industrial capitalist (who
appears as "_the producer_" before the outside world, being the
personification of industrial capital), had sold them to the dealer at
their prices of production. If the purchase price of commodities paid by
the dealer is equal to their price of production, or, in the last
instance, equal to their value, so that the price of production or, in
the last instance, the value, represent the merchant's cost-price, then,
indeed, the excess of his selling price over his purchase price — and
this difference alone is the source of his profit — must be an excess of
their commercial price over their price of production, so that in the
final analysis the merchant sells all commodities above their values.
But why was it assumed that the industrial capitalist sells his
commodities to the merchant at their prices of production? Or rather,
what was taken for granted in that assumption? It was that merchant's
capital did not go into forming the general rate of profit (we are
dealing with it as yet only in its capacity of commercial capital). We
proceeded necessarily from this premise in discussing the general rate
of profit, first, because merchant's capital as such did not exist for
us at the time, and, second, because average profit, and hence the
general rate of profit, had first to be developed as a levelling of
profits or surplus-values actually produced by the industrial capitals
in the different spheres of production. But in the case of merchant's
capital we are dealing with a capital which shares in the profit without
participating in its production. Hence, it is now necessary to
supplement our earlier exposition.

Suppose, the total industrial capital advanced in the course of the year
= 720_(c) + 180_(v) = 900 (say million £), and that s' = 100%. The
product therefore = 720_(c) + 180_(v) + 180_(s). Let us call this
product or the produced commodity-capital, C, whose value, or price of
production (since both are identical for the totality of commodities) =
1,080, and the rate of profit for the total social capital of 900 = 20%.
These 20% are, according to our earlier analyses, the average rate of
profit, since the surplus-value is not calculated here on this or that
capital of any particular composition, but on the total industrial
capital of average composition. Thus, C = 1,080, and the rate of profit
= 20%. Let us now assume, however, that aside from these £900 of
industrial capital, there are still £100 of merchant's capital, which
shares in the profit _pro rata_ to its magnitude just as the former.
According to our assumption, it is 1/10 of the total capital of 1,000.
Therefore, it participates to the extent of 1/10 in the total
surplus-value of 180, and thus secures a profit of 18%. Actually, then,
the profit to be distributed among the other 1/10 of the total capital
is only = 162, or on the capital of 900 likewise = 18%. Hence, the price
at which C is sold by the owners of the industrial capital of 900 to the
merchants = 720_(c) + 180_(v) + 162_(s) = 1,062. If the dealer then adds
the average profit of 18% to his capital of 100, he sells the
commodities at 1,062 + 18 = 1,080, _i.e._, at their price of production,
or, from the standpoint of the total commodity-capital, at their value,
although he makes his profit only during and through the circulation
process, and only from an excess of his selling price over his purchase
price. Yet he does not sell the commodities above their value, or above
their price of production, precisely because he has bought them from the
industrial capitalist below their value, or below their price of
production.

Thus, merchant's capital enters the formation of the general rate of
profit as a determinant _pro rata_ to its part in the total capital.
Hence, if we say in the given case that the average rate of profit =
18%, it would = 20%, if it were not that 1/10 of the total capital was
merchant's capital and the general rate of profit thereby lowered by
1/10. This leads to a closer and more comprehensive definition of the
price of production. By price of production we mean, just as before, the
price of a commodity = its costs (the value of the constant + variable
capital contained in it) + the average profit. But this average profit
is now determined differently. It is determined by the total profit
produced by the total productive capital; but not as calculated on the
total productive capital alone, so that if this = 900, as assumed above,
and the profit = 180, then the average rate of profit = 180/900 = 20%.
But, rather, as calculated on the total productive + merchant's capital,
so that with 900 productive and 100 merchant's capital, the average rate
of profit = 180/1,000 = 18%. The price of production is, therefore = k
(the costs) + 18, instead of k + 20. The share of the total profit
falling to merchant's capital is thus included in the average rate of
profit. The actual value, or price of production, of the total
commodity-capital is therefore = k + p + m (where m is commercial
profit). The price of production, or the price at which the industrial
capitalist as such sells his commodities, is thus smaller than the
actual price of production of the commodity; or in terms of all
commodities taken together, the prices at which the class of industrial
capitalists sell their commodities are lower than their value. Hence, in
the above case, 900 (costs) + 18% on 900, or 900 + 162= 1,062. It
follows, then, that in selling a commodity at 118 for which he paid 100
the merchant does, indeed, add 18% to the price. But since this
commodity, for which he paid 100, is really worth 118, he does not sell
it above its value. We shall henceforth use the term price of production
in this, its more precise, sense. It is evident, therefore, that the
profit of the industrial capitalist equals the excess of the price of
production of the commodity over its cost-price, and that commercial
profit, as distinct from this industrial profit, equals the excess of
the selling price over the price of production of the commodity which,
for the merchant, is its purchase price; but that the actual price of
the commodity = its price of production + the commercial profit. Just as
industrial capital realises only such profits as already exist in the
value of commodities as surplus-value, so merchant's capital realises
profits only because the entire surplus-value, or profit, has not as yet
been fully realised in the price charged for the commodities by the
industrial capitalist.^([1]) The merchant's selling price thus exceeds
the purchase price not because the former exceeds the total value, but
because the latter is below this value.

Merchant's capital, therefore, participates in levelling surplus-value
to average profit, although it does not take part in its production.
Thus, the general rate of profit contains a deduction from surplus-value
due to merchant's capital, hence a deduction from the profit of
industrial capital.

It follows from the foregoing:

1) The larger the merchant's capital in proportion to the industrial
capital, the smaller the rate of industrial profit, and vice versa.

2) It was demonstrated in the first part that the rate of profit is
always lower than the rate of the actual surplus-value, _i.e._, it
always understates the intensity of exploitation, as in the above case,
720_(c) + 180_(v) + 180_(s), the rate of surplus-value of 100% and a
rate of profit of only 20%. And the difference becomes still greater,
inasmuch as the average rate of profit appears smaller again, dropping
from 20% to 18%, if the share falling to merchant's capital is also
taken into account. The average rate of profit of the direct capitalist
exploiter, therefore, expresses a rate of profit smaller than it
actually is.

Assuming all other circumstances remaining the same, the relative volume
of merchant's capital (with the exception of the small dealer who
represents a hybrid form) is in inverse proportion to the velocity of
its turnover, hence in inverse proportion to the energy of the process
of reproduction in general. In the course of scientific analysis, the
formation of a general rate of profit appears to result from industrial
capitals and their competition, and is only later corrected,
supplemented, and modified by the intervention of merchant's capital. In
the course of its historical development, however, the process is really
reversed. It is the commercial capital which first determines the prices
of commodities more or less in accordance with their values, and it is
the sphere of circulation, the sphere that promotes the process of
reproduction, in which a general rate of profit initially takes shape.
It is originally the commercial profit which determines the industrial
profit. Not until the capitalist mode of production has asserted itself
and the producer himself has become merchant, is commercial profit
reduced to that aliquot part of the total surplus-value falling to the
share of merchant's capital as an aliquot part of the total capital
engaged in the social process of reproduction.

It was seen in the supplementary equalisation of profit through the
intervention of merchant's capital that no additional element entered
the value of commodities with the merchant's advanced money-capital, and
that the extra charge to the price, whereby the merchant makes his
profit, was merely equal to that portion of the value of the
commodities, which productive capital had not calculated in the price of
production, _i.e._, had left out. The case of this money-capital is
similar to that of the industrial capitalist's fixed capital, since it
is not consumed and its value, therefore, does not make up an element of
the value of commodity. It is in the purchase price of commodity-capital
that the merchant replaces its price of production = M, in money. His
own selling price, as previously shown, is = M + DM, where DM stands for
the addition to the price of commodities determined by the general rate
of profit. Once he sells the commodities, his original money-capital,
which he advanced for their purchase, returns to him together with this
DM. We see once more that his money-capital is nothing but the
industrial capitalist's commodity-capital transformed into
money-capital, which affects the magnitude of the value of this
commodity-capital no more than would a direct sale of the latter to the
ultimate consumer, instead of to the merchant. It, actually, merely
anticipates the payment of the consumer. However, this is correct only
on the condition hitherto assumed, that the merchant has no overhead
expenses, or that aside from the money-capital which he must advance to
buy commodities from the producer he need not advance any other capital,
circulating or fixed, in the process of commodity metamorphosis., the
process of buying and selling. But this is not so in reality, as we have
seen in the analysis of the costs of circulation (Book II, Chap. VI).
These costs of circulation are partly expenses which the merchant has to
reclaim from other agents of circulation, and partly expenses arising
directly from his specific business.

No matter what the nature of these costs of circulation — whether they
arise from the purely commercial nature of the merchant's establishment
as such and hence belong to the merchant's specific costs of
circulation, or represent items which are charges for subsequent
processes of production added in the process of circulation, such as
expressage, transport, storage, etc. — they always require of the
merchant, aside from his money-capital, advanced to the purchase of
commodities, some additional capital for the purchase and payment of
such means of circulation. As much of this element of cost as consists
of circulating capital passes wholly as an additional element into the
selling price of the commodities; and as much of it as consists of fixed
capital only to the extent of its wear and tear. But only as an element
which forms a nominal value, even if as the purely commercial costs of
circulation, it does not add any real value to the commodities. But
whether fixed or circulating, this entire additional capital
participates in forming the general rate of profit.

The purely commercial costs of circulation (hence, excluding costs of
expressage, shipping, storage, etc.) resolve themselves into costs
required to realise the value of commodities, to transform it from
commodities into money, or from money into commodities, to effect their
exchange. We leave entirely out of consideration all possible processes
of production which may continue in the process of circulation, and from
which the merchant's business can be altogether separated; as, in fact,
the actual transport industry and expressage may be, and are, industrial
branches entirely distinct from commercial; and purchaseable and
saleable commodities may be stored in docks or in other public premises,
with the resultant cost of storage being charged to the merchant by
third persons inasmuch as he has to advance it. All this takes place in
actual wholesale commerce, where merchant's capital appears in its
purest form, unmixed with other functions. The express company owner,
the railway director, and the shipowner, are not "merchants." The costs
which we consider here are those of buying and selling. We have already
remarked earlier that these resolve themselves into accounting,
book-keeping, marketing, correspondence, etc. The constant capital
required for this purpose consists of offices, paper, postage, etc. The
other costs break up into variable capital advanced for the employment
of mercantile wage-workers. (Expressage, transport costs, advances for
customs duties, etc., may partly be considered as being advanced by the
merchant in purchasing commodities and thus enter the purchase price as
far as he is concerned.)

All these costs are not incurred in producing the use-value of
commodities, but in realising their value. They are pure costs of
circulation. They do not enter into the immediate process of production,
but since they are part of the process of circulation they are also part
of the total process of reproduction.

The only portion of these costs of interest to us at this point is that
advanced as variable capital. (The following questions should also be
analysed: First, how does the law that only necessary labour enters the
value of commodities operate in the process of circulation? Second, how
does accumulation obtain in merchant's capital? Third, how does
merchant's capital function in the actual aggregate reproduction process
of society?)

These costs arise due to the product having the economic form of a
commodity.

If the labour-time which the industrial capitalists themselves lose
while directly selling commodities to one another — hence, speaking
objectively, the circulation time of the commodities — does not add
value to these commodities, it is evident that this labour-time does not
change its nature in the least by falling to the merchant instead of the
industrial capitalist. The conversion of commodities (products) into
money, and of money into commodities (means of production) is a
necessary function of industrial capital and, therefore, a necessary
operation of the capitalist — who is actually but personified capital
endowed with a consciousness of its own and a will. But these functions
neither create value, nor produce surplus-value. By performing these
operations and carrying on the functions of capital in the sphere of
circulation after the productive capitalist has ceased to be involved
the merchant merely takes the place of the industrial capitalist. The
labour-time required in these operations is devoted to certain necessary
operations of the reproduction process of capital, but yields no
additional value. If the merchant did not perform these operations
(hence, did not expend the labour-time entailed), he would not be
applying his capital as a circulation agent of industrial capital; he
would not then be continuing the interrupted function of the industrial
capitalist, and consequently could not participate as a capitalist _pro
rata_ to his advanced capital, in the mass of profit produced by
industrial capitalists. In order to share in the mass of surplus-value,
to expand the value of his advance as capital, the commercial capitalist
need not employ wage-workers. If his business and capital are small, he
may be the only worker in it. He is paid with that portion of the profit
which falls to him through the difference between the purchase price
paid by him for commodities and their actual price of production.

But, on the other hand, the profit realised by the merchant on a small
amount of advanced capital may be no larger, or may even be smaller,
than the wages of one of the better-paid skilled wage-workers. In fact,
he brushes shoulders with many direct commercial agents of the
productive capitalist, such as buyers, sellers, travellers, who enjoy
the same or a higher income either in the form of wages, or in the form
of a share in the profit (percentages, bonuses) made from each sale. In
the first case, the merchant pockets the mercantile profit as an
independent capitalist; in the other, the salesman, the industrial
capitalist's wage-labourer, receives a portion of the profit either in
the form of wages, or as a proportional share in the profit of the
industrial capitalist, whose direct agent he is, while his employer
pockets both the industrial and the commercial profit. But in all these
cases, although his income may appear to the circulation agent as an
ordinary wage, as payment for work performed, and although, where it
does not so appear, the profit may be no larger than the wage of a
better-paid labourer, his income is derived solely from the mercantile
profit. This follows from his labour not being labour which produces
value.

The lengthening of the act of circulation represents for the industrial
capitalist 1) a personal loss of time, since it prevents him from
performing in person his function as manager of the productive process;
2) a longer stay of his product in money- or commodity-form, in the
circulation process, hence in a process where it does not expand value
and where the direct production process is interrupted. If this process
is not to be interrupted, production must either be curtailed, or more
money-capital must be advanced to maintain the process of production on
the same scale. This means that each time either a smaller profit is
made on the capital hitherto invested, or that additional money-capital
must be advanced to make the previous profit. All this remains unchanged
when the merchant takes the place of the industrial capitalist. Instead
of the industrial capitalist devoting more time to the process of
circulation, it is the merchant who is so engaged; instead of the
industrial capitalist it is the merchant who advances additional capital
for circulation; or, what amounts to the same thing, instead of a large
portion of the industrial capital being continually diverted into the
process of circulation, it is the merchant's capital which is wholly
tied up in it; and instead of making a smaller profit, the industrial
capitalist must yield a portion of his profit wholly to the merchant. So
long as merchant's capital remains within the bounds in which it is
necessary, the only difference is that this division of the functions of
capital reduces the time exclusively used up in the process of
circulation, that less additional capital is advanced for this purpose,
and that the loss in total profit, represented by mercantile profit, is
smaller than it would otherwise have been. If in the above example,
720_(c) + 180_(v) + 180_(s), assisted by a merchant's capital of 100,
produces a profit of 162, or 18%, for the industrial capitalist, hence
implying a deduction of 18, then, but for this independent merchant's
capital, the additional capital required would probably be 200, and we
should have a total advance by the industrial capitalist of 1,100
instead of 900, which, based upon a surplus-value of 180, would yield a
rate of profit of only 16 4/11%.

If the industrial capitalist who acts as his own merchant advances not
only the additional capital to buy new commodities before his product in
the process of circulation has been reconverted into money, but also
capital (office expenses and wages for commercial employees) to realise
the value of his commodity-capital, or, in other words, for the process
of circulation, then these supplements form additional capital, but do
not create surplus-value. They must be made good out of the value of the
commodities, because a portion of the value of these commodities must be
reconverted into these circulation costs. But no additional
surplus-value is created thereby. So far as this concerns the total
capital of society, it means in fact that a portion of it must be set
aside for secondary operations which are no part of the self-expansion
process, and that this portion of the social capital must be continually
reproduced for this purpose. This reduces the rate of profit for the
individual capitalist and for the entire class of industrial
capitalists, an effect arising from every new investment of additional
capital whenever such capital is required to set in motion the same mass
of variable capital.

In so far as these additional costs connected with the business of
circulation are transferred from the industrial to the commercial
capitalist, there takes place a similar reduction in the rate of profit,
but to a lesser degree and in a different way. It now develops that the
merchant advances more capital than would be necessary if these costs
did not exist, and that the profit on this additional capital increases
the amount of the commercial profit, so that more of the merchant's
capital joins industrial capital in levelling the average rate of profit
and thereby the average profit falls. If in our above example an
additional capital of 50 is advanced besides the merchant's capital of
100 to cover the costs in question, then the total surplus-value of 180
is distributed with respect to a productive capital of 900 plus a
merchant's capital of 150, together = 1,050. The average rate of profit,
therefore, sinks to 17 1/7% The industrial capitalist sells his
commodities to the merchant at 900 + 154 2/7 = 1,0542 1/7, and the
merchant sells them at 1,130 (1,080 + 50 for costs which he must
recover). Moreover, it must be admitted that the division between
merchant's and industrial capital is accompanied by a centralisation of
the commercial expenses and, consequently, by their reduction.

The question now arises: What about the commercial wage-workers employed
by the commercial capitalist, here the merchant?

In one respect, such a commercial employee is a wage-worker like any
other. In the first place, his labour-power is bought with the variable
capital of the merchant, not with money expended as revenue, and
consequently it is not bought for private service, but for the purpose
of expanding the value of the capital advanced for it. In the second
place, the value of his labour-power, and thus his wages, are determined
as those of other wage-workers, _i.e._, by the cost of production and
reproduction of his specific labour-power, not by the product of his
labour.

However, we must make the same distinction between him and the
wage-workers directly employed by industrial capital which exists
between industrial capital and merchant's capital, and thus between the
industrial capitalist and the merchant. Since the merchant, as a mere
agent of circulation, produces neither value nor surplus-value (for the
additional value which he adds to the commodities through his expenses
resolves itself into an addition of previously existing values, although
the question here poses itself, how he preserves this value of his
constant capital?) it follows that the mercantile workers employed by
him in these same functions cannot directly create surplus-value for
him. Here, as in the case of productive labourers, we assume that wages
are determined by the value of the labour-power, and that, hence, the
merchant does not enrich himself by depressing wages, so that he does
not enter into his cost account an advance for labour which he has paid
only in part; in other words, that he does not enrich himself through
cheating his clerks, etc.

The difficulty as concerns mercantile wage-workers is by no means to
explain how they produce direct profits for their employer without
creating any direct surplus-value (of which profit is but a transmuted
form). This question has, indeed, already been solved in the general
analysis of commercial profits. Just as industrial capital makes profit
by selling labour embodied and realised in commodities, for which it has
not paid any equivalent, so merchant's capital derives profit from not
paying in full to productive capital for all the unpaid labour contained
in the commodities (in commodities, in so far as capital invested in
their production functions as an aliquot part of the total industrial
capital), and by demanding payment for this unpaid portion still
contained in the commodities when making a sale. The relation of
merchant's capital to surplus-value is different from that of industrial
capital. The latter produces surplus-value by directly appropriating the
unpaid labour of others. The former appropriates a portion of this
surplus-value by having this portion transferred from industrial capital
to itself.

It is only through its function of realising values that merchant's
capital acts as capital in the process of reproduction, and hence draws
on the surplus-value produced by the total capital. The mass of the
individual merchant's profits depends on the mass of capital that he can
apply in this process, and he can apply so much more of it in buying and
selling, the more the unpaid labour of his clerks. The very function, by
virtue of which the merchant's money becomes capital, is largely done
through his employees. The unpaid labour of these clerks, while it does
not create surplus-value, enables him to appropriate surplus-value,
which, in effect, amounts to the same thing with respect to his capital.
It is, therefore, a source of profit for him. Otherwise commerce could
never be conducted on a large scale, capitalistically.

Just as the labourer's unpaid labour directly creates surplus-value for
productive capital, so the unpaid labour of the commercial wage-worker
secures a share of this surplus-value for merchant's capital.

The difficulty lies here: Since the merchant's labour-time and labour do
not create value, although they secure for him a share of already
produced surplus-value, how does the matter stand with the variable
capital which he lays out in purchasing commercial labour-power? Is this
variable capital to be included in the cost outlays of the advanced
merchant's capital? If not, this appears to conflict with the law of
equalisation of the rate of profit; what capitalist would advance 150 if
he could charge only 100 to advanced capital? If so, it seems to
conflict with the nature of merchant's capital, since this kind of
capital does not act as capital by setting in motion the labour of
others, as industrial capital does, but rather by doing its own work,
_i.e._, performing the functions of buying and selling, this being
precisely the means and the reason why it receives a portion of the
surplus-value produced by the industrial capital.

(We must therefore analyse the following points: the merchant's variable
capital; the law of necessary labour in the sphere of circulation; how
the merchant's labour maintains the value of his constant capital; the
part played by merchant's capital in the process of reproduction as a
whole; and, finally, the duplication in commodity-capital and
money-capital, on the one hand, and in commercial capital and
money-dealing capital on the other.)

If every merchant had only as much capital as he himself were able to
turn over by his own labour, there would be infinite fragmentation of
merchant's capital. This fragmentation would increase in the same
proportion as productive capital raised production and operated with
greater masses in the forward march of the capitalist mode of
production. Hence, an increasing disproportion of the two. Capital in
the sphere of circulation would become decentralised in the same
proportion as it became centralised in the sphere of production. The
purely commercial business of the industrial capitalist, and thus his
purely commercial expenses, would expand infinitely thereby, for he
would have to deal with, say, 1,000 merchants, instead of 100. Thus, the
advantages of independently operating merchant's capital would largely
be lost. And not the purely commercial expenses alone, but also the
other costs of circulation, such as sorting, expressage, etc., would
grow. This, as far as the industrial capital is concerned. Now let us
consider merchant's capital. Firstly, the purely commercial operations.
It does not take more time to deal with large figures than with small
ones. It takes ten times as much time to make 10 purchases at £100 each
as it does to make _one_ purchase at £1,000. It takes ten times as much
correspondence, paper, and postage, to correspond with 10 small
merchants as it does with _one_ large merchant. The clearly defined
division of labour in a commercial office, in which one keeps the books,
another looks after money matters, a third has charge of correspondence,
one buys, another sells, a third travels, etc., saves immense quantities
of labour-time, so that the number of workers employed in wholesale
commerce are in no way related to the comparative size of the
establishment. This is so, because in commerce much more than in
industry the same function requires the same labour-time, whether
performed on a large or a small scale. This is the reason why
concentration appears earlier historically in the merchant's business
than in the industrial workshop. Further, regarding outlays in constant
capital. One hundred small offices cost incomparably more than one large
office, 100 small warehouses more than a large one, etc. The costs of
transport, which enter the accounts of a commercial establishment at
least as costs to be advanced, grow with the fragmentation.

The industrial capitalist would have to lay out more in labour and in
circulation costs in the commercial part of his business. The same
merchant's capital, when divided among many small capitalists, would,
owing to this fragmentation, require more labourers to perform its
functions, and more merchant's capital would, furthermore, be needed to
turn over the same commodity-capital.

Suppose B is the entire merchant's capital directly applied in buying
and selling commodities, and b the corresponding variable capital paid
out in wages to the commercial employees. Then B + b is smaller than the
total merchant's capital, B, would be if every merchant had to get along
without assistants, hence would invest nothing in b. However, we have
not yet overcome the difficulty.

The selling price of the commodities must suffice 1) to pay the average
profit on B + b. This is explained if only by the fact that B + b is
generally a reduction of the original B, representing a smaller
merchant's capital than would be required without b. But this selling
price must suffice 2) to cover not only the additional profit on b, but
to replace also the paid wages, the merchant's variable capital = b.
This last consideration gives rise to the difficulty. Does b represent a
new constituent of the price, or is it merely a part of the profit made
by means of B + b, which appears as wages only so far as the mercantile
wage-worker is concerned, and as concerns the merchant simply replaces
variable capital? In the latter case, the merchant's profit on his
advanced capital B + b would just equal the profit due to B by virtue of
the general rate, plus b, which he pays out in the form of wages, but
which does not itself yield a profit.

The crux of the matter is, indeed, to find the limits (mathematically
speaking) of b. Let us first accurately define the problem. Let B stand
for capital invested directly in buying and selling commodities, K for
the constant capital (actual handling costs) consumed in this function,
and b for the variable capital invested by the merchant.

Recovering B offers no difficulties at all. For the merchant it is
simply the realised purchase price, and the price of production for the
manufacturer. It is the price paid by the merchant, and in reselling he
recovers B as part of his selling price; in addition to this B, he makes
a profit on B, as previously explained. For example, let the commodity
cost £100. Suppose the profit is 10%. In that case, the commodity is
sold at 110. The commodity previously cost 100, and the merchant's
capital of 100 merely adds 10 to it.

Now if we look at K, it is at most as large as, but in fact smaller
than, the portion of constant capital which the producer would use up in
buying and selling, but then it would form an addition to the constant
capital he requires directly in production. This portion, nonetheless,
must be continually recovered in the price of the commodity, or, what
amounts to the same, a corresponding portion of the commodity must be
continually expended in this form, or, from the standpoint of the total
capital of society, must be continually reproduced in this form. This
portion of the advanced constant capital would have a limiting effect on
the rate of profit, just as the entire mass of it directly invested in
production. In so far as the industrial capitalist leaves the commercial
part of his business to the merchant, he need not advance this part of
the capital. The merchant advances it in his stead. In a way, he does
this but nominally, since a merchant neither produces, nor reproduces,
the constant capital consumed by him (the actual handling costs). Its
production appears a separate business, or at least a part of the
business, of some industrial capitalists who thus play a role similar to
those who supply constant capital to producers of necessities of life.
First, therefore, the merchant has this constant capital recovered for
him and, secondly, receives his profit on it. Through both of these,
therefore, the industrial capitalist's profit is reduced. But owing to
economising and concentration which are bound up with division of
labour, it shrinks less than it would if he himself had to advance this
capital. The reduction in the rate of profit is less, because the
capital thus advanced is less.

So far, then, the selling price is made up of B + K + the profit on B +
K. This portion of it offers no further difficulties. But now b, the
variable capital advanced by the merchant, enters into it.

The resultant selling price is B + K + b + the profit on B + K + the
profit on b.

B merely recovers the purchase price and adds nothing to it but the
profit on B. K adds the profit on K, and K itself; but K + the profit on
K, the part of the circulation costs advanced in the form of constant
capital + the corresponding average profit, would be larger in the hands
of the industrial capitalist than in the merchant's. The shrinking of
the average profit appears in the form of the full average profit
calculated after deducting B + K from the advanced industrial capital,
with the deduction from the average profit on B + K paid to the
merchant, so that this deduction appears as the profit of a specific
capital, merchant's capital.

But the situation is different with respect to b + the profit on b, or,
in the present case, where the rate of profit is assumed = 10%, with b +
1/10 b. And the real difficulty lies here.

What the merchant buys with b is, according to our assumption, nothing
but commercial labour, hence labour required to perform the functions of
circulating capital, C — M and M — C. But commercial labour is the
labour generally necessary for a capital to operate as merchant's
capital, to help convert commodities into money and money into
commodities. It is labour which realises, but does not create, values.
And only in so far as a capital performs these functions — hence a
capitalist performs these operations, or this work with his capital —
does it serve as merchant's capital and participate in regulating the
general rate of profit, _i.e._, draw its dividends out of the total
profit. But (b + the profit on b) appears to include, first, payment for
labour (for it makes no difference whether the industrial capitalist
pays the merchant for his own labour, or the labour of the clerks paid
by the merchant), and, secondly, the profit on the payment for this
labour, which the merchant would have to perform in person. First,
merchant's capital gets its b refunded, and, secondly, he makes the
profit on it. This arises from the fact, therefore, that, first, it
requires payment for the work whereby it operates as _merchant's_
capital, and that, secondly, it demands the profit, because it operates
as _capital, i.e._, because it performs work for which profit is paid to
it as functioning capital. This is, therefore, the question to be
solved.

Let us assume that B = 100, b = 10, and the rate of profit = 10%. We
take it that K = 0, in order to leave out of consideration this element
of the purchase price, which does not belong here and has already been
accounted for. Hence, the selling price would = B + p + b + p (= B + Bp'
+ b + bp'; where p stands for the rate of profit) = 100 + 40 + 10 +
1=121.

But if b were not invested by the merchant in wages — since b is paid
only for commercial labour, hence labour required, to realise the value
of the commodity — capital thrown on the market by industrial capital —
the matter would stand as follows: to buy or sell for B = 100, the
merchant would devote his time, and we wish to assume that this is the
only time at his disposal. The commercial labour represented by b, or
10, if paid for by profit instead of wages, would presuppose another
merchant's capital = 100, since at 10% this makes b = 10. This second B
= 100 would not additionally go into the price of commodities, but the
10% would. There would, hence, be two operations at 100 = 200, that
would buy commodities at 200 + 20 = 220.

Since merchant's capital is absolutely nothing but an individualised
form of a portion of industrial capital engaged in the process of
circulation, all questions referring to it must be solved by
representing the problem primarily in a form; in which the phenomena
peculiar to merchant's capital do not yet appear independently, but
still in direct connection with industrial capital, as a branch of it.
As an office, distinct from a workshop, mercantile capital operates
continually in the circulation process. It is here — in the office of
the industrial capitalist himself — that we must first analyse the b now
under consideration.

The office is from the outset always infinitesimally small compared to
the industrial workshop. As for the rest, it is clear that as the scale
of production is extended, commercial operations required constantly for
the circulation of industrial capital, in order to sell the product
existing as commodity-capital, to reconvert the money so received into
means of production, and to keep account of the whole process, multiply
accordingly. Calculation of prices, book-keeping, managing funds,
correspondence — all belong under this head. The more developed the
scale of production, the greater, even if not proportionately greater,
the commercial operations of the industrial capital, and consequently
the labour and other costs of circulation involved in realising value
and surplus-value. This necessitates the employment of commercial
wage-workers who make up the actual office staff. The outlay for these,
although made in the form of wages, differs from the variable capital
laid out in purchasing productive labour. It increases the outlay of the
industrial capitalist, the mass of the capital to be advanced, without
directly increasing surplus-value. Because it is an outlay for labour
employed solely in realising value already created. Like every other
outlay of this kind, it reduces the rate of profit be-cause the advanced
capital increases, but not the surplus-value. If surplus-value s remains
constant while advanced capital C increases to C + DC, then the rate of
profit s/C is replaced by the smaller rate of profit s/C + DC. The
industrial capitalist endeavours, therefore, to cut these expenses of
circulation down to a minimum, just as his expenses for constant
capital. Hence, industrial capital does not maintain the same attitude
to its commercial wage-labourers as it does to its productive
wage-labourers. The more productive wage-labourers it employs under
otherwise equal circumstances, the greater the output, and the greater
the surplus-value, or profit. Conversely, however, the larger the scale
of production, the greater the quantity of value and surplus-value to be
realised, the greater the produced commodity-capital, the greater are
the absolute, if not relative, office costs, giving rise to a kind of
division of labour. To what extent profit is the precondition for these
outlays, is seen, among other things, from the fact that with the
increase of commercial salaries, a part of them is frequently paid by a
share in the profit. It is in the nature of things that labour
consisting merely of intermediate operations connected partly with
calculating values, partly with realising them, and partly with
reconverting the realised money into means of production, is a labour
whose magnitude therefore depends on the quantity of the produced values
that have to he realised, and does not act as the cause, like directly
productive labour, but rather as an effect, of the respective magnitudes
and masses of these values. The same applies to the other costs of
circulation. To do much measuring, weighing, packing, and transporting,
much must be on hand. The amount of packing, transporting, etc., depends
on the quantity of commodities which are the objects of this activity,
not vice versa.

The commercial worker produces no surplus-value directly. But the price
of his labour is determined by the value of his labour-power, hence by
its costs of production, while the application of this labour-power, its
exertion, expenditure of energy, and wear and tear, is as in the ease of
every other wage-labourer by no means limited by its value. His wage,
therefore, is not necessarily proportionate to the mass of profit which
he helps the capitalist to realise. What he costs the capitalist and
what he brings in for him, are two different things. He creates no
direct surplus-value, but adds to the capitalist's income by helping him
to reduce the cost of realising surplus-value, inasmuch as he performs
partly unpaid labour. The commercial worker, in the strict sense of the
term, belongs to the better-paid class of wage-workers — to those whose
labour is classed as skilled and stands above average labour. Yet the
wage tends to fall, even in relation to average labour, with the advance
of the capitalist mode of production. This is due partly to the division
of labour in the office, implying a one-sided development of the labour
capacity, the cost of which does not fall entirely on the capitalist,
since the labourer's skill develops by itself through the exercise of
his function, and all the more rapidly as division of labour makes it
more one-sided. Secondly, because the necessary training, knowledge of
commercial practices, languages, etc., is more and more rapidly, easily,
universally and cheaply reproduced with the progress of science and
public education the more the capitalist mode of production directs
teaching methods, etc., towards practical purposes. The universality of
public education enables capitalists to recruit such labourers from
classes that formerly had no access to such trades and were accustomed
to a lower standard of living. Moreover, this increases supply, and
hence competition. With few exceptions, the labour-power of these people
is therefore devaluated with the progress of capitalist production.
Their wage falls, while their labour capacity increases. The capitalist
increases the number of these labourers whenever he has more value and
profits to realise. The increase of this labour is always a result,
never a cause of more surplus-value.^([2])

------------------------------------------------------------------------

There is duplication, therefore. On the one hand, the functions as
commodity-capital and money-capital (hence further designated as
merchant's capital) are general definite forms assumed by industrial
capital. On the other hand, specific capitals, and therefore specific
groups of capitalists, are exclusively devoted to these functions; and
these functions thus develop into specific spheres of self-expansion of
capital.

In the case of mercantile capital, the commercial functions and
circulation costs are found only in individualised form. That side of
industrial capital which is devoted to circulation, continuously exists
not only in the shape of commodity-capital and money-capital, but also
in the office alongside the workshop. But it becomes independent in the
case of mercantile capital. In the latter's case, the office is its only
workshop. The portion of capital employed in the form of circulation
costs appears much larger in the case of the big merchant than in that
of the industrialist, because besides their own offices connected with
every industrial workshop, that part of capital which would have to be
so applied by the entire class of industrial capitalists is concentrated
in the hands of a few merchants, who in carrying out the functions of
circulation also provide for the growing expenses incidental to their
continuation.

To industrial capital the costs of circulation appear as unproductive
expenses, and so they are. To the merchant they appear as a source of
his profit, proportional, given the general rate of profit, to their
size. The outlay to be made for these circulation costs is, therefore, a
productive investment for mercantile capital. And for this reason, the
commercial labour which it buys is likewise immediately productive for
it.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. John Bellers [_Essays about the Poor, Manufactures, Trade,
Plantations, and Immorality_, London, 1699, p. 10. — _Ed._].

2. How well this forecast of the fate of the commercial proletariat,
written in 1865, has stood the test of time can be corroborated by
hundreds of German clerks, who are trained in all commercial operations
and acquainted with three or four languages, and offer their services in
vain in London City at 25 shillings per week, which is far below the
wages of a good machinist. A blank of two pages in the manuscript
indicates that this point was to have been treated at greater length.
For the rest, we refer the reader to Book II (Kap. VI.) ("The Costs of
Circulation") [English edition: Vol. II, Ch. VI. — _Ed._], where various
matters belonging under this head have already been discussed. — _F.E._

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 18. The Turnover of Merchant's Capital. Prices.

 

The turnover of industrial capital is a combination of its period of
production and time of circulation, and therefore embraces the entire
process of production. The turnover of merchant's capital, on the other
hand, being in reality nothing but an alienated movement of
commodity-capital, represents only the first phase in the metamorphosis
of a commodity, C — M, as the refluent movement of a specific capital; M
— C, C — M, is, from the mercantile point of view, the turnover of
merchant's capital. The merchant buys, converting his money into
commodities, then sells, converting the latter back into money, and so
forth in constant repetition. Within circulation, the metamorphosis of
industrial capital always presents itself in the form of C₁ — M — C₂;
the money realised by the sale of the produced commodity C₁ is used to
purchase new means of production, C₂. This amounts to a practical
exchange of C₁ for C₂, and the same money thus changes hands twice. Its
movement mediates the exchange of two different kinds of commodities, C₁
and C₂. But in the case of the merchant, it is, conversely, the same
commodity which changes hands twice in M — C — M'. It merely promotes
the reflux of his money.

If, for example, a certain merchant's capital is £100, and for these
£100 the merchant buys commodities and sells them for £110, then his
capital of £100 has completed one turnover, and the number of such
turnovers per year depends on the number of times this movement M — C —
M' is repeated.

We here leave entirely out of consideration the costs which may be
concealed in the difference between the purchase price and the selling
price, since these do not alter in any way the form, which we are now
analysing.

The number of turnovers of a given merchant's capital, therefore, is
analogous in this case to the repeated cycles of money as a mere medium
of circulation. Just as the same thaler buys ten times its value in
commodities in making ten cycles, so the same money-capital of the
merchant, when turned over ten times, buys ten times its value in
commodities, or realises a total commodity-capital of ten times its
value; a merchant's capital of 100, for instance, a ten-fold value =
1,000. But there is this difference: In the cycle of money as a medium
of circulation it is the same piece of money that passes through
different hands, thus repeatedly performing the same function and hence
making up for the mass of the circulating pieces of money by its
velocity. But in the merchant's case it is the same money capital, the
same money-value, regardless of what pieces of money it may be composed,
which repeatedly buys and sells commodity-capital to the amount of its
value and which therefore returns to the same hands, the same point of
departure as M + DM, _i.e._, value plus surplus-value. This
characterises its turnover as a capital turnover. It always withdraws
more money from circulation than it throws in. It is self-evident, at
any rate, that an accelerated turnover of merchant's capital (given a
developed credit system, the function of money as a means of payment
predominates) implies a more rapid circulation of the same quantity of
money.

A repeated turnover of commercial capital, however, never connotes more
than repeated buying and selling; while a repeated turnover of
industrial capital connotes the periodicity and renovation of the entire
reproduction process (which includes the process of consumption). For
merchant's capital this appears merely as an external condition.
Industrial capital must continually bring commodities to the market and
withdraw them from it, in order that rapid turnover of merchant's
capital may remain possible. If the process of reproduction is slow,
then so is the turnover of merchant's capital. True, merchant's capital
promotes the turnover of productive capital, but only in so far as it
shortens its time of circulation. It has no direct influence on the time
of production, which is also a barrier to the period of turnover of
industrial capital. This is the first barrier for the turnover of
merchant's capital. Secondly, aside from the barrier formed by
reproductive consumption, the turnover of merchant's capital is
ultimately limited by the velocity and volume of the total individual
consumption, since all the commodity-capital which is part of the
consumption-fund depends on it.

However (aside from the turnovers in the world of commerce, in which one
merchant always sells the same commodity to another, and this sort of
circulation may appear highly prosperous in times of speculation), the
merchant's capital, in the first place, curtails phase C — M for
productive capital. Secondly, under the modern credit system it disposes
of a large portion of the total social money-capital, so that it can
repeat its purchases even before it has definitely sold what has
previously been purchased. And it is immaterial in this case, whether
our merchant sells directly to the ultimate consumer, or there are a
dozen other intermediate merchants between them. Owing to the immense
elasticity of the reproduction process, which may always be pushed
beyond any given bounds, it does not encounter any obstacle in
production itself, or at best a very elastic one. Aside from the
separation of C — M and M — C, which follows from the nature of the
commodities, a fictitious demand is then created. In spite of its
independent status, the movement of merchant's capital is never more
than the movement of industrial capital within the sphere of
circulation. But by virtue of its independent status it moves, within
certain limits, independently of the bounds of the reproduction process
and thereby even drives the latter beyond its bounds. This internal
dependence and external independence push merchant's capital to a point
where the internal connection is violently restored through a crisis.

Hence the phenomenon that crises do not come to the surface, do not
break out, in the retail business first, which deals with direct
consumption, but in the spheres of wholesale trade, and of banking,
which places the money-capital of society at the disposal of the former.

The manufacturer may actually sell to the exporter, and the exporter, in
his turn, to his foreign customer; the importer may sell his raw
materials to the manufacturer, and the latter may sell his products to
the wholesale merchant, etc. But at some particular imperceptible point
the goods lie unsold, or else, again, all producers and middlemen may
gradually become overstocked. Consumption is then generally at its
highest, either because one industrial capitalist sets a succession of
others in motion; or because the labourers employed by them are fully
employed and have more to spend than usual. The capitalists'
expenditures increase together with their growing income. Besides, as we
have seen (Book II, Part III), continuous circulation takes place
between constant capital and constant capital (even regardless of
accelerated accumulation). It is at first independent of individual
consumption because it never enters the latter. But this consumption
definitely limits it nevertheless, since constant capital is never
produced for its own sake but solely because more of it is needed in
spheres of production whose products go into individual consumption.
However, this may go on undisturbed for some time, stimulated by
prospective demand, and in such branches, therefore, the business of
merchants and industrialists goes briskly forth. The crisis occurs when
the returns of merchants who sell in distant markets (or whose supplies
have also accumulated on the home market) become so slow and meagre that
the banks press for payment, or promissory notes for purchased
commodities become due before the latter have been resold. Then forced
sales take place, sales in order to meet payments. Then comes the crash,
which brings the illusory prosperity to an abrupt end.

But the superficiality and meaninglessness of the turnover of merchant's
capital are still greater, because the turnover of one and the same
merchant's capital may simultaneously or successively promote the
turnovers of several productive capitals.

The turnover of merchant's capital does not just promote the turnovers
of several industrial capitals, it can also expedite the opposite phases
of the metamorphosis of commodity-capital. For instance, the merchant
buys linen from the manufacturer and sells it to the bleacher. In this
case, therefore the turnover of the same merchant's capital — in fact,
the same C — M, a realisation of the linen — represents two opposite
phases for two different industrial capitals. Inasmuch as the merchant
sells for productive consumption, his C — M is always M — C for one
industrial capitalist, and his M — C always C — M for another industrial
capitalist.

If we leave out K, the circulation costs, as we do in this chapter, if,
in other words, we leave aside that portion of capital which the
merchant advances along with the money required to purchase commodities,
it follows that we also omit DK, the additional profit made on this
additional capital. This is thus the strictly logical and mathematically
correct mode of analysis if we want to see how profit and turnover of
merchant's capital affect prices.

If the price of production of 1 lb. of sugar were £1, the merchant could
buy 100 lbs. of sugar with £100. If he buys and sells this quantity in
the course of the year, and if the average annual rate of profit is 15%,
he would add £15 to the £100, and 3s. to £1, the price of production of
1 lb. of sugar. That is, he would sell 1 lb. of sugar at £1.3s. But if
the price of production of 1 lb. of sugar should fall to 1s., the
merchant could buy 2,000 lbs. of sugar with £100, and sell the sugar at
1s. 1 4/5d. per lb. The annual profit on capital invested in the sugar
business would still be £15 on each £100. But the merchant has to sell
100 lbs. in the first case, and 2,000 lbs. in the second. The high or
low level of the price of production has nothing to do with the rate of
profit. But it would greatly and decisively affect that aliquot part of
the selling price of each lb. of sugar, which resolves itself in
mercantile profit, _i.e._, the addition to the price which the merchant
makes on a certain quantity of commodities or products. If the price of
production of a commodity is small, so, too, the amount the merchant
advances in its purchase price, _i.e._, for a certain quantity of it.
Hence, with a given rate of profit, the amount of profit he makes on
this quantity of cheap commodities is small as well. Or, what amounts to
the same, he can then buy with a certain amount of capital, say, 100, a
larger quantity of these cheap commodities, and the total profit of 15,
which he makes per 100, breaks up into small fractions over each
individual piece or portion belonging to this mass of commodities. If
the opposite takes place, then the reverse is true. This depends
entirely on the greater or smaller productivity of the industrial
capital in whose products he trades. If we except the cases in which the
merchant is a monopolist and simultaneously monopolises production, as
did the Dutch East India Company in its day, nothing can be more
ridiculous than the current idea that it depends on the merchant whether
he sells many commodities at a small profit or few commodities at a
large profit on each individual piece of the commodities. The two limits
of his selling price are: on the one hand, the price of production of
the commodities, over which he has no control; on the other hand, the
average rate of profit, over which he has just as little control. The
only thing up to him to decide is whether he wants to deal in dear or in
cheap commodities, and even here the size of his available capital and
other circumstances also have their effect. Therefore, it depends wholly
on the degree of development of the capitalist mode of production, not
on the merchant's goodwill, what course he shall follow. A purely
commercial company like the old Dutch East India Company, which had a
monopoly of production, could fancy that it could continue a method
adapted at best to the beginnings of capitalist production, under
entirely changed conditions.^([1])

The following circumstances, among others, help to maintain that popular
prejudice, which, like all false conceptions of profit, etc., arises
from the observation of pure commerce and merchants' prejudice:

_First_: phenomena of competition, which, however, apply merely to the
distribution of mercantile profit among individual merchants, the
shareholders of the total merchant's capital; if one, for example, sells
cheaper, in order to drive his competitors off the field.

_Secondly_: an economist of the calibre of Professor Roscher may still
imagine in Leipzig that it was "common sense and humanitarian" [Roscher,
_Die Grundlagen der Nationalökonomie_, 3. Auflage, 1858, S. 192. —
_Ed._] grounds, which produced the change in selling prices, and that it
was not a result of a revolutionised mode of production.

_Thirdly_: if production prices fall due to greater productivity of
labour, and selling prices fall for the same reason, the demand, and
with it the market-prices, often rise even faster than the supply, so
that selling prices yield more than the average profit.

_Fourthly_: a merchant may reduce his selling price (which is never more
than a reduction of the usual profit that he adds to the price) so as to
turn over a larger capital more rapidly. All these are matters that only
concern competition between the merchants themselves.

We have already shown in Book I [English edition: Vol. 1, pp. 519-20. —
_Ed_]. that high or low commodity-prices do not determine either the
mass of surplus-value produced by a given capital, or the rate of
surplus-value; although the price of a commodity, and with it the share
of surplus-value in this price, are greater or smaller, depending on the
relative quantity of commodities produced by a given quantity of labour.
The prices of every specified quantity of a commodity are, so far as
they correspond to the values, determined by the total quantity of
labour incorporated in this commodity. If little labour is incorporated
in much commodity, the unit price of the commodity is low and the
surplus-value in it is small. How this labour incorporated in a
commodity breaks up into paid and unpaid labour and what portion of its
price, therefore, represents surplus-value, has nothing to do with this
total quantity of labour, nor, consequently, with the price of the
commodity. But the rate of surplus-value does not depend on the absolute
magnitude of the surplus-value contained in the unit price of the
commodity. It depends on its relative magnitude, its proportion to the
wages contained in the same commodity. The rate of surplus-value may
therefore be large, while the absolute magnitude of surplus-value in
each unit of the commodity is small. This absolute magnitude of
surplus-value in each piece of the commodity depends primarily on the
productivity of labour, and only secondarily on its division into paid
and unpaid labour.

Now, in the case of the commercial selling price, the price of
production is a given external precondition.

The high commercial commodity-prices in former times were due 1) to the
high prices of production, _i.e._, the unproductiveness of labour; 2) to
the absence of a general rate of profit, with merchant's capital
absorbing a much larger quota of surplus-value than would have fallen to
its share if capitals enjoyed greater general mobility. The ending of
this situation, in both its aspects, is therefore the result of the
development of the capitalist mode of production.

The turnovers of merchant's capital vary in duration, their annual
number consequently being greater or smaller, in different branches of
commerce. Within the same branch the turnover is more or less rapid in
the different phases of the economic cycle. Yet there is an average
number of turnovers, determined by experience.

We have already seen that the turnover of merchant's capital differs
from that of industrial capital. This is in the nature of things. One
single phase in the turnover of industrial capital appears as a complete
turnover of an independently constituted merchant's capital, or yet of
its part. It also stands in a different relation to profit and price
determination.

In the case of industrial capital, its turnover expresses, on the one
hand, the periodicity of reproduction, and, therefore, the mass of
commodities thrown on the market in a certain period depends on it. On
the other hand, its time of circulation creates a barrier, an extensible
one, and exerts more or less of a restraint on the creation of value and
surplus-value, because it affects the volume of the production process.
The turnover, therefore, acts as a determining element on the mass of
annually produced surplus-value, and hence on the formation of the
general rate of profit, but it acts as a limiting, rather than positive,
element. For merchant's capital, on the contrary, the average rate of
profit is a given magnitude. The merchant's capital does not directly
participate in creating profit or surplus-value, and joins in shaping
the general rate of profit only in so far as it draws a dividend
proportionate to its share in the total capital, out of the mass of
profit produced by industrial capital.

The greater the number of turnovers of an industrial capital under
conditions described in Book II, Part II, the greater the mass of profit
it creates. True, through the formation of a general rate of profit, the
total profit is distributed among the different capitals not in
proportion to their actual part in its production, but in proportion to
the aliquot part they make up of the total capital, _i.e._, in
proportion to their magnitude. But this does not alter the essence of
the matter. The greater the number of turnovers of the total industrial
capital, the greater the mass of profits, the mass of annually produced
surplus-value, and, therefore, other circumstances remaining unchanged,
the rate of profit. It is different with merchant's capital. The rate of
profit is a given magnitude with respect to it, determined on the one
hand by the mass of profit produced by industrial capital, and on the
other by the relative magnitude of the total merchant's capital, by its
quantitative relation to the sum of capital advanced in the processes of
production and circulation. The number of its turnovers does, indeed,
decisively affect its relation to the total capital, or the relative
magnitude of merchant's capital required for the circulation, for it is
evident that the absolute magnitude of the required merchant's capital
and the velocity of its turnovers stand in inverse proportion. But, all
other conditions remaining equal, the relative magnitude of merchant's
capital, or the part it makes up of the total capital, is determined by
its absolute magnitude. If the total capital is 10,000, and the
merchant's capital 1/10 of that sum, it is = 1,000; if the total capital
is 1,000, then 1/10 of it = 100. The absolute magnitude of merchant's
capital varies, depending on the magnitude of the total capital,
although its relative magnitude remains the same. But here we assume
that its relative magnitude, say, 1/10 of the total capital, is given.
This relative magnitude, however, is again determined by the turnover.
If it is turned over rapidly, its absolute magnitude, for example, will
= £1,000 in the first case, = 100 in the second, and hence its relative
magnitude = 1/10. With a slower turnover its absolute magnitude is, say,
= 2,000 in the first case, and = 200 in the second. Its relative
magnitude will then have increased from 1/10 to 1/5 of the total
capital. Circumstances which reduce the average turnover of merchant's
capital, like the development of means of transportation, for instance,
reduce _pro tanto_ the absolute magnitude of merchant's capital, and
thereby increase the general rate of profit. If the opposite takes
place, then the reverse is true. A developed capitalist mode of
production, compared with earlier conditions, exerts a two-fold
influence on merchant's capital. On the one hand, the same quantity of
commodities is turned over with a smaller mass of actually functioning
merchant's capital; owing to the more rapid turnover of merchant's
capital, and the more rapid reproduction process, on which this depends,
the relation of merchant's capital to industrial capital diminishes. On
the other hand, with the development of the capitalist mode of
production all production becomes the production of commodities, which
places all products into the hands of agents of circulation. It is to be
added that under the previous mode of production, which produced on a
small scale, a very large portion of the producers sold their goods
directly to the consumers, or worked on their personal orders, save for
the mass of products consumed directly, in kind, by the producer
himself, and the mass of services performed in kind. While, therefore,
under former modes of production commercial capital was greater in
relation to the commodity-capital which it turned over, it was:

1) absolutely smaller, because a disproportionately smaller part of the
total product was produced as commodities, and passed as
commodity-capital into circulation, falling into the hands of merchants.
It was smaller, because the commodity-capital was smaller. But at the
same time it was proportionately larger, not only because its turnover
was slower and not only in relation to the mass of commodities turned
over by it. It was larger also because the price of this mass of
commodities, and hence the merchant's capital to be advanced for it,
were greater than under capitalist production on account of a lower
productivity of labour, so that the same value was incorporated in a
smaller mass of commodities.

2) It is not only that a larger mass of commodities is produced on the
basis of capitalist production (taking into account also the reduced
value of this mass of commodities), but the same mass of products, for
instance, of corn, also forms a greater commodity mass, _i.e._, more and
more of it becomes an object of commerce. As a consequence, there is an
increase not only of the mass of merchant's capital, but of all capital
applied in circulation, such as in marine shipping, railways, telegraph,
etc.

3) However, and this is an aspect which belongs to the discussion of
"competition among capitals": idle or only half-functioning merchant's
capital grows with the progress of the capitalist mode of production,
with the ease of entering retail trade, with speculation, and the
redundance of released capital.

But, assuming the relative magnitude of merchant's capital to total
capital to be given, the difference of turnovers in the various branches
of commerce does not affect either the magnitude of the total profit
falling to the share of merchant's capital, or the general rate of
profit. The merchant's profit is not determined by the mass of
commodity-capital turned over by him, but by the dimensions of the
money-capital advanced by him to promote this turnover. If the general
annual rate of profit is 15%, and the merchant advances £100, which he
turns over once a year, he will sell his commodities at 115. If his
capital turns over five times a year, he will sell a commodity-capital
he bought at 100 at 103 five times a year, hence in a year a
commodity-capital of 500 at 515. This gives the same annual profit of 15
on his advanced capital of 100. If this were not so, merchant's capital
would yield a much higher profit, proportionate to the number of its
turnovers, than industrial capital, which would be in conflict with the
law of the general rate of profit.

Hence, the number of turnovers of merchant's capital in the various
branches of commerce has a direct influence on the mercantile prices of
commodities. The amount added to the mercantile price, the aliquot part
of mercantile profit of a given capital, which falls upon the price of
production of a commodity, is in inverse proportion to the number of
turnovers, or the velocity of turnover, of merchants' capitals in the
various lines of commerce. If a certain merchant's capital is turned
over five times a year, it will add to a commodity-capital of equal
value but 1/5 of what another merchant's capital, which turns over just
once a year, adds to a commodity-capital of equal value.

The modification of selling prices by the average period of turnover of
capitals in different branches of commerce amounts to this: The same
mass of profits, determined for any given magnitude of merchant's
capital by the general annual rate of profit, hence determined
independently of the specific character of the commercial operations of
this capital, is differently distributed — proportionately to the rate
of turnover — over masses of commodities of equal value, so that, for
instance, if a merchant's capital is turned over five times a year, 15/5
= 3% if once a year, 15%, is added to the price of the commodities.

The same percentage of commercial profit in different branches of
commerce, therefore, increases the selling prices of commodities by
quite different percentages of their values, all depending on their
periods of turnover.

On the other hand, in the case of industrial capital, the period of
turnover does not in any way affect the magnitude of the value of
individual commodities produced, although it does affect the mass of
values and surplus-values produced in a given time by a given capital,
because it affects the mass of exploited labour. This is concealed, to
be sure, and seems to be otherwise as soon as one turns to prices of
production. But this is due solely to the fact that, according to
previously analysed laws, the prices of production of various
commodities deviate from their values. If we look upon the process of
production as a whole, and upon the mass of commodities produced by the
total industrial capital, we shall at once find the general law
vindicated.

While, therefore, a closer inspection of the influence of the period of
turnover on the formation of values by industrial capital leads us back
to the general law and to the basis of political economy, that the
values of commodities are determined by the labour-time contained in
them, the influence of the turnovers of merchant's capital on mercantile
prices reveals phenomena which, without benefit of a very far-reaching
analysis of the connecting links, seem to point to a purely arbitrary
determination of prices; namely, that they are fixed by a capital simply
bent upon pocketing a certain quantity of profit in a year. Due
particularly to this influence of turnovers, it appears that within
certain limits the process of circulation as such determines
commodity-prices independently of the process of production. All
superficial and false conceptions of the process of reproduction as a
whole are derived from examinations of merchant's capital and from the
conceptions which its peculiar movements call forth in the minds of
circulation agents.

If, as the reader will have realised to his great dismay, the analysis
of the actual intrinsic relations of the capitalist process of
production is a very complicated matter and very extensive; if it is a
work of science to resolve the visible, merely external movement into
the true intrinsic movement, it is self-evident that conceptions which
arise about the laws of production in the minds of agents of capitalist
production and circulation will diverge drastically from these real laws
and will merely be the conscious expression of the visible movements.
The conceptions of the merchant, stockbroker, and banker, are
necessarily quite distorted. Those of the manufacturers are vitiated by
the acts of circulation to which their capital is subject, and by the
levelling of the general rate of profit. ^([2]) Competition likewise
assumes a completely distorted role in their minds. If the limits of
value and surplus-value are given, it is easy to grasp how competition
of capitals transforms values into prices of production and further into
mercantile prices, and surplus-value into average profit. But without
these limits, it is absolutely unintelligible why competition should
reduce the general rate of profit to one level instead of another,
_e.g._, make it 15% instead of 1,500%. Competition can at best only
reduce the general rate of profit to _one_ level. But it contains no
element by which it could determine this level itself.

From the standpoint of merchant's capital, therefore, it is the turnover
which appears to determine prices. On the other hand, while the rate of
turnover of industrial capital, in so far as it enables a certain
capital to exploit more or less labour, exerts a determining and
limiting influence on the mass of profit, and thus on the general rate
of profit, this rate of profit obtains for merchant's capital as an
external fact, its internal connection with the production of
surplus-value being entirely obliterated. If, under otherwise equal
circumstances and particularly the same organic composition, the same
industrial capital is turned over four times a year instead of twice, it
produces twice as much surplus-value and, consequently, profit. And this
is apparent as soon, and as long, as this capital has a monopoly on an
improved method of production, which makes this accelerated turnover
possible. Conversely, differences in the periods of turnover in
different branches of commerce manifest themselves in the fact that
profit made on the turnover of a given commodity-capital is in inverse
proportion to the number of times the money-capital turns over this
commodity-capital. Small profits and quick returns appear to the
shopkeeper to be the principle which he follows out of sheer principle.

For the rest, it is self-evident that regardless of alternating,
mutually compensating, speedier and slower turnovers, this law of
turnover of merchant's capital holds good in each branch of commerce
only for the average turnovers made by the entire merchant's capital
invested in each particular branch. The capital of A, who deals in the
same branch as B, may make more or less than the average number of
turnovers. In this case the others make less or more. This does not
alter the turnover of the total mass of merchant's capital invested in
this line. But it is of decisive moment for the individual merchant or
shopkeeper. In this case he makes an extra profit, just as industrial
capitalists make extra profits if they produce under better than average
conditions. If competition compels him, he can sell cheaper than his
competitors without lowering his profit below the average. If the
conditions which would enable him to turn over his capital more rapidly,
are themselves for sale, such as a favourable shop location, he can pay
extra rent for it, _i.e._, convert a portion of his surplus-profit into
ground-rent.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. "Profit, on the general principle, is always the same, whatever be
price; keeping its place like an incumbent body on the swelling or
sinking tide. As, therefore, prices rise, a tradesman raises price; as
prices fall, a tradesman lowers price." (Corbet, _An Inquiry into the
Causes, etc., of the Wealth of Individuals_, London, 1841, p. 20.) Here,
as in the text generally; it is only a matter of ordinary commerce, not
of speculation. The analysis of speculation, as well as everything else
pertaining to the division of mercantile capital, falls outside the
field of our inquiry. "The profit of trade is a value added to capital
which is independent of price, the second" (speculation) "is founded on
the variation in the value of capital or in price itself" (1. c., p.
128).

2. This is a very naive, but also a very correct remark: "Surely the
fact that one and the same commodity may be had from different sellers
at considerably different prices is frequently due to mistakes of
calculation." (Feller and Odermann, _Das Ganze der kaufmännischen
Arithmetik_, 7th ed., 1859, S.451.) This shows how purely theoretical,
that is, abstract, becomes the determination of prices.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 19. Money-Dealing Capital

 

The purely technical movements performed by money in the circulation
process of industrial, and, as we may now add, of commercial capital
(since it takes over a part of the circulation movement of industrial
capital as its own, peculiar movement), if individualised as a function
of some particular capital performing just these, and only these,
operations as its specific operations, convert this capital into
money-dealing capital. A portion of industrial capital, and, more
precisely, also of commercial capital, not only obtains all the time in
the form of money, as money-capital in general, but as money-capital
engaged precisely in these technical functions. A definite part of the
total capital dissociates itself from the rest and stands apart in the
form of money-capital, whose capitalist function consists exclusively in
performing these operations for the entire class of industrial and
commercial capitalists. As in the case of commercial capital, a portion
of industrial capital engaged in the circulation process in the form of
money-capital separates from the rest and performs these operations of
the reproduction process for all the other capital. The movements of
this money-capital are, therefore, once more merely movements of an
individualised part of industrial capital engaged in the reproduction
process.

It is only when, and in so far as, capital is newly invested — which
also applies to accumulation — that capital in money-form appears as the
starting-point and the end result of the movement. But for all capitals
already engaged in the process, these first and last points appear
merely as points of transit. Since, as already seen in the case of
simple commodity-circulation, from the moment of leaving the sphere of
production to the moment of its re-entry industrial capital undergoes
the metamorphosis C' — M — C, M in fact represents the end result of one
phase of the metamorphosis, just to become the starting-point of the
reverse phase, which supplements it. And although the C — M of
industrial capital is always M — C — M for merchant's capital, the
actual process for the latter is continually also C — M — C once it has
begun to function. But it performs the acts C — M and M — C
simultaneously. This is to say that there is not just _one_ capital in
the stage C — M while another is in the stage M — C, but that the same
capital buys continually and sells continually at one and the same time
because of the continuity of the production process. It is to be found
always in both stages at one and the same time. While one of its parts
turns into money, later to be reconverted into commodities, another
turns simultaneously into commodities, to be reconverted into money.

It all depends on the form of the commodity exchange whether the money
serves here as a means of circulation or of payment. In both cases the
capitalist has to pay out money constantly to many persons, and to
receive money continually from many persons. This purely technical
operation of disbursing and receiving money is in itself labour which,
as long as the money serves as a means of payment, necessitates drawing
up payment balances and acts of balancing accounts. This labour is a
cost of circulation, _i.e._, not labour creating value. It is shortened
in being carried out by a special section of agents, or capitalists, for
the rest of the capitalist class.

A definite portion of the capital must be on hand constantly as a hoard,
as potential money-capital — a reserve of means of purchase, a reserve
of means of payment, and idle capital in the form of money waiting to be
put to work. Another portion streams back continually in this form.
Aside from collecting, paying, and book-keeping, this entails
safekeeping the hoard, which is an operation all in itself. It is,
indeed, a continuous conversion of the hoard into means of circulation
and means of payment, and its restoration by means of money secured
through sales and from payments due. This constant movement of the part
of capital existing as money, dissociated from the function of capital
itself, this purely technical function, causes its own labour and
expense, classified as costs of circulation.

The division of labour brings it about that these technical operations,
dependent upon the functions of capital, should be performed for the
entire capitalist class as much as possible by a special section of
agents or capitalists as their exclusive function — or that these
operations should be concentrated in their hands. We have here, as in
merchant's capital, division of labour in a two-fold sense. It becomes a
specialised business, and because performed as a specialised business
for the money-mechanism of the whole class, it is concentrated and
conducted on a large scale. A further division of labour takes place
within it, both through division into various independent branches, and
through segmentation of work within these branches (large offices,
numerous book-keepers and cashiers, and far-reaching division of
labour). Paying and receiving money, settling accounts, keeping current
accounts, storing money, etc. — all this, dissociated from the acts
necessitating these technical operations, makes money-dealing capital of
the capital advanced for these functions.

The various operations, whose individualisation into specific businesses
gives rise to the money trade, spring from the different purposes of
money itself and from its functions, which capital in its money-form
must therefore likewise carry out.

I have pointed out earlier that finance developed originally from the
exchange of products between different communities. ^([1])

Trading in money, commerce in the money-commodity, first developed
therefore out of international commerce. Ever since different national
coins have existed merchants buying in foreign countries have had to
exchange their national coins for local coins, and vice versa, or to
exchange different coins for uncoined pure silver or gold — the
world-money. Hence the exchange business which is to be regarded as one
of the natural foundations of modern finance.^([2]) Out of it developed
banks of exchange, in which silver (or gold) serves as world-money — now
called bank money or commercial money — as distinct from currency.
Exchange transactions, in the sense of mere notes of payment to
travellers from a money-changer in one country to a changer in another
country, developed back in Rome and Greece out of the actual
money-changing.

Trading in gold and silver as commodities (raw materials for the making
of luxury articles) is the natural basis of the bullion trade, or the
trade which acts as a medium for the functions of money as universal
money. These functions, as previously explained (Buch I, Kap. III, 3, c
[ English edition: Ch. III, 3, c. _— Ed._]), are two-fold: currency
movement back and forth between the various national spheres of
circulation in order to balance international payments and in connection
with the migrations of capital in quest of interest; simultaneously,
flow of precious metals from their sources of production via the
world-market and their distribution among the various national spheres
of circulation. Goldsmiths acted as bankers still during the greater
part of the 17th century in England. We shall completely disregard the
way in which the balancing of international accounts developed further
in the bill jobbing, etc., and everything referring to transactions in
valuable papers; in short, we shall leave out of consideration all
special forms of the credit system, which do not as yet concern us here.

National money discards its local character in the capacity of universal
money; one national currency is expressed in another, and thus all of
them are finally reduced to their content of gold or silver, while the
latter, being the two commodities circulating as world-money, are
simultaneously reduced to their reciprocal value-ratio, which changes
continually. It is this intermediate operation which the money trader
makes his special occupation. Money-changing and the bullion trade are
thus the original forms of the money trade, and spring from the two-fold
functions of money — as national money and world-money.

The capitalist process of production, just as commerce in general, even
under pre-capitalist methods, imply:

_First_, the accumulation of money as a hoard, _i.e._, here as that part
of capital which must always be on hand in the form of money as a
reserve fund of means of payment and purchase. This is the first form of
a hoard, as it reappears under the capitalist mode of production, and as
it appears generally with the development of merchant's capital, at
least for the purposes of this capital. Both remarks apply to national,
as well as international, circulation. The hoard is in continuous flux,
pours ceaselessly into circulation, and returns ceaselessly from it. The
second form of a hoard is that of idle, temporarily unemployed capital
in the shape of money, including newly accumulated and not yet invested
money-capital. The functions entailed by this formation of a hoard are
primarily those of safekeeping, bookkeeping, etc.

_Secondly_, however, this involves outlays of money for purchases,
collecting money from sales, making and receiving payments, balancing
payments, etc. The money-dealer performs all these services at first as
a simple _cashier_ of the merchants and industrial capitalists. ^([3])

The money trade becomes fully developed, even in its first stages, as
soon as its ordinary functions are supplemented by lending and borrowing
and by credit. Of this more in the next part, which deals with
interest-bearing capital.

The bullion trade itself, the transfer of gold or silver from one
country to another, is merely the result of trading in commodities. It
is determined by the rate of exchange which expresses the standing of
international payments and the interest rates in the different markets.
The bullion trader as such acts merely as an intermediary of the
results.

In discussing money and the way its movements and forms develop out of
simple commodity-circulation, we saw (Book 1 Ch. III) that the movements
of the mass of money circulating as means of purchase and payment depend
on the metamorphosis of commodities, on the volume and velocity of this
metamorphosis, which we now know to be but a phase in the entire process
of reproduction. As for securing the money materials — gold and silver —
from their sources of production, this resolves itself into a direct
exchange of commodities, an exchange of gold and silver as commodities
for other commodities. Hence, it is itself as much a phase of the
exchange of commodities as the securing of iron or other metals.
However, so far as the movement of precious metals on the world-market
is concerned (we here leave aside movements expressing the transfer of
capital by loans — a type of transfer which also obtains in the shape of
commodity-capital), it is quite as much determined by the international
exchange of commodities as the movement of money as a national means of
purchase and payment is determined by the exchange of commodities in the
home market. The inflow and outflow of precious metals from one national
sphere of circulation to another, inasmuch as this is caused merely by a
depreciation of the national currency, or by a double standard, are
alien to money circulation as such and merely represent corrections of
deviations brought about arbitrarily by state decrees. Finally, as
concerns the formations of hoards which constitute reserve funds for
means of purchase and payment, be it for home or foreign trade, and
which also merely represent a form of temporarily idle capital, they are
in both cases necessary precipitates of the circulation process.

If the entire circulation of money is in volume, form and movement
purely a result of commodity-circulation, which, in its turn, from the
capitalist point of view, is only the circulation process of capital
(also embracing the exchange of capital for revenue, and of revenue for
revenue, so far as outlay of revenue is effected through retail trade),
it is self-evident that dealing in money does not merely promote the
circulation of money, a mere result and phenomenon of
commodity-circulation. This circulation of money itself, a phase in
commodity-circulation, is taken for granted in money-dealing. What the
latter promotes is merely the technical operations of money circulation
which it concentrates, shortens, and simplifies. Dealing in money does
not form the hoards. It provides the technical means by which the
formation of hoards may, so far as it is voluntary (hence, not an
expression of unemployed capital or of disturbances in the reproduction
process), be reduced to its economic minimum because, if managed for the
capitalist class as a whole, the reserve funds of means of purchase and
payment need not be as large as they would have to be if each capitalist
were to manage his own. The money-dealers do not buy the precious
metals. They merely handle their distribution as soon as the commodity
trade has bought them. They facilitate the settling of balances,
inasmuch as money serves as the means of payment, and reduce through the
artificial mechanism of these settlements the amount of money required
for this purpose. But they do not determine either the connections, or
the volume, of the mutual payments. The bills of exchange and the
cheques, for instance, which are exchanged for one another in banks and
clearing houses, represent quite independent transactions and are the
results of given operations, and it is merely a question of a better
technical settlement of these results. So far as money circulates as a
means of purchase, the volume and number of purchases and sales have no
connection whatever with money-dealing. The latter can do no more than
shorten the technical operations that go with buying and selling, and
thus reduce the amount of cash money required to turn over the
commodities.

Money-dealing in its pure form, which we consider here, _i.e_., set
apart from the credit system, is thus concerned only with the technique
of a certain phase of commodity-circulation, namely, that of money
circulation and the different functions of money arising in its
circulation.

This substantially distinguishes dealing in money from the dealing in
commodities, which promotes the metamorphosis of commodities and their
exchange, or even gives this process of the commodity-capital the
appearance of a process of a capital set apart from industrial capital.
While, therefore, commercial capital has its own form of circulation, M
— C — M, in which the commodity changes hands twice and thus provides a
reflux of money, as distinct from C — M — C, in which money changes
hands twice and thus promotes commodity exchange, there is no such
special form in the case of money-dealing capital.

In so far as money-capital is advanced by a separate class of
capitalists in this technical promotion of money circulation — a capital
which on a reduced scale represents the additional capital the merchants
and industrial capitalists would otherwise have to advance themselves
for these purposes — the general form of capital, M — M', occurs here as
well. By advancing M, the advancing capitalist secures M + ΔM. But
promotion of M — M' does not here concern the material, but only the
technical, processes of the metamorphosis.

It is evident that the mass of money-capital with which the
money-dealers operate is the money-capital of merchants and industrial
capitalists in the process of circulation, and that the money-dealers'
operations are actually operations of merchants and industrial
capitalists, in which they act as middlemen.

It is equally evident that the money-dealers' profit is nothing but a
deduction from the surplus-value, since they operate with already
realised values (even when realised in the form of creditors' claims).

Just as in the commodity trade, there is a duplication of functions,
because a part of the technical operations connected with money
circulation must be carried out by the dealers and producers of
commodities themselves.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. _Zur Kritik der politischen Oekonomie,_ S. 27.

2. "The great differences among coins as concerns their grain and
coinage by many princes and towns that were privileged to coin money,
necessitated the creation of business establishments to enable merchants
to use local money wherever compensation for the different coins was
required. To be able to make cash payments, merchants who travelled to a
foreign market provided themselves with uncoined pure silver, or gold.
In the same way they exchanged money received in local markets for
uncoined silver or gold when returning home. The business of exchanging
money, the exchange of uncoined precious metals for local coins, and
vice versa, thus became a widespread and paying business." (Hüllmann,
_Städtewesen des Mittelalters._ Bonn, 1826-29, I, S. 437-38.) "Banks of
exchange do not owe their name to the fact that they issue bills of
exchange... but to the fact that they used to exchange coins. Long
before the establishment of the Amsterdam Bank of Exchange in 1609,
there existed in the Dutch merchant towns money-changers and exchange
houses, even exchange banks ... The business of these money-changers
consisted in exchanging the numerous varieties of coin brought into the
country by foreign traders for the currency of the realm. Gradually
their circle of activity extended ... They became the bankers and
cashiers of their times. But the government of Amsterdam viewed as
dangerous the combination of cashier and exchange businesses, and to
meet this danger it was resolved to establish a large chartered
institution able to perform both the cashier and exchange operations.
This institution was the famous Amsterdam Bank of Exchange of 1609. In
like manner, the exchange banks of Venice, Genoa, Stockholm, Hamburg,
owe their origin to the continual necessity of changing money. Of all
these, the Hamburg Exchange is the only one today still doing business,
because the need for such an institution is still felt in that
merchants' town, which has no Mint of its own, etc." (S. Vissering,
_Handboek van Praktische Staathuishoudkunde,_ Amsterdam, 1860-61, I,
247-48.)

3. "The institution of cashier has probably nowhere preserved its
original independent character so pure as in the Dutch merchant towns"
(cf. on the origin of the cashier business in Amsterdam. E. Lusac,
_Holland's Rykdom,_ Part III). "Its functions coincide in part with
those of the old Amsterdam Bank of Exchange. The cashier receives from
the merchants, who employ his services, a certain amount of money, for
which he opens a 'credit' for them in his books. Later, they send him
their claims, which he collects for them and credits to their account.
At the same time, he makes payments on their drafts _(kassiers briefes)_
and charges the amounts to their account. He makes a small charge for
these receipts and payments, which yields him a remuneration for his
labours only corresponding to the size of the turnover accomplished
between the two parties. If payments are to be balanced between two
merchants, who both deal with the same cashier, such payments are
settled very simply by mutual entries in the books, for the cashiers
balance their mutual claims from day to day. The cashier's actual
business thus consists basically of this mediation in payments.
Therefore, it excludes industrial enterprises, speculation, and opening
of unlimited credits; for it must be the rule in this business that the
cashier makes no payment over and above the credit of any one keeping an
account with him." (Vissering, _loc. cit_., p. 434.) Re the banking
associations of Venice: "The requirements and locality of Venice, where
carrying bullion was less convenient than in other places, induced the
large merchants of that city to found banking associations under due
safeguards, supervision and management. Members of such associations
deposited certain sums, on which they drew drafts for their creditors,
whereupon the paid sum was deducted from the debtor's account on the
page of the book reserved for that purpose and added to the sum credited
in the same book to the creditor. This is the earliest beginning of the
so-called giro banks. These associations are indeed old. But if
attributed to the 12th century, they are being confounded with the State
Loan Institute established in 1171." (Hüllmann, _Loc. cit.,_ pp.
453-54.)

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 20. Historical Facts about Merchant's Capital

 

The particular form in which commercial and money-dealing capitals
accumulate money will be discussed in the next part.

It is self-evident from what has gone before that nothing could be more
absurd than to regard merchant's capital, whether in the shape of
commercial or of money-dealing capital, as a particular variety of
industrial capital, such as, say, mining, agriculture, cattle-raising,
manufacturing, transport, etc., which are side lines of industrial
capital occasioned by the division of social labour, and hence different
spheres of investment. The simple observation that in the circulation
phase of its reproduction process every industrial capital performs as
commodity-capital and as money-capital the very functions which appear
as the exclusive functions of the two forms of merchant's capital,
should rule out such a crude notion. On the other hand, in commercial
and money-dealing capital the differences between industrial capital as
productive capital and the same capital in the sphere of circulation are
individualised through the fact that the definite forms and functions
which capital assumes for the moment appear as independent forms and
functions of a separate portion of the capital and are exclusively bound
up with it. The transmuted form of industrial capital and the material
differences between productive capitals applied in different branches of
industry, which arise from the nature of these various branches, are
worlds apart.

Aside from the crudity with which the economist generally considers
distinctions of form, which really concern him only from their
substantive side, this misconception by the vulgar economist is
explained on two additional counts. First, his inability to explain the
peculiar nature of mercantile profit; and, secondly, his apologetic
endeavours to deduce commodity-capital and money-capital, and later
commercial capital and money-dealing capital as forms arising
necessarily from the process of production as such, whereas they are due
to the specific form of the capitalist mode of production, which above
all presupposes the circulation of commodities, and hence of money, as
its basis.

If commercial capital and money-dealing capital do not differ from grain
production any more than this differs from cattle-raising and
manufacturing, it is plain as day that production and capitalist
production are altogether identical, and that, among other things, the
distribution of the social products among the members of a society, be
it for productive or individual consumption, must just as consistently
be handled by merchants and bankers as the consumption of meat by
cattle-raising and that of clothing by their manufacture. ^([1])

The great economists, such as Smith, Ricardo, etc., are perplexed over
mercantile capital being a special variety, since they consider the
basic form of capital, capital as industrial capital, and circulation
capital (commodity-capital and money-capital) solely because it is a
phase in the reproduction process of every capital. The rules concerning
the formation of value, profit, etc., immediately deduced by them from
their study of industrial capital, do not extend directly to merchant's
capital. For this reason, they leave merchant's capital entirely aside
and mention it only as a kind of industrial capital. Wherever they make
a special analysis of it, as Ricardo does in dealing with foreign trade,
they seek to demonstrate that it creates no value (and consequently no
surplus-value). But whatever is true of foreign trade, is also true of
home trade.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Hitherto we have considered merchant's capital merely from the
standpoint, and within the limits, of the capitalist mode of production.
However, not commerce alone, but also merchant's capital, is older than
the capitalist mode of production, is, in fact, historically the oldest
free state of existence of capital.

Since we have already seen that money-dealing and the capital advanced
for it require nothing more for their development than the existence of
wholesale commerce, and further of commercial capital, it is only the
latter which we must occupy ourselves with here.

Since merchant's capital is penned in the sphere of circulation, and
since its function consists exclusively of promoting the exchange of
commodities, it requires no other conditions for its existence — aside
from the undeveloped forms arising from direct barter — outside those
necessary for the simple circulation of commodities and money. Or
rather, the latter is the condition of _its_ existence. No matter what
the basis on which products are produced, which are thrown into
circulation as commodities — whether the basis of the primitive
community, of slave production, of small peasant and petty bourgeois, or
the capitalist basis, the character of products as commodities is not
altered, and as commodities they must pass through the process of
exchange and its attendant changes of form. The extremes between which
merchant's capital acts as mediator exist for it as given, just as they
are given for money and for its movements. The only necessary thing is
that these extremes should be on hand as commodities, regardless of
whether production is wholly a production of commodities, or whether
only the surplus of the independent producers' immediate needs,
satisfied by their own production, is thrown on the market. Merchant's
capital promotes only the movements of these extremes, of these
commodities, which are preconditions of its own existence.

The extent to which products enter trade and go through the merchants'
hands depends on the mode of production, and reaches its maximum in the
ultimate development of capitalist production, where the product is
produced solely as a commodity, and not as a direct means of
subsistence. On the other hand, on the basis of every mode of
production, trade facilitates the production of surplus-products
destined for exchange, in order to increase the enjoyments, or the
wealth, of the producers (here meant are the owners of the products).
Hence, commerce imparts to production a character directed more and more
towards exchange-value.

The metamorphosis of commodities, their movement, consists 1)
materially, of the exchange of different commodities for one another,
and 2) formally, of the conversion of commodities into money by sale,
and of money into commodities by purchase. And the function of
merchant's capital resolves itself into these very acts of buying and
selling commodities. It therefore merely promotes the exchange of
commodities; yet this exchange is not to be conceived at the outset as a
bare exchange of commodities between direct producers. Under slavery,
feudalism and vassalage (so far as primitive communities are concerned)
it is the slave-owner, the feudal lord, the tribute-collecting state,
who are the owners, hence sellers, of the products. The merchant buys
and sells for many. Purchases and sales are concentrated in his hands
and consequently are no longer bound to the direct requirements of the
buyer (as merchant).

But whatever the social organisation of the spheres of production whose
commodity exchange the merchant promotes, his wealth exists always in
the form of money, and his money always serves as capital. Its form is
always M — C — M'. Money, the independent form of exchange-value, is the
point of departure, and increasing the exchange-value an end in itself.
Commodity exchange as such and the operations effecting it — separated
from production and performed by non-producers — are just a means of
increasing wealth not as mere wealth, but as wealth in its most
universal social form, as exchange-value. The compelling motive and
determining purpose are the conversion of M into M + ΔM. The
transactions M — C and C — M', which promote M — M', appear merely as
stages of transition in this conversion of M into M + ΔM. This M — C —
M', the characteristic movement of merchant's capital, distinguishes it
from C — M — C, trade in commodities directly between producers, which
has for its ultimate end the exchange of use-values.

The less developed the production, the more wealth in money is
concentrated in the hands of merchants or appears in the specific form
of merchants' wealth.

Within the capitalist mode of production — _i.e._, as soon as capital
has established its sway over production and imparted to it a wholly
changed and specific form — merchant's capital appears merely as a
capital with a _specific_ function. In all previous modes of production,
and all the more, wherever production ministers to the immediate wants
of the producer, merchant's capital appears to perform the function _par
excellence_ of capital.

There is, therefore, not the least difficulty in understanding why
merchant's capital appears as the historical form of capital long before
capital established its own domination over production. Its existence
and development to a certain level are in themselves historical premises
for the development of capitalist production 1) as premises for the
concentration of money wealth, and 2) because the capitalist mode of
production presupposes production for trade, selling on a large scale,
and not to the individual customer, hence also a merchant who does not
buy to satisfy his personal wants but concentrates the purchases of many
buyers in his one purchase. On the other hand, all development of
merchant's capital tends to give production more and more the character
of production for exchange-value and to turn products more and more into
commodities. Yet its development, as we shall presently see, is
incapable by itself of promoting and explaining the transition from one
mode of production to another.

Within capitalist production merchant's capital is reduced from its
former independent existence to a special phase in the investment of
capital, and the levelling of profits reduces its rate of profit to the
general average. It functions only as an agent of productive capital.
The special social conditions that take shape with the development of
merchant's capital, are here no longer paramount. On the contrary,
wherever merchant's capital still predominates we find backward
conditions. This is true even within one and the same country, in which,
for instance, the specifically merchant towns present far more striking
analogies with past conditions than industrial towns.^([2])

The independent and predominant development of capital as merchant's
capital is tantamount to the non-subjection of production to capital,
and hence to capital developing on the basis of an alien social mode of
production which is also independent of it. The independent development
of merchant's capital, therefore, stands in inverse proportion to the
general economic development of society.

Independent mercantile wealth as a predominant form of capital
represents the separation of the circulation process from its extremes,
and these extremes are the exchanging producers themselves. They remain
independent of the circulation process, just as the latter remains
independent of them. The product becomes a commodity by way of commerce.
It is commerce which here turns products into commodities, not the
produced commodity which by its movements gives rise to commerce. Thus,
capital appears here first as capital in the process of circulation. It
is in the circulation process that money develops into capital. It is in
circulation that products first develop as exchange-values, as
commodities and as money. Capital can, and must, form in the process of
circulation, before it learns to control its extremes — the various
spheres of production between which circulation mediates. Money and
commodity circulation can mediate between spheres of production of
widely different organisation, whose internal structure is still chiefly
adjusted to the output of use-values. This individualisation of the
circulation process, in which spheres of production are interconnected
by means of a third, has a two-fold significance. On the one hand, that
circulation has not as yet established a hold on production, but is
related to it as to a given premise. On the other hand, that the
production process has not as yet absorbed circulation as a mere phase
of production. Both, however, are the case in capitalist production. The
production process rests wholly upon circulation, and circulation is a
mere transitional phase of production, in which the product created as a
commodity is realised and its elements of production, likewise created
as commodities, are replaced. That form of capital — merchant's capital
— which developed directly out of circulation appears here merely as one
of the forms of capital occurring in its reproduction process.

The law that the independent development of merchant's capital is
inversely proportional to the degree of development of capitalist
production is particularly evident in the history of the carrying trade,
as among the Venetians, Genoese, Dutch, etc., where the principal gains
were not thus made by exporting domestic products, but by promoting the
exchange of products of commercially and otherwise economically
undeveloped societies, and by exploiting both producing countries.^([3])
Here, merchant's capital is in its pure form, separated from the
extremes — the spheres of production between which it mediates. This is
the main source of its development. But this monopoly of the carrying
trade disintegrates, and with it this trade itself, proportionately to
the economic development of the peoples, whom it exploits at both ends
of its course, and whose lack of development was the basis of its
existence. In the case of the carrying trade this appears not only as
the decline of a special branch of commerce, but also that of the
predominance of the purely trading nations, and of their commercial
wealth in general, which rested upon the carrying trade. This is but a
special form, in which is expressed the subordination of merchants to
industrial capital with the advance of capitalist production. The
behaviour of merchant's capital wherever it rules over production is
strikingly illustrated not only by the colonial economy (the so-called
colonial system) in general, but quite specifically by the methods of
the old Dutch East India Company.

Since the movement of merchant's capital is M — C — M', the merchant's
profit is made, first, in acts which occur only within the circulation
process, hence in the two acts of buying and selling; and, secondly, it
is realised in the last act, the sale. It is therefore profit upon
alienation. _Prima facie,_ a pure and independent commercial profit
seems impossible so long as products are sold at their value. To buy
cheap in order to sell dear is the rule of trade. Hence, not the
exchange of equivalents. The conception of value is included in it in so
far as the various commodities are all values, and therefore money. In
respect to quality they are all expressions of social labour. But they
are not values of equal magnitude. The quantitative ratio in which
products are exchanged is at first quite arbitrary. They assume the form
of commodities inasmuch as they are exchangeables, _i.e._, expressions
of one and the same third. Continued exchange and more regular
reproduction for exchange reduces this arbitrariness more and more. But
at first not for the producer and consumer, but for their go-between,
the merchant, who compares money-prices and pockets the difference. It
is through his own movements that he establishes equivalence.

Merchant's capital is originally merely the intervening movement between
extremes which it does not control, and between premises which it does
not create.

Just as money originates from the bare form of commodity-circulation, C
— M — C, not only as a measure of value and a medium of circulation, but
also as the absolute form of commodity, and hence of wealth, or hoard,
so that its conservation and accumulation as money becomes an end in
itself, so, too, does money, the hoard, as something that preserves and
increases itself through mere alienation, originate from the bare form
of the circulation of merchant's capital, M — C — M'.

The trading nations of ancient times existed like the gods of Epicurus
in the intermediate worlds of the universe, or rather like the Jews in
the pores of Polish society. The trade of the first independent
flourishing merchant towns and trading nations rested as a pure carrying
trade upon the barbarism of the producing nations, between whom they
acted the middleman.

In the pre-capitalist stages of society commerce ruled industry. In
modern society the reverse is true. Of course, commerce will have more
or less of a counter-effect on the communities between which it is
carried on. It will subordinate production more and more to
exchange-value by making luxuries and subsistence more dependent on sale
than on the immediate use of the products. Thereby it dissolves the old
relationships. It multiplies money circulation. It encompasses no longer
merely the surplus of production, but bites deeper and deeper into the
latter, and makes entire branches of production dependent upon it.
Nevertheless this disintegrating effect depends very much on the nature
of the producing community.

So long as merchant's capital promotes the exchange of products between
undeveloped societies, commercial profit not only appears as
out-bargaining and cheating, but also largely originates from them.
Aside from the fact that it exploits the difference between the prices
of production of various countries (and in this respect it tends to
level and fix the values of commodities), those modes of production
bring it about that merchant's capital appropriates an overwhelming
portion of the surplus-product partly as a mediator between communities
which still substantially produce for use-value, and for whose economic
organisation the sale of the portion of their product entering
circulation, or for that matter any sale of products at their value, is
of secondary importance; and partly, because under those earlier modes
of production the principal owners of the surplus-product with whom the
merchant dealt, namely, the slave-owner, the feudal lord, and the state
(for instance, the oriental despot) represent the consuming wealth and
luxury which the merchant seeks to trap, as Adam Smith correctly scented
in the passage on feudal times quoted earlier. Merchant's capital, when
it holds a position of dominance, stands everywhere for a system of
robbery,^([4]) so that its development among the trading nations of old
and modern times is always directly connected with plundering, piracy,
kidnapping slaves, and colonial conquest; as in Carthage, Rome, and
later among the Venetians, Portuguese, Dutch, etc.

The development of commerce and merchant's capital gives rise everywhere
to the tendency towards production of exchange-values, increases its
volume, multiplies it, makes it cosmopolitan, and develops money into
world-money. Commerce, therefore, has a more or less dissolving
influence everywhere on the producing organisation, which it finds at
hand and whose different forms are mainly carried on with a view to
use-value. To what extent it brings about a dissolution of the old mode
of production depends on its solidity and internal structure. And
whither this process of dissolution will lead, in other words, what new
mode of production will replace the old, does not depend on commerce,
but on the character of the old mode of production itself. In the
ancient world the effect of commerce and the development of merchant's
capital always resulted in a slave economy; depending on the point of
departure, only in the transformation of patriarchal slave system
devoted to the production of immediate means of subsistence into one
devoted to the production of surplus-value. However, in the modern
world, it results in the capitalist mode of production. It follows
therefrom that these results spring in themselves from circumstances
other than the development of merchant's capital.

It is in the nature of things that as soon as town industry as such
separates from agricultural industry, its products are from the outset
commodities and thus require the mediation of commerce for their sale.
The leaning of commerce towards the development of towns, and, on the
other hand, the dependence of towns upon commerce, are so far natural.
However, it depends on altogether different circumstances to what
measure industrial development will go hand in hand with this
development. Ancient Rome, in its later republican days, developed
merchant's capital to a higher degree than ever before in the ancient
world, without showing any progress in the development of crafts, while
in Corinth and other Grecian towns in Europe and Asia Minor the
development of commerce was accompanied by highly developed crafts. On
the other hand, quite contrary to the growth of towns and attendant
conditions, the trading spirit and the development of merchant's capital
occur frequently among unsettled nomadic peoples.

There is no doubt — and it is precisely this fact which has led to
wholly erroneous conceptions — that in the 16th and 17th centuries the
great revolutions, which took place in commerce with the geographical
discoveries and speeded the development of merchant's capital,
constitute one of the principal elements in furthering the transition
from feudal to capitalist mode of production. The sudden expansion of
the world-market, the multiplication of circulating commodities, the
competitive zeal of the European nations to possess themselves of the
products of Asia and the treasures of America, and the colonial system —
all contributed materially toward destroying the feudal fetters on
production. However, in its first period — the manufacturing period —
the modern mode of production developed only where the conditions for it
had taken shape within the Middle Ages. Compare, for instance, Holland
with Portugal.^([5]) And when in the 16th, and partially still in the
17th, century the sudden expansion of commerce and emergence of a new
world-market overwhelmingly contributed to the fall of the old mode of
production and the rise of capitalist production, this was accomplished
conversely on the basis of the already existing capitalist mode of
production. The world-market itself forms the basis for this mode of
production. On the other hand, the immanent necessity of this mode of
production to produce on an ever-enlarged scale tends to extend the
world-market continually, so that it is not commerce in this case which
revolutionises industry, but industry which constantly revolutionises
commerce. Commercial supremacy itself is now linked with the prevalence
to a greater or lesser degree of conditions for a large industry.
Compare, for instance, England and Holland. The history of the decline
of Holland as the ruling trading nation is the history of the
subordination of merchant's capital to industrial capital. The obstacles
presented by the internal solidity and organisation of pre-capitalistic,
national modes of production to the corrosive influence of commerce are
strikingly illustrated in the intercourse of the English with India and
China. The broad basis of the mode of production here is formed by the
unity of small-scale agriculture and home industry, to which in India we
should add the form of village communities built upon the common
ownership of land, which, incidentally, was the original form in China
as well. In India the English lost no time in exercising their direct
political and economic power, as rulers and landlords, to disrupt these
small economic communities.^([6]) English commerce exerted a
revolutionary influence on these communities and tore them apart only in
so far as the low prices of its goods served to destroy the spinning and
weaving industries, which were an ancient integrating element of this
unity of industrial and agricultural production. And even so this work
of dissolution proceeds very gradually. And still more slowly in China,
where it is not reinforced by direct political power. The substantial
economy and saving in time afforded by the association of agriculture
with manufacture put up a stubborn resistance to the products of the big
industries, whose prices include the _faux frais_ of the circulation
process which pervades them. Unlike the English, Russian commerce, on
the other hand, leaves the economic groundwork of Asiatic production
untouched.^([7])

The transition from the feudal mode of production is two-fold. The
producer becomes merchant and capitalist, in contrast to the natural
agricultural economy and the guild-bound handicrafts of the medieval
urban industries. This is the really revolutionising path. Or else, the
merchant establishes direct sway over production. However much this
serves historically as a stepping-stone — witness the English
17th-century clothier, who brings the weavers, independent as they are,
under his control by selling their wool to them and buying their cloth —
it cannot by itself contribute to the overthrow of the old mode of
production, but tends rather to preserve and retain it as its
precondition. The manufacturer in the French silk industry and in the
English hosiery and lace industries, for example, was thus mostly but
nominally a manufacturer until the middle of the 19th century. In point
of fact, he was merely a merchant, who let the weavers carry on in their
old unorganised way and exerted only a merchant's control, for that was
for whom they really worked.^([8]) This system presents everywhere an
obstacle to the real capitalist mode of production and goes under with
its development. Without revolutionising the mode of production, it only
worsens the condition of the direct producers, turns them into mere
wage-workers and proletarians under conditions worse than those under
the immediate control of capital, and appropriates their surplus-labour
on the basis of the old mode of production. The same conditions exist in
somewhat modified form in part of the London handicraft furniture
industry. It is practised notably in the Tower Hamlets on a very large
scale. The whole production is divided into very numerous separate
branches of business independent of one another. One establishment makes
only chairs, another only tables, a third only bureaus, etc. But these
establishments themselves are run more or less like handicrafts by a
single minor master and a few journeymen. Nevertheless, production is
too large to work directly for private persons. The buyers are the
owners of furniture stores. On Saturdays the master visits them and
sells his product, the transaction being closed with as much haggling as
in a pawnshop over a loan. The masters depend on this weekly sale, if
for no other reason than to be able to buy raw materials for the
following week and to pay out wages. Under these circumstances, they are
really only middlemen between the merchant and their own labourers. The
merchant is the actual capitalist who pockets the lion's share of the
surplus-value.^([9]) Almost the same applies in the transition to
manufacture of branches formerly carried on as handicrafts or side lines
to rural industries. The transition to large-scale industry depends on
the technical development of these small owner-operated establishments —
wherever they employ machinery that admits of a handicraft-like
operation. The machine is driven by steam, instead of by hand. This is
of late the case, for instance, in the English hosiery industry.

There is, consequently, a three-fold transition. _First,_ the merchant
becomes directly an industrial capitalist. This is true in crafts based
on trade, especially crafts producing luxuries and imported by merchants
together with the raw materials and labourers from foreign lands, as in
Italy from Constantinople in the 15th century. _Second,_ the merchant
turns the small masters into his middlemen, or buys directly from the
independent producer, leaving him nominally independent and his mode of
production unchanged. _Third,_ the industrialist becomes merchant and
produces directly for the wholesale market.

In the Middle Ages, the merchant was merely one who, as Poppe rightly
says, "transferred" the goods produced by guilds or peasants [Poppe,
_Geschichte der Technologie seit der Wiederherstellung der
Wissenschaften bis an das Ende des achtzehnten Jahrhunderts_, Band I,
Göttingen. 1807, S. 70. — _Ed_.] The merchant becomes industrialist, or
rather, makes craftsmen, particularly the small rural producers, work
for him. Conversely, the producer becomes merchant. The master weaver,
for instance, buys his wool or yarn himself and sells his cloth to the
merchant, instead of receiving his wool from the merchant piecemeal and
working for him together with his journeymen. The elements of production
pass into the production process as commodities bought by himself. And
instead of producing for some individual merchant, or for specified
customers, he produces for the world of trade. The producer is himself a
merchant. Merchant's capital does no more than carry on the process of
circulation. Originally, commerce was the precondition for the
transformation of the crafts, the rural domestic industries, and feudal
agriculture, into capitalist enterprises. It develops the product into a
commodity, partly by creating a market for it, and partly by introducing
new commodity equivalents and supplying production with new raw and
auxiliary materials, thereby opening new branches of production based
from the first upon commerce, both as concerns production for the home
and world-market, and as concerns conditions of production originating
in the world-market. As soon as manufacture gains sufficient strength,
and particularly large-scale industry, it creates in its turn a market
for itself, by capturing it through its commodities. At this point
commerce becomes the servant of industrial production, for which
continued expansion of the market becomes a vital necessity. Ever more
extended mass production floods the existing market and thereby works
continually for a still greater expansion of this market for breaking
out of its limits. What restricts this mass production is not commerce
(in so far as it expresses the existing demand), but the magnitude of
employed capital and the level of development of the productivity of
labour. The industrial capitalist always has the world-market before
him, compares, and must constantly compare, his own cost-prices with the
market-prices at home, and throughout the world. In the earlier period
such comparison fell almost entirely to the merchants, and thus secured
the predominance of merchant's capital over industrial capital.

The first theoretical treatment of the modern mode of production — the
mercantile system — proceeded necessarily from the superficial phenomena
of the circulation process as individualised in the movements of
merchant's capital, and therefore grasped only the appearance of
matters. Partly because merchant's capital is the first free state of
existence of capital in general. And partly because of the overwhelming
influence which it exerted during the first revolutionising period of
feudal production — the genesis of modern production. The real science
of modern economy only begins when the theoretical analysis passes from
the process of circulation to the process of production.
Interest-bearing capital is, indeed, likewise a very old form of
capital. But we shall see later why mercantilism does not take it as its
point of departure, but rather carries on a polemic against it.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

1. The sage Mr. Roscher [_Die Grundlagen der Nationalökonomie,_ 3.
Auflage, 1858, § 60, 5. _103. — Ed._] has figured out that, since
certain people designate trade as _mediation_ between producers and
consumers, "one" might just as well designate production itself as
_mediation_ of consumption (between whom?), and this implies, of course,
that merchant's capital is as much a part of productive capital as
agricultural and industrial capital. In other words, because I can say,
that man can mediate his consumption only by means of production (and he
has to do this even without getting his education at Leipzig), or that
labour is required for the appropriation of the products of Nature
(which might be called _mediation_), it follows, of course, that social
_mediation_ arising from a specific social form of production — because
mediation — has the same absolute character of necessity, and the same
rank. The word _mediation_ settles everything. By the way, the merchants
are not mediators between producers and consumers (consumers as distinct
from producers, consumers, that is, who do not produce, are left aside
for the moment), but mediators in the exchange of the products of these
producers among themselves. They are but middlemen in an exchange, which
in thousands of cases proceeds without them.

2. Herr W. Kiesselbach (in his _Der Gang des Welthandels im
Mittelalter,_ 1860) is indeed still enwrapped in the ideas of a world,
in which merchant's capital is the general form of capital. He has not
the least idea of the modern meaning of capital, any more than Mommsen
when he speaks in his history of Rome of "capital" and the rule of
capital. In modern English history, the commercial estate proper and the
merchant towns are also politically reactionary and in league with the
landed and moneyed interest against industrial capital. Compare, for
instance, the political role of Liverpool with that of Manchester and
Birmingham. The complete rule of industrial capital was not acknowledged
by English merchant's capital and moneyed interest until after the
abolition of the corn tax, etc.

3. "The inhabitants of trading cities, by importing the improved
manufactures and expensive luxuries of richer countries afforded some
food to the vanity of the great proprietors, who eagerly purchased them
with great quantities of the rude produce of their own lands. The
commerce of a great part of Europe in those times, accordingly consisted
chiefly, in the exchange of their own rude produce for the manufactured
produce of more civilised nations.... When this taste became so general
as to occasion a considerable demand, the merchants, in order to save
the expense of carriage, naturally endeavoured to establish some
manufactures of the same kind in their own country." (Adam Smith
[_Wealth of Nations_], Book III, Ch. III, London, 1776, pp. 489, 490.)

4. "Now there is among merchants much complaint about the nobles, or
robbers, because they must trade under great danger and run the risk of
being kidnapped, beaten, blackmailed, and robbed. If they would suffer
these things for the sake of justice, the merchants would be saintly
people.... But since such great wrong and unchristian thievery and
robbery are committed all over the world by merchants, and even among
themselves, is it any wonder that God should procure that such great
wealth, gained by wrong, should again be lost or stolen, and they
themselves be hit over the head or made prisoner? ... And the princes
should punish such unjust bargains with due rigour and take care that
their subjects shall not be so outrageously abused by merchants. Because
they fail to do so, God employs knights and robbers, and punishes the
merchants through them for the wrongs they committed, and uses them as
his devils, just as he plagues Egypt and all the world with devils, or
destroys through enemies. He thus pits one against the other, without
thereby insinuating that knights are any the less robbers than
merchants, although the merchants daily rob the whole world, while a
knight may rob one or two once or twice a year." "Go by the word of
Isaiah: Thy princes have become the companions of robbers. For they hang
the thieves, who have stolen a gulden or a half gulden, but they
associate with those, who rob all the world and steal with greater
assurance than all others, so that the proverb remains true: Big thieves
hang little thieves; and as the Roman senator Cato said: Mean thieves
lie in prisons and stocks, but public thieves are clothed in gold and
silks. But what will God say finally? He will do as he said to Ezekiel;
he will amalgamate princes and merchants, one thief with another, like
lead and iron, as when a city burns down, leaving neither princes nor
merchants." (Martin Luther, _Von Kaufshandlung und Wucher,_ 1524, S.
296-97.)

5. How predominant fishery, manufacture and agriculture, aside from
other circumstances, were as the basis for Holland's development, has
already been explained by 18th-century writers, such as Massie [p. 60].
In contradistinction to the former view, which underrated the volume and
importance of commerce in Asia, in Antiquity, and in the Middle Ages, it
has now come to be the custom to extremely overrate it. The best
antidote against this conception is to study the imports and exports of
England in the early 18th century and to compare them with modern
imports and exports. And yet they were incomparably greater than those
of any former trading nation. (See Anderson, _An Historical and
Chronological Deduction of the Origin of Commerce._ [Vol. II, London,
1764, p. 261 et seq. — Ed.])

6. If any nation's history, then the history of the English in India is
a string of futile and really absurd (in practice infamous) economic
experiments. In Bengal they created a caricature of large-scale English
landed estates; in south-eastern India a caricature of small parcelled
property; in the north-west they did all they could to transform the
Indian economic community with common ownership of the soil into a
caricature of itself.

7. Since Russia has been making frantic exertions to develop its own
capitalist production, which is exclusively dependent upon its domestic
and the neighbouring Asiatic market, this is also beginning to change. —
_F.E_.

8. The same is true of the ribbon and basting makers and the silk
weavers of the Rhine. Even a railway has been built near Krefeld for the
intercourse of these rural hand-weavers with the town "manufacturer."
But this was later put out of business, together with the hand-weavers,
by the mechanical weaving industry. — _F.E._

9. This system has been developed since 1865 on a still larger scale.
For details see the First Report of the Select Committee of the House of
Lords on the Sweating System, London, _1888. — F.E._

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III



PART V. DIVISION OF PROFIT INTO INTEREST AND PROFIT OF ENTERPRISE. INTEREST-BEARING CAPITAL


 


Chapter 21. Interest-Bearing Capital

 

In our first discussion of the general, or average, rate of profit (Part
II of this book) we did not have this rate before us in its complete
form, the equalisation of profit appearing only as equalisation between
industrial capitals invested in different spheres. This was supplemented
in the preceding part, which dealt with the participation of merchant's
capital in this equalisation, and also commercial profit. The general
rate of profit and the average profit now appeared in narrower limits
than before. It should be remembered in the course of our analysis that
in any future reference to the general rate of profit or to average
profit we mean this latter connotation, hence only the final form of
average rate. And since this rate is the same for mercantile, as well as
industrial, capital, it is no longer necessary, so far as this average
profit is concerned, to make a distinction between industrial and
commercial profit. Whether industrially invested in the sphere of
production, or commercially in the sphere of circulation, capital yields
the same average annual profit _pro rata_ to its magnitude.

Money — here taken as the independent expression of a certain amount of
value existing either actually as money or as commodities — may be
converted into capital on the basis of capitalist production, and may
thereby be transformed from a given value to a self-expanding, or
increasing, value. It produces profit, _i.e._, it enables the capitalist
to extract a certain quantity of unpaid labour, surplus-product and
surplus-value from the labourers, and to appropriate it. In this way,
aside from its use-value as money, it acquires an additional use-value,
namely that of serving as capital. Its use-value then consists precisely
in the profit it produces when converted into capital. In this capacity
of potential capital, as a means of producing profit, it becomes a
commodity, but a commodity _sui generis_. Or, what amounts to the same,
capital as capital becomes a commodity.^([1])

Suppose the annual average rate of profit is 20%. In that case a machine
valued at £100, employed as capital under average conditions and an
average amount of intelligence and purposive effort, would yield a
profit of £20. A man in possession of £100, therefore, possesses the
power to make £120 out of £100, or to produce a profit of £20. He
possesses a potential capital of £100. If he gives these £100 to another
for one year, so the latter may use them as real capital, he gives him
the power to produce a profit of £20 — a surplus-value which costs this
other nothing, and for which he pays no equivalent. If this other should
pay, say, £5 at the close of the year to the owner of the £100 out of
the profit produced, he would thereby pay the use-value of the £100 —
the use-value of its function as capital, the function of producing a
profit of £20. The part of the profit paid to the owner is called
interest, which is just another name, or special term, for a part of the
profit given up by capital in the process of functioning to the owner of
the capital, instead of putting it into its own pocket.

It is plain that the possession of £100 gives their owner the power to
pocket the interest — that certain portion of profit produced by means
of his capital. If he had not given the £100 to the other person, the
latter could not have produced any profit, and could not at all have
acted as a capitalist with reference to these £100. ^([2])

To speak here of natural justice, as Gilbart does (see note), is
nonsense. The justice of the transactions between agents of production
rests on the fact that these arise as natural consequences out of the
production relationships. The juristic forms in which these economic
transactions appear as wilful acts of the parties concerned, as
expressions of their common will and as contracts that may be enforced
by law against some individual party, cannot, being mere forms,
determine this content. They merely express it. This content is just
whenever it corresponds, is appropriate, to the mode of production. It
is unjust whenever it contradicts that mode. Slavery on the basis of
capitalist production is unjust; likewise fraud in the quality of
commodities.

The £100 produce the profit of £20 because they function as capital, be
it industrial or mercantile. But the _sine qua non_ of this function as
capital is that they are expended as capital, _i.e._, are expended in
purchasing means of production (in the case of industrial capital) or
commodities (in the case of merchant's capital). But to be expended,
they must be available. If A, the owner of the £100, were either to
spend them for personal consumption, or to keep them as a hoard, they
could not have been invested as capital by B in his capacity of
functioning capitalist. B does not expend his own capital, but A's;
however, he cannot expend A's capital without A's consent. Therefore, it
is really A who originally expends the £100 as capital, albeit his
function as capitalist is limited to this outlay of £100 as capital. In
respect to these £100, B acts as capitalist only because A lends him the
£100, thus expending them as capital.

Let us first consider the singular circulation of interest-bearing
capital. We shall then secondly have to analyse the peculiar manner in
which it is sold as a commodity, namely loaned instead of relinquished
once and for all.

The point of departure is the money which A advances to B. This may be
done with or without security. The first-named form, however, is the
more ancient, save advances on commodities or paper, such as bills of
exchange, shares, etc. These special forms do not concern us at this
point. We are dealing here with interest-bearing capital in its usual
form.

In B's possession the money is actually converted into capital, passes
through M — C — M' and returns to A as M', as M+ΔM, where ΔM represents
the interest. For the sake of simplicity we shall not consider here the
case, in which capital remains in B's possession for a long term and
interest is paid at regular intervals.

The movement, therefore, is

M — M — C — M' — M'.

What appears duplicated here, is 1) the outlay of money as capital, and
2) its reflux as realised capital, as M' or M+ΔM.

In the movement of merchant's capital, M — C — M', the same commodity
changes hands twice, or more than twice, if merchant sells to merchant.
But every such change of place of the same commodity indicates a
metamorphosis, a purchase or sale of the commodity, no matter how often
the process may be repeated, until it enters consumption.

On the other hand, the same money changes hands twice in C — M — C, but
this indicates the complete metamorphosis of the commodity, which is
first converted into money and then from money back into another
commodity.

But in interest-bearing capital the first time M changes hands is by no
means a phase either of the commodity metamorphosis, or of reproduction
of capital. It first becomes one when it is expended a second time, in
the hands of the active capitalist who carries on trade with it, or
transforms it into productive capital. M's first change of hands does
not express anything here, beyond its transfer from A to B — a transfer
which usually takes place under certain legal forms and stipulations.

This double outlay of money as capital, of which the first is merely a
transfer from A to B, is matched by its double reflux. As M', or M + ΔM,
it flows back out of the process to B, the person acting as capitalist.
The latter then transfers it back to A, but together with a part of the
profit, as realised capital, as M + ΔM, in which ΔM is not the entire
profit, but only a portion of the profit — the interest. It flows back
to B only as what he had expended, as functioning capital, but as the
property of A. To make its reflux complete, B must consequently return
it to A. But in addition to the capital, B must also turn over to A a
portion of the profit, a part which goes under the name of interest,
which he had made with this capital since A had given him the money only
as a capital, _i.e._, as value which is not only preserved in its
movement, but also creates surplus-value for its owner. It remains in
B's hands only so long as it is functioning capital. And with its reflux
— on the stipulated date — it ceases to function as capital. When no
longer acting as capital, however, it must again be returned to A, who
had never ceased being its legal owner.

The form of lending, which is peculiar to this commodity, to capital as
commodity, and which also occurs in other transactions instead of that
of sale, follows from the simple definition that capital obtains here as
a commodity, or that money as capital becomes a commodity.

A distinction should be made here.

We have seen (Book II, Chap. I), and recall briefly at this point, that
in the process of circulation capital serves as commodity-capital and
money-capital. But in neither form does capital become a commodity as
capital.

As soon as productive capital turns into commodity-capital it must be
placed on the market to be sold as a commodity. There it acts simply as
a commodity. The capitalist then appears only as the seller of
commodities, just as the buyer is only the buyer of commodities. As a
commodity the product must realise its value, must assume its transmuted
form of money, in the process of circulation by its sale. It is also
quite immaterial for this reason, whether this commodity is bought by a
consumer as a necessity of life, or by a capitalist as means of
production, _i.e._, as a component part of his capital. In the act of
circulation commodity-capital acts only as a commodity, not as a
capital. It is commodity-_capital_, as distinct from an ordinary
commodity, 1) because it is weighted with surplus-value, the realisation
of its value, therefore, being simultaneously the realisation of
surplus-value; but this alters nothing about its simple existence as a
commodity, as a product with a certain price; 2) because its function as
a commodity is a phase in its process of reproduction as capital, and
therefore its movement as a commodity being only a partial movement of
its process, is simultaneously its movement as capital. Yet it does not
become that through the sale as such, but only through the connection of
the sale with the whole movement of this specific quantity of value in
the capacity of capital.

In the same way as money-capital it really acts simply as money, _i.e._,
as a means of buying commodities (the elements of production). The fact
that this money is simultaneously money-capital, a form of capital, does
not emerge from the act of buying, the actual function which it here
performs as money, but from the connection of this act with the total
movement of capital, since this act, performed by capital as money,
initiates the capitalist production process.

But in so far as they actually function, _i.e._, actually play a role in
the process, commodity-capital acts here only as a commodity and
money-capital only as money. At no time during the metamorphosis, viewed
by itself, does the capitalist sell his commodities as _capital_ to the
buyer, although to him they represent capital; nor does he give up money
as capital to the seller. In both cases be gives up his commodities
simply as commodities, and money simply as money, _i.e._, as a means of
purchasing commodities.

It is only in connection with the entire process, at the moment where
the point of departure appears simultaneously as the point of return, in
M — M' or C — C', that capital in the process of circulation appears as
capital (whereas in the process of production it appears as capital
through the subordination of the labourer to the capitalist and the
production of surplus value). In this moment of return, however, the
connection disappears. What we have then is M', or M + ΔM, a sum of
money equal to the sum originally advanced plus an increment — the
realised surplus-value (regardless of whether the amount of value
increased by ΔM exists in the form of money, or commodities, or elements
of production). And it is precisely at this point of return where
capital exists as realised capital, as an expanded value, that it never
enters the circulation in this form — in so far as this point is fixed
as a point of rest, whether real or imaginary — but rather appears to
have been withdrawn from circulation as a result of the whole process.
Whenever it is again expended, it is never given up to another as
_capital_, but is sold to him as an ordinary commodity, or given to him
as ordinary money in exchange for commodities. It never appears as
capital in its process of circulation, only as commodity or money, and
at this point this is the only form of its existence for _others_.
Commodities and money are here capital not because commodities change
into money, or money into commodities, not in their actual relations to
sellers or buyers, but only in their ideal relations to the capitalist
himself (subjectively speaking), or as phases in the process of
reproduction (objectively speaking). Capital exists as capital in actual
movement, not in the process of circulation, but only in the process of
production, in the process by which labour-power is exploited.

The matter is different with interest-bearing capital, however, and it
is precisely this difference which lends it its specific character. The
owner of money who desires to enhance his money as interest-bearing
capital, turns it over to a third person, throws it into circulation,
turns it into a commodity as _capital_; not just capital for himself,
but also for others. It is not capital merely for the man who gives it
up, but is from the very first given to the third person as capital, as
a value endowed with the use-value of creating surplus-value, of
creating profit; a value which preserves itself in its movement and
returns to its original owner, in this case the owner of money, after
performing its function. Hence it leaves him only for a specified time,
passes but temporarily out of the possession of its owner into the
possession of a functioning capitalist, is therefore neither given up in
payment nor sold, but merely loaned, merely relinquished with the
understanding that, first, it shall return to its point of departure
after a definite time interval, and, second, that it shall return as
realised capital — a capital having realised its use-value, its power of
creating surplus-value.

Commodities loaned out as capital are loaned either as fixed or as
circulating capital, depending on their properties. Money may be loaned
out in either form. It may be loaned as fixed capital, for instance, if
it is paid back in the form of an annuity, whereby a portion of the
capital flows back together with the interest. Certain commodities, such
as houses, ships, machines, etc., can be loaned out only as fixed
capital by the nature of their use-values. Yet all loaned capital,
whatever its form, and no matter how the nature of its use-value may
modify its return, is always only a specific form of money-capital.
Because what is loaned out is always a definite sum of money, and it is
this sum on which interest is calculated. Should whatever is loaned out
be neither money nor circulating capital, it is also paid back in the
way fixed capital returns. The lender periodically receives interest and
a portion of the consumed value of the fixed capital itself, this being
an equivalent for the periodic wear and tear. And at the end of the
stipulated term the unconsumed portion of the loaned fixed capital is
returned in kind. If the loaned capital is circulating capital, it is
likewise returned in the manner peculiar to circulating capital.

The _manner_ of reflux is, therefore, always determined by the actual
circuit described by capital in the act of reproduction and by its
specific varieties. But as for loaned capital, its reflux assumes the
_form_ of return payments, because its advance, by which it is
transferred, possesses the form of a loan.

In this chapter we treat only of actual money-capital, from which the
other forms of loaned capital are derived.

The loaned capital flows back in two ways. In the process of
reproduction it returns to the functioning capitalist, and then its
return repeats itself once more as transfer to the lender, the
money-capitalist, as return payment to the real owner, its legal point
of departure.

In the actual process of circulation, capital appears always as a
commodity or as money, and its movement always is broken up into a
series of purchases and sales. In short, the process of circulation
resolves itself into the metamorphosis of commodities. It is different,
when we consider the process of reproduction as a whole. If we start out
with money (and the same is true if we start out with commodities, since
we begin with their value, hence view them _sub specie_ as money), we
shall see that a certain sum of money is expended and returns after a
certain period with an increment. The advanced sum of money returns
together with a surplus-value. It has remained intact and increased in
making a certain cycle. But now, being loaned out as capital, money is
loaned as just the sum of money which preserves and expands itself,
which returns after a certain period with an increment, and is always
ready to perform the same process over again. It is expended neither as
money nor as a commodity, thus, neither exchanged against a commodity
when advanced in the form of money, nor sold in exchange for money when
advanced as a commodity; rather, it is expended as capital. This
relation to itself, in which capital presents itself when the capitalist
production process is viewed as a whole and as a single unity, and in
which capital appears as money that begets money, is here imparted to it
as its character, its designation, without any intermediary movement.
And it is relinquished with this designation when loaned out as
money-capital.

A queer conception of the role of money-capital is hold by Proudhon
(_Gratuité du Crédit. Discussion entre M. F. Bastiat et M. Proudhon_,
Paris, 1850). Loaning seems an evil to Proudhon because it is not
selling. Loaning for an interest is

"the faculty of selling the same article over and over again, and of
receiving its price again and again, without once relinquishing
ownership of the object which is being sold" (p. 9). [The cited words
belong to Cheve, one of the editors of the newspaper _La Voix du
peuple_, and the author of the "first letter" in the book _Gratuité du
Crédit. Discussion entre M. F. Bastiat et M. Proudhon_, Paris, 1850. —
_Ed_]

The object — money, a house, etc. — does not change owners as in selling
and buying. But Proudhon does not see that no equivalent is received in
return for money given away in the form of interest-bearing capital.
True, the object is given away in every act of buying and selling, so
far as there are processes of exchange at all. Ownership of the sold
article is always relinquished. But its value is not given up. In a sale
the commodity is given away, but not its value, which is returned in the
form of money, or in what is here just another form of it — promissory
notes, or titles of payment. When purchasing, the money is given away,
but not its value, which is replaced in the form of commodities. The
industrial capitalist retains the same value in his hands throughout the
process of reproduction (excluding surplus-value), but in different
forms.

Inasmuch as there is an exchange, _i.e._, an exchange of articles, there
is no change in the value. The same capitalist always retains the same
value. But so long as surplus-value is produced by the capitalist, there
is no exchange. As soon as an exchange occurs, the surplus-value is
already incorporated in the commodities. If we view the entire circuit
made by capital, M — C — M', rather than individual acts of exchange, we
shall see that a definite amount of value is continually advanced, and
that this same amount plus surplus-value, or profit, is withdrawn from
circulation. The actual acts of exchange do not, at any rate, reveal how
this process is promoted. And it is precisely this process of M as
capital, on which the interest of the money-lending capitalist rests,
and from which it is derived.

"In fact," says Proudhon, "the hat-maker, who sells hats, receives their
value, neither more nor less. But the money-lending capitalist ... does
not recover just his capital, he recovers more than his capital, more
than he throws into the exchange; he receives an interest over and above
his capital" (p. 69).

Here the hatter represents the productive capitalist as distinct from
the loan capitalist. Proudhon has obviously failed to grasp the secret
of how the productive capitalist can sell commodities at their value
(equalisation through prices of production is here immaterial to his
conception) and receive a profit over and above the capital he flings
into exchange. Suppose the price of production of 100 hats = £115, and
that this price of production happens to coincide with the value of the
hats, which means that the capital producing the hats is of the same
composition as the average social capital. Should the profit = 15%, the
hatter makes a profit of £15 by selling his commodities at their value
of £115. They cost him only £100. If he produced them with his own
capital, he pockets the entire surplus of £15 but if with borrowed
capital, he may have to give up £5 as interest. This alters nothing in
the value of the hats, only in the distribution among different persons
of the surplus-value already contained in this value. Since, therefore,
the value of the hats is not affected by the payment of interest, it is
nonsense on Proudhon's part to say:

"As in commerce the interest on capital is added to the wages of
labourers in making up the price of commodities, it is impossible for
the labourer to buy back the product of his own labour. _Vivre en
travaillant_ is a principle which contains a contradiction under the
rule of interest" (p. 105). ^([3])

How little Proudhon understood the nature of capital is shown in the
following statement, in which he describes the movement of capital in
general as a movement peculiar to interest-bearing capital:

"Since money-capital returns to its source from exchange through the
accumulation of interest, it follows that reinvestment always made by
the same individual continually brings profit to the same person," p.
154.

What is it that still puzzles him in the peculiar movement of
interest-bearing capital? The categories: buying, price, giving up
articles, and the immediate form in which surplus-value appears here; in
short, the phenomenon that capital as such has become a commodity, that
selling, consequently, has turned into lending and price into a share of
the profit.

The return of capital to its point of departure is generally the
characteristic movement of capital in its total circuit. This is by no
means a feature of interest-bearing capital alone. What singles it out
is rather the external form of its return without the intervention of
any circuit. The loaning capitalist gives away his capital, transfers it
to the industrial capitalist, without receiving any equivalent. His
transfer is not an act belonging to the real circulation process of
capital at all. It serves merely to introduce this circuit, which is
effected by the industrial capitalist. This first change of position of
money does not express any act of the metamorphosis — neither buying nor
selling. Ownership is not relinquished, because there is no exchange and
no equivalent is received. The return of the money from the hands of the
industrial capitalist to those of the loaning capitalist merely
supplements the first act of giving away the capital. Advanced in the
form of money, the capital again returns to the industrial capitalist
through the circular process in the form of money. But since it did not
belong to him when he invested it, it cannot belong to him on its
return. Passing through the process of reproduction cannot by any means
turn the capital into his property. He must therefore restore it to the
lender. The first expenditure, which transfers the capital from the
lender to the borrower, is a legal transaction which has nothing to do
with the actual process of reproduction. It is merely a prelude to this
process. The return payment, which again transfers the capital that has
flowed back from the borrower to the lender is another legal
transaction, a supplement of the first. One introduces the actual
process, the other is an act supplementary to this process. Point of
departure and point of return, the giving away and the recovery of the
loaned capital, thus appear as arbitrary movements promoted by legal
transactions, which take place before and after the actual movement of
capital and have nothing to do with it as such. It would have been all
the same as concerns this actual movement if the capital had from the
first belonged to the industrial capitalist and had returned to him,
therefore, as his own.

In the first introductory act the lender gives his capital to the
borrower. In the supplemental and closing act the borrower returns the
capital to the lender. As concerns the transaction between these two —
and aside from the interest for the present — as concerns the movement
of the loaned capital between lender and borrower, therefore, the two
acts (separated by a longer or shorter time interval, during which the
actual reproduction process of the capital takes place) embrace the
entire movement. And this movement, disposing on condition of returning,
constitutes _per se_ the movement of lending and borrowing, that
specific form of conditionally alienating money or commodities.

The characteristic movement of capital in general, the return of the
money to the capitalist, _i.e._, the return of capital to its point of
departure, assumes in the case of interest-bearing capital a wholly
external appearance, separated from the actual movement, of which it is
a form. A gives away his money not as money, but as capital. No
transformation occurs in the capital. It merely changes hands. Its real
transformation into capital does not take place until it is in the hands
of B. But for A it becomes capital as soon as he gives it to B. The
actual reflux of capital from the processes of production and
circulation takes place only for B. But for A the reflux assumes the
same form as the alienation. The capital returns from B to A. Giving
away, _i.e._, loaning money for a certain time and receiving it back
with interest (surplus-value) is the complete form of the movement
peculiar to interest-bearing capital as such. The actual movement of
loaned money as capital is an operation lying outside the transactions
between lender and borrower. In these the intermediate act is
obliterated, invisible, not directly included. A special sort of
commodity, capital has its own peculiar mode of alienation. Neither does
its return, therefore, express itself as the consequence and result, of
some definite series of economic processes, but as the effect of a
specific legal agreement between buyer and seller. The time of return
depends on the progress of the process of reproduction; in the case of
interest-bearing capital, its return as capital _seems_ to depend on the
mere agreement between lender and borrower. So that in regard to this
transaction the return of capital no longer appears as a result arising
out of the process of reproduction; it appears as if the loaned capital
never lost the form of money. To be sure, these transactions are really
determined by the actual reproductive returns. But this is not evident
in the transaction itself. Nor is it by any means always the case in
practice. If the actual return does not take place in due time, the
borrower must look for other resources to meet his obligations vis-à-vis
the lender. The bare _form_ of capital — money expended as a certain
sum, A, which returns as sum A + 1/x A after a given lapse of time
without any other intermediate act save this lapse of time — is only a
meaningless form of the actual movement of capital.

In the actual movement of capital its return is a phase in the process
of circulation. The money is first converted into means of production;
production transforms them into commodities; through sale of the
commodities they are reconverted into money and return in this form into
the hands of the capitalist who had originally advanced the capital in
the form of money. But in the case of interest-bearing capital, the
return, like alienation, is the result of a legal transaction between
the owner of the capital and a second party. We see only the alienation
and the return payment. Whatever passes in the interim is obliterated.

But since money advanced as capital has the property of returning to the
person who advanced it, to the one who expended it as capital, and since
M — C — M' is the immanent form of the movement of capital, the owner of
the money can, for this very reason, loan it out as capital, as
something that has the property of returning to its point of departure,
of preserving, and increasing, its value in the course of its movement.
He gives it away as capital, because it returns to its point of
departure after having been employed as capital, hence can be restored
by the borrower after a certain period precisely because it has come
back to him.

Loaning money as capital — its alienation on the condition of it being
returned after a certain time-presupposes, therefore, that it will be
actually employed as capital, and that it actually flows back to its
starting-point. The real cycle made by money as capital is, therefore,
the premise for the legal transaction by which the borrower must return
the money to the lender. If the borrower does not use the money as
capital, that is his own business. The lender loans it as capital, and
as such it is supposed to perform the functions of capital, which
include the circuit of money-capital until it returns to its
starting-point in the form of money.

The acts of circulation, M — C and C — M', in which a certain amount of
value functions as money or commodities, are but intermediate processes,
mere phases of the total movement. As capital, it performs the entire
movement M — M'. It is advanced as money or a sum of values in one form
or another, and returns as a sum of values. The lender of money does not
expend it in purchasing commodities, or, if this sum of values is in
commodity-form, does not sell it for money. He advances it as capital,
as M — M', as a value, which returns to its point of departure after a
certain term. He lends instead of buying or selling. This lending,
therefore, is the appropriate form of alienating value as _capital_,
instead of alienating it as money or commodities. It does not follow,
however, that lending cannot also take the form of transactions which
have nothing to do with the capitalist process of reproduction.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

We have so far only considered the movements of loaned _capital_ between
its owner and the industrial capitalist. Now we must inquire into
_interest_.

The lender expends his money as capital; the amount of value, which he
relinquishes to another, is capital, and consequently returns to him.
But the mere return of it would not be the reflux of the loaned sum of
value as _capital_, but merely the return of a loaned sum of value. To
return as capital, the advanced sum of value must not only be preserved
in the movement but must also expand, must increase in value, _i.e._,
must return with a surplus-value, as M + ΔM, the latter being interest
or a portion of the average profit, which does not remain in the hands
of the operating capitalist, but falls to the share of the
money-capitalist.

The fact that the latter has relinquished it as capital implies that it
must be restored to him as M + ΔM. Later, we shall also have to turn our
attention to the form in which interest is paid in the meantime at fixed
intervals, but without the capital, whose return follows at the end of a
lengthy period.

What does the money-capitalist give to the borrower, the industrial
capitalist? What does he really turn over to him? It is only this act of
handing over money which changes lending money into alienation of money
as capital, _i.e._, alienation of capital as a commodity.

It is only by this act of alienating that capital is loaned by the
money-lender as a commodity, or that the commodity at his disposal is
given to another as capital.

What is alienated in an ordinary sale? Not the value of the sold
commodity, for this merely changes its form. The value exists ideally in
a commodity as its price before it actually passes as money into the
hands of the seller. The same value and the same amount of value merely
change their form. In the one instance they exist in commodity-form, in
the other in the form of money. What is really alienated by the seller,
and, therefore, passes into the individual or productive consumption of
the buyer, is the use-value of the commodity — the commodity as a
use-value.

What, now, is the use-value which the money-capitalist gives up for the
period of the loan and relinquishes to the productive capitalist — the
borrower? It is the use-value which the money acquires by being capable
of becoming capital, of performing the functions of capital, and
creating a definite surplus-value, the average profit (whatever is above
or below it appears here as a mere accident) during its process, besides
preserving its original magnitude of value. In the case of the other
commodities the use-value is ultimately consumed. Their substance
disappears, and with it their value. In contrast, the commodity-capital
is peculiar in that its value and use-value not only remain intact but
also increase, through consumption of its use-value.

It is this use-value of money as capital — this faculty of producing an
average profit — which the money-capitalist relinquishes to the
industrial capitalist for the period, during which he places the loaned
capital at the latter's disposal.

Money thus loaned has in this respect a certain similarity with
labour-power in its relation to the industrial capitalist. With the
difference that the latter pays for the value of labour-power, whereas
he simply pays back the value of the loaned capital. The use-value of
labour-power for the industrial capitalist is that labour-power creates
more value (profit) in its consumption than it possesses itself, and
than it costs. This additional value is use-value for the industrial
capitalist. And in like manner the use-value of loaned capital appears
as its faculty of begetting and increasing value.

The money-capitalist, in fact, alienates a use-value, and thus whatever
he gives away is given as a commodity. It is to this extent that the
analogy with a commodity _per se_ is complete. In the first place, it is
a value which passes from one hand to another. In the case of an
ordinary commodity, a commodity as such, the same value remains in the
hands of the buyer and seller, only in different forms; both have the
same value which they had before the transaction, and which they had
alienated — the one in the form of a commodity, the other in the form of
money. The difference is that in a loan the money-capitalist is the only
one in the transaction who gives away value; but he preserves it through
the prospective return. In the loan transaction just one party receives
value, since only one party relinquishes value. — In the second place, a
real use-value is relinquished on the one side, and received and
consumed on the other. But in contrast to ordinary commodities this
use-value is value in itself, namely the excess over the original value
realised through the use of money as capital. The profit is this
use-value.

The use-value of the loaned money lies in its being able to serve as
capital and, as such, to produce the average profit under average
conditions.^([4])

What, now, does the industrial capitalist pay, and what is, therefore,
the price of the loaned capital?

"That which men pay as interest for the use of what they borrow" is,
according to Massie, "a part of the profit it is capable of producing,"
1. c., p. 49. ^([5])

What the buyer of an ordinary commodity buys is its use-value; what he
pays for is its value. What the borrower of money buys is likewise its
use-value as capital; but what does he pay for? Surely not its price, or
value, as in the case of ordinary commodities. No change of form occurs
in the value passing between borrower and lender, as occurs between
buyer and seller when it exists in one instance in the form of money,
and in another in the form of a commodity. The sameness of the alienated
and returned value is revealed here in an entirely different way. The
sum of value, _i.e._, the money, is given away without an equivalent,
and is returned after a certain period. The lender always remains the
owner of the same value, even after it passes from his hands into those
of the borrower. In an ordinary exchange of commodities money always
comes from the buyer's side; but in a loan it comes from the side of the
seller. He is the one who gives away money for a certain period, and the
buyer of capital is the one who receives it as a commodity. But this is
only possible as long as the money acts as capital and is therefore
advanced. The borrower borrows money as capital, as a value producing
more value. But at the moment when it is advanced it is still only
potential capital, like any other capital at its starting-point, the
moment it is advanced. It is only through its employment that it expands
its value and realises itself as capital. However, it has to be returned
by the borrower as _realised_ capital, hence as value plus surplus-value
(interest). And the latter can only be a portion of the realised profit.
Only a portion, not all of it. For the use-value of the loaned capital
to the borrower consists in producing profit for him. Otherwise there
would not have been any alienation of use-value on the lender's part. On
the other hand, not all the profit can fall to the borrower's share.
Otherwise he would pay nothing for the alienated use-value, and would
return the advanced money to the lender as ordinary money, not as
capital, as realised capital, for it is realised capital only as M + ΔM.

Both of them, lender and borrower, expend the same sum of money as
capital. But it is only in the hands of the latter that it serves as
capital. The profit is not doubled by the double existence of the same
sum of money as capital for two persons. It can serve as capital for
both of them only by dividing the profit. The portion which falls to the
lender is called interest.

The entire transaction, as assumed, takes place between two kinds of
capitalists — the money-capitalist and the industrial or merchant
capitalist.

It must always be borne in mind that here capital as capital is a
commodity, or that the commodity here discussed is capital. All the
relations in evidence here would therefore be irrational from the
standpoint of an ordinary commodity, or from that of capital in so far
as it acts as a commodity-capital in the process of reproduction.
Lending and borrowing, instead of selling and buying, is a distinction
which here springs from the specific nature of the commodity-capital.
Similarly, the fact that it is interest, not the price of the commodity,
which is paid here. If we want to call interest the price of
money-capital, then it is an irrational form of price quite at variance
with the conception of the price of commodities.^([6]) The price is here
reduced to its purely abstract and meaningless form, signifying that it
is a certain sum of money paid for something serving in one way or
another as a use-value; whereas the conception of price really signifies
the value of some use-value expressed in money.

Interest, signifying the price of capital, is from the outset quite an
irrational expression. The commodity in question has a double value,
first a value, and then a price different from this value, while price
represents the expression of value in money. Money-capital is nothing
but a sum of money, or the value of a certain quantity of commodities
fixed in a sum of money. If a commodity is loaned out as capital, it is
only a disguised form of a sum of money. Because what is loaned out as
capital is not so and so many pounds of cotton, but so much and so much
money existing in the form of cotton as its value. The price of capital,
therefore, refers to it as to a sum of money, even if not currency, as
Mr. Torrens thinks (see Footnote 59). How, then, can a sum of value have
a price besides its own price, besides the price expressed in its own
money-form? Price, after all, is the value of a commodity (this is also
true of the market-price, whose difference from value is not one of
quality, but only one of quantity, referring only to the magnitude of
value) as distinct from its use-value. A price which differs from value
in quality is an absurd contradiction.^([7])

Capital manifests itself as capital through self-expansion. The degree
of its self-expansion expresses the quantitative degree in which it
realises itself as capital. The surplus-value or profit produced by it —
its rate or magnitude — is measurable only by comparison with the value
of the advanced capital. The greater or lesser self-expansion of
interest-bearing capital is, therefore, likewise only measurable by
comparing the amount of interest, its share in the total profits, with
the value of the advanced capital. If, therefore, price expresses the
value of the commodity, then interest expresses the self-expansion of
money-capital and thus appears as the price paid for it to the lender.
This shows how absurd it is from the very first to apply hereto the
simple relations of exchange through the medium of money in buying and
selling, as Proudhon does. The basic premise is precisely that money
functions as capital and may thus be transferred as such, _i.e._, as
potential capital, to a third person.

Capital, however, appears here as a commodity, inasmuch as it is offered
on the market, and the use-value of money is actually alienated as
capital. Its use-value, however, lies in producing profit. The value of
money or of commodities employed as capital does not depend on their
value as money or as commodities, but on the quantity of surplus-value
they produce for their owner. The product of capital is profit. On the
basis of capitalist production it is merely a different use of money —
whether it is expended as money; or advanced as capital. Money, or
commodities, are in themselves potentially capital, just as labour-power
is potential capital. Because, 1) money may be converted into elements
of production and is, as is, merely an abstract expression of them —
their existence as value; 2) the material elements of wealth have the
property of potentially becoming capital, because their supplementary
opposite, which makes them into capital, namely wage-labour, is
available on the basis of capitalist production.

The contradictory social features of material wealth — its antagonism to
labour as wage-labour — are expressed in capitalist property as such
independently of the production process. This particular fact, set apart
from the process of capitalist production itself, from which it
constantly results and as whose constant result it serves as a constant
prerequisite, expresses itself in that money and commodities alike are
latent, potential, capital, so that they may be sold as capital, and in
that they can in this form command the labour of others bestowing a
claim to appropriate the labour of others, and therefore represent
self-expanding values. It also becomes clearly apparent that this
relationship, and not the labour offered as an equivalent on the part of
the capitalist, supplies the title and the means to appropriate the
labour of others.

Furthermore, capital appears as a commodity, inasmuch as the division of
profit into interest and profit proper is regulated by supply and
demand, that is, by competition, just as the market-prices of
commodities. But the difference here is just as apparent as the analogy.
If supply and demand coincide, the market-price of commodities
corresponds to their price of production, _i.e._, their price then
appears to be regulated by the immanent laws of capitalist production,
independently of competition, since the fluctuations of supply and
demand explain nothing but deviations of market-prices from prices of
production. These deviations mutually balance one another, so that in
the course of certain longer periods the average market-prices equal the
prices of production. As soon as supply and demand coincide, these
forces cease to operate, _i.e._, compensate one another, and the general
law determining prices then also comes to apply to individual cases. The
market-price then corresponds even in its immediate form, and not only
as the average of market-price movements, to the price of production,
which is regulated by the immanent laws of the mode of production
itself. The same applies to wages. If supply and demand coincide, they
neutralise each other's effect, and wages equal the value of
labour-power. But it is different with the interest on money-capital.
Competition does not, in this case, determine the deviations from the
rule. There is rather no law of division except that enforced by
competition, because, as we shall later see, no such thing as a
"natural" rate of interest exists. By the natural rate of interest
people merely mean the rate fixed by free competition. There are no
"natural" limits for the rate of interest. Whenever competition does not
merely determine the deviations and fluctuations, whenever, therefore,
the neutralisation of opposing forces puts a stop to any and all
determination, the thing to be determined becomes something arbitrary
and lawless. More on this in the next chapter.

In the case of interest-bearing capital everything appears superficial:
the advance of capital as mere transfer from lender to borrower; the
reflux of realised capital as mere transfer back, as a return payment
with interest, by borrower to lender. The same is true of the fact,
immanent in the capitalist mode of production, that the rate of profit
is not only determined by the relation of profit made in one single
turnover to advanced capital-value, but also by the length of this
period of turnover, hence determined as profit yielded by industrial
capital within definite spans of time. In the case of interest-bearing
capital this likewise appears on the surface to mean that a definite
interest is paid to the lender for a definite time span.

With his usual insight into the internal connection of things, the
romantic Adam Müller says (_Elemente der Staatskunst_, Berlin, 1809,
Dritter Theil, S. 138);

"In determining the prices of things, time is not considered; while in
determining interest, time is the principal factor."

He does not see how the time of production and the time of circulation
enter into the determination of commodity-prices, and how this is just
what determines the rate of profit for a given period of turnover of
capital, whereas interest is determined by precisely this determination
of profit for a given period. His sagacity here, as elsewhere, consists
in observing the clouds of dust on the surface and presumptuously
declaring this dust to be something mysterious and important.

Notes

1. At this point certain passages may be quoted, in which the economists
so conceive the matter. — "You (the Bank of England) are very large
dealers in the _commodity of capital_?" is the question posed to a
director of this bank when he was interrogated for the Report on Bank
Acts on the witness stand. (H. of C. 1857, p. 404.)

2. "That a man who borrows money with a view of making a profit by it,
should give some portion of his profit to the lender, is a self-evident
principle of natural justice." (Gilbart, _The History and Principles of
Banking_, London, 1834, p.463.)

3. "A house," "money," etc., are not to be loaned as "capital" if
Proudhon is to have his way, but are to be sold as "commodities ...
cost-price" (p. 44). Luther stood somewhat above Proudhon. He knew that
profit-making does not depend on the manner of lending or buying: "They
turn buying also into usury. But this is really too much to bite off at
once. We must first confine ourselves to one thing, usury in lending,
and after we have stopped that (after judgement-day), we shall not fail
to preach against _usury in buying_." (Martin Luther, _An die Pfarherrn
wider den Wucher zu predigen_, Wittenberg, 1540.)

4. "The equitableness of taking interest depends not upon a man's making
or not making profit, but upon its" (the borrowed) "being capable of
producing profit if rightly employed". (_An Essay on the Governing
Causes of the Natural Rate of Interest, wherein the sentiments of Sir W.
Petty and Mr. Locke, on that head, are considered_, London, 1750, p. 49.
The author of this anonymous work is J. Massie.)

5. "Rich people, instead of employing their money themselves ... let it
out to other people for them to make profit of, reserving for the owners
a proportion of the profits so made" (l. c., pp. 23-24).

6. "The term 'value,' when applied to currency, has three several
meanings ... 2) currency, actually in hand... compared with the same
amount of currency to be received upon a future day. In this case the
value of currency is measured by the rate of interest, and the rate of
interest being determined by the ratio between the amount of liable
capital and the demand for it." (Colonel R. Torrens, _On the Operation
of the Bank Charter Act of 1844, etc._, 2nd ed., 1847, pp. 5, 6.)

7. "The ambiguity of the term 'value of money' or of the currency, when
employed indiscriminately as it is, to signify both value in exchange
for commodities and value in use of capital, is a constant source of
confusion." (Tooke, _Inquiry into the Currency Principle_, p. 77.) The
main confusion (implied in the matter itself) that value as such
(interest) becomes the use-value of capital, has escaped Tooke.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 22. Division of Profit. Rate of Interest. Natural Rate of Interest.

 

The subject of this chapter, like all the other phenomena of credit we
shall come across later on, cannot be analysed here in detail. The
competition between lenders and borrowers and the resultant minor
fluctuations of the money-market fall outside the scope of our inquiry.
The circuit described by the rate of interest during the industrial
cycle requires for its presentation the analysis of this cycle itself,
but this likewise cannot be given here. The same applies to the greater
or lesser approximate equalisation of the rate of interest in the
world-market. We are here concerned with the independent form of
interest-bearing capital and the individualisation of interest, as
distinct from profit.

Since interest is merely a part of profit paid, according to our earlier
assumption, by the industrial capitalist to the money-capitalist, the
maximum limit of interest is the profit itself, in which case the
portion pocketed by the productive capitalist would = 0. Aside from
exceptional cases, in which interest might actually be larger than
profit, but then could not be paid out of the profit, one might consider
as the maximum limit of interest the total profit minus the portion (to
be subsequently analysed) which resolves itself into wages of
superintendence. The minimum limit of interest is altogether
indeterminable. It may fall to any low. Yet in that case there will
always be counteracting influences to raise it again above this relative
minimum.

"The relation between the sum paid for the use of capital and the
capital expresses the rate of interest as measured in money." "The rate
of interest depends 1) on the rate of profit; 2) on the proportion in
which the entire profit is divided between the lender and borrower."
(_Economist_, January 22, 1853.) "If that which men pay as interest for
the use of what they borrow, be a part of the profits it is capable of
producing, this interest must always be governed by those profits."
(Massie, 1.c., p.49.)

Let us first assume that there is a fixed relation between the total
profit and that part of it which has to be paid as interest to the
money-capitalist. It is then clear that the interest will rise or fall
with the total profit, and the latter is determined by the general rate
of profit and its fluctuations. For instance, if the average rate of
profit were = 20% and the interest = ¼ of the profit, the rate of
interest would = 5%; if the average rate of profit were = 16%, the rate
of interest would = 4%. With the rate of profit at 20%, the rate of
interest might rise to 8%, and the industrial capitalist would still
make the same profit as he would at a rate of profit = 16% and a rate of
interest = 4%, namely 12%. Should interest rise only to 6% or 7%, he
would still keep a larger share of the profit. If the interest amounted
to a constant quota of the average profit, it would follow that the
higher the general rate of profit, the greater the absolute difference
between the total profit and the interest, and the greater the portion
of the total profit pocketed by the productive capitalist, and vice
versa. Take it that interest = 1/5 of the average profit. One-fifth of
10 is 2; the difference between total profit and interest = 8. One-fifth
of 20 = 4; difference = 20 - 4 = 16; 1/5 of 25 = 5; difference = 25 - 5
= 20; 1/5 of 30 = 6; difference = 30 - 6 = 24; 1/5 of 35 = 7; difference
= 35 - 7 = 28. The different rates of interest of 4, 5, 6, 7% would here
always represent no more than 1/5, or 20% of the total profit. If the
rates of profit are different, therefore, different rates of interest
may represent the same aliquot parts of the total profit, or the same
percentage of the total profit. With such constant proportions of
interest, the industrial profit (the difference between the total profit
and the interest) would rise proportionately to the general rate of
profit, and conversely.

All other conditions taken as equal, _i.e._, assuming the proportion
between interest and total profit to be more or less constant, the
functioning capitalist is able and willing to pay a higher or lower
interest directly proportional to the level of the rate of profit.^([1])

Since we have seen that the rate of profit is inversely proportional to
the development of capitalist production, it follows that the higher or
lower rate of interest in a country is in the same inverse proportion to
the degree of industrial development, at least in so far as the
difference in the rate of interest actually expresses the difference in
the rates of profit. It shall later develop that this need not always be
the case. In this sense it may be said that interest is regulated
through profit, or, more precisely, the general rate of profit. And this
mode of regulating interest applies even to its average.

In any event the average rate of profit is to be regarded as the
ultimate determinant of the maximum limit of interest.

The fact that interest is to be related to average profit will be
considered presently at greater length. Whenever a specified entity,
such as profit, is to be divided between two parties, the matter
naturally hinges above all on the magnitude of the entity which is to be
divided, and this, the magnitude of the profit, is determined by its
average rate. Suppose the general rate of profit, hence the magnitude of
profit, for a capital of given size, say, = 100, is assumed as given.
Then the variations of interest will obviously be inversely proportional
to those of the part of profit remaining in the hands of the producing
capitalist, working with a borrowed capital. And the circumstances
determining the amount of profit to be distributed, of the value
produced by unpaid labour, differ widely from those which determine its
distribution between these two kinds of capitalists, and frequently
produce entirely opposite effects. ^([2])

If we observe the cycles in which modern industry moves — state of
inactivity, mounting revival, prosperity, over-production, crisis,
stagnation, state of inactivity, etc., which fall beyond the scope of
our analysis — we shall find that a low rate of interest generally
corresponds to periods of prosperity or extra profit, a rise in interest
separates prosperity and its reverse, and a maximum of interest up to a
point of extreme usury corresponds to the period of crisis.^([3]) The
summer of 1843 ushered in a period of remarkable prosperity; the rate of
interest, still 4½% in the spring of 1842, fell to 2% in the spring and
summer of 1843;^([4]) in September it fell as low as 1½% (Gilbart, I, p.
166); whereupon it rose to 8% and higher during the crisis of 1847.

It is possible, however, for low interest to go along with stagnation,
and for moderately rising interest to go along with revived activity.

The rate of interest reaches its peak during crises, when money is
borrowed at any cost to meet payments. Since a rise in interest implies
a fall in the price of securities, this simultaneously offers a fine
opportunity to people with available money-capital, to acquire at
ridiculously low prices such interest-bearing securities as must, in the
course of things, at least regain their average price as soon as the
rate of interest falls again.^([5])

However, the rate of interest also has a tendency to fall quite
independently of the fluctuations in the rate of profit. And, indeed,
due to two main causes:

I. "Were we even to suppose that capital was never borrowed with any
view but to productive employment, I think it very possible that
interest might vary without any change in the rate of gross profits.
For, as a nation advances in the career of wealth, a class of men
springs up and increases more and more, who by the labours of their
ancestors find themselves in the possession of funds sufficiently ample
to afford a handsome maintenance from the interest alone. Very many also
who during youth and middle age were actively engaged in business,
retire in their latter days' to live quietly on the interest of the sums
they have themselves accumulated. This class, as well as the former, has
a tendency to increase with the increasing riches of the country, for
those who begin with a tolerable stock are likely to make an
independence sooner than they who commence with little. Thus it comes to
pass, that in old and rich countries, the amount of national capital
belonging to those who are unwilling to take the trouble of employing it
themselves, bears a larger proportion to the whole productive stock of
the society, than in newly settled and poorer districts. How much more
numerous in proportion to the population is the class of _rentiers_ ...
in England! As the class of _rentiers_ increases, so also does that of
lenders of capital, for they are one and the same." (Ramsay, _An Essay
on the Distribution of Wealth_, pp. 201-02.)

II. The development of the credit system and the attendant ever-growing
control of industrialists and merchants over the money savings of all
classes of society that is effected through the bankers, and the
progressive concentration of these savings in amounts which can serve as
money-capital, must also depress the rate of interest. More about this
later.

With reference to the determination of the rate of interest, Ramsay says
that it

"depends partly upon the rate of gross profits, partly on the proportion
in which these are separated into profits of capital and those of
enterprise. This proportion again depends upon the competition between
the lenders of capital and the borrowers; which competition is
influenced, though by no means entirely regulated, by the rate of gross
profit expected to be realised.^([6]) And the reason why competition is
not exclusively regulated by this cause, is, because on the one hand
many borrow without any view to productive employment; and, on the
other, because the proportion of the whole capital to be lent, varies
with the riches of the country independently of any change in gross
profits." (Ramsay, 1. c., pp. 206-07.)

To determine the average rate of interest we must 1) calculate the
average rate of interest during its variations in the major industrial
cycles; and 2) find the rate of interest for investments which require
long-term loans of capital.

The average rate of interest prevailing in a certain country — as
distinct from the continually fluctuating market rates — cannot be
determined by any law. In this sphere there is no such thing as a
natural rate of interest in the sense in which economists speak of a
natural rate of profit and a natural rate of wages. Massie has rightly
said in this respect (p.49):

"The only thing which any man can be in doubt about on this occasion,
is, what proportion of these profits do of right belong to the borrower,
and what to the lender; and this there is no other method of determining
than by the opinions of borrowers and lenders in general; for right and
wrong, in this respect, are only what common consent makes so."

Equating supply and demand — assuming the average rate of profit as
given — means nothing. Wherever else this formula is resorted to (and
this is then practically correct), it serves as a formula to find the
fundamental rule (the regulating limits or limiting magnitudes) which is
independent of, and rather determines, competition; notably as a formula
for those who are held captive by the practice of competition, and by
its phenomena and the conceptions arising out of them, to arrive at what
is again but a superficial idea of the inner connection of economic
relations obtaining within competition. It is a method to pass from the
variations that go with competition to the limits of these variations.
This is not the case with the average rate of interest. There is no good
reason why average conditions of competition, the balance between lender
and borrower, should give the lender an interest rate of 3, 4, 5%, etc.,
or else a certain percentage of the gross profits, say 20% or 50%, on
his capital. Wherever it is competition as such which determines
anything, the determination is accidental, purely empirical, and only
pedantry or fantasy would seek to represent this accident as a
necessity.^([7]) Nothing is more amusing in the reports of Parliament
for 1857 and 1858 concerning bank legislation and commercial crises than
to hear of "the real rate produced" as the directors of the Bank of
England, London bankers, country bankers, and professional theorists
chatter back and forth, never getting beyond such commonplaces as that
"the price paid for the use of loanable capital should vary with the
supply of such capital," that "a high rate and a low profit cannot
permanently exist," and similar specious platitudes.^([8]) Customs,
juristic tradition, etc., have as much to do with determining the
average rate of interest as competition itself, in so far as it exists
not merely as an average, but rather as actual magnitude. In many law
disputes, where interest has to be calculated, an average rate of
interest has to be assumed as the legal rate. If we inquire further as
to why the limits of a mean rate of interest cannot be deduced from
general laws, we find the answer lies simply in the nature of interest.
It is merely a part of the average profit. The same capital appears in
two roles — as loanable capital in the lender's hands and as industrial,
or commercial, capital in the hands of the functioning capitalist. But
it functions just once, and produces profit just once. In the production
process itself the nature of capital as loanable capital plays no role.
How the two parties who have claim to it divide the profit is in itself
just as purely empirical a matter belonging to the realm of accident as
the distribution of percentage shares of a common profit in a business
partnership. Two entirely different elements — labour-power and capital
— act as determinants in the division between surplus-value and wages,
which division essentially determines the rate of profit; these are
functions of two independent variables, which limit one another; and it
is their _qualitative difference_ that is the source of the
_quantitative division_ of the produced value. We shall see later that
the same occurs in the splitting of surplus-value into rent and profit.
Nothing of the kind occurs in the case of interest. Here the
_qualitative differentiation_ as we shall presently see, proceeds rather
from the _purely quantitative division_ of the same sum of
surplus-value.

It follows from the aforesaid that there is no such thing as a "natural"
rate of interest. But if, unlike the general rate of profit, there is on
the one hand no general law to determine the limits of the average
interest, or average rate of interest as distinct from the continually
fluctuating market rates of interest, because it is merely a question of
dividing the gross profit between two owners of capital under different
title; on the other hand, the rate of interest — be it the average or
the market rate prevalent in each particular case — appears as a
uniform, definite and tangible magnitude in a quite different way from
the general rate of profit. ^([9])

The rate of interest is similarly related to the rate of profit as the
market-price of a commodity is to its value. In so far as the rate of
interest is determined by the rate of profit, this is always the general
rate of profit and not any specific rate of profit prevailing in some
particular branch of industry, and still less any extra profit which an
individual capitalist may make in a particular sphere of
business.^([10]) It is a fact, therefore, that the general rate of
profit appears as an empirical, given reality in the average rate of
interest, although the latter is not a pure or reliable expression of
the former.

It is indeed true that the rate of interest itself varies in accordance
with the different classes of securities offered by borrowers, and in
accordance with the length of time for which the money is borrowed; but
it is uniform in each of these classes at a given moment. This
distinction, then, does not militate against a fixed and uniform
appearance of the rate of interest. ^([11])

The average rate of interest appears in every country over fairly long
periods as a constant magnitude, because the general rate of profit
varies only at longer intervals — in spite of constant variations in
specific rates of profit, in which a change in one sphere is offset by
an opposite change in another. And its relative constancy is revealed
precisely in this more or less constant nature of the average, or
common, rate of interest.

As concerns the perpetually fluctuating market rate of interest,
however, it exists at any moment as a fixed magnitude, just as the
market-price of commodities, because in the money-market all loanable
capital continually faces functioning capital as an aggregate mass, so
that the relation between the supply of loanable capital on one side,
and the demand for it on the other, decides the market level of interest
at any given time. This is all the more so, the more the development,
and the attendant concentration, of the credit system gives to loanable
capital a general social character and throws it all at once on the
money-market. On the other hand, the general rate of profit is never
anything more than a tendency, a movement to equalise specific rates of
profit. The competition between capitalists — which is itself this
movement toward equilibrium — consists here of their gradually
withdrawing capital from spheres in which profit is for an appreciable
length of time below average, and gradually investing capital into
spheres in which profit is above average. Or it may also consist in
additional capital distributing itself gradually and in varying
proportions among these spheres. It is continual variation in supply and
withdrawal of capital in regard to these different spheres, and never a
simultaneous mass effect, as in the determination of the rate of
interest.

We have seen that interest-bearing capital, although a category which
differs absolutely from a commodity, becomes a commodity _sui generis_,
so that interest becomes its price, fixed at all times by supply and
demand like the market-price of an ordinary commodity. The market rate
of interest, while fluctuating continually, appears therefore at any
given moment just as constantly fixed and uniform as the market-price of
a commodity prevailing in each individual case. Money-capitalists supply
this commodity, and functioning capitalists buy it, creating the demand
for it. This does not occur when equalisation creates a general rate of
profit. If prices of commodities in one sphere are below or above the
price of production (wherein we deliberately leave aside the
fluctuations attendant upon the various phases of the industrial cycle
in each and every enterprise) the balance is effected through the
expansion or curtailment of production, _i.e._, the expansion or
curtailment of the masses of commodities thrown on the market by
industrial capitals — caused by inflow or outflow of capital to and from
individual spheres of production. It is by this equalisation of the
average market-prices of commodities to prices of production that
deviations of specific rates of profit from the general, or average,
rate of profit are corrected. It cannot be that in this process
industrial or mercantile capital _as such_ should ever assume the
appearance of commodities vis-à-vis the buyer, as in the case of
interest-bearing capital. If perceptible at all, this process is so only
in the fluctuations and equalisations of market-prices of commodities to
prices of production, not as a direct fixation of the average profit.
The general rate of profit is, indeed, determined 1) by the
surplus-value produced by the total capital, 2) by the proportion of
this surplus-value to the value of the total capital, and 3) by
competition, but only in so far as this is a movement whereby capitals
invested in particular production spheres seek to draw equal dividends
out of this surplus-value in proportion to their relative magnitudes.
The general rate of profit, therefore, derives actually from causes far
different and far more complicated than the market rate of interest,
which is directly and immediately determined by the proportion between
supply and demand, and hence is not as tangible and obvious a fact as
the rate of interest. The individual rates of profit in various spheres
of production are themselves more or less uncertain; but in so far as
they appear, it is not their uniformity but their differences which are
perceptible. The general rate of profit, however, appears only as the
lowest limit of profit, not as an empirical, directly visible form of
the actual rate of profit.

In emphasising this difference between the rate of interest and the rate
of profit, we still omit the following two points, which favour
consolidation of the rate of interest: 1) the historical pre-existence
of interest-bearing capital and the existence of a traditional general
rate of interest; 2) the far greater direct influence exerted by the
world-market on establishing the rate of interest, irrespective of the
economic conditions of a country, as compared with its influence on the
rate of profit.

The average profit does not obtain as a directly established fact, but
rather is to be determined as an end result of the equalisation of
opposite fluctuations. Not so with the rate of interest. It is a thing
fixed daily in its general, at least local, validity — a thing which
serves industrial and mercantile capitals even as a prerequisite and a
factor in the calculation of their operation. It becomes the general
endowment of every sum of money of £100 to yield £2, 3, 4, 5.
Meteorological reports never denote the readings of the barometer and
thermometer with greater accuracy than stock exchange reports denote the
rate of interest, not for one or another capital, but for capital in the
money-market, _i.e._, for loanable capital generally.

In the money-market only lenders and borrowers face one another. The
commodity has the same form-money. All specific forms of capital in
accordance with its investment in particular spheres of production or
circulation are here obliterated. It exists in the undifferentiated
homogeneous form of independent value-money. The competition of
individual spheres does not affect it. They are all thrown together as
borrowers of money, and capital confronts them all in a form, in which
it is as yet indifferent to the prospective manner of its investment. It
obtains most emphatically in the supply and demand of capital as
_essentially the common capital of a class_ — something industrial
capital does only in the movement and competition of capital between the
various individual spheres. On the other hand, money-capital in the
money-market actually possesses the form, in which, indifferent to its
specific employment, it is divided as a common element among the various
spheres, among the capitalist class, as the requirements of production
in each individual sphere may dictate. Moreover, with the development of
large-scale industry money-capital, so far as it appears on the market,
is not represented by some individual capitalist, not the owner of one
or another fraction of the capital in the market, but assumes the nature
of a concentrated, organised mass, which, quite different from actual
production, is subject to the control of bankers, _i.e._, the
representatives of social capital. So that, as concerns the form of
demand, loanable capital is confronted by the class as a whole, whereas
in the province of supply it is loanable capital which obtains _en
masse_.

These are some of the reasons why the general rate of profit appears
blurred and hazy alongside the definite interest rate, which may
fluctuate in magnitude, but always confronts borrowers as given and
fixed because it varies uniformly for all of them. Just as variations in
the value of money do not prevent it from having the same value
vis-à-vis all commodities. Just as the daily fluctuations in
market-prices of commodities do not prevent them from being daily
reported in the papers. So the rate of interest is regularly reported as
"the price of money." It is so, because capital itself is being offered
here in the form of money as a commodity. The fixation of its price is
thus a fixation of its market-price, as with all other commodities. The
rate of interest, therefore, always appears as the general rate of
interest, as so much money for so much money, as a definite quantity.
The rate of profit, on the other hand, may vary even within the same
sphere for commodities with the same price, depending on different
conditions under which different capitals produce the same commodity,
because the rate of profit of an individual capital is not determined by
the market-price of a commodity, but rather by the difference between
market-price and cost-price. And these different rates of profit can
strike a balance — first within the same sphere and then between
different spheres — only through continual fluctuation.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

(Note for later elaboration.) A specific form of credit: It is known
that when money serves as a means of payment instead of a means of
purchase, the commodity is alienated, but its value is realised only
later. If payment is not made until after the commodity has again been
sold, this sale does not appear as the result of the purchase; rather it
is through this sale that the purchase is realised. In other words, the
sale becomes a means of purchase. Secondly: titles to debts, bills of
exchange, etc., become means of payment for the creditor. Thirdly: the
compensation of titles to debts replaces money.

Notes

1. "The natural rate of interest is governed by the profits of trade to
particulars." (Massie, l. c., p. 51.)

2. At this point the manuscript contains the following remark: "The
course of this chapter shows that it is preferable, before analysing the
laws of the distribution of profits, to ascertain first the way in which
the division of quantity becomes one of quality. To make a transition
from the previous chapter, we need but assume that interest is a certain
indefinite portion of profit."

3. "In the first period, immediately after pressure, money is abundant
without speculation; in the second period, money is abundant and
speculations abound; in the third period, speculation begins to decline
and money is in demand, in the fourth period, money is scarce and a
pressure arrives." (Gilbart, _A Practical Treatise on Banking_, 5th ed.,
Vol. I, London, 1849, p. 149.)

4. Tooke explains this "by the accumulation of surplus-capital
necessarily accompanying the scarcity of profitable employment for it in
previous years, by the release of hoards, and by the revival of
confidence in commercial prospects." _(History of Prices from 1839 till
1847_, London, 1848, p. 54.

5. "An old customer of a banker was refused a loan upon a £200,000 bond;
when about to leave to make known his suspension of payment, he was told
there was no necessity for the step, under the circumstances the banker
would buy the bond at £50,000." ([H. Roy] _The Theory of the Exchanges.
The Bank Charter Act of 1844, etc._, London, 1869, p. 50.)

6. Since the rate of interest is on the whole determined by the average
rate of profit, inordinate swindling is often bound up with a low rate
of interest. For instance, the railway swindle in the summer of 1844.
The rate of interest of the Bank of England was not raised to 3% until
16th October, 1844.

7. J G. Opdyke, for instance, in his _Treatise on Political Economy_
(New York, 1851) makes a very unsuccessful attempt to explain the
universality of a 5% rate of interest by eternal laws. Mr. Karl Arnd is
still more naive in _Die naturgemässe Volkswirtschaft gegenüber dem
Monopoltengeist und dem Kommunismus, etc._, Hanau, 1845. It is stated
there: "In the natural course of goods production there is just _one_
phenomenon, which, in the fully settled countries, seems in some measure
to regulate the rate of interest; this is the proportion, in which the
timber in European forests is augmented through their annual growth.
This new growth occurs quite independently of their exchange-value, at
the rate of 3 or 4 to 100." (How queer that trees should see to their
new growth independently of their exchange-value!) "According to this a
drop in the rate of interest below its present level in the richest
countries cannot be expected" (p. 124). (He means, because the new
growth of the trees is independent of their exchange-value, however much
their exchange-value may depend on their new growth.) This deserves to
be called "the primordial forest rate of interest." Its discoverer makes
a further laudable contribution in this work to "our science" as the
"philosopher of the dog tax." [Marx ironically calls K. Arnd the
"philosopher of the dog tax" because in a special paragraph in his book
(§ 88, 5.420-24) he advocated that tax. — Ed.]

8. The Bank of England raises and lowers the rate of its discount,
always, of course, with due consideration of the rate prevailing in the
open market, in accordance with imports and exports of gold. "By which
gambling in discounts, by anticipation of the alterations in the
bank-rate, has now become half the trade of the great heads of the money
centre" — _i.e._, of the London money-market. ([H. Roy] _The Theory of
the Exchanges, etc._ , p. 113.)

9. "'The price of commodities fluctuates' continually; they are all made
for different uses; the money serves for all purposes. The commodities,
even those of the same kind, differ according to quality; cash money is
always of the same value, or at least is assumed to be so. Thus it is
that the price of money, which we designate by the term interest, has a
greater stability and uniformity than that of any other thing." (J.
Steuart, _Principles of Political Economy_, French translation, 1789,
IV, p. 27.)

10. "This rule of dividing profits is not, however, to be applied
particularly to every lender and borrower, but to lenders and borrowers
in general ... remarkably great and small gains are the reward of skill
and the want of understanding, which lenders have nothing at all to do
with; for as they will not suffer by the one, they ought not to benefit
by the other. What has been said of particular men in the same business
is applicable to particular sorts of business; if the merchants and
tradesmen employed in any one branch of trade get more by what they
borrow than the common profits made by other merchants and tradesmen of
the same country, the extraordinary gain is theirs, though it required
only common skill and understanding to get it; and not the lenders', who
supplied them with money ... for the lenders would not have lent their
money to carry on any branch of trade up on lower terms than would admit
of paying so much as the common rate of interest; and therefore they
ought not to receive more than that, whatever advantages may be made by
their money." (Massie, 1. c., pp. 50, 51.)

11. Bank-rate 5%
Market rate of discount, 60 days' drafts 3 5/8%
Ditto, 8 months' 3½%
Ditto, 6 months' 3 5/16%
Loans to bill-brokers, day to day 1 to 2%
Ditto, for one week 3%
Last rate for fortnight, loans to stockbrokers 4¾ to 5%
Deposit allowance (banks) 3½%
Ditto (discount houses) 3 to 3¼ %
How large this difference may be for one and the same day is shown in
the preceding figures of the rate of interest of the London money-market
on December 9, 1889, taken from the City article of the _Daily News_ of
December 10.
The minimum is 1%, the maximum 5%. [_F.E._]

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 23. Interest and Profit of Enterprise

 

Interest, as we have seen in the two preceding chapters, appears
originally, is originally, and remains in fact merely a portion of the
profit, _i.e._, of the surplus-value, which the functioning capitalist,
industrialist or merchant has to pay to the owner and lender of
money-capital whenever he uses loaned capital instead of his own. If he
employs only his own capital, no such division of profit takes place;
the latter is then entirely his. Indeed, as long as the owners of the
capital employ it on their own in the reproduction process, they do not
compete in determining the rate of interest. This alone shows that the
category of interest — impossible without determining the rate of
interest — is alien to the movements of industrial capital as such.

"The rate of interest may be defined to be that proportional sum which
the lender is content to receive, and the borrower to pay, annually, or
for any longer or shorter period, for the use of a certain amount of
moneyed capital.... When the owner of a capital employs it actively in
reproduction, he does not come under the head of those capitalists, the
proportion of whom, to the number of borrowers, determines the rate of
interest."; (Th. Tooke, _History of Prices_, London, 1838, II, pp.
355-56.)

It is indeed only the separation of capitalists into money-capitalists
and industrial capitalists that transforms a portion of the profit into
interest, that generally creates the category of interest; and it is
only the competition between these two kinds of capitalists which
creates the rate of interest.

As long as capital functions in the process of reproduction — assuming
that it even belongs to the industrial capitalist and he has no need of
paying it back to a lender — the capitalist, as a private individual,
does not have at his disposal this capital itself, but only the profit,
which he may spend as revenue. As long as his capital functions as
capital, it belongs to the process of reproduction, is tied up in it. He
is, indeed, its owner, but this ownership does not enable him to dispose
of it in any other way, so long as he uses it as capital for the
exploitation of labour. The same is true of the money-capitalist. So
long as his capital is loaned out and thereby serves as money-capital,
it brings him interest, a portion of the profit, but he cannot dispose
of the principal. This is evident whenever he loans out his capital for,
say, a year, or more, and receives interest at certain stipulated times
without the return of his principal. But even the return of the
principal makes no difference here. If he gets it back, he must always
loan it out again, so long as it is to function for him as capital —
here as money-capital. As long as he keeps it in his own hands, it does
not collect interest and does not act as capital; and as long as it does
gather interest and serve as capital, it is out of his hands. Hence the
possibility of loaning out capital for all time. The following remarks
by Tooke directed against Bosanquet are, therefore, entirely wrong. He
quotes Bosanquet (_Metallic, Paper and Credit Currency,_ London, 1842,
p. 73):

"Were the rate of interest reduced as low as 1%, capital borrowed would
be placed nearly on a par with capital possessed.";

To this Tooke adds the following marginal note:

"That a capital borrowed at that, or even a lower rate, should be
considered nearly on a par with capital possessed, is a proposition so
strange as hardly to warrant serious notice were it not advanced by a
writer so intelligent, and, on some points of the subject, so well
informed. Has he overlooked the circumstance, or does he consider it of
little consequence, that there must, by the supposition, be a condition
of repayment?"; (Th. Tooke, _An Inquiry into the Currency Principle_ ,
2nd ed., London, 1844, p. 80.)

If interest were = 0, the industrial capitalist operating on borrowed
capital would stand on a par with a capitalist using his own capital.
Both would pocket the same average profit, and capital, whether borrowed
or owned, serves as capital only as long as it produces profit. The
condition of return payment would alter nothing. The nearer the rate of
interest approaches zero, falling, for instance, to 1%, the nearer
borrowed capital is to being on a par with owner's capital. So long as
money-capital is to exist as money-capital, it must always be loaned
out, and indeed at the prevailing rate of interest, say of 1%, and
always to the same class of industrial and commercial capitalists. So
long as these function as capitalists, the sole difference between the
one working with borrowed capital and the other with his own is that the
former must pay interest and the latter must not; the one pockets the
entire profit p, and the other p - i, the profit minus the interest. The
nearer interest approaches zero, the nearer p - i approaches p, and
hence the nearer the two capitals are to being on a par. The one must
pay back the capital and borrow anew; yet the other must likewise
advance it again and again to the production process, so long as his
capital is to function, and cannot dispose of it freely, independent of
this process. The sole remaining difference between the two is the
obvious difference that one is the owner of his capital, and the other
is not.

The question which now arises is this. How does this purely quantitative
division of profit into net profit and interest turn into a qualitative
one? In other words, how is it that a capitalist who employs solely his
own, not borrowed capital, classifies a portion of his gross profit
under the specific category of interest and as such calculates it
separately? And, furthermore, how is it that all capital, whether
borrowed or not, is differentiated as interest-bearing capital from
itself as capital producing a net profit?

It is understood that not every accidental quantitative division of
profit turns in this manner into a qualitative one. For instance, some
industrial capitalists join hands to operate a business and then divide
the profit among themselves in accordance with some legal agreement.
Others do their business, each on his own, without any partners. These
last do not calculate their profit under two heads — one part as
individual profit, and the other as company profit for their
non-existent partners. In this case the quantitative division therefore
does not become a qualitative one. This occurs whenever ownership
happens to be vested in several juridical persons. It does not occur
whenever this is not the case.

In order to answer this question, we must dwell somewhat longer on the
actual point of departure in the formation of interest; that is, we must
proceed from the assumption that the money-capitalist and industrial
capitalist really confront one another not just as legally different
persons, but as persons playing entirely different roles in the
reproduction process, or as persons in whose hands the same capital
really performs a two-fold and wholly different movement. The one merely
loans it, the other employs it productively.

For the productive capitalist who works on borrowed capital, the gross
profit falls into two parts — the interest, which he is to pay the
lender, and the surplus over and above the interest, which makes up his
own share of the profit. If the general rate of profit is given, this
latter portion is determined by the rate of interest; and if the rate of
interest is given, then by the general rate of profit. And furthermore:
however the gross profit, the actual value of the total profit, may
diverge in each individual case from the average profit, the portion
belonging to the functioning capitalist is determined by the interest,
since this is fixed by the general rate of interest (leaving aside any
special legal stipulations) and assumed to be given beforehand, before
the process of production begins, hence before its result, the gross
profit, is achieved. We have seen that the actual specific product of
capital is surplus-value, or, more precisely, profit. But for the
capitalist working on borrowed capital it is not profit, but profit
minus interest, that portion of profit which remains to him after paying
interest. This portion of the profit, therefore, necessarily appears to
him to be the product of a capital as long as it is operative; and this
it is, as far as he is concerned, because he represents capital only as
functioning capital. He is its personification as long as it functions,
and it functions as long as it is profitably invested in industry or
commerce and such operations are undertaken with it through its employer
as are prescribed by the branch of industry concerned. As distinct from
interest, which he has to pay to the lender out of the gross profit, the
portion of profit which falls to his share necessarily assumes the form
of industrial or commercial profit, or, to use a German term embracing
both, the form of _Unternehmergewinn_ (profit of enterprise). If the
gross profit equals the average profit, the size of the profit of
enterprise is determined exclusively by the rate of interest. If the
gross profit deviates from the average profit, its difference from the
average profit (after interest is deducted from both) is determined by
all the circumstances which cause a temporary deviation, be it of the
rate of profit in any particular sphere from the general rate of profit,
or the profit of some individual capitalist in a certain sphere from the
average profit of this sphere. We have seen however that the rate of
profit within the production process itself does not depend on
surplus-value alone, but also on many other circumstances, such as
purchase prices of means of production, methods more productive than the
average, on savings of constant capital, etc. And aside from the price
of production, it depends on special circumstances, and in every single
business transaction on the greater or lesser shrewdness and industry of
the capitalist, whether, and to what extent, he buys or sells above or
below the price of production and thus appropriates a greater or smaller
portion of the total surplus-value in the process of circulation. In any
case, the quantitative division of the gross profit turns here into a
qualitative one, and all the more so because the quantitative division
itself depends on _what_ is to be divided, the _manner_ in which the
active capitalist manages his capital, and what gross profit it yields
to him as a functioning capital, _i.e._, in consequence of his functions
as an active capitalist. The functioning capitalist is here assumed as a
non-owner of capital. Ownership of the capital is represented in
relation to him by the money-capitalist, the lender. The interest he
pays to the latter thus appears as that portion of gross profit which is
due to the ownership of capital as such. As distinct from this, that
portion of profit which falls to the active capitalist appears now as
profit of enterprise, deriving solely from the operations, or functions,
which he performs with the capital in the process of reproduction, hence
particularly those functions which he performs as entrepreneur in
industry or commerce. In relation to him interest appears therefore as
the mere fruit of owning capital, of capital as such abstracted from the
reproduction process of capital, inasmuch as it does not "work,"; does
not function; while profit of enterprise appears to him as the exclusive
fruit of the functions which he performs with the capital, as the fruit
of the movement and performance of capital, of a performance which
appears to him as his own activity, as opposed to the inactivity, the
non-participation of the money-capitalist in the production process.
This qualitative distinction between the two portions of gross profit
that interest is the fruit of capital as such, of the ownership of
capital irrespective of the production process, and that profit of
enterprise is the fruit of performing capital, of capital functioning in
the production process, and hence of the active role played by the
employer of the capital in the reproduction process — this qualitative
distinction is by no means merely a subjective notion of the
money-capitalist, on the one hand, and the industrial capitalist, on the
other. It rests upon an objective fact, for interest flows to the
money-capitalist, to the lender, who is the mere owner of capital, hence
represents only ownership of capital before the production process and
outside of it; while the profit of enterprise flows to the functioning
capitalist alone, who is non-owner of the capital.

The merely quantitative division of the gross profit between two
different persons who both have different legal claims to the same
capital, and hence to the profit produced by it, thus turns into a
qualitative division for both the industrial capitalist in so far as he
is operating on borrowed capital, and for the money-capitalist, in so
far as he does not himself apply his capital. One portion of the profit
appears now as fruit due as such to capital in one form, as interest;
the other portion appears as a specific fruit of capital in an opposite
form, and thus as profit of enterprise. One appears exclusively as the
fruit of operating with the capital, the fruit of performing capital, or
of the functions performed by the active capitalist. And this
ossification and individualisation of the two parts of the gross profit
in respect to one another, as though they originated from two
essentially different sources, now takes firm shape for the entire
capitalist class and the total capital. And, indeed, regardless of
whether the capital employed by the active capitalist is borrowed or
not, and whether the capital belonging to the money-capitalist is
employed by himself or not. The profit of every capital, and
consequently also the average profit established by the equalisation of
capitals, splits, or is separated, into two qualitatively different,
mutually independent and separately individualised parts, to wit —
interest and profit of enterprise — both of which are determined by
separate laws. The capitalist operating on his own capital, like the one
operating on borrowed capital, divides the gross profit into interest
due to himself as owner, as his own lender, and into profit of
enterprise due to him as to an active capitalist performing his
function. As concerns this division, therefore, as a qualitative one, it
is immaterial whether the capitalist really has to share with another,
or not. The employer of capital, even when working with his own capital,
splits into two personalities — the owner of capital and the employer of
capital; with reference to the categories of profit which it yields, his
capital also splits into capital_-property,_ capital _outside_ the
production process, and yielding interest of itself, and capital _in_
the production process which yields a profit of enterprise through its
function.

Interest, therefore, becomes firmly established in a way that it no
longer appears as a division of gross profit of indifference to
production, which occurs occasionally when the industrial capitalist
happens to operate with someone else's capital. His profit splits into
interest and profit of enterprise even when he operates on his own
capital. A merely quantitative division thus turns into a qualitative
one. It occurs regardless of the fortuitous circumstance whether the
industrial capitalist is, or is not, the owner of his capital. It is not
only a matter of different quotas of profit assigned to different
persons, but two different categories of profit which are differently
related to the capital, hence related to different aspects of the
capital.

Now that this division of gross profit into interest and profit of
enterprise has become a qualitative one, it is easy to discover the
reasons why it acquires this character of a qualitative division for the
total capital and the entire class of capitalists.

_Firstly_, this follows from the simple empirical circumstance that the
majority of industrial capitalists, even if in different numerical
proportions, work with their own and with borrowed capital, and that at
different times the proportion between one's own and borrowed capital
changes.

_Secondly_, the transformation of a portion of the gross profit into the
form of interest converts its other portion into profit of enterprise.
The latter is, indeed, but the opposite form assumed by the excess of
gross profit over interest as soon as this exists as an independent
category. The entire analysis of the problem how gross profit is
differentiated into interest and profit of enterprise, resolves itself
into the inquiry of how a portion of the gross profit becomes
universally ossified and individualised as interest. Yet historically
interest-bearing capital existed as a completed traditional form, and
hence interest as a completed sub-division of surplus-value produced by
capital, long before the capitalist mode of production and its attendant
conceptions of capital and profit. Thus it is that to the popular mind
money-capital, or interest-bearing capital, is still capital as such, as
capital _par excellence._ Thus it is, on the other hand, that up to the
time of Massie the notion prevailed that it is money as such which is
paid in interest. The fact that loaned capital yields interest whether
actually employed as capital or not — even when borrowed only for
consumption — lends strength to the idea that this form of capital
exists independently. The best proof of the independence which interest
possessed during the early periods of the capitalist mode of production
in reference to profit, and which interest-bearing capital possessed in
reference to industrial capital, is that it was discovered (by Massie
[[J. Massie] _An Essay on the Governing Causes of the Natural Rate of
Interest_, London, 1750. — _Ed._] and after him by Hume [D. Hume, "On
Interest." In: "Essays and Treatises on Several Subjects," Vol. I,
London, 1764. — _Ed._] ) as late as the middle of the 18th century, that
interest is but a portion of the gross profit, and that such a discovery
was at all necessary.

_Thirdly_, whether the industrial capitalist operates on his own or on
borrowed capital does not alter the fact that the class of
money-capitalists confronts him as a special kind of capitalists,
money-capital as an independent kind of capital, and interest as an
independent form of surplus-value peculiar to this specific capital.

_Qualitatively_ speaking, interest is surplus-value yielded by the mere
ownership of capital; it is yielded by capital as such, even though its
owner remains outside the reproduction process. Hence it is
surplus-value realised by capital outside of its process.

_Quantitatively_ speaking, that portion of profit which forms interest
does not seem to be related to industrial or commercial capital as such,
but to money-capital, and the rate of this portion of surplus-value, the
rate of interest, reinforces this relation. Because, in the first place,
the rate of interest is independently determined despite its dependence
upon the general rate of profit, and, in the second place, like the
market-price of commodities, it appears in contrast to the intangible
rate of profit as a fixed, uniform, tangible and always given relation
for all its variations. If all capital were in the hands of the
industrial capitalists there would be no such thing as interest and rate
of interest. The independent form assumed by the quantitative division
of gross profit creates the qualitative one. If the industrial
capitalist were to compare himself with the money-capitalist, it would
be his profit of enterprise alone, the excess of his gross profit over
the average interest — the latter appearing to be empirically given by
virtue of the rate of interest — that would distinguish him from the
other person. If, on the other hand, he compares himself with the
industrial capitalist working with his own, instead of borrowed,
capital, the latter differs from him only as a money-capitalist in
pocketing the interest instead of paying it to someone else. The portion
of gross profit distinguished from interest appears to him in either
case as profit of enterprise, and interest itself as a surplus-value
yielded by capital as such, which it would yield even if not applied
productively.

This is correct in the practical sense for the individual capitalist. He
has the choice of making use of his capital by lending it out as
interest-bearing capital, or of expanding its value on his own by using
it as productive capital, regardless of whether it exists as
money-capital from the very first, or whether it still has to be
converted into money-capital. But to apply it to the total capital of
society, as some vulgar economists do, and to go so far as to define it
as the cause of profit, is, of course, preposterous. The idea of
converting all the capital into money-capital, without there being
people who buy and put to use means of production, which make up the
total capital outside of a relatively small portion of it existing in
money, is, of course, sheer nonsense. It would be still more absurd to
presume that capital would yield interest on the basis of capitalist
production without performing any productive function, _i.e._, without
creating surplus-value, of which interest is just a part; that the
capitalist mode of production would run its course without capitalist
production. If an untowardly large section of capitalists were to
convert their capital into money-capital, the result would be a
frightful depreciation of money-capital and a frightful fall in the rate
of interest; many would at once face the impossibility of living on
their interest, and would hence be compelled to reconvert into
industrial capitalists. But we repeat that it is a fact for the
individual capitalist. For this reason, even when operating with his own
capital, he necessarily considers the part of his average profit which
equals the average interest as fruit of his capital as such, set apart
from the process of production; and as distinct from this portion
singled out as interest, he considers the surplus of the gross profit as
mere profit of enterprise.

_Fourthly_, [A blank in the manuscript].

We have seen, therefore, that the portion of profit which the
functioning capitalist has to pay to the owner of borrowed capital is
transformed into an independent form for a portion of the profit, which
all capital as such, whether borrowed or not, yields under the name of
interest. How large this portion is depends on the average rate of
interest. Its origin is only still revealed in the fact that the
functioning capitalist, when owner of his capital, does not compete — at
least not actively — in determining the interest rate. The purely
quantitative division of the profit between two persons who have
different legal titles to it has turned into a qualitative division,
which seems to spring from the very nature of capital and profit.
Because, as we have seen, as soon as a portion of profit universally
assumes the form of interest, the difference between average profit and
interest, or the portion of profit over and above the interest, assumes
a form opposite to interest — the form of profit of enterprise. These
two forms, interest and profit of enterprise, exist only as opposites.
Hence, they are not related to surplus-value, of which they are but
parts placed under different categories, heads or names, but rather to
one another. It is because one portion of profit turns into interest,
that the other appears as profit of enterprise.

By profit we here always mean average profit, since variations do not
concern us in this analysis, be they of individual profits or of profits
in different spheres — hence variations caused by the competitive
struggle and other circumstances affecting the distribution of the
average profit, or surplus-value. This applies generally to this entire
inquiry.

Interest is then net profit, as Ramsay calls it, which the ownership of
capital yields as such, either simply to the lender, who remains outside
the reproduction process, or to the owner who employs his capital
productively. But in the latter's case, too, capital yields this net
profit to him not in his capacity of productive capitalist, but of
money-capitalist, of lender of his own capital as interest-bearing
capital to himself as to a functioning capitalist. Just as the
conversion of money, and of value in general, into capital is the
constant result of capitalist production, so is its existence as capital
its constant precondition. By its ability to be transformed into means
of production it continually commands unpaid labour and thereby
transforms the processes of production and circulation of commodities
into the production of surplus-value for its owner. Interest is,
therefore, the expression of the fact that value in general-materialised
labour in its general social form-value which assumes the form of means
of production in the actual process of production, confronts living
labour-power as an independent power, and is a means of appropriating
unpaid labour; and that it is such a power because it confronts the
labourer as the property of another. But on the other hand, this
antithesis to wage-labour is obliterated in the form of interest,
because interest-bearing capital as such has not wage-labour, but
productive capital for its opposite. The lending capitalist as such
faces the capitalist performing his actual function in the process of
reproduction, not the wage-worker, who, precisely under capitalist
production, is expropriated of the means of production. Interest-bearing
capital is capital as _property_ as distinct from capital as a
_function._ But so long as capital does not perform its function, it
does not exploit labourers and does not come into opposition to labour.

On the other hand, profit of enterprise is not related as an opposite to
wage-labour, but only to interest.

_Firstly_, assuming the average profit to be given, the rate of the
profit of enterprise is not determined by wages, but by the rate of
interest. It is high or low in inverse proportion to it ^([1])

_Secondly_, the functioning capitalist derives his claim to profits of
enterprise, hence the profit of enterprise itself, not from his
ownership of capital, but from the function of capital, as distinct from
the definite form in which it is only inert property. This stands out as
an immediately apparent contrast whenever he operates with borrowed
capital, and interest and profit of enterprise therefore go to different
persons. The profit of enterprise springs from the function of capital
in the reproduction process, hence as a result of the operations, the
acts by which the functioning capitalist promotes this function of
industrial and commercial capital. But to represent functioning capital
is not a sinecure, like representing interest-bearing capital. On the
basis of capitalist production, the capitalist directs the process of
production and circulation. Exploiting productive labour entails
exertion, whether he exploits it himself or has it exploited by someone
else on his behalf. Therefore, his profit of enterprise appears to him
as distinct from interest, as independent of the ownership of capital,
but rather as the result of his function as a non-proprietor — a
_labourer._

He necessarily conceives the idea for this reason that his profit of
enterprise, far from being counterposed to wage-labour and far from
being the unpaid labour of others, is itself rather a _wage_ or wages of
superintendence of labour, higher than a common labourer's, 1) because
the work is far more complicated, and 2) because he pays them to
himself. The fact that his function as a capitalist consists in creating
surplus-value, _i.e._, unpaid labour, and creating it under the most
economical conditions, is entirely lost sight of in the contrast that
interest falls to the share of the capitalist even when he does not
perform the function of a capitalist and is merely the owner of capital;
and that, on the other hand, profit of enterprise does fall to the share
of the functioning capitalist even when he is not the owner of the
capital on which he operates. He forgets, due to the antithetical form
of the two parts into which profit, hence surplus-value, is divided,
that both are merely parts of the surplus-value, and that this division
alters nothing in the nature, origin, and way of existence of
surplus-value.

In the process of reproduction the functioning capitalist represents
capital as the property of another vis-à-vis the wage-labourers, and the
money-capitalist, represented by the functioning capitalist, takes a
hand in exploiting labour. The fact that the investing capitalist can
perform his function of making the labourers work for him, or of
employing means of production as capital, only as the personification of
the means of production vis-à-vis the labourers, is forgotten in the
contradiction between the function of capital in the reproduction
process and the mere ownership of capital outside of the reproduction
process.

In fact, the form of interest and profit of enterprise assumed by the
two parts of profit, _i.e._, of surplus-value, expresses no relation to
labour, because this relation exists only between labour and profit, or
rather the surplus-value as a sum, a whole, the unity of these two
parts. The proportion in which the profit is divided, and the different
legal titles by which this division is sanctioned, are based on the
assumption that profit is already in existence. If, therefore, the
capitalist is the owner of the capital on which he operates, he pockets
the whole profit, or surplus-value. It is absolutely immaterial to the
labourer whether the capitalist does this, or whether he has to pay a
part of it to a third person as its legal proprietor. The reasons for
dividing the profit among two kinds of capitalists thus turn
imperceptibly into the reasons for the existence of the profit, the
surplus-value, that is to be divided, and which capital as such derives
from the reproduction process regardless of any subsequent division.
Since interest is opposed to profit of enterprise, and profit of
enterprise to interest, and since they are both counterposed to one
another, but not to labour, it follows that profit of enterprise plus
interest, _i.e._, profit, and further surplus-value, are derived — from
what? From the antithetical form of its two parts! But profit is
produced before its division is undertaken, and before there can be any
thought of it.

Interest-bearing capital remains as such only so long as the loaned
money is actually converted into capital and a surplus is produced with
it, of which interest is a part. But this does not rule out that drawing
interest, regardless of the process of production, is its organic
property. So does labour-power preserve its property of producing value
only so long as it is employed and materialised in the labour-process;
yet this does not argue against the fact that it is potentially, as a
power, an activity which creates value, and that as such it does not
spring from the process of production, but rather antecedes it. It is
bought as such a capacity for creating value. One might also buy it
without setting it to work productively; for purely personal ends, for
instance, for personal services, etc. The same applies to capital. It is
the borrower's affair whether he employs it as capital, hence actually
sets in motion its inherent property of producing surplus-value. What he
pays for, is in either case the potential surplus-value inherently
contained in capital as a commodity.

Let us now consider profit of enterprise in greater detail.

Since the specific social attribute of capital under capitalist
production — that of being property commanding the labour-power of
another — becomes fixed, so that interest appears as a part of
surplus-value produced by capital in this interrelation, the other part
of surplus-value — profit of enterprise — must necessarily appear as
coming not from capital as such, but from the process of production,
separated from its specific social attribute, whose distinct mode of
existence is already expressed by the term interest on capital. But the
process of production, separated from capital, is simply a
labour-process. Therefore, the industrial capitalist, as distinct from
the owner of capital, does not appear as operating capital, but rather
as a functionary irrespective of capital, or, as a simple agent of the
labour-process in general, as a labourer, and indeed as a wage-labourer.

Interest as such expresses precisely the existence of the conditions of
labour as capital, in their social antithesis to labour, and in their
transformation into personal power vis-à-vis and over labour. It
represents the ownership of capital as a means of appropriating the
products of the labour of others. But it represents this characteristic
of capital as something which belongs to it outside the production
process and by no means is the result of the specifically capitalist
attribute of this production process itself. Interest represents this
characteristic not as directly counterposed to labour, but rather as
unrelated to labour, and simply as a relationship of one capitalist to
another. Hence, as an attribute outside of and irrelevant to the
relation of capital to labour. In interest, therefore, in that specific
form of profit in which the antithetical character of capital assumes an
independent form, this is done in such a way that the antithesis is
completely obliterated and abstracted. Interest is a relationship
between two capitalists, not between capitalist and labourer.

On the other hand, this form of interest lends the other portion of
profit the qualitative form of profit of enterprise, and further of
wages of superintendence. The specific functions which the capitalist as
such has to perform, and which fall to him as distinct from and opposed
to the labourer, are presented as mere functions of labour. He creates
surplus-value not because he works as a _capitalist,_ but because he
_also_ works, regardless of his capacity of capitalist. This portion of
surplus-value is thus no longer surplus-value, but its opposite, an
equivalent for labour performed. Due to the alienated character of
capital, its antithesis to labour, being relegated to a place outside
the actual process of exploitation, namely to the interest-bearing
capital, this process of exploitation itself appears as a simple
labour-process in which the functioning capitalist merely performs a
different kind of labour than the labourer. So that the labour of
exploiting and the exploited labour both appear identical as labour. The
labour of exploiting is just as much labour as exploited labour. The
social form of capital falls to interest, but expressed in a neutral and
indifferent form. The economic function of capital falls to profit of
enterprise, but abstracted from the specific capitalist character of
this function.

The same thing passes through the mind of the capitalist in this case as
in the case of the reasons indicated in Part II of this book for
compensation in the equalisation to average profit. These reasons for
compensation which enter the distribution of surplus-value as
determinants are distorted in a capitalist's mind to appear as bases of
origin and the (subjective) justifications of profit itself.

The conception of profit of enterprise as the wages of supervising
labour, arising from the antithesis of profit of enterprise to interest,
is further strengthened by the fact that a portion of profit may,
indeed, be separated, and is separated in reality, as wages, or rather
the reverse, that a portion of wages appears under capitalist production
as integral part of profit. This portion, as Adam Smith correctly
deduced, presents itself in pure form, independently and wholly
separated from profit (as the sum of interest and profit of enterprise),
on the one hand, and on the other, from that portion of profit which
remains, after interest is deducted, as profit of enterprise in the
salary of management of those branches of business whose size, etc.,
permits of a sufficient division of labour to justify a special salary
for a manager.

The labour of supervision and management is naturally required wherever
the direct process of production assumes the form of a combined social
process, and not of the isolated labour of independent producers.^([2])
However, it has a double nature.

On the one hand, all labour in which many individuals co-operate
necessarily requires a commanding will to co-ordinate and unify the
process, and functions which apply not to partial operations but to the
total activity of the workshop, much as that of an orchestra conductor.
This is a productive job, which must be performed in every combined mode
of production.

On the other hand — quite apart from any commercial department — this
supervision work necessarily arises in all modes of production based on
the antithesis between the labourer, as the direct producer, and the
owner of the means of production. The greater this antagonism, the
greater the role played by supervision. Hence it reaches its peak in the
slave system.^([3]) But it is indispensable also in the capitalist mode
of production, since the production process in it is simultaneously a
process by which the capitalist consumes labour-power. Just as in
despotic states, supervision and all-round interference by the
government involves both the performance of common activities arising
from the nature of all communities, and the specific functions arising
from the antithesis between the government and the mass of the people.

In the works of ancient writers, who had the slave system before them,
both sides of the work of supervision are as inseparably combined in
theory as they were in practice. Likewise in the works of modern
economists, who regard the capitalist mode of production as absolute. On
the other hand, as I shall presently illustrate with an example, the
apologists of the modern slave system utilise the work of supervision
quite as much as a justification of slavery, as the other economists do
to justify the wage system.

The _villicus_ in Cato's time:

"At the head of the estate with slave economy (_familia rustica_) stands
the manager (_villicus,_ derived from _villa_), who receives and
expends, buys and sells, takes instructions from the master, in whose
absence he gives orders and metes out punishment.... The manager
naturally had more freedom of action than the other slaves; the Magonian
books advise that he be permitted to marry, raise children, and have his
own funds, and Cato recommends that he be married to the female manager;
he alone probably had the prospect of winning his freedom from the
master in the event of good behaviour. As for the rest, all formed a
common household.... Every slave, including the manager himself, was
supplied his necessities at his master's expense at definite intervals
and fixed rates, and had to get along on them... The quantity varied in
accordance with labour, which is why the manager, for example, whose
work was lighter than the other slaves', received a smaller ration than
they."; (Mommsen, _Römische Geschichte,_ 2nd ed., 1856, 1, pp. 809-10.)

Aristotle:

"O gar despothz ouc en ktasqai touz doulouz, allen tw crhqaiu oulouz."
("For the master" — the capitalist — "proves himself such not by
obtaining slaves" — ownership of capital which gives him power to buy
labour-power — "but in employing slaves" — using labourers, nowadays
wage-labourers, in the production process.) "Esti de auth h episthmh
ouden mega ecousa oude semnon." ("But there is nothing great or sublime
about this science.") "a gar ton doulon epistasqai dei poiein eceinon
dei tauta epistasq ai epitattein." "But whatever the slave must be able
to perform, the master must be able to order.") "Dio osoiz exousia mh
autouz cacopaqein epistopoz lambanei tau- thn thn timhn, autoi de
politeuontai h filosofosin." ("Whenever the masters are not compelled to
plague themselves with supervision, the manager assumes _this honour,_
while the masters attend to affairs of state or study philosophy.")
(Aristotle, _De republica,_ Bekker edition, Book I, 7.)

Aristotle says in just so many words that supremacy in the political and
economic fields imposes the functions of government upon the ruling
powers, and hence that they must, in the economic field, know the art of
consuming labour-power. And he adds that this supervisory work is not a
matter of great moment and that for this reason the master leaves the
"honour" of this drudgery to an overseer as soon as he can afford it.

The work of management and supervision — so far as it is not a special
function determined by the nature of all combined social labour, but
rather by the antithesis between the owner of means of production and
the owner of mere labour-power, regardless of whether this labour-power
is purchased by buying the labourer himself, as it is under the slave
system, or whether the labourer himself sells his labour-power, so that
the production process also appears as a process by which capital
consumes his labour — this function arising out of the servitude of the
direct producers has all too often been quoted to justify this
relationship. And exploitation, the appropriation of the unpaid labour
of others, has quite as often been represented as the reward justly due
to the owner of capital for his work; but never better than by a
champion of slavery in the United States, a lawyer named O'Connor, at a
meeting held in New York on December 19, 1859, under the slogan of
"Justice for the South."

"Now, gentlemen," he said amid thunderous applause, "to that condition
of bondage the Negro is assigned by Nature... He has strength, and has
the power to labour; but the Nature which created the power denied to
him either the intellect to govern, or willingness to work." (Applause.)
"Both were denied to him. And that Nature which deprived him of the will
to labour, gave him a master to coerce that will, and to make him a
useful... servant in the clime in which he was capable of living useful
for himself and for the master who governs him... I maintain that it is
not injustice to leave the Negro in the condition in which Nature placed
him, to give him a master to govern him ... nor is it depriving him of
any of his rights to compel him to labour in return, and afford to that
master just compensation for the labour and talent employed in governing
him and rendering him useful to himself and to the society." [_New York
Daily Tribune,_ November 20, 1859, pp. 7-8. — _Ed_]

Now, the wage-labourer, like the slave, must have a master who puts him
to work and rules over him. And assuming the existence of this
relationship of lordship and servitude, it is quite proper to compel the
wage-labourer to produce his own wages and also the wages of
supervision, as compensation for the labour of ruling and supervising
him, or

"just compensation for the labour and talent employed in governing him
and rendering him useful to himself and to the society."

The labour of supervision and management, arising as it does out of an
antithesis, out of the supremacy of capital over labour, and being
therefore common to all modes of production based on class
contradictions like the capitalist mode, is directly and inseparably
connected, also under the capitalist system, with productive functions
which all combined social labour assigns to individuals as their special
tasks. The wages of an _epitropos,_ or _régisseur,_ as he was called in
feudal France, are entirely divorced from profit and assume the form of
wages for skilled labour whenever the business is operated on a
sufficiently large scale to warrant paying for such a manager, although,
for all that, our industrial capitalists are far from "attending to
affairs of state or studying philosophy."

It has already been remarked by Mr. Ure ^([4]) that it is not the
industrial capitalists, but the industrial managers who are "the soul of
our industrial system." Whatever concerns the commercial part of an
establishment we have already said all that is necessary in the
preceding part.

The capitalist mode of production has brought matters to a point where
the work of supervision, entirely divorced from the ownership of
capital, is always readily obtainable. It has, therefore, come to be
useless for the capitalist to perform it himself. An orchestra conductor
need not own the instruments of his orchestra, nor is it within the
scope of his duties as conductor to have anything to do with the "wages"
of the other musicians. Co-operative factories furnish proof that the
capitalist has become no less redundant as a functionary in production
as he himself, looking down from his high perch, finds the big landowner
redundant. Inasmuch as the capitalist's work does not originate in the
purely capitalistic process of production, and hence does not cease on
its own when capital ceases; inasmuch as it does not confine itself
solely to the function of exploiting the labour of others; inasmuch as
it therefore originates from the social form of the labour-process, from
combination and co-operation of many in pursuance of a common result, it
is just as independent of capital as that form itself as soon as it has
burst its capitalistic shell. To say that this labour is necessary as
capitalistic labour, or as a function of the capitalist, only means that
the _vulgus_ is unable to conceive the forms developed in the lap of
capitalist production, separate and free from their antithetical
capitalist character. The industrial capitalist is a worker, compared to
the money-capitalist, but a worker in the sense of capitalist, _i.e._,
an exploiter of the labour of others. The wage which he claims and
pockets for this labour is exactly equal to the appropriated quantity of
another's labour and depends directly upon the rate of exploitation of
this labour, in so far as he undertakes the effort required for
exploitation; it does not, however, depend on the degree of exertion
that such exploitation demands, and which he can shift to a manager for
moderate pay. After every crisis there are enough ex-manufacturers in
the English factory districts who will supervise, for low wages, what
were formerly their own factories in the capacity of managers of the new
owners, who are frequently their creditors.^([5])

The wages of management both for the commercial and industrial manager
are completely isolated from the profits of enterprise in the
co-operative factories of labourers, as well as in capitalist stock
companies. The separation of wages of management from profits of
enterprise, purely accidental at other times, is here constant. In a
co-operative factory the antagonistic nature of the labour of
supervision disappears, because the manager is paid by the labourers
instead of representing capital counterposed to them. Stock companies in
general — developed with the credit system — have an increasing tendency
to separate this work of management as a function from the ownership of
capital, be it self-owned or borrowed. Just as the development of
bourgeois society witnessed a separation of the functions of judges and
administrators from land-ownership, whose attributes they were in feudal
times. But since, on the one hand, the mere owner of capital, the
money-capitalist, has to face the functioning capitalist, while
money-capital itself assumes a social character with the advance of
credit, being concentrated in banks and loaned out by them instead of
its original owners, and since, on the other hand, the mere manager who
has no title whatever to the capital, whether through borrowing it or
otherwise, performs all the real functions pertaining to the functioning
capitalist as such, only the functionary remains and the capitalist
disappears as superfluous from the production process.

It is manifest from the public accounts of the co-operative factories in
England ^([6]) that — after deducting the manager's wages, which form a
part of the invested variable capital much the same as wages of other
labourers — the profit was higher than the average profit, although at
times they paid a much higher interest than did private manufacturers.
The source of greater profits in all these cases was greater economy in
the application of constant capital. What interests us in this, however,
is the fact that here the average profit ( = interest + profit of
enterprise) presents itself actually and palpably as a magnitude wholly
independent of the wages of management. Since the profit was higher here
than average profit, the profit of enterprise was also higher than
usual.

The same situation is observed in relation to some capitalist stock
companies, such as joint-stock banks. The London and Westminster Bank
paid an annual dividend of 30% in 1863, while the Union Bank of London
and others paid 15%. Aside from the directors' salary the interest paid
for deposits is here deducted from gross profit. The high profit is to
be explained here by the moderate proportion of paid-in capital to
deposits. For instance, in the case of the London and Westminster Bank,
in 1863: paid-in capital, £1,000,000; deposits, £14,540,275. As for the
Union Bank of London, in 1863: paid-in capital, £600,000; deposits,
£12,384,173.

Profit of enterprise and wages of supervision, or management, were
confused originally due to the antagonistic form assumed in respect to
interest by the surplus of profit. This was further promoted by the
apologetic aim of representing profit not as a surplus-value derived
from unpaid labour, but as the capitalist's wages for work performed by
him. This was met on the part of socialists by a demand to reduce profit
actually to what it pretended to be theoretically, namely, mere wages of
supervision. And this demand was all the more obnoxious to theoretical
embellishment, the more these wages of supervision, like any other wage,
found their definite level and definite market-price, on the one hand,
with the development of a numerous class of industrial and commercial
managers,^([7]) and the more they fell, on the other, like all wages for
skilled labour, with the general development which reduces the cost of
production of specially trained labour-power.^([8]) With the development
of co-operation on the part of the labourers, and of stock enterprises
on the part of the bourgeoisie, even the last pretext for the confusion
of profit of enterprise and wages of management was removed, and profit
appeared also in practice as it undeniably appeared in theory, as mere
surplus-value, a value for which no equivalent was paid, as realised
unpaid labour. It was then seen that the functioning capitalist really
exploits labour, and that the fruit of his exploitation, when working
with borrowed capital, was divided into interest and profit of
enterprise, a surplus of profit over interest.

On the basis of capitalist production a new swindle develops in stock
enterprises with respect to wages of management, in that boards of
numerous managers or directors are placed above the actual director, for
whom supervision and management serve only as a pretext to plunder the
stockholders and amass wealth. Very curious details concerning this are
to be found in _The City or the Physiology of London Business; with
Sketches on Change, and the Coffee Houses,_ London, 1845.

"What bankers and merchants gain by the direction of eight or nine
different companies, may be seen from the following illustration: The
private balance sheet of Mr. Timothy Abraham Curtis, presented to the
Court of Bankruptcy when that gentleman failed, exhibited a sample of
the income netted from directorship ... between £800 and £900 a year.
Mr. Curtis having been associated with the Courts of the Bank of
England, and the East India House, it was considered quite a plum for a
public company to acquire his services in the boardroom" (pp. 81, 82).

The remuneration of the directors of such companies for each weekly
meeting is at least one guinea. The proceedings of the Court of
Bankruptcy show that these wages of supervision were, as a rule,
inversely proportional to the actual supervision performed by these
nominal directors.

Notes

1. "The profits of enterprise depend upon the net profits of capital,
not the latter upon the former." (Ramsay, _Essay on the Distribution of
Wealth,_ p. 214. For Ramsay net profits always mean interest.)

2. "Superintendence is here" (in the case of the farm owner) "completely
dispensed with." (J. E. Cairnes, _The Slave Power,_ London, 1862, p.
48.)

3. "If the nature of the work requires that the workmen" (viz., the
slaves) "should be dispersed over an extended area, the number of
overseers, and, therefore, the cost of the labour which requires this
supervision, will be proportionately increased." (Cairnes, 1. c., p.
44.)

4. A. Ure, _Philosophy of Manufactures,_ French translation, 1836, I, p.
67, where this Pindar of the manufacturers at the same time testifies
that most manufacturers have not the slightest understanding of the
mechanism which they set in motion.

5. In a case known to me, following the crisis of 1868, a bankrupt
manufacturer became the paid wage-labourer of his own former labourers.
The factory was operated after the bankruptcy of its owner by a
labourers' co-operative, and its former owner was employed as manager. —
_F. E._

6. The accounts quoted here go no further than 1864, since the above was
written in 1865. — _F. E._

7. "Masters are labourers as well as their journeymen. In this character
their interest is precisely the same as that of their men. But they are
also either capitalists, or the agents of the capitalists, and in this
respect their interest is decidedly opposed to the interests of the
workmen." (p. 27). "The wide spread of education among the journeymen
mechanics of this country diminishes daily the value of the labour and
skill of almost all masters and employers by increasing the number of
persons who possess their peculiar knowledge" (p. 30, Hodgskin, _Labour
Defended Against the Claims of Capital, etc.,_ London, 1825).

8. "The general relaxation of conventional barriers, the increased
facilities of education tend to bring down the wages of skilled labour
instead of raising those of the unskilled." (J. St. Mill, _Principles of
Political Economy,_ 2nd ed., London, 1849, I, p. 479.)

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 24. Externalization of the Relations of Capital in the Form of Interest-Bearing Capital

 

The relations of capital assume their most externalised and most
fetish-like form in interest-bearing capital. We have here M — M', money
creating more money, self-expanding value, without the process that
effectuates these two extremes. In merchant's capital, M — C — M', there
is at least the general form of the capitalistic movement, although it
confines itself solely to the sphere of circulation, so that profit
appears merely as profit derived from alienation; but it is at least
seen to be the product of a social _relation,_ not the product of a mere
_thing._ The form of merchant's capital at least presents a process, a
unity of opposing phases, a movement that breaks up into two opposite
actions — the purchase and the sale of commodities. This is obliterated
in M — M', the form of interest-bearing capital. For instance, if £1,000
are loaned out by a capitalist at a rate of interest of 5%, the value of
£1,000 as a capital for one year = C + Ci', where C is the capital and
i' the rate of interest. Hence, 5% = 5/100 = 1/20, and 1,000 + 1,000 ×
1/20 = £1,050. The value of £1,000 as capital = £1,050, _i.e._, capital
is not a simple magnitude. It is a _relationship_ of magnitudes, a
relationship of the principal sum as a given value to itself as a
self-expanding value, as a principal sum which has produced a
surplus-value. And capital as such, as we have seen, assumes this form
of a directly self-expanding value for all active capitalists, whether
they operate on their own or borrowed capital.

M — M'. We have here the original starting-point of capital, money in
the formula M — C — M' reduced to its two extremes M — M', in which M' =
M + DM, money creating more money. It is the primary and general formula
of capital reduced to a meaningless condensation. It is ready capital, a
unity of the process of production and the process of circulation, and
hence capital yielding a definite surplus-value in a particular period
of time. In the form of interest-bearing capital this appears directly,
unassisted by the processes of production and circulation. Capital
appears as a mysterious and self-creating source of interest — the
source of its own increase. The _thing_ (money, commodity, value) is now
capital even as a mere thing, and capital appears as a mere thing. The
result of the entire process of reproduction appears as a property
inherent in the thing itself. It depends on the owner of the money,
_i.e._, of the commodity in its continually exchangeable form, whether
he wants to spend it as money or loan it out as capital. In
interest-bearing capital, therefore, this automatic fetish,
self-expanding value, money generating money, are brought out in their
pure state and in this form it no longer bears the birth-marks of its
origin. The social relation is consummated in the relation of a thing,
of money, to itself. Instead of the actual transformation of money into
capital, we see here only form without content. As in the case of
labour-power, the use-value of money here is its capacity of creating
value — a value greater than it contains. Money as money is potentially
self-expanding value and is loaned out as such — which is the form of
sale for this singular commodity. It becomes a property of money to
generate value and yield interest, much as it is an attribute of
pear-trees to bear pears. And the money-lender sells his money as just
such an interest-bearing thing. But that is not all. The actually
functioning capital, as we have seen, presents itself in such a light,
that it seems to yield interest not as a functioning capital, but as
capital in itself, as money-capital.

This, too, becomes distorted. While interest is only a portion of the
profit, _i.e._, of the surplus-value, which the functioning capitalist
squeezes out of the labourer, it appears now, on the contrary, as though
interest were the typical product of capital, the primary matter, and
profit, in the shape of profit of enterprise, were a mere accessory and
by-product of the process of reproduction. Thus we get the fetish form
of capital and the conception of fetish capital. In M — M' we have the
meaningless form of capital, the perversion and objectification of
production relations in their highest degree, the interest-bearing form,
the simple form of capital, in which it antecedes its own process of
reproduction. It is the capacity of money, or of a commodity, to expand
its own value independently of reproduction — which is a mystification
of capital in its most flagrant form.

For vulgar political economy, which seeks to represent capital as an
independent source of value, of value creation, this form is naturally a
veritable find, a form in which the source of profit is no longer
discernible, and in which the result of the capitalist process of
production — divorced from the process — acquires an independent
existence.

It is not until capital is money-capital that it becomes a commodity,
whose capacity for self-expansion has a definite price quoted every time
in every prevailing rate of interest.

As interest-bearing capital, and particularly in its direct form of
interest-bearing money-capital (the other forms of interest-bearing
capital, which do not concern us here, are derivatives of this form and
presuppose its existence), capital assumes its pure fetish form, M — M'
being the subject, the saleable thing. _Firstly,_ through its continual
existence as money, a form, in which all its specific attributes are
obliterated and its real elements invisible. For money is precisely that
form in which the distinctive features of commodities as use-values are
obscured, and hence also the distinctive features of the industrial
capitals which consist of these commodities and conditions of their
production. It is that form, in which value — in this case capital —
exists as an independent exchange-value. In the reproduction process of
capital, the money-form is but transient — a mere point of transit. But
in the money-market capital always exists in this form. _Secondly,_ the
surplus-value produced by it, here again in the form of money, appears
as an inherent part of it. As the growing process is to trees, so
generating money (tocoz) appears innate in capital in its form of
money-capital.

In interest-bearing capital the movement of capital is contracted. The
intervening process is omitted. In this way, a capital = 1,000 is fixed
as a thing, which in itself = 1,400, and which is transformed after a
certain period into 1,100 just as wine stored in a cellar improves its
use-value after a certain period. Capital is now a thing, but as a thing
it is capital. Money is now pregnant. [Goethe, _Faust_, Part I, Scene 5.
— _Ed_] As soon as it is loaned out, or invested in the reproduction
process (inasmuch as it yields interest to the functioning capitalist as
its owner, separate from profit of enterprise), interest on it grows, no
matter whether it is awake or asleep, is at home or abroad, by day or by
night. Thus interest-bearing money-capital (and all capital is
money-capital in terms of its value, or is considered as the expression
of money-capital) fulfils the most fervent wish of the hoarder.

It is this ingrown existence of interest in money-capital as in a thing
(this is how the production of surplus-value through capital appears
here), which occupies Luther's attention so thoroughly in his naive
onslaught against usury. After demonstrating that interest may be
demanded if the failure to repay a loan on a definite date to a lender
who himself required it to make some payment, caused a loss to him, or
resulted in his missing an opportunity to make a profit on a bargain,
for instance, in buying a garden, Luther continues:

"Now that I have loaned you them (100 gulden), you cause me a double
loss due to my not being able to pay on the one hand nor buy on the
other, so that I have to lose on both sides, and this is called _duplex
interesse, damni emergentis et lucri cessantis...._ On hearing that John
sustained losses on his loan of 100 gulden and demands just damages,
they rush in and charge double on every 100 gulden, such double
reimbursement, namely, for the loss due to non-payment and to inability
to make a profit on a bargain, just as though these 100 gulden _had the
double loss grown on to them_, so that whenever they have 100 gulden,
they loan them out and charge for two losses, which they have not at all
sustained... Therefore you are a usurer, who takes damages out of his
neighbour's money for an imaginary loss that you did not sustain at all,
and which you can neither prove nor calculate. This sort of loss is
called by the jurists _non verum, sed phantasticum interesse_. It is a
loss which each conjures up for himself... It will not do to say,
therefore, that there could have been losses because I could not have
been able to pay or buy. Else it would mean _ex contingente
necessarium_, which is making something out of a thing that is not, and
a thing that is uncertain into a thing that is absolutely sure. Would
not such usury devour the world in a few years? ... If an unhappy
accident befalls him against his will, and he must recover from it, he
may demand damages for it, but it is different in trade and just the
reverse. There they scheme to profit at the expense of their needy
neighbours, how to amass wealth and get rich, to be lazy and idle and
live in luxury on the labour of others, without any care, danger, and
loss. To sit by the stove and let my 100 gulden gather wealth for me in
the country and yet keep them in my pocket, because they are only
loaned, without any danger or risk; my friend, who would not like that?"
(Martin Luther, _An die Pfarherrn wider den Wucher zu predigen, etc._,
Wittenberg, 1540.)

The conception of capital as a self-reproducing and self-expanding
value, lasting and growing eternally by virtue of its innate properties
— hence by virtue of the hidden quality of scholasticists — has led to
the fabulous fancies of Dr. Price, which outdo by far the fantasies of
the alchemists; fancies, in which Pitt believed in all earnest, and
which he used as pillars of his financial administration in his laws
concerning the sinking fund.

"Money bearing compound interest increases at first slowly. But, the
rate of increase being continually accelerated, it becomes in some time
so rapid, as to mock all the powers of the imagination. One penny, put
out at our Saviour's birth to 5 per cent compound interest, would,
before this time, have increased to a greater sum, than would be
contained in a hundred and fifty millions of earths, all solid gold. But
if put out to simple interest, it would, in the same time, have amounted
to no more than seven shillings and four pence half-penny. Our
government has hitherto chosen to improve money in the last, rather than
the first of these ways."^([1])

His fancy flies still higher in his _Observations on Reversionary
Payments, etc.,_ London, 1772. There we read:

"A shilling put out to 6% compound interest at our Saviour's birth"
(presumably in the Temple of Jerusalem) "would ... have increased to a
greater sum than the whole solar system could hold, supposing it a
sphere equal in diameter to the diameter of Saturn's orbit." "A state
need never therefore be under any difficulties; for with the smallest
savings it may in as little time as its interest can require pay off the
largest debts" (pp. XIII, XIV).

What a pretty theoretical introduction to the national debt of England!

Price was simply dazzled by the gargantuan dimensions obtained in a
geometrical progression. Since he took no note of the conditions of
reproduction and labour, and regarded capital as a self-regulating
automaton, as a mere number that increases itself just as Malthus [_An
Essay on the Principle of Population_, London, 1798, pp. 25-26. — _Ed_]
did with respect to population in his geometrical progression, he was
struck by the thought that he had found the law of its growth in the
formula s = c(1 + i)_(n), in which s = the sum of capital + compound
interest, c = advanced capital, i = rate of interest (expressed in
aliquot parts of 100) and n stands for the number of years in which this
process takes place.

Pitt takes Dr. Price's mystification quite seriously. In 1786 the House
of Commons had resolved to raise £1 million for the public weal.
According to Price, in whom Pitt believed, there was, of course, no
better way than to tax the people, so as to "accumulate" this sum after
raising it, and thus to spirit away the national debt through the
mystery of compound interest. The above resolution of the House of
Commons was soon followed up by Pitt with a law which ordered the
accumulation of £250,000,

"until, with the expired annuities, the fund should have grown to
£4,000,000 annually." (Act 26, George III, Chap. 3l.) ["An Act for
vesting certain sums in Commissioners, at the End of every Quarter of a
Year, to be by them applied to the Reduction of the National Debt" (Anno
26 Georgii III, Regis, cap. 31). — _Ed_.]

In his speech of 1792, in which Pitt proposed that the amount devoted to
the sinking fund be increased, he mentioned machines, credit, etc.,
among the causes of England's commercial supremacy, but as

"the most wide-spread and enduring cause, that of accumulation. This
principle, he said, was completely developed in the work of Smith, that
genius ... and this accumulation, he continued, was accomplished by
laying aside at least a portion of the annual profit for the purpose of
increasing the principal, which was to be employed in the same manner
the following year, and which thus yielded a continual profit."

With Dr. Price's aid Pitt thus converts Smith's theory of accumulation
into enrichment of a nation by means of accumulating debts, and thus
arrives at the pleasant progression of an infinity of loans — loans to
pay loans.

It had already been noted by Josiah Child, the father of modern banking,
that £100 at 10% would produce in 70 years by compound interest
£102,400. (_Traité sur le commerce, etc._, par J. Child, traduit, etc.,
Amsterdam et Berlin, 1754, p. 115. Written in 1669.)

How thoughtlessly Dr. Price's conception is applied by modern
economists, is shown in the following passage from the _Economist_:

"Capital, with compound interest on every portion of capital saved, is
so all-engrossing that all the wealth in the world from which income is
derived, has long ago become the interest of capital... All rent is now
the payment of interest on capital previously invested in the land."
(_Economist_, July 49, 1851.)

In its capacity of interest-bearing capital, capital claims the
ownership of all wealth which can ever be produced, and everything it
has received so far is but an instalment for its all-engrossing
appetite. By its innate laws, all surplus-labour which the human race
can ever perform belongs to it. Moloch.

In conclusion, the following hodge-podge by the romantic Müller:

"Dr. Price's immense increase of compound interest, or of the
self-accelerating forces of man, presupposes an undivided, or
uninterrupted, uniform application for several centuries, if they are to
produce such enormous effects. As soon as capital is divided, cut up
into several independently growing shoots, the total process of
accumulating forces begins anew. Nature has distributed over a span of
about 20 to 25 years the progression of energy which falls on an average
to the share of every labourer (!). After the lapse of this time the
labourer leaves his career and must transfer the capital accumulated by
the compound interest of labour to a new labourer, mostly distributing
it among several labourers or children. These must first learn to
activate and apply their share of capital, before they can draw any
actual compound interest on it. Furthermore, an enormous quantity of
capital gained by civil society even in the most restless communities,
is gradually accumulated over many years and not employed for any
immediate expansion of labour. Instead, as soon as an appreciable sum is
gathered together, it is transferred to another individual, a labourer,
bank or state, under the head of a loan. And the receiver then sets the
capital into actual motion and draws compound interest on it, so that he
can easily pledge to pay simple interest to the lender. Finally, the law
of consumption, greed, and waste opposes those huge progressions, in
which man's powers and their products would multiply if the law of
production, or thrift, were alone effective." (A. Müller, _Elemente der
Staatskunst,_ III, pp. 147-49.)

It is impossible to concoct a more hair-raising absurdity in so few
lines. Leaving aside the droll confusion of labourer and capitalist,
value of labour-power and interest on capital, etc., the charging of
compound interest is supposed to be explained by the fact that capital
is loaned out to bring in compound interest. The method employed by our
Müller is thoroughly characteristic of the romanticism in all walks of
life. It is made up of current prejudices, skimmed from the most
superficial semblance of things. This incorrect and trite content should
then be "exalted" and rendered sublime through a mystifying mode of
expression.

The process of accumulation of capital may be conceived as an
accumulation of compound interest in the sense that the portion of
profit (surplus-value) which is reconverted into capital, _i.e._, serves
to absorb more surplus-labour, may be called interest. But:

1) Aside from all incidental interference, a large part of available
capital is constantly more or less depreciated in the course of the
reproduction process, because the value of commodities is not determined
by the labour-time originally expended in their production, but by the
labour-time expended in their reproduction, and this decreases
continually owing to the development of the social productivity of
labour. On a higher level of social productivity, all available capital
appears, for this reason, to be the result of a relatively short period
of reproduction, instead of a long process of accumulation of
capital.^([2])

2) As demonstrated in Part III of this book, the rate of profit
decreases in proportion to the mounting accumulation of capital and the
correspondingly increasing productivity of social labour, which is
expressed precisely in the relative and progressive decrease of the
variable as compared to the constant portion of capital. To produce the
same rate of profit after the constant capital set in motion by one
labourer increases ten-fold, the surplus labour-time would have to
increase ten-fold, and soon the total labour-time, and finally the
entire 24 hours of a day, would not suffice, even if wholly appropriated
by capital. The idea that the rate of profit does not shrink is,
however, the basis of Price's progression and in general the basis of
"all-engrossing capital with compound interest."^([3])

The identity of surplus-value and surplus-labour imposes a qualitative
limit upon the accumulation of capital. This consists of the _total
working-day,_ and the prevailing development of the productive forces
and of the population, which limits the number of simultaneously
exploitable working-days. But if one conceives of surplus-value in the
meaningless form of interest, the limit is merely quantitative and
defies all fantasy.

Now, the concept of capital as a fetish reaches its height in
interest-bearing capital, being a conception which attributes to the
accumulated product of labour, and at that in the fixed form of money,
the inherent secret power, as an automaton, of creating surplus-value in
geometrical progression, so that the accumulated product of labour, as
the _Economist_ thinks, has long discounted all the wealth of the world
for all time as belonging to it and rightfully coming to it. The product
of past labour, the past labour itself, is here pregnant in itself with
a portion of present or future living surplus-labour. We know, however,
that in reality the preservation, and to that extent also the
reproduction of the value of products of past labour is _only_ the
result of their contact with living labour; and secondly, that the
domination of the products of past labour over living surplus-labour
lasts only as long as the relations of capital, which rest on those
particular social relations in which past labour independently and
overwhelmingly dominates over living labour.

Notes

1. Richard Price, _An Appeal to the Public on the Subject of the
National Debt_, 2nd ed., London, 1774, p. 19. He cracks the naive joke:
"It is borrowing money at simple interest, in order to improve it at
compound interest." (R. Hamilton, _An Inquiry into the Rise and Progress
of the National Debt of Great Britain_, 2nd ed., Edinburgh, 1814, p.
133.) According to this, borrowing would be the safest means also for
private people to gather wealth. But if I borrow £100 at 5% annual
interest, I have to pay £5 at the end of the year, and even if the loan
lasts for 100 million years, I have meanwhile only £100 to loan every
year and £5 to pay every year. I can never manage by this process to
loan £105 when borrowing £100. And how am I going to pay 5%? By new
loans, or, if it is the state, by new taxes. Now, if the industrial
capitalist borrows money, and his profit amounts to, say, 15%, he may
pay 5% interest, spend 5% for his private expenses (although his
appetite grows with his income), and capitalise 5%. In this case, 15% is
the precondition for paying continually 5% interest. If this process
continues, the rate of profit, for the reasons indicated in former
chapters, will fall from 15% to, say, 10%. But Price entirely forgets
that the interest of 5% presupposes a rate of profit of 15%, and assumes
it to continue with the accumulation of capital. He has nothing
whatsoever to do with the actual process of accumulation, but rather
only with lending money and getting it back with compound interest. How
that is accomplished is immaterial to him, since it is the innate
property of interest-bearing capital.

2. See Mill and Carey, and Roscher's mistaken commentary on this score.
[Marx refers to the following works: J. St. Mill, _Principles of
Political Economy_, Second edition, Vol. I, London, 1849, pp. 91-92; H.
Ch. Carey, _Principles of Social Science_, Vol. III, Philadelphia, 1859,
pp. 71.73; W. Roscher, _Die Grundlagen der Nationalökonomie_, 3 Auflage,
Stuttgart und Augsburg, 1858, § 45. — _Ed._]

3. "It is clear, that no labour, no productive power, no ingenuity, and
no art, can answer the overwhelming demand of compound interest. But all
saving is made from the revenue of the capitalist, so that actually
these demands are constantly made and as constantly the productive power
of labour refuses to satisfy them. A sort of balance is, therefore,
constantly struck." _(Labour Defended Against the Claims of Capital,_ p.
23. By Hodgskin.)

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 25. Credit and Fictitious Capital

 

An exhaustive analysis of the credit system and of the instruments which
it creates for its own use (credit-money, etc.) lies beyond our plan. We
merely wish to dwell here upon a few particular points, which are
required to characterise the capitalist mode of production in general.
We shall deal only with commercial and bank credit. The connection
between the development of this form of credit and that of public credit
will not be considered here.

I have shown earlier (Buch I, Kap. III, 3, b [English edition: Ch. III,
3, b. — _Ed_.]) how the function of money as a means of payment, and
therewith a relation of creditor and debtor between the producer and
trader of commodities, develop from the simple circulation of
commodities. With the development of commerce and of the capitalist mode
of production, which produces solely with an eye to circulation, this
natural basis of the credit system is extended, generalised, and worked
out. Money serves here, by and large, merely as a means of payment,
_i.e._, commodities are not sold for money, but for a written promise to
pay for them at a certain date. For brevity's sake, we may put all these
promissory notes under the general head of bills of exchange. Such bills
of exchange, in their turn, circulate as means of payment until the day
on which they fall due; and they form the actual commercial money.
Inasmuch as they ultimately neutralise one another through the balancing
of claims and debts, they act absolutely as money, although there is no
eventual transformation into actual money. Just as these mutual advances
of producers and merchants make up the real foundation of credit, so
does the instrument of their circulation, the bill of exchange, form the
basis of credit-money proper, of bank-notes, etc. These do not rest upon
the circulation of money, be it metallic or government-issued paper
money, but rather upon the circulation of bills of exchange.

W. Leatham (banker of Yorkshire) writes in his _Letters on the
Currency,_ 2nd ed., London, 1840:

"I find, then, the amount for the whole of the year of 1839 ... to be
£528,493,842" (he assumed that the foreign bills of exchange made up
about one-fifth of the total) "and the amount of bills out at one time
in the above year, to be £132,123,460" (p. 56). The bills of exchange
make up "one component part greater in amount than all the rest put
together" (p. 3). "This enormous superstructure of bills of exchange
rests (!) upon the base formed by the amount of bank-notes and gold, and
when, by events, this base becomes too much narrowed, its solidity and
very existence is endangered" (p. 8). "If I estimate the whole currency"

(he means of the bank-notes)

"and the amount of the liabilities of the Bank and country bankers,
payable on demand, I find a sum of 153 million, which, by law, can be
converted into gold ... and the amount of gold to meet this demand" only
14 million (p.11). "The bills of exchange are not ... placed under any
control, except by preventing the abundance of money, excessive and low
rates of interest or discount, which create a part of them, and
encourage their great and dangerous expansion. It is impossible to
decide what part arises out of real _bonâ fide_ transactions, such as
actual bargain and sale, or what part is fictitious and mere
accommodation paper, that is, where one bill of exchange is drawn to
take up another running, in order to raise a fictitious capital, by
creating so much currency. In times of abundance and cheap money this I
know reaches an enormous amount"

(pp. 43-44). J.W. Bosanquet, _Metallic, Paper and Credit Currency_,
London, 1842:

"An average amount of payments to the extent of upwards of £3,000,000 is
settled through the Clearing House

(where the London bankers exchange due bills and filed cheques)

every day of business in the year, and the daily amount of money
required for the purpose is little more than £200,000" (p. 86).

(In 1889, the total turnover of the Clearing House amounted to £7,618.75
million, which, in roughly 300 business days, averages £25½ million
daily. — _F. E._]

"Bills of exchange act undoubtedly as currency, independent of money,
inasmuch as they transfer property from hand to hand by endorsement" (p.
92). "It may be assumed that upon an average there are two endorsements
upon every bill in circulation, and ... each bill performs two payments
before it becomes due. Upon this assumption it would appear, that by
endorsement alone property changed hands, by means of bills of exchange,
to the value of twice five hundred and twenty-eight million, or
£1,056,000,000, being at the rate of more than £3,000,000 per day, in
the course of the year 1839. We may safely therefore conclude, that
deposits and bills of exchange together, perform the functions of money,
by transferring property from hand and to hand without the aid of money,
to an extent daily of not less than £18,000,000" (p. 93).

Tooke says the following about credit in general:

"Credit, in its most simple expression, is the confidence which, well,
or ill-founded, leads a person to entrust another with a certain amount
of capital, in money, or in goods computed at a value in money agreed
upon, and in each case payable at the expiration of a fixed term. In the
case where the capital is lent in money, that is, whether in bank-notes,
or in a cash credit, or in an order upon a correspondent, an addition
for the use of the capital of so much upon every £100 is made to the
amount to be repaid. In the case of goods the value of which is agreed
in terms of money, constituting a sale, the sum stipulated to be repaid
includes a consideration for the use of the capital and for the risk,
till the expiration of the period fixed for payment. Written obligations
of payment at fixed dates mostly accompany these credits, and the
obligations or promissory notes after date being transferable, form the
means by which the lenders, if they have occasion for the use of their
capital, in the shape whether of money or goods, before the expiration
of the term of the bills they hold, are mostly enabled to borrow or to
buy on lower terms, by having their own credit strengthened by the names
on the bills in addition to their own." _(Inquiry into the Currency
Principle,_ p. 87.)

Ch. Coquelin, _Du Crédit et des Banques dans L'Industrie, Revue des Deux
Mondes,_ 1842, Tome 31:

"In every country the majority of credit transactions takes place within
the circle of industrial relations... The producer of the raw material
advances it to the processing manufacturer, and receives from the latter
a promise to pay on a certain day. The manufacturer, having completed
his share of the work, in his turn advances his product on similar terms
to another manufacturer, who has to process it further, and in this way
credit stretches on and on, from one to the other, right up to the
consumer. The wholesale dealer gives the retailer commodities on credit,
while receiving credit from a manufacturer or commission agent. All
borrow with one hand and lend with the other, sometimes money, but more
frequently products. In this manner an incessant exchange of advances,
which combine and intersect in all directions, takes place in industrial
relations. The development of credit consists precisely in this
multiplication and growth of mutual advances, and therein is the real
seat of its power."

 

The other side of the credit system is connected with the development of
money-dealing, which, of course, keeps step under capitalist production
with the development of dealing in commodity. We have seen in the
preceding part (Chap. XIX) how the care of the reserve funds of
businessmen, the technical operations of receiving and disbursing money,
of international payments, and thus of the bullion trade, are
concentrated in the hands of the money-dealers. The other side of the
credit system — the management of interest-bearing capital, or
money-capital, develops alongside this money-dealing as a special
function of the money-dealers. Borrowing and lending money becomes their
particular business. They act as middlemen between the actual lender and
the borrower of money-capital. Generally speaking, this aspect of the
banking business consists of concentrating large amounts of the loanable
money-capital in the bankers' hands, so that, in place of the individual
money-lender, the bankers confront the industrial capitalists and
commercial capitalists as representatives of all moneylenders. They
become the general managers of money-capital. On the other hand by
borrowing for the entire world of commerce, they concentrate all the
borrowers vis-à-vis all the lenders. A bank represents a centralisation
of money-capital, of the lenders, on the one hand, and on the other a
centralisation of the borrowers. Its profit is generally made by
borrowing at a lower rate of interest than it receives in loaning.

The loanable capital which the banks have at their disposal streams to
them in various ways. In the first place, being the cashiers of the
industrial capitalists, all the money-capital which every producer and
merchant must have as a reserve fund, or receives in payment, is
concentrated in their hands. These funds are thus converted into
loanable money-capital. In this way, the reserve fund of the commercial
world, because it is concentrated in a common treasury, is reduced to
its necessary minimum, and a portion of the money-capital which would
otherwise have to lie slumbering as a reserve fund, is loaned out and
serves as interest-bearing capital. In the second place, the loanable
capital of the banks is formed by the deposits of money-capitalists who
entrust them with the business of loaning them out. Furthermore, with
the development of the banking system, and particularly as soon as banks
came to pay interest on deposits, money savings and the temporarily idle
money of all classes were deposited with them. Small amounts, each in
itself incapable of acting in the capacity of money-capital, merge
together into large masses and thus form a money power. This aggregation
of small amounts must be distinguished as a specific function of the
banking system from its go-between activities between the
money-capitalists proper and the borrowers. In the final analysis, the
revenues, which are usually but gradually consumed, are also deposited
with the banks.

The loan is made (we refer here strictly to commercial credit) by
discounting bills of exchange — by converting bills of exchange into
money before they come due — and by advances of various kinds: direct
advances on personal credit, loans against securities, such as
interest-bearing paper, government paper, stocks of all sorts, and,
notably, overdrafts against bills of lading, dock warrants, and other
certified titles of ownership of commodities and overdrawing deposits,
etc.

The credit given by a banker may assume various forms, such as bills of
exchange on other banks, cheques on them, credit accounts of the same
kind, and finally, if the bank is entitled to issue notes — bank-notes
of the bank itself. A bank-note is nothing but a draft upon a banker,
payable at any time to the bearer, and given by the banker in place of
private drafts. This last form of credit appears particularly important
and striking to the layman, first, because this form of credit-money
breaks out of the confines of mere commercial circulation into general
circulation, and serves there as money; and because in most countries
the principal banks issuing notes, being a peculiar mixture of national
and private banks, actually have the national credit to back them, and
their notes are more or less legal tender; because it is apparent here
that the banker deals in credit itself, a bank-note being merely a
circulating token of credit. But the banker also has to do with credit
in all its other forms, even when he advances the cash money deposited
with him. In fact, a bank-note simply represents the coin of wholesale
trade, and it is always the deposit which carries the most weight with
banks. The best proof of this is furnished by the Scottish banks.

Special credit institutions, like special forms of banks, need no
further consideration for our purpose.

"The business of bankers ... may be divided into two branches... One
branch of the banker's business is to _collect_ capital from those who
have not immediate employment for it, and to distribute or transfer it
to those who have. The other branch is to receive deposits of the
_incomes_ of their customers, and to pay out the amount, as it is wanted
for expenditure by the latter in the objects of their consumption... The
former being a circulation of _capital,_ the latter of currency... " —
"One relates to the concentration of capital on the one hand and the
distribution of it on the other, the other is employed in administering
the circulation for local purposes of the district." Tooke, _Inquiry
into the Currency Principle,_ pp. 36, 37.

We shall revert to this passage later, in Chapter XXVIII.

Reports of Committees, Vol. VIII. Commercial Distress, Vol. 11, Part I,
1847-48, Minutes of Evidence. (Further quoted as Commercial Distress,
1847-48.) In the forties, when discounting bills of exchange in London,
21-day drafts of one bank on another were often accepted in lieu of
banknotes. (Testimony of J. Pease, country banker, Nos. 4638 and 4645.)
According to the same report, bankers were in the habit of giving such
bills of exchange regularly in payment to their customers whenever money
was tight. If the receiver wanted bank-notes, he had to rediscount this
bill. For the banks this amounted to a privilege of coining money.
Messrs. Jones, Lloyd and Co. made payments in this way "from time
immemorial," as soon as money was scarce and the rate of interest rose
above 5%. The customer was glad to get such banker's bills because bills
from Jones, Loyd and Co. were easier discounted than his own; besides,
they often passed through twenty to thirty hands. (_Ibid.,_ Nos. 901 to
904, 905, 992.)

All these forms serve to make the payments claim transferable.

"There is scarcely any shape into which credit can be cast, in which it
will not at times be called to perform the functions of money; and
whether that shape be a bank-note, or a bill of exchange, or a banker's
cheque, the process is in every essential particular the same, and the
result is the same." Fullarton, _On the Regulation of Currencies,_ 2nd
ed., London, 1845, p. 38. — "Bank-notes are the small change of credit"
(p. 51).

The following from J. W. Gilbart's _The History and Principle of
Banking,_ London, 1834:

"The trading capital of a bank may be divided into two parts: the
invested capital, and the borrowed banking capital" (p. 117). "There are
three ways of raising a banking or borrowed capital. First, by
receiving; secondly, by the issuing of notes; thirdly, by the drawing of
bills. If a person will lend me £100 for nothing, and I lend that £100
to another person at four per cent interest, then, in the course of a
year, I shall gain £4 by the transaction. Again, if a person will take
my 'promise to pay'" ("I promise to pay" is the usual formula for
English bank-notes) "and bring it back to me at the end of the year, and
pay me four per cent for it, just the same as though I had lent him 100
sovereigns, then I shall gain £4 by that transaction; and again, if a
person in a country town brings me £100 on condition that, twenty-one
days afterwards, I shall pay the same amount to a person in London, then
whatever interest I can make of the money during the twenty-one days,
will be my profit. This is a fair representation of the operations of
banking, and of the way in which a banking capital is created by means
of deposits, notes, and bills" (p. 117). "The profits of a banker are
generally in proportion to the amount of his banking or borrowed
capital... To ascertain the real profit of a bank, the interest upon the
invested capital should be deducted from the gross profit, and what
remains is the banking profit" (p. 118). _"The advances of bankers to
their customers are made with other people's money"_ (p. 146).
"Precisely those bankers who do not issue notes, create a banking
capital by the discounting of bills. They render their discounts
subservient to the increase of their deposits. The London bankers will
not discount except for those houses who have deposit accounts with
them" (p. 119). "A party who has had bills discounted, and has paid
interest on the whole amount, must leave some portion of that amount in
the hands of the banker without interest. By this means the banker
obtains more than the current rate of interest on the money actually
advanced, and raises a banking capital to the amount of the balance left
in his hands" (pp. 119- 20).

Economising on reserve funds, deposits, cheques:

"Banks of deposit serve to economise the use of the circulating medium.
This is done upon the principle of transfer of titles.... Thus it is
that banks of deposit ... are enabled to settle a large amount of
transactions with a small amount of money. The money thus liberated, is
employed by the banker in making advances, by discount or otherwise, to
his customers. Hence the principle of transfer gives additional
efficiency to the deposit system..." (p. 123). "It matters not whether
the two parties, who have dealings with each other, keep their accounts
with the same banker or with different bankers; for, as the bankers
exchange their cheques with each other at the clearing house.... The
deposit system might thus, by means of transfers, be carried to such an
extent as wholly to supersede the use of a metallic currency. Were every
man to keep a deposit account at a bank, and make all his payments by
cheques, money might be superseded, and cheques become the sole
circulating medium. In this case, however, it must be supposed that the
banker has the money in his hands, or the cheques would have no value"
(p. 124).

Centralisation of local transactions in the hands of the banks is
effected 1) through branch banks. Country banks have branch
establishments in the smaller towns of their district, and London banks
in different districts of the city. 2) Through agencies.

"Each country banker employs a London agent to pay his notes or bills
... and to receive sums that may be lodged by parties residing in London
for the use of parties residing in the country" (p.127). "Each banker
accepts the notes of others, but does not reissue them. In all larger
cities they come together once or twice a week and exchange their notes.
The balance is paid by a draft on London" (p.134). "It is the object of
banking to give facilities to trade, and whatever gives facilities to
trade gives facilities to speculation. Trade and speculation are in some
cases so nearly allied, that it is impossible to say at what precise
point trade ends and speculation begins.... Wherever there are banks,
capital is more readily obtained, and at a cheaper rate. The cheapness
of capital gives facilities to speculation, just in the same way as the
cheapness of beef and of beer gives facilities to gluttony and
drunkenness" (pp. 137, 438). "As banks of circulation always issue their
own notes, it would seem that their discounting business was carried on
exclusively with this last description of capital, but it is not so. It
is very possible for a banker to issue his own notes for all the bills
he discounts, and yet nine-tenths of the bills in his possession shall
represent real capital. For, although in the first instance, the
banker's notes are given for the bill, yet these notes may not stay in
circulation until the bill becomes due — the bill may have three months
to run, the notes may return in three days" (p. 172). "The overdrawing
of a cash credit account is a regular matter of business; it is, in
fact, the purpose for which the cash credit has been granted.... Cash
credits are granted not only upon personal security, but also upon the
security of the Public Funds" (pp. 174, 175). "Capital advanced, by way
of loan, on the securities of merchandise, would produce the same
effects as if advanced in the discounting of bills. If a party borrows
1400 on the security of his merchandise, it is the same as though he had
sold his merchandise for a 8100 bill, and got it discounted with the
banker. By obtaining this advance he is enabled to hold over this
merchandise for a better market, and avoids a sacrifice which,
otherwise, be might be induced to make, in order to raise the money for
urgent purposes" (pp. 180-81).

_The Currency Theory Reviewed, etc_., pp. 62-63:

"It is unquestionably true that the £1,000 which you deposit at A today
may be reissued tomorrow, and form a deposit at B. The day after that,
reissued from B, it may form a deposit at C ... and so on to infinitude;
and that the same £1,000 in money may thus, by a succession of
transfers, multiply itself into a sum of deposits absolutely indefinite.
It is possible, therefore, that _nine-tenths of all the deposits in the
United Kingdom may have no existence beyond their record in the books of
the bankers_ who are respectively accountable for them ... Thus in
Scotland, for instance, currency (mostly paper money at that) has never
exceeded 13 million, the deposits in the banks are estimated at £27
million.... Unless a run on the banks be made, the same £1,000 would, if
sent back upon its travels, cancel with the same facility a sum equally
indefinite. As the same £1,000 with which you cancel your debt to a
tradesman today, may cancel his debt to the merchant tomorrow, the
merchant's debt to the bank the day following, and so on without end; so
the same £1,000 may pass from hand to hand, and bank to bank, and cancel
any conceivable sum of deposits."

[We have seen that Gilbart knew even in 1834 that

"whatever gives facilities to trade gives facilities to speculation.
Trade and speculation are in some cases so nearly allied, that it is
impossible to say at what precise point trade ends and speculation
begins."

The easier it is to obtain advances on unsold commodities, the more such
advances are taken, and the greater the temptation to manufacture
commodities, or dump already manufactured commodities in distant
markets, just to obtain advances of money on them. To what extent the
entire business world of a country may be seized by such swindling, and
what it finally comes to, is amply illustrated by the history of English
business during 1845-47. It shows us what credit can accomplish. Before
passing on to the following examples, a few preliminary remarks.

At the close of 1842 the pressure which English industry suffered almost
uninterruptedly since 1837, began to lift. During the following two
years foreign demand for English manufactured goods increased still
more; 1845 and 1846 marked a period of greatest prosperity. In 1843 the
Opium War had opened China to English commerce. The new market gave a
new impetus to the further expansion of an expanding industry,
particularly the cotton industry. "How can we ever produce too much? We
have to clothe 300 million people," a Manchester manufacturer said to
this writer at the time. But all the newly erected factory buildings,
steam-engines, and spinning and weaving machines did not suffice to
absorb the surplus-value pouring in from Lancashire. With the same zeal
as was shown in expanding production, people engaged in building
railways. The thirst for speculation of manufacturers and merchants at
first found gratification in this field, and as early as in the summer
of 1844. Stock was fully underwritten, _i.e._, so far as there was money
to cover the initial payments. As for the rest, time would show! But
when further payments were due — Question 1059, C. D. 1848/57, indicates
that the capital invested in railways in 1846-47 amounted to £75 million
— recourse had to be taken to credit, and in most cases the basic
enterprises of the firm had also to bleed.

And in most cases these basic enterprises were already over-burdened.
The enticingly high profits had led to far more extensive operations
than justified by the available liquid resources. Yet there was
credit-easy to obtain and cheap. The bank discount rate stood low: 1¾ to
2¾% in 1844, less than 3% until October 1845, rising to 5% for a while
(February 1846), then dropping again to 3¼% in December 1846. The Bank
of England had an unheard-of supply of gold in its vaults. All inland
quotations were higher than ever before. Why then allow this splendid
opportunity to escape? Why not go in for all one was worth? Why not send
all one could manufacture to foreign markets which pined for English
goods? And why should not the manufacturer himself pocket the double
gain arising from selling yarn and fabrics in the Far East, and the
return cargo in England?

Thus arose the system of mass consignments to India and China against
advance payments, and this soon developed into a system of consignments
purely for the sake of getting advances, as described in greater detail
in the following notes, which led inevitably to over-flooding the
markets and a crash.

The crash was precipitated by the crop failure of 1846. England, and
particularly Ireland, required enormous imports of foodstuffs, notably
corn and potatoes. But the countries which supplied them could be paid
with the products of English industry only to a very limited extent.
Precious metals had to be given out. Gold worth at least nine million
was sent abroad. Of this amount no less than seven and a half million
came from the treasury of the Bank of England, whose freedom of action
on the money-market was thereby considerably impaired. Other banks,
whose reserves were deposited with the Bank of England and were
practically identical with those of that Bank, were thus also compelled
to curtail accommodation of money. The rapid and easy flow of payments
was obstructed, first here and there, then generally. The banking
discount rate, still 3 to 3½% in January 1847, rose to 7% in April, when
the first panic broke out. The situation eased somewhat in the summer
(6½%, 6%), but when the new crop failed as well panic broke out afresh
and even more violently. The official minimum bank discount rose in
October to 7 and in November to 10%; _i.e._, the overwhelming mass of
bills of exchange was discountable only at outrageous rates of interest,
or no longer discountable at all. The general cessation of payments
caused the failure of several leading and very many medium-sized and
small firms. The Bank itself was in danger due to the limitations
imposed by the artful Bank Act of 4844. The government yielded to the
general clamour and suspended the Bank Act on October 25, thereby
eliminating the absurd legal fetters imposed on the Bank. Now it could
throw its supply of bank-notes into circulation without hindrance. The
credit of these bank-notes being in practice guaranteed by the credit of
the nation, and thus unimpaired, the money stringency was thus instantly
and decisively relieved. Naturally, quite a number of hopelessly
enmeshed large and small firms failed nevertheless, but the peak of the
crisis was overcome, the banking discount dropped to 5% in December, and
in the course of 1848 a new wave of business activity began which took
the edge off the revolutionary movements on the continent in 1849, and
which inaugurated in the fifties an unprecedented industrial prosperity,
but then ended again — in the crash of 1857. — _F. E._]

I. A document issued by the House of Lords in 1848 deals with the
colossal depreciation of government paper and bonds during the 1847
crisis. According to it the depreciation of October 23, 1847, compared
with the level in February of the same year, amounted to:

  ----------------------------- --------------
  On English government bonds   £93,824,217
  On dock and canal stock       £1,358,288
  On railway stock              £19,579,820
  TOTAL                         £114,762,325
  ----------------------------- --------------

II. With reference to the swindle in East Indian trade, in which drafts
were no longer drawn because commodities were being bought, but rather
commodities were bought to be able to make out discountable drafts
convertible into money, the _Manchester Guardian_ of November 24, 1847,
remarks:

Mr. A in London instructs a Mr. B to buy from the manufacturer C in
Manchester commodities for shipment to a Mr. D in East India. B pays C
in six months' drafts to be made out by C on B. B secures himself by six
months' drafts on A. As soon as the goods are shipped A makes out six
months' drafts on D against the mailed bill of lading.

"The shipper and the co-signee were thus both put in possession of funds
— months before they actually paid for the goods; and, very commonly,
these bills were renewed at maturity, on pretence of affording time for
the returns in a 'long trade'. Unfortunately, losses by such a trade,
instead of leading to its contraction, led directly to its increase. The
poorer men became, the greater need they had to purchase, in order to
make up, by new advances, the capital they had lost on the past
adventures. Purchases thus became, not a question of supply and demand,
but the most important part of the finance operations of a firm
labouring under difficulties. But this is only one side of the picture.
What took place in reference to the export of goods at home, was taking
place in the purchase and shipment of produce abroad. Houses in India,
who had credit to pass their bills, were purchasers of sugar, indigo,
silk, or cotton — not because the prices advised from London by the last
overland mail promised a profit on the prices current in India, but
because former drafts upon the London house would soon fall due, and
must be provided for. What was so simple as to purchase a cargo of
sugar, pay for it in bills upon the London house at ten months' date,
transmit the shipping documents by the overland mail; and, in less than
two months, the goods on the high seas, or perhaps not yet passed the
mouth of the Hoogly, were pawned in Lombard Street — putting the London
house in funds eight months before the drafts against those goods fell
due. And all this went on without interruption or difficulty, as long as
bill-brokers had abundance of money 'at call,'; to advance on bills of
lading and dock warrants, and to discount, without limit, the bills of
India houses drawn upon the eminent firms in Mincing Lane."

[This fraudulent procedure remained in vogue so long as goods to and
from India had to round the Cape in sailing vessels. But ever since they
are being shipped in steamboats via the Suez Canal this method of
fabricating fictitious capital has been deprived of its basis — the long
freight voyage. And ever since the telegraph informs the English
businessman about the Indian market and the Indian merchant about the
English market, on the same day this method has become totally
impracticable. — _F.E_.]

III. The following is taken from the quoted Report on Commercial
Distress, 1847-48:

"In the last week of April 1847, the Bank of England advised the Royal
Bank of Liverpool that it would thereafter reduce its discount business
with the latter bank by one-half. The announcement operated with
peculiar hardship on this account, that the payments into Liverpool had
latterly been much more in bills than in cash; and the merchants who
generally brought to the Bank a large proportion of cash with which to
pay their acceptances, had latterly been able to bring only bills which
they had received for their cotton and other produce, and that increased
very rapidly as the difficulties increased.... The acceptances ... which
the Bank had to pay for the merchants, were acceptances drawn chiefly
upon them from abroad, and they have been accustomed to meet those
acceptances by whatever payment they received for their produce.... The
bills that the merchants brought... in lieu of cash, which they usually
brought ... were of various dates, and of various descriptions; a
considerable number of them were bankers' bills, of three months' date,
the large bulk being cotton bills. These bills of exchange, when
bankers' bills, were accepted by London bankers, and by merchants in
every trade that we could mention — the Brazilian, the American, the
Canadian, the West Indian.... The merchants did not draw upon each
other; but the parties in the interior, who had purchased produce from
the merchants, remitted to the merchants bills on London bankers, or
bills on various parties in London, or bills upon anybody. The
announcement of the Bank of England caused a reduction of the maturity
terms of bills drawn against sales of foreign products, frequently
extending to over three months" (pp. 26, 27).

The period of prosperity in England from 1844 to 1847, was, as described
above, connected with the first great railway swindle. The above-named
report makes the following reference to the effect of this swindle on
business in general:

In April 1847 "almost all mercantile houses had begun to starve their
business more or less ... by taking part of their commercial capital for
railways" (p.42). "Loans were made on railway shares at a high rate of
interest, say, 8%, by private individuals, by bankers and by
fire-offices" (p. 66). "Loans to so great an extent by commercial houses
to railways induced them to lean too much upon banks by the discount of
paper, whereby to carry on their commercial operations" (p. 67).
(Question:) "Should you say that the railway calls had had a great
effect in producing the pressure which there was" (on the money-market)
"in April and October" (1847)? — (Answer:) "I should say that they had
had hardly any effect at all in producing the pressure in April; I
should imagine that up to April, and up, perhaps, to the summer, they
had increased the power of bankers in some respects rather than
diminished it; for the expenditure had not been nearly so rapid as the
calls; the consequence was, that most of the banks had rather a large
amount of railway money in their hands in the beginning of the year."

(This is corroborated in numerous statements made by bankers in C. D.
1848-57.)

"In the summer that melted gradually away, and on the 31st of December
it was materially less. One cause ... of the pressure in October was the
gradual diminution of the railway money in the bankers' hands; between
the 22nd of April and the 31st of December the railway balances in our
hands were reduced one- third; and the railway calls have also had this
effect throughout the Kingdom; they have been gradually draining the
deposits of bankers" (pp. 43, 44).

Samuel Gurney (head of the ill-famed firm of Overend, Gurney and Co.)
similarly says:

"During the year 1846 ... there had been a considerable demand for
capital, for the establishment of rail-ways ... but it did not increase
the value of money.... There was a condensation of small sums into large
masses, and those large masses were used in our market; so that, upon
the whole, the effect was to throw more money into the money-market of
the City than to take it out" [p. 159].

A. Hodgson, Director of the Liverpool Joint-Stock Bank, shows how much
bills of exchange may constitute a reserve for bankers:

"It has been our habit to keep at least nine-tenths of all our deposits,
and all money we have of other persons, in our bill case, in bills that
are falling due from day to day ... so much so, that during the time of
the run, the bills falling due were almost equal to the amount of the
ran upon us day by day" (p. 53).

_Speculative bills_.

"5092. Who were those bills (against sold cotton) generally accepted
by?" — (R. Gardner, the cotton manufacturer repeatedly mentioned in this
work:) "Produce brokers: a person buys cotton, and places it in the
hands of a broker, and draws upon that broker, and gets the bills
discounted." — "5094. And they are taken to the banks at Liverpool, and
discounted? — Yes, and in other parts besides.... I believe if it had
not been for the accommodation thus granted, and principally by the
Liverpool banks, cotton would never have been so high last year as it
was by 1½ d. or 2d. a pound." — "600. You have stated that a vast amount
of bills were put in circulation, drawn by speculators upon cotton
brokers in Liverpool; does that system extend to your advance on
acceptances upon colonial and foreign produce as well as on cotton?" (A.
Hodgson, a Liverpool banker:) "It refers to all kinds of colonial
produce, but to cotton most especially." — "601. Do you, as a banker,
disencourage as far as you can that description of paper? — We do not;
we consider it a very legitimate description of paper, when kept in
moderation. This description of paper is frequently renewed."

_Swindling in the East Indian and Chinese Market, 1847_. — Charles
Turner (head of one of the leading East Indian houses in Liverpool):

"We are all aware of the events which have taken place as regards the
Mauritius trade, and other trades of that kind. The brokers have been in
the habit ... not only of advancing upon goods after their arrival to
meet the bills drawn against those goods, which is perfectly legitimate,
and upon the bills of lading ... but ... they have advanced upon produce
before it was shipped, and in some cases before it was manufactured.
Now, to speak of my own individual instance: I have bought bills in
Calcutta to the extent of six or seven thousand pounds in one particular
instance; the proceeds of the bills went down to the Mauritius, to help
in the growth of sugar; those bills came to England, and above half of
them were protested; for when the shipments of sugar came forward,
instead of being held to pay those bills, it had been mortgaged to third
parties ... before it was shipped, in fact almost before it was boiled"
(p.78). "Now manufacturers are insisting upon cash but it does not
amount to much, because if a buyer has any credit in London, he can draw
upon the house, and get the bill discounted; he goes to London, where
discounts now are cheap; he gets the bill discounted, and pays cash to
the manufacturer.... It takes twelve months, at least, for the shipper
of goods to get his return from India ... a man with ten or fifteen
thousand pounds would go into the Indian trade; he would open a credit
with a house in London, to a considerable extent, giving that house one
per cent; he, drawing upon the house in London, on the understanding
that the proceeds of the goods that go out are to be returned to the
house in London, but it being perfectly understood by both parties that
the man in London is to be kept out of a cash advance; that is to say,
in other words, the bills are to be renewed till the proceeds come home.
The bills were discounted at Liverpool, Manchester ... or in London ...
many of them lie in the Scotch banks" (p. 79). — "786. There is one
house which failed in London the other day, and in examining their
affairs, a transaction of this sort was proved to have taken place;
there is a house of business at Manchester, and another at Calcutta;
they opened a credit account with a house in London to the extent of
£200,000; that is to say, the friends of this house in Manchester, who
consigned goods to the East India House from Glasgow and from
Manchester, had the power of drawing upon the house in London to the
extent of £200,000; at the same time, there was an understanding that
the corresponding house in Calcutta were to draw upon the London house
to the extent of £200,000; with the proceeds of those bills sold in
Calcutta, they were to buy other bills, and remit them to the house in
London, to take up the first bills drawn from Glasgow... There would
have been £600,000 of bills created upon that transaction." — "971. At
present, if a house in Calcutta purchase a cargo" (for England), "and
give their own bills upon their correspondent in London in payment, and
they send the bills of lading home to this country, those bills of
lading ... immediately become available to them in Lombard Street for
advances, and they have eight months' use of the money before their
correspondents are called upon to pay."

IV. In 1848 a secret committee of the House of Lords investigated the
causes of the 1847 crisis. The evidence given to the committee was not
published, however, until 1857 (Minutes of Evidence, taken before the
Secret Committee of the H. of L. appointed to inquire into the Causes of
Distress, etc., 1857; quoted as C.D. 1848/57). Here Mr. Lister, Director
of the Union Bank of Liverpool, testified, among other things, to the
following:

"2444. In the spring of 1844 there was an undue extension of credit...
because a man transferred property from business into railways and was
still anxious to carry on the same extent of business. He probably first
thought that he could sell the railway shares at a profit and replace
the money in his business. Perhaps he found that could not be done, and
he then got credit in his business where formerly he paid in cash. There
was an extension of credit from that circumstance."

"2500. Were those bills ... upon which the banks had sustained a loss by
holding them, principally bills upon corn or bills upon cotton?" — "They
were bills upon all kinds of produce, corn and cotton and sugar, all
foreign produce of all descriptions. There was scarcely any thing
perhaps with the exception of oil, that did not go down." — "2506. A
broker who accepts a bill will not accept it without a good margin as to
the value."

"2512. There are two kinds of bills drawn against produce; the first is
the original bill drawn abroad upon the merchant, who imports it.... The
bills which are drawn against produce frequently fall due before the
produce arrives. The merchant, therefore, when it arrives, if he has not
sufficient capital, has to pledge that produce with the broker till he
has time to sell that produce. Then a new species of bill is immediately
drawn by the merchant in Liverpool upon the broker, on the security of
that produce.... Then it is the business of the banker to ascertain from
the broker whether he has the produce, and to what extent he has
advanced upon it. It is his business to see that the broker has property
to protect himself if he makes a loss."

"2516. We also receive bills from abroad.... A man buys a bill abroad on
England, and sends it to a house in England; we cannot tell whether that
bill is drawn prudently or imprudently, whether it is drawn for produce
or for wind."

"2533. You said that almost every kind of foreign produce was sold at a
great loss. Do you think that that was in consequence of undue
speculation in that produce? — It arose from a very large import, and
there not being an equal consumption to take it off. It appears that
consumption fell off a great deal." — "2534. In October produce was
almost unsaleable."

How a general _sauve qui peut_ develops at the height of a crisis is
revealed in the same report by a first-rate expert, the esteemed crafty
Quaker, Samuel Gurney, of Overend, Gurney and Co.:

"1262 ... When a panic exists a man does not ask himself what he can get
for his bank-notes, or whether he shall lose one or two per cent by
selling his exchequer bills, or three per cent. If he is under the
influence of alarm he does not care for the profit or loss, but makes
himself safe and allows the rest of the world to do as they please."

V. Concerning the mutual satiation of the two markets Mr. Alexander, a
merchant in the East India trade, testifies before the Committee of the,
Lower House on the Bank Act of 1857 (quoted as B.C. 1857):

"4330. At the present moment, if I lay out 6s. in Manchester, I get 5s.
back in India; if I lay out 6s. in India, I get 5s. back in London."

So that the Indian market is, therefore, drugged by England, and the
English by India. This was, indeed, the case in the summer of 1857,
barely ten years after the bitter experience of 1847!

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 26. Accumulation of Money-Capital. Its Influence on the Interest Rate

 

"In England there takes place a steady accumulation of additional
wealth, which has a tendency ultimately to assume the form of money. Now
next in urgency, perhaps, to the desire to acquire money, is the wish to
part with it again for some species of investment that shall yield
either interest or profit; for money itself, as money, yields neither.
Unless, therefore, concurrently with this ceaseless influx of
surplus-capital, there is a gradual and sufficient extension of the
field for its employment, we must be subject to periodical accumulations
of money seeking investment, of more or less volume, according to the
movement of events. For a long series of years, the grand absorbent of
the surplus wealth of England was our public debt.... As soon as in 1816
the debt reached its maximum, and operated no longer as an absorbent, a
sum of at least seven-and-twenty million per annum was necessarily
driven to seek other channels of investment. What was more, various
return payments of capital were made.... Enterprises which entail a
large capital and create an opening from time to time for the excess of
unemployed capital ... are absolutely necessary, at least in our
country, so as to take care of the periodical accumulations of the
superfluous wealth of society, which is unable to find room in the usual
fields of application." (_The Currency Theory Reviewed,_ London, 1845,
pp. 32-34.)

Of 1845 the same work says:

"Within a very recent period prices have sprung upwards from the lowest
point of depression.... Consols touch par.... The bullion in the vaults
of the Bank of England has ... exceeded in amount the treasure held by
that establishment since its institution. Shares of every description
range at prices on the average wholly unprecedented, and interest has
declined to rates which are all but nominal. If these be not evidences
that another heavy accumulation of unemployed wealth exists at this hour
in England, that another period of speculative excitement is at hand."
(_Ibid_., p. 36.)

"Although ... the import of bullion is no sure sign of gain upon the
foreign trade, yet, in the absence of any explanatory cause, it does
_prima facie_ represent a portion of it." (J. G. Hubbard, _The Currency
and the Country,_ London, 1843, pp. 40-411.) "Suppose ... that at a
period of steady trade, fair prices ... and full, but not redundant
circulation, a deficient harvest should give occasion for an import of
corn, and an export of gold to the value of five million. The
circulation"

[meaning, as we shall presently see, idle money-capital rather than
means of circulation — _F.E_.]

"would of course be reduced by the same amount. An equal quantity of the
circulation might still be held by individuals, but the deposits of
merchants at their bankers, the balances of bankers with their
money-broker, and the reserve in their till, will all be diminished, and
the immediate result of this reduction in the amount of unemployed
capital will be a rise in the rate of interest. I will assume from 4 per
cent to 6. Trade being in a sound state, confidence will not be shaken,
but credit will be more highly valued." (_Ibid_., p. 42.) "But imagine
... that all prices fall.... The superfluous currency returns to the
bankers in increased deposits-the abundance of unemployed capital lowers
the rate of interest to a minimum, and this state of things lasts until
either a return of higher prices or a more active trade call the dormant
currency into service, or until it is absorbed by investments in foreign
stocks or foreign goods" (p. 68).

The following extracts are also taken from the parliamentary Report on
Commercial Distress, 1847-48. — Owing to the crop failure and famine of
1846-47 large-scale imports of foodstuffs became necessary.

"These circumstances caused the imports of the country to be very
largely in excess over ... exports ... a considerable drain upon the
banks, and an increased application to the discount brokers ... for the
discount of bills.... They began to scrutinise the bills ... The
facilities of houses then began to be very seriously curtailed, and the
weak houses began to fail. Those houses which ... relied upon their
credit... went down. This increased the alarm that had been previously
felt; and the bankers and others finding that they would not rely with
the same degree of confidence that they had previously done upon turning
their bills and other money securities into bank-notes, for the purpose
of meeting their engagements, still further curtailed their facilities,
and in many cases refused them altogether; they locked up their
bank-notes, in many instances to meet their own engagements; they were
afraid of parting with them.... The alarm and confusion were increased
daily; and unless Lord John Russell .... had issued the letter to the
Bank ... universal bankruptcy would have been the issue" (pp. 74-75).

Russell's letter suspended the Bank Act. — The previously mentioned
Charles Turner testifies:

"Some houses had large means, but not available. The whole of their
capital was locked up in estates in the Mauritius, or indigo factories,
or sugar factories. Having incurred liabilities to the extent of
£500,000 or £600,000 they had no available assets to pay their bills,
and eventually it proved that to pay their bills they were entirely
dependent upon their credit" (p. 81).

The aforementioned S. Gurney said [1664]:

"At present (1848) there is a limitation of transaction and a great
superabundance of money." — "1763. I do not think it was owing to the
want of capital; it was owing to the alarm that existed that the rate of
interest got so high."

In 1847 England paid at least £9 million gold to foreign countries for
imported foodstuffs. Of this amount £7½ million came from the Bank of
England and 1½ million from other sources (p. 245). — Morris, Governor
of the Bank of England:

"The public stocks in the country and canal and railway shares had
already by the 23rd of October 1847 been depreciated in the aggregate to
the amount of £114,752,225" (p. 312).

Again Morris, when questioned by Lord G. Bentinck:

"Are you not aware that all property invested in stocks and produce of
every description was depreciated in the same way; that raw cotton, raw
silk and unmanufactured wool were sent to the continent at the same
depreciated price... and that sugar, coffee and tea were sacrificed as
at forced sales? — It was ... inevitable that the country should make a
considerable sacrifice for the purpose of meeting the efflux of bullion
which had taken place in consequence of the large importation of food."
— [3848] "Do not you think it would have been better to trench upon the
£8,000,000 lying in the coffers of the Bank than to have endeavoured to
get the gold back again at such a sacrifice? — _No, I do not." —_

Now to the commentaries on such heroism. Disraeli questions Mr. W.
Cotton, a Director and former Governor of the Bank of England:

"What was the rate of dividend paid to the Bank proprietors in 1844? —
It was 7 per cent for the year." — "What is the dividend ... for 1847? —
Nine per cent." — "Does the Bank pay the income tax for its proprietors
in this year? — It does." — "Did it do so in 1844? — It did not." ^([1])
— "Then this Bank Act" (of 1844) "has worked very well for the
proprietors?... The result is, that since the passing of the Act, the
dividend to the proprietors has been raised from 7 per cent to 9 per
cent, and the income tax, that previously to the Act was paid by the
proprietors, is now paid by the Bank? — _It is so."_ (Nos. 4356-61.)

Mr. Pease, a country banker, had the following to say concerning
hoarding in banks during the crisis of 1847:

"4605. As the Bank was obliged still to raise its rate of interest,
every one seemed apprehensive; country bankers increased the amount of
bullion in their hands, and increased their reserve of notes, and many
of us who were in the habit of keeping, perhaps, a few hundred pounds of
gold and bank-notes, immediately laid up thousands in our desks and
drawers, as there was an uncertainty about discounts, and about our
bills being current in the market, a general hoarding ensued."

A member of the Committee remarks:

"4691. Then, whatever may have been the cause during the last 12 years,
the result has been rather in favour of the Jew and money-dealer, than
the productive classes generally."

How much a money-dealer takes advantage of times of crisis is revealed
by Tooke:

"In the hardware districts of Warwickshire and Staffordshire, a great
many orders for goods were declined to be accepted in 1847, because the
rate of interest which the manufacturer had to pay for discounting his
bills more than absorbed all his profit" (No. 5451).

Let us now take another parliamentary report cited earlier: Report of
Select Committee on Bank Acts, communicated from the Commons to the
Lords, 1857 (quoted further as B. C. 1857). In it Mr. Norman, Director
of the Bank of England and a leading figure among the champions of the
Currency Principle, is interrogated as follows:

"3635. You stated, that you consider that the rate of interest depends,
not upon the amount of notes, but upon the supply and demand of capital.
Will you state what you include in 'capital,' besides notes and coin? —
I believe that the ordinary definition of 'capital' is commodities or
services used in production." — "3636. Do you mean to include all
commodities in the word 'capital' when you speak of the rate of
interest? — All commodities used in production." — "3637. You include
all that in the word 'capital,' when you speak of what regulates the
rate of interest? — Yes. Supposing a cotton manufacturer to want cotton
for his factory, the way in which he goes to work to obtain it is,
probably, by getting an advance from his banker, and with the notes so
obtained he goes to Liverpool, and makes a purchase. What he really
wants is the cotton; he does not want the notes or the gold, except as a
means of getting the cotton. Or he may want the means of paying his
workmen; then again, he borrows the notes, and he pays the wages of the
workmen with the notes; and the workmen, again, require food and
lodging, and the money is the means of paying for those." — "3638. But
interest is paid for the money? — It is, in the first instance; but take
another case. Supposing he buys the cotton on credit, without going to
the bank for an advance, then the difference between the ready-money
price and the credit price at the time at which he is to pay for it is
the measure of the interest. Interest would exist if there was no money
at all."

This self-complacent rubbish is quite fitting for this pillar of the
Currency Principle. First, the brilliant discovery that bank-notes or
gold are means of buying something, and that they are not borrowed for
their own sake. And this is advanced to explain that the rate of
interest is regulated — but by what? By the demand and supply of
commodities, which heretofore was known to regulate only the
market-prices of commodities. However, very different rates of interest
are compatible with the same market-prices of commodities. — But now
this cunning. He is confronted with the correct remark: "But interest is
paid for the money," which, of course, contains the implication: "What
has interest received by the banker, who does not deal in commodities at
all, to do with these commodities? And do not manufacturers receive
money at the same rate of interest, although they invest it in widely
different markets, hence in markets with widely different conditions of
demand and supply for the commodities used in production?" All that this
celebrated genius has to say in reply to these questions is that if the
manufacturer buys cotton on credit "the difference between the
ready-money price and the credit price at the time at which he is to pay
for it is the measure of the interest." Quite the contrary. The
prevailing rate of interest whose regulation the great intellect Norman
was asked to explain is the measure of the difference between the cash
price and the credit price until payment is due. First the cotton is to
be sold at its cash price, and this is determined by the market-price,
itself regulated by the state of supply and demand. Say the price
£1,000. This concludes the transaction between the manufacturer and the
cotton broker so far as buying and selling is concerned. Now comes a
second transaction. This is one between lender and borrower. The value
of £1,000 is advanced to the manufacturer in cotton, and he has to repay
it in money, say, in three months. And three months' interest for £1000,
determined by the market rate of interest, makes up the extra charge
over and above the cash price. The price of cotton is determined by
supply and demand. But the price of the advanced value of cotton, of
£1,000 advanced for three months, is determined by the rate of interest.
And this fact, that cotton is thus transformed into money-capital,
proves to Mr. Norman that interest would exist even if there had been no
money. If there were no money at all, there would certainly be no
general rate of interest.

There is, to begin with, a vulgar conception of capital as "commodities
used in production." In so far as these commodities serve as capital,
their value as _capital,_ as distinct from their value as _commodities,_
is expressed in the profit which is derived from their productive or
mercantile employment. And the rate of profit under all circumstances
has something to do with the market-price of the purchased commodities
and with their supply and demand, but is determined by entirely
different circumstances. And there is no doubt that the interest rate is
generally limited by the rate of profit. But Mr. Norman should tell us
just how this limit is determined. And it is determined by the supply
and demand of money-capital _as distinguished_ from the other forms of
capital. It could be further asked: How are demand and supply of
money-capital determined? It is doubtlessly true that a tacit connection
exists between the supply of material capital and the supply of
money-capital; and, likewise, that the demand of industrial capitalists
for money-capital is determined by conditions of actual production.
Instead of enlightening us on this point, Norman offers us the sage
opinion that the demand for money-capital is not identical with the
demand for money as such; and this sagacity alone, because he,
Overstone, and the other Currency prophets, constantly have pricks of
conscience since they are striving to make capital out of means of
circulation as such through the artificial intervention of legislation,
and to raise the interest rate.

Now to Lord Overstone, alias Samuel Jones Loyd, as he is asked to
explain why he takes 10% for his "money" because "capital" is so scarce
in his country.

"3653. The fluctuations in the rate of interest arise from one of two
causes: an alteration in the value of capital"

(excellent! Value of capital, generally speaking, signifies precisely
the rate of interest! A change in the rate of interest is thus made to
spring from a change in the rate of interest. "Value of capital," as we
have shown elsewhere, is never conceived otherwise in theory. Or else,
if Lord Overstone means the rate of profit by the phrase "value of
capital", then the profound thinker returns to the notion that the
interest rate is regulated by the rate of profit!)

"or an alteration in the amount of money in the country. All great
fluctuations of interest, great either in their duration or in the
extent of the fluctuation, may be distinctly traced to alterations in
the value of capital. Two more striking practical illustrations of that
fact cannot be furnished than the rise in the rate of interest in 1847
and during the last two years (1855-56); the minor fluctuations in the
rate of interest, which arise from an alteration in the quantity of
money, are small both in extent and in duration. They are frequent, and
the more rapid and frequent they are, the more effectual they are for
accomplishing their destined purpose",

which is to enrich bankers like Overstone. Friend Samuel Gurney
expresses it very naively before the Committee of Lords, C. D. 1848
[1857]:

"1324. Do you think that the great fluctuations in the rate of interest
which have taken place in the last year are advantageous or not to
bankers or dealers in money? — I think they are advantageous to dealers
in money. All fluctuations in trade are advantageous to the knowing
man."

"1325. May not the banker suffer eventually from the high rates of
interest, by impoverishing his best customers? — No; I do not think it
has that effect perceptibly." —

_Voilà ce que parler veut dire._ [This is what had to be said. — _Ed_.]

We shall eventually return to the influence of the quantity of available
money on the rate of interest. But it is to be noted right here that
Overstone again makes a _quid pro quo._ The demand for money-capital in
1847 (before October there was no anxiety over money stringency, or the
"quantity of money," as he called it) increased for various reasons,
such as rising prices for corn and cotton, lack of buyers of sugar due
to over-production, railway speculation and the crash, overcrowding of
foreign markets with cotton goods, and the forced export to, and import
from, India for the purpose of speculation in bills of exchange, which
was described above. All these things, over-production in industry and
underproduction in agriculture — in other words, greatly differing
causes — gave rise to an increased demand for money-capital, _i.e._, for
credit and money. The increased demand for money-capital had its origin
in the course of the productive process itself. But whatever may have
been the cause, it was the demand for _money-_capital which made the
interest rate, the value of money-capital, climb. If Overstone means to
say that the value of money-capital rose _because_ it rose, then it is
tautology. But if, by "value of capital," he means a rise in the rate of
profit as the cause of the rise in the rate of interest, we shall
immediately see that this is wrong. The demand for money-capital, and
consequently the "value of capital," may rise even though the profit may
decrease; as soon as the relative supply of money-capital shrinks, its
"value" increases. What Overstone wished to prove is that the crisis of
1847, and the attendant high interest rate, had nothing to do with the
"quantity of money," _i.e.,_ with the regulations of the Bank Act of
1844 which he had inspired; although it was, indeed, connected with
them, inasmuch as the fear of exhausting the bank reserve — a creation
of Overstone — contributed a money panic to the crisis of 1847-48. But
this is not the issue here. There was a dearth of money-capital, caused
by the excessive volume of operations compared to the available means
and precipitated by the disturbance in the reproduction process due to a
crop failure, over-investment in railways, over-production, particularly
of cotton goods, swindling operations in trade with India and China,
speculation, superfluous sugar imports, etc. What the people, who had
bought corn at 120 shillings per quarter, lacked when it fell to 60
shillings, were the 60 shillings which they had overpaid and the
corresponding credit for that amount in Lombard Street advances on the
corn. It was by no means a lack of bank-notes that prevented them from
converting their corn into money at its old price of 120 shillings. The
same applied to those who had imported an excess of sugar, which became
almost unsaleable. It applied likewise to the gentlemen who had tied up
their floating capital in railways and relied on credit to replace it in
their "legitimate" business. To Overstone all this signifies a "moral
sense of the enhanced value of his money." But this enhanced value of
money-capital corresponded directly on the other hand to the depreciated
money-value of real capital (commodity-capital and productive capital).
The value of capital in the one form rose because the value of capital
in the other fell. Overstone, however, seeks to identify these two
values of different sorts of capital in a single value of capital in
general, and he tries to do so by opposing both of them to a scarcity of
the medium of circulation, of available money. But the same amount of
money-capital may be loaned with very different quantities of the
circulation medium.

Take his example of 1847. The official bank-rate stood at 3 to 3½% in
January; 4 to 4½% in February. In March it was generally 4%. April
(panic) 4 to 7½%. May 5 to 5½%, June, on the whole, 5%. July 5%. August
5 to 5½%. September 5% with trifling variations of 5¼, 5½, 6%. October
5, 5½, 7%. November 7-10%. December 7 to 5%. — In this case the interest
rose because profits decreased and the money-values of commodities fell
enormously. If, therefore, Overstone says here that the rate of interest
rose in 1847 because the value of capital rose, he cannot mean anything
by value of capital but the value of money-capital, and the value of
money-capital is the rate of interest, and nothing else. But later he
showed the cloven hoof and identified the value of capital with the rate
of profit.

As for the high rate of interest paid in 1856, Overstone was indeed
ignorant of the fact that this was partially a symptom that the credit
jobbers were coming to the fore, who paid interest not from their
profit, but with the capital of others; he maintained just a few months
before the crisis of 1857 that "business is quite sound."

He testified furthermore: [B.C. 1857]

"3722. That idea of the profits of trade being destroyed by a rise in
the rate of interest is most erroneous. In the first place, a rise in
the rate of interest is seldom of any long duration; in the second
place, if it is of long duration, and of great extent, it is really a
rise in the value of capital, and why does value of capital rise?
Because the rate of profit is increased."

Here, then, we learn, at last, what the meaning of "value of capital"
is. Furthermore, the rate of profit may be high for a lengthy period,
and yet the profit of enterprise may fall and the rate of interest rise
to a point where it swallows the greater portion of the profit.

"3724. The rise in the rate of interest has been in consequence of the
great increase in the trade of the country, and the great rise in the
rate of profits; and to complain of the rise in the rate of interest as
being destructive of the two things, which have been its own cause, is a
sort of logical absurdity, which one does not know how to deal with."

This is just as logical as if he were to say: The rise in the rate of
profit has been in consequence of the rise in commodity-prices by
speculation, and to complain that the rise in prices destroys its own
cause, namely, speculation, is a logical absurdity, etc. That anything
can ultimately destroy its own cause is a logical absurdity only for the
usurer enamoured of the high interest rate. The greatness of the Romans
was the cause of their conquests, and their conquests destroyed their
greatness. Wealth is the cause of luxury and luxury has a destructive
effect on wealth. The wiseacre! The idiocy of the present-day bourgeois
world cannot be better described than by the respect, which the "logic"
of the millionaire — the dunghill aristocrat — inspired in all England.
Furthermore, if a high rate of profit and an expansion of business may
be causes of a high interest rate, a high rate of interest is by no
means therefore a cause of high profit. The question is precisely
whether such a high interest (as was actually discovered during the
crisis) continued or, what is more, reached its climax after the high
rate of profit had long gone the way of all flesh.

"3718. With regard to a great rise in the rate of discount, that is a
circumstance entirely arising from the increased value of capital, and
the cause of that increased value of capital I think any person may
discover with perfect clearness. I have already alluded to the fact that
during the 13 years this Act has been in operation, the trade of this
country has increased from £45,000,000 to £120,000,000. Let any person
reflect upon all the events which are involved in that short statement;
let him consider the enormous demand upon capital for the purpose of
carrying on such a gigantic increase of trade, and let him consider at
the same time that the natural source from which that great demand
should be supplied, namely, the annual savings of this country, has for
the last three or four years been consumed in the unprofitable
expenditure of war. I confess that my surprise is, that the rate of
interest is not much higher than it is; or, in other words, my surprise
is, that the pressure for capital to carry on these gigantic operations,
is not far more stringent than you have found it to be."

What an amazing jumble of words by our logician of usury! Here he comes
again with his increased value of capital! He seems to think that this
enormous expansion of the reproduction process, hence accumulation of
real capital, took place on one side, and that on the other there
existed a "capital", for which there arose an "enormous demand", in
order to accomplish this gigantic increase of commerce! Was not this
enormous increase of production an increase of capital itself, and if it
created a demand, did it not also create the supply, and,
simultaneously, an increased supply of money-capital? If the interest
rate rose very high, then merely because the demand for money-capital
increased still more rapidly than its supply, which implies, in other
words, that with the expansion of industrial production its operation on
a credit basis expanded as well. That is to say, the actual industrial
expansion caused an increased demand for "accommodation," and the latter
demand is evidently what our banker means by the "enormous demand for
capital." It was surely not the expansion of this _demand_ for capital
alone, which raised the export business from £45 to £120 million. And
furthermore, what does Overstone mean when he says that the country's
annual savings swallowed by the Crimean War form the natural source of
supply for this big demand? in the first place, how did England achieve
accumulation in 1792-1815, which was a far different war from the little
Crimean one? In the second place, if the natural source was dry, from
what source did capital flow at all? It is well known that England did
not request loans from foreign countries. Yet if there is an artificial
source besides the natural one, it would have been best for a nation to
utilise the natural source in war and the artificial one in business.
But if only the old money-capital was available, could it double its
effectiveness through a high rate of interest? Mr. Overstone evidently
thinks that the country's annual savings (which, however, were supposed
to have been consumed in this case) are converted only into
money-capital. But if no real accumulation, _i.e._, expansion of
production and augmentation of the means of production, had taken place,
what good would there be from the accumulation of debtor's money claims
on this production?

The increase in the "value of capital" springing from a high rate of
profit is identified by Overstone with an increase caused by a greater
demand for money-capital. This demand may climb for reasons quite
independent of the rate of profit. He himself cites the example of its
rise in 1847 as a result of the depreciation of real capital. Depending
on what suits his purpose, he ascribes the value of capital to real
capital or money-capital.

The dishonesty of our banking lord, and his narrow-minded banker's point
of view with its didactic flavouring are further revealed in the
following:

(3728. Question:) "You have stated that the rate of discount is of no
material moment you think to the merchant; will you be kind enough to
state what you consider the ordinary rate of profit?"

Mr. Overstone declares that it is "impossible" to answer this question.

"3729. Supposing the average rate of profit to be, say, from 7 to 10%, a
variation of from 2 to 7 or 8% in the rate of discount must materially
affect the rate of profit, must it not? "

(This question itself lumps together the rate of profit of enterprise
with the rate of profit, and. passes over the fact that the rate of
profit is the common source of interest and profit of enterprise. The
interest rate may leave the rate of profit untouched, but not the profit
of enterprise. Overstone replied:)

"In the first place parties will not pay a rate of discount which
seriously interrupts their profits; they will discontinue their business
rather than do that."

(Yes, if they can do so without ruining themselves. So long as their
profit is high, they pay the discount because they wish to, and when it
is low, because they have to.)

"What is the meaning of discount? Why does a person discount a bill? ...
Because he wants to obtain the command of a greater quantity of
capital."

(_Halte-là!_ because he wants to anticipate the return in money of his
tied-up capital and to prevent his business from stopping; because he
must meet payments due. He demands more capital only when business is
good, or when he speculates on another's capital, though business may be
bad. The discount is by no means simply a device to expand business.)

"And why does he want to obtain the command of a greater quantity of
capital? Because he wants to employ that capital; and why does he want
to employ that capital? Because it is profitable to him to do so; it
would not be profitable to him to do so if the discount destroyed his
profit."

This smug logician assumes that bills of exchange are discounted only
for the purpose of expanding business, and that business is expanded
because it is profitable. The first assumption is wrong. The ordinary
businessman discounts, in order to anticipate the money-form of his
capital and thereby to keep his process of reproduction in flow; not in
order to expand his business or secure additional capital, but in order
to balance the credit he gives by the credit he receives. And if he
wants to expand his business on credit, discounting bills will do him
little good because it is merely conversion of the money-capital which
he already has in his hands from one form into another; he will rather
take a direct loan for a longer period. The credit swindler will get his
accommodation bills discounted to expand his business activity, to cover
one squalid business deal by another; not to make profits but to obtain
possession of another's capital.

After Mr. Overstone has thus identified discounting with borrowing
additional capital (instead of with converting bills representing
capital into hard cash), he beats an instant retreat as soon as the
screws are applied to him.

(3730. Question:) "Merchants being engaged in business, must they not
for a certain period carry on their operations in despite of any
temporary increase in the rate of discount?" — (Overstone:) "There is no
doubt that in any particular transaction, if a person can get his
command of capital at a low rate of interest rather than at a high rate
of interest, taken in that limited view of the matter, that is
convenient to him."

But it is a very unlimited point of view, on the other hand, which
enables Mr. Overstone quite suddenly to understand only his, banker's
capital, as "capital," and to assume that the man who discounts a bill
of exchange with him is a man without capital, just because his capital
exists in the form of commodities, or because the money-form of his
capital is a bill of exchange, which Mr. Overstone converts into another
money-form.

3732. "With reference to the Act of 1844, can you state what has been
about the average rate of interest in proportion to the amount of
bullion in the Bank; would it be a fact that when the amount of bullion
has been about £9,000,000 or £10,000,000 the rate of interest has been 6
or 7 per cent, and that when it has been £16,000,000, the rate of
interest has been, say, from 3 to 4 per cent?"

(The examiner wishes to press him to explain the rate of interest, so
far as it is influenced by the amount of bullion in the Bank, on the
basis of the rate of interest, so far as it is influenced by the value
of capital.)

"I do not apprehend that that is so... but if it is, then I think we
must take still more stringent measures than those adopted by the Act of
1844, because if it be true that the greater the store of bullion, the
lower the rate of interest, we ought to set to work, according to that
view of the matter, to increase the store of bullion to an indefinite
amount, and then we should get the interest down to nothing."

The examiner, Cayley, unmoved by this poor joke, continues:

"3733. If that be so, supposing that £5,000,000 of bullion was to be
restored to the Bank, in the course of the next six months the bullion
then would amount, say, to £16,000,000, and supposing that the rate of
interest was thus to fall to 3 or 4 per cent, how could it be stated
that that fall in the rate of interest arose from a great decrease of
the trade of the country? — I said that the recent rise in the rate of
interest, not that the fall in the rate of interest, was closely
connected with the great increase in the trade of the country."

But what Cayley says is this: If a rise of interest rate together with a
contraction of the gold reserve, is an indication of an expansion in
business, then a fall of the interest rate together with an expansion of
the gold reserve, must be an indication of a contraction of business.
Overstone has no answer to this.

(3736. Question:) "I observed you" (in the text always "Your Lordship")
"to say that money was the instrument for obtaining capital."

(Precisely this is the mistake, to conceive money as an instrument; it
is a form of capital.)

"Under a drain of bullion (of the Bank of England) is not the great
strain, on the contrary, for _capitalists_ to obtain money?" —
(Overstone:) "No, it is not the capitalists, it is those who are not
capitalists, who want to obtain money and why do they want to obtain
money? ... Because through the money they obtain the command of the
capital of the capitalist to carry on the business of the persons who
are not capitalists."

Here he declares point-blank that manufacturers and merchants are not
capitalists, and that the capitalist's capital is only money-capital.

"3737. Are not the parties who draw bills of exchange capitalists? — The
parties who draw bills of exchange may be, and may not be, capitalists."

Here he is stuck.

He is then asked whether merchants' bills of exchange represent
commodities which have been sold or shipped. He denies that these bills
represent the value of commodities in the same way that a bank-note
represents gold. (3740, 3741.) This is somewhat insolent.

"3742. Is it not the merchant's object to get money? — No; getting money
is not the object in drawing the bill; getting money is the object in
discounting the bill."

Drawing bills of exchange is converting commodities into a form of
credit-money, just as discounting bills of exchange is converting this
credit-money into another, namely bank-notes. At any rate, Mr. Overstone
admits here that the purpose of discounting is to obtain money. A while
ago he said that discounting was a way not of converting capital from
one form into another, but of obtaining additional capital.

"3743. What is the great desire of the mercantile community under
pressure of panic, such as you state to have occurred in 1825, 1837 and
1839; is their object to get possession of capital or the legal tender?
— Their object is to get the command of capital to support their
business."

Their purpose is to obtain means of payment for due bills of exchange on
themselves, on account of the prevailing lack of credit, so that they
will not have to let their commodities go below price. If they have no
capital at all themselves, they receive it along with the means of
payment, because they receive value without an equivalent. The urge to
obtain money as such consists always in the wish to convert value from
the form of commodities or creditor's claims into the form of money.
Hence, even aside from the crises, the great difference between
borrowing capital and discount, the latter being a mere conversion of
money claims from one form into another, or into real money.

[I take the liberty at this point in my capacity of editor to
interpolate a few remarks.

With respect to Norman, as well as Loyd-Overstone, the banker is always
the one who "advances capital" to others, and his customers are those
who demand "capital" from him. Thus, Overstone says that people have
bills of exchange discounted through him, "because they wish to obtain
the command of _capital_" (3729), and that it is pleasant for such
people if they can "get _command of capital_ at a low rate of interest"
(3730). "Money is the instrument for obtaining _capital_" (3736), and
during a panic the great desire of the mercantile community is to "get
the command of _capital_" (3743). For all of Loyd-Overstone's confusion
over what capital is, it is at least clear that he designates what the
banker gives to his client as capital, as a capital which the client did
not formerly possess, but which was advanced to him to supplement what
he already possessed.

The banker has become so accustomed to act as distributor (through
loans) of the social capital available in money-form that he considers
every function whereby he hands out money, as loaning. All the money he
pays out appears to him as a loan. If the money is directly loaned, this
is literally true. If it is invested in the bill-discounting business,
it is in fact advanced by himself until the bill becomes due. The notion
thus grows on him that all the payments he makes are advances;
furthermore, that they are advances not merely in the sense that every
investment of money with the object of deriving interest or profit, is
economically considered an advance of money which the owner of money
concerned, in his capacity of private individual, makes to himself in
his capacity as entrepreneur, but advances in the definite sense that
the banker lends his client a sum of money which augments the capital
already at the latter's disposal.

It is this conception, which, transferred from the banker's office to
political economy, has created the confusing controversy, whether that
which the banker places at his client's disposal in hard cash is capital
or mere money, a medium of circulation, or currency. To decide this —
fundamentally simple — controversy, we must put ourselves in the place
of a bank client. It all depends on what this customer requests and
receives.

If the bank allows its client a loan simply on his personal credit,
without any security on his part, then the matter is clear. He then
certainly receives an advance of definite value as a supplement to the
capital he has already invested. He receives it in the form of money;
hence, not merely money, but also money-_capital._

If, on the other hand, he receives the advance against securities, etc.,
then it is an advance in the sense of money paid to him on condition
that he pay it back. But it is not an advance of capital. For the
securities also represent capital, and a larger amount at that than the
advance. The recipient therefore receives less capital-value than he
deposits as security; this represents for him no acquisition of
additional capital. He does not enter into the transaction because he
needs capital — he has that in his securities — but because he needs
money. Here we, therefore, have an advance of _money,_ not of capital.

If the loan is granted by discounting bills, then even the _form_ of an
advance disappears. Then it is purely a matter of buying and selling.
The bill passes by endorsement into the possession of the bank, while
the money passes into the possession of the client. There is no question
of any return payment on his part. If the client buys hard cash with a
bill of exchange or some similar instrument of credit, it is no more and
no less an advance than were he to buy cash money with his other
commodities, such as cotton, iron, or corn. Still less can this be
called an advance of _capital._ Every purchase and sale between one
merchant and another is a transfer of capital. But an advance of capital
occurs only when the transfer of capital is not reciprocal, but
unilateral and for a period of time. An advance of capital through
discount can, therefore, only occur when a bill is a speculative one,
which does not represent any sold commodities, and no banker will take
such a bill if he is aware of its nature. In the regular discounting
business the bank client does not, therefore, receive an advance, either
of capital or of money. What he receives is money for sold commodities.

The cases in which the customer demands and receives capital from a bank
are thus clearly distinguished from those, in which he merely receives
an advance of money, or buys money from the bank. And since least of all
Mr. Loyd-Overstone ever advanced his funds without collateral except on
the rarest occasions (he was the banker of my firm in Manchester), it is
likewise evident that his lyric descriptions of the great quantities of
capital loaned by generous bankers to manufacturers in need of capital
are gross inventions.

By the way, in Chapter XXXII Marx says essentially the same thing: "The
demand for means of payment is a mere demand for _convertibility into
money,_ so far as merchants and producers have good securities to offer;
it is a demand for _money-capital_ whenever there is no collateral, so
that an advance of means of payment gives them not only the _form of
money_ but also the _equivalent_ they lack, whatever its form, with
which to make payment." — And again in Chapter XXXIII: "Under a
developed system of credit, with the money concentrated in the hands of
bankers, it is they, _at least nominally,_ who advance it. This advance
refers only to money in circulation. It is an advance of _circulation,_
not an advance of capitals which it circulates." Mr. Chapman, who should
know, likewise corroborates this conception of the discounting business:
B. C. 1857:

"The banker has the bill, the banker has _bought the bill."_Evid.
Question 5139.

We shall, however, return to this subject in Chapter XXVIII. — _F. E._]

"3744. Will you be good enough to describe what you actually mean by the
term ‘capital’?" — (Overstone:) "Capital consists of various
commodities, by means of which trade is carried on; there is fixed
capital and there is circulating capital. Your ships, your docks, your
wharves ... are fixed capital; your provisions, your clothes, etc., are
circulating capital."

"3745. Is the country oppressed under a drain of bullion? — Not in the
rational sense of the word."

(Then comes the old Ricardian theory of money.)

"In the natural state of things the money of the world is distributed
amongst the different countries of the world in certain proportions,
those proportions being such that under that distribution (of money) the
intercourse between any one country and all the other countries of the
world jointly will be an intercourse of barter; but disturbing
circumstances will arise to affect that distribution, and when those
arise, a certain portion of the money of any given country passes to
other countries." — "3746. Your Lordship now uses the term ‘money.’ I
understood you before to say that it was a loss of capital. — That what
was a loss of capital?" — "3747. The export of bullion? — No, I did not
say so. If you treat bullion as capital, no doubt it is a loss of
capital; it is parting with a certain proportion of those precious
metals which constitute the money of the world." — "3748. I understood
Your Lordship to say that an alteration in the rate of discount was a
mere sign of an alteration in the value of capital? — I did." — "3749.
And that the rate of discount generally alters with the state of the
store of bullion in the Bank of England? — Yes, but I have already
stated that the fluctuations in the rate of interest, which arise from
an alteration in the quantity of money" (what he therefore means here is
the quantity of actually existing gold) "in a country, are very small."

"3750. Then, does Your Lordship mean that there is a less capital than
there was, when there is a more continuous yet temporary increase in the
rate of discount than usual? — Less, in one sense of the word. The
proportion between capital and the demand for it is altered; it may be
by an increased demand, not by a diminution of the quantity of capital."

(But a moment ago it was capital = money or gold, and a little before
that he had explained the rise in interest rate by a high rate of
profit, due to an expansion rather than a contraction of business or
capital.)

"3751. What is the capital which you particularly allude to? — That
depends entirely upon what the capital is which each person wants. It is
the capital which the country has at its command for conducting its
business, and when that business is doubled, there must be a great
increase in the demand for the capital with which it is to be carried
on."

(This shrewd banker doubles first the business activity and then the
demand for capital with which it is to be doubled. All he sees is his
client, who asks Mr. Loyd for more capital by which to double the volume
of his business.)

"Capital is like any other commodity" (but according to Mr. Loyd capital
is nothing but the totality of commodities), "it will vary in its price"
(hence, commodities change their price twice, one time as commodities
and the second as capital), "according to the supply and demand."

"3752. The changes in the rate of discount are generally connected with
the changes in the amount of gold which there is in the coffers of the
Bank. Is it that capital to which Your Lordship refers? — No." — "3753.
Can Your Lordship point to any instance in which there has been a large
store of capital in the Bank of England connected with a high rate of
discount? — The Bank of England is not a place for the deposit of
capital, it is a place for the deposit of money." — "3754. Your Lordship
has stated that the rate of interest depends upon the amount of capital;
will you be kind enough to state what capital you mean, and whether you
can point to any instance in which there has been a large store of
bullion in the Bank and at the same time a high rate of interest? — It
is very probable (aha!) that the accumulation of bullion in the Bank may
be coincident with a low rate of interest, because a period in which
there is a diminished demand for capital"

(namely, money-capital; the period to which reference is made here, 1844
and 1845, was a period of prosperity)

"is a period, during which, of course, the means or instrument through
which you command capital may accumulate." — "3755. Then you think that
there is no connection between the rate of discount and the amount of
bullion in the coffers of the Bank? — There may be a connection, but it
is not a connection of principle" (his Bank Act of 1844, however, made
it a principle of the Bank of England to regulate the interest rate by
the quantity of bullion in its possession), "there may be a coincidence
of time." — "3758. Do I rightly understand you to say, that the
difficulty of merchants in this country, under a state of pressure, in
consequence of a high rate of discount, is in getting capital, and not
in getting money? — You are putting two things together which I do not
join in that form; their difficulty is in getting capital, and their
difficulty also is in getting money.... The difficulty of getting money
and the difficulty of getting capital is the same difficulty taken in
two successive stages of its progress."

Here the fish is caught in the net again. The first difficulty is to
discount a bill of exchange, or to obtain a loan against the security of
commodities. It is the difficulty of converting capital, or a commercial
token of capital into money. And this difficulty is manifested, among
other things, in a high rate of interest. But as soon as the money is
obtained, what is the second difficulty? Does anyone ever find any
difficulty in getting rid of his money when it is merely a matter of
paying? And if it is a matter of buying, has anyone ever had any
difficulty in purchasing during times of crisis? And, for the sake of
argument, should this refer to a specific dearth in corn, cotton, etc.,
this difficulty could only appear in the price of these commodities, not
in the value of money-capital, _i.e._, not in the rate of interest; and
this difficulty is overcome, in the final analysis, by the fact that our
man now has the money to buy them.

"3760. But a higher rate of discount is an increased difficulty of
getting money? — It is an increased difficulty of getting money, but it
is not because you want to have the money; it is only the form" (and
this form brings profit into the banker's pocket) "in which the
increased difficulty of getting capital presents itself according to the
complicated relations of a civilised state."

"3763. (Overstone's reply:) The banker is the go-between who receives
deposits on the one side, and on the other applies those deposits,
entrusting them, _in the form of capital,_ to the hands of persons, who,
etc."

At last we have what he means by capital. He converts money into capital
by "entrusting" it, less euphemistically, by loaning it at interest.

After Mr. Overstone has stated that a change in the rate of discount is
not essentially connected with a change in quantity of the gold reserve
in a bank, or in the quantity of available money, but that there is at
best only a coincidence in time, he repeats:

"3805. When the money in the country is diminished by a drain, its value
increases, and the Bank of England must conform to that alteration in
the value of money"

(hence, the value of money _as capital;_ in other words, the rate of
interest, for the value of money _as money,_ compared with commodities,
remains the same),

"which is meant by the technical term of raising the rate of interest."

"3819. I never confound those two."

Meaning money and capital, and for the simple reason that he never
differentiated between them.

"3834. The very large sum, which had to be paid" (for corn in 1847),
"which was _in point of fact capital,_ for the supply of the necessary
provisions of the country."

"3841. The variations in the rate of discount have no doubt a very close
relation to the state of the reserve " (of the Bank of England),
"because the state of the reserve is the indicator of the increase or
the decrease of the quantity of money in the country; and in proportion
as the money in the country increases or decreases, the value of that
money will increase or decrease, and the bank-rate of discount will
conform to that change."

Thus, Overstone admits here what he emphatically denied in No. 3755.

"3842. There is an intimate connection between them."

Meaning the quantity of bullion in the issue department, on the one
hand, and the reserve of notes in the banking department, on the other.
Here he explains the change in the rate of interest by the change in the
quantity of money. But this statement is wrong. The reserve may shrink
because the circulating money in the country increases. This is the case
when the public takes more notes and the hoard of metal does not
decrease. But in such case the interest rate rises, because then the
banking capital of the Bank of England is limited by the Act of 1844.
But he dare not mention this, because due to this law the two
departments have nothing to do with one another.

"3859. A high rate of profit will always create a great demand for
capital; a great demand for capital will raise the value of it."

Here, at last, we have the connection between a high rate of profit and
a demand for capital as Overstone conceives it. Now, a high rate of
profit prevailed in, for example, 1844-45 in the cotton industry,
because raw cotton was cheap, and remained so, whereas the demand for
cotton goods was strong. The value of capital (and in an earlier
statement Overstone calls capital that which everyone needs in his
business), in this case therefore the value of raw cotton, was not
increased for the manufacturer. The high rate of profit may have induced
some cotton manufacturer to obtain money on credit for the purpose of
expanding his business. Thereby his demand rose for _money_-capital, but
for nothing else.

"3889. Bullion may or may not be money, just as paper may or may not be
a bank-note."

"3896. Do I correctly understand Your Lordship that you give up the
argument, which you used in 1840, that the fluctuations in the notes out
of the Bank of England ought to conform to the fluctuations in the
amount of bullion? — I give it up so far as this... that now with the
means of information which we possess, the notes out of the Bank of
England must have added to them the notes which are in the banking
reserve of the Bank of England."

This is superlative. The arbitrary provision that the Bank may make out
as many paper notes as it has gold in the treasury and 14 million more,
implies, of course, that its issue of notes fluctuates with the
fluctuations of the gold reserve. But since the present "means of
information which we possess" clearly showed that the mass of notes,
which the Bank can thus manufacture (and which the issue department
transfers to the banking department) — that this circulation between the
two departments of the Bank of England, fluctuating with the
fluctuations of the gold reserve, does not determine the fluctuations in
the circulation of bank-notes outside the Bank of England, then the
latter — the real circulation — becomes a matter of indifference to the
bank administration, and the circulation between the two departments of
the Bank, whose difference from the real circulation is mirrored in the
reserve, alone becomes decisive. To the outside world this internal
circulation is significant only because the reserve indicates how close
the Bank is approaching the legal maximum of its note issue, and how
much its clients can still receive from the banking department.

The following is a brilliant example of Overstone's _mala fides:_

"4243. Does the quantity of capital, do you think, oscillate from month
to month to such a degree as to alter its value in the way exhibited of
late years in the oscillations in the rate of discount? — The relation
between the demand and the supply of capital may undoubtedly fluctuate
even within short periods.... If France tomorrow put out a notice that
she wishes to borrow a very large loan, there is no doubt that it would
immediately cause a great alteration _in the value of money,_ that is to
say, _in the value of capital,_ in this country."

"4245. If France announces, that she wants suddenly, for any purpose, 30
million's worth of commodities there will be a great demand for
_capital,_ to use the more scientific and the simpler term."

"4246. The _capital,_ which France would wish to buy with her loan, is
_one_ thing, and the _money_ with which she buys it is _another,_ is it
the _money,_ which alters in value, or not? — We seem to be reviving the
old question, which I think is more fit for the chamber of a student
than for this committee room."

And with this he retires, but not into the chamber of a student. ^([2])

Notes

1. In other words, formerly they first fixed the dividend, and then
deducted the income tax as the dividend was paid to the individual
stockholder; after 1844, however, the Bank first paid the income tax on
its total profit, and then paid the dividend "free of income tax."

The same nominal percentages are, therefore, higher in the latter case
by the amount of the tax_. — F. E._

2. More on Overstone's confusion of terms in matters concerning capital
at the close of Chapter XXXII. — [_F.E_.]

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 27. The Role of Credit in Capitalist Production

 

The general remarks, which the credit system so far elicited from us,
were the following:

I. Its necessary development to effect the equalisation of the rate of
profit, or the movements of this equalisation, upon which the entire
capitalist production rests.

II. Reduction of the costs of circulation.

1) One of the principal costs of circulation is money itself, being
value in itself. It is economised through credit in three ways.

A. By dropping away entirely in a great many transactions.

B. By the accelerated circulation of the circulating medium.^([1]) This
corresponds in part with what is to be said under 2). On the one hand,
the acceleration is technical; _i.e._, with the same magnitude and
number of actual turnovers of commodities for consumption, a smaller
quantity of money or money tokens performs the same service. This is
bound up with the technique of banking. On the other hand, credit
accelerates the velocity of the metamorphoses of commodities and thereby
the velocity of money circulation.

C. Substitution of paper for gold money.

2) Acceleration, by means of credit, of the individual phases of
circulation or of the metamorphosis of commodities, later the
metamorphosis of capital, and with it an acceleration of the process of
reproduction in general. (On the other hand, credit helps to keep the
acts of buying and selling longer apart and serves thereby as a basis
for speculation.) Contraction of reserve funds, which may be viewed in
two ways: as a reduction of the circulating medium, on the one hand,
and, on the other, as a reduction of that part of capital which must
always exist in the form of money.^([2])

III. Formation of stock companies. Thereby:

1) An enormous expansion of the scale of production and of enterprises,
that was impossible for individual capitals. At the same time,
enterprises that were formerly government enterprises, become public.

2) The capital, which in itself rests on a social mode of production and
presupposes a social concentration of means of production and
labour-power, is here directly endowed with the form of social capital
(capital of directly associated individuals) as distinct from private
capital, and its undertakings assume the form of social undertakings as
distinct from private undertakings. It is the abolition of capital as
private property within the framework of capitalist production itself.

3) Transformation of the actually functioning capitalist into a mere
manager, administrator of other people's capital, and of the owner of
capital into a mere owner, a mere money-capitalist. Even if the
dividends which they receive include the interest and the profit of
enterprise, _i.e._, the total profit (for the salary of the manager is,
or should be, simply the wage of a specific type of skilled labour,
whose price is regulated in the labour-market like that of any other
labour), this total profit is henceforth received only in the form of
interest, _i.e._, as mere compensation for owning capital that now is
entirely divorced from the function in the actual process of
reproduction, just as this function in the person of the manager is
divorced from ownership of capital. Profit thus appears (no longer only
that portion of it, the interest, which derives its justification from
the profit of the borrower) as a mere appropriation of the
surplus-labour of others, arising from the conversion of means of
production into capital, _i.e._, from their alienation vis-à-vis the
actual producer, from their antithesis as another's property to every
individual actually at work in production, from manager down to the last
day-labourer. In stock companies the function is divorced from capital
ownership, hence also labour is entirely divorced from ownership of
means of production and surplus-labour. This result of the ultimate
development of capitalist production is a necessary transitional phase
towards the reconversion of capital into the property of producers,
although no longer as the private property of the individual producers,
but rather as the property of associated producers, as outright social
property. On the other hand, the stock company is a transition toward
the conversion of all functions in the reproduction process which still
remain linked with capitalist property, into mere functions of
associated producers, into social functions.

Before we go any further, there is still the following economically
important fact to be noted: Since profit here assumes the pure form of
interest, undertakings of this sort are still possible if they yield
bare interest, and this is one of the causes, stemming the fall of the
general rate of profit, since such undertakings, in which the ratio of
constant capital to the variable is so enormous, do not necessarily
enter into the equalisation of the general rate of profit.

[Since Marx wrote the above, new forms of industrial enterprises have
developed, as we know, representing the second and third degree of stock
companies. The daily growing speed with which production may be enlarged
in all fields of large-scale industry today, is offset by the
ever-greater slowness with which the market for these increased products
expands. What the former turns out in months, can scarcely be absorbed
by the latter in years. Add to this the protective tariff policy, by
which every industrial country shuts itself off from all others,
particularly from England, and also artificially increases domestic
production capacity. The results are a general chronic over-production,
depressed prices, falling and even wholly disappearing profits; in
short, the old boasted freedom of competition has reached the end of its
tether and must itself announce its obvious, scandalous bankruptcy. And
in every country this is taking place through the big industrialists of
a certain branch joining in a cartel for the regulation of production. A
committee fixes the quantity to be produced by each establishment and is
the final authority for distributing the incoming orders. Occasionally
even international cartels were established, as between the English and
German iron industries. But even this form of association in production
did not suffice. The antagonism of interests between the individual
firms broke through it only too often, restoring competition. This led
in some branches, where the scale of production permitted, to the
concentration of the entire production of that branch of industry in one
big joint-stock company under single management. This has been
repeatedly effected in America; in Europe the biggest example so far is
the United Alkali Trust, which has brought all British alkali production
into the hands of a single business firm. The former owners of the more
than thirty individual plants have received shares for the appraised
value of their entire establishments, totalling about £5 million, which
represent the fixed capital of the trust. The technical management
remains in the same hands as before, but business control is
concentrated in the hands of the general management. The floating
capital, totalling about £1 million, was offered to the public for
subscription. The total capital is, therefore, £6 million. Thus, in this
branch, which forms the basis of the whole chemical industry,
competition has been replaced by monopoly in England, and the road has
been paved, most gratifyingly, for future expropriation by the whole of
society, the nation. — _F.E._]

This is the abolition of the capitalist mode of production within the
capitalist mode of production itself, and hence a self-dissolving
contradiction, which _prima facie_ represents a mere phase of transition
to a new form of production. It manifests itself as such a contradiction
in its effects. It establishes a monopoly in certain spheres and thereby
requires state interference. It reproduces a new financial aristocracy,
a new variety of parasites in the shape of promoters, speculators and
simply nominal directors; a whole system of swindling and cheating by
means of corporation promotion, stock issuance, and stock speculation.
It is private production without the control of private property.

IV. Aside from the stock-company business, which represents the
abolition of capitalist private industry on the basis of the capitalist
system itself and destroys private industry as it expands and invades
new spheres of production, credit offers to the individual capitalist;
or to one who is regarded a capitalist, absolute control within certain
limits over the capital and property of others, and thereby over the
labour of others.^([3]) The control over social capital, not the
individual capital of his own, gives him control of social labour. The
capital itself, which a man really owns or is supposed to own in the
opinion of the public, becomes purely a basis for the superstructure of
credit. This is particularly true of wholesale commerce, through which
the greatest portion of the social product passes. All standards of
measurement, all excuses more or less still justified under capitalist
production, disappear here. What the speculating wholesale merchant
risks is social property, not _his own._ Equally sordid becomes the
phrase relating the origin of capital to savings, for what he demands is
that _others_ should save for him. [Just as all France recently saved up
one and a half billion francs for the Panama Canal swindlers. In fact, a
description of the entire Panama swindle is here correctly anticipated,
fully twenty years before it occurred. — _F.E._] The other phrase
concerning abstention is squarely refuted by his luxury, which is now
itself a means of credit. Conceptions which have some meaning on a less
developed stage of capitalist production, become quite meaningless here.
Success and failure both lead here to a centralisation of capital, and
thus to expropriation on the most enormous scale. Expropriation extends
here from the direct producers to the smaller and the medium-sized
capitalists themselves. It is the point of departure for the capitalist
mode of production; its accomplishment is the goal of this production.
In the last instance, it aims at the expropriation of the means of
production from all individuals. With the development of social
production the means of production cease to be means of private
production and products of private production, and can thereafter be
only means of production in the hands of associated producers, _i.e._,
the latter's social property, much as they are their social products.
However, this expropriation appears within the capitalist system in a
contradictory form, as appropriation of social property by a few; and
credit lends the latter more and more the aspect of pure adventurers.
Since property here exists in the form of stock, its movement and
transfer become purely a result of gambling on the stock exchange, where
the little fish are swallowed by the sharks and the lambs by the
stock-exchange wolves. There is antagonism against the old form in the
stock companies, in which social means of production appear as private
property; but the conversion to the form of stock still remains ensnared
in the trammels of capitalism; hence, instead of overcoming the
antithesis between the character of wealth as social and as private
wealth, the stock companies merely develop it in a new form.

The co-operative factories of the labourers themselves represent within
the old form the first sprouts of the new, although they naturally
reproduce, and must reproduce, everywhere in their actual organisation
all the shortcomings of the prevailing system. But the antithesis
between capital and labour is overcome within them, if at first only by
way of making the associated labourers into their own capitalist,
_i.e._, by enabling them to use the means of production for the
employment of their own labour. They show how a new mode of production
naturally grows out of an old one, when the development of the material
forces of production and of the corresponding forms of social production
have reached a particular stage. Without the factory system arising out
of the capitalist mode of production there could have been no
co-operative factories. Nor could these have developed without the
credit system arising out of the same mode of production. The credit
system is not only the principal basis for the gradual transformation of
capitalist private enterprises into capitalist stock companies, but
equally offers the means for the gradual extension of co-operative
enterprises on a more or less national scale. The capitalist stock
companies, as much as the co-operative factories, should be considered
as transitional forms from the capitalist mode of production to the
associated one, with the only distinction that the antagonism is
resolved negatively in the one and positively in the other.

So far we have considered the development of the credit system — and the
implicit latent abolition of capitalist property — mainly with reference
to industrial capital. In the following chapters we shall consider
credit with reference to interest-bearing capital as such, and to its
effect on this capital, and the form it thereby assumes; and there are
generally a few more specifically economic remarks still to be made.

But first this:

The credit system appears as the main lever of over-production and
over-speculation in commerce solely because the reproduction process,
which is elastic by nature, is here forced to its extreme limits, and is
so forced because a large part of the social capital is employed by
people who do not own it and who consequently tackle things quite
differently than the owner, who anxiously weighs the limitations of his
private capital in so far as he handles it himself. This simply
demonstrates the fact that the self-expansion of capital based on the
contradictory nature of capitalist production permits an actual free
development only up to a certain point, so that in fact it constitutes
an immanent fetter and barrier to production, which are continually
broken through by the credit system.^([4]) Hence, the credit system
accelerates the material development of the productive forces and the
establishment of the world-market. It is the historical mission of the
capitalist system of production to raise these material foundations of
the new mode of production to a certain degree of perfection. At the
same time credit accelerates the violent eruptions of this contradiction
— crises — and thereby the elements of disintegration of the old mode of
production.

The two characteristics immanent in the credit system are, on the one
hand, to develop the incentive of capitalist production, enrichment
through exploitation of the labour of others, to the purest and most
colossal form of gambling and swindling, and to reduce more and more the
number of the few who exploit the social wealth; on the other hand, to
constitute the form of transition to a new mode of production. It is
this ambiguous nature, which endows the principal spokesmen of credit
from Law to Isaac Péreire with the pleasant character mixture of
swindler and prophet.

Notes

1. "The average of notes in circulation during the year was, in 1812,
106,538,000 francs; in 1818, 101,205,000 francs; whereas the movement of
the currency, or the annual aggregate of disbursements and upon all
accounts, was, in 1812, 2,837,712,000 francs; in 1818, 9,665,030,000
francs. The activity of the currency in France, therefore, during the
year 1818, as compared with its activity in 1812, was in the proportion
of three to one. The great regulator of the velocity of circulation is
credit.... This explains, why a severe pressure upon the money-market is
generally coincident with a full circulation." (_The Currency Theory
Reviewed, etc.,_ p. 65) — "Between September 1833 and September 1843
nearly 300 banks were added to the various issuers of notes throughout
the United Kingdom; the result was a reduction in the circulation to the
extent of two million and a half; it was £36,035,244 at the close of
September 1833, and £33,518,554 at the close of September 1843." (L. c.,
p. 53) — "The prodigious activity of Scottish circulation enables it,
with £100, to effect the same quantity of monetary transactions, which
in England it requires £420 to accomplish." (L. c., p. 55. This last
refers only to the technical side of the operation.)

2. Before the establishment of the banks ... the amount of capital
withdrawn for the purposes of currency was greater, at all times, than
the actual circulation of commodities required." (_Economist,_ 1845, p.
238.)

3. See, for instance, in the _Times_ the list of business bankruptcies
in a crisis year such as 1857 and compare the private property of those
bankrupt with the amount of their debts. "The truth is that the power of
purchase by persons having capital and credit is much beyond anything
that those who are unacquainted practically with speculative markets
have any idea of." (Tooke, _Inquiry into the Currency Principle,_ p.
79.) "A person having the reputation of capital enough for his regular
business, and enjoying good credit in his trade, if he takes a sanguine
view of the prospect of a rise of price of the article in which he
deals, and is favoured by circumstances in the outset and progress of
his speculation, may effect purchases to an extent perfectly enormous
compared with his capital" (_Ibid.,_ p. 136). "Merchants, manufacturers,
etc., carry on operations much beyond those which the use of their own
capital alone would enable them to do.... Capital is rather the
foundation upon which a good credit is built than the limit of the
transactions of any commercial establishment." (_Economist,_ 1847, p.
333.)

4 Th. Chalmers [_On Political Economy, etc.,_ Glasgow, 1832. — Ed.].

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 28. Medium of Circulation and Capital; Views of Tooke and Fullarton

 

The distinction between currency and capital, as Tooke, Wilson, and
others draw it, whereby the differences between medium of circulation as
money, as money-capital generally, and as interest-bearing capital
(moneyed capital in the English sense) are thrown together pell-mell,
comes down to two things.^([1])

Currency circulates on the one hand as _coin_ (money), so far as it
promotes the _expenditure of revenue_, hence the traffic between the
individual consumers and the retail merchants, to which category belong
all merchants who sell to the consumers — to the individual consumers as
distinct from productive consumers or producers. Here money circulates
in the function of coin, although it continually _replaces capital._ A
certain portion of money in a particular country is continually devoted
to this function, although this portion consists of perpetually changing
individual coins. In so far as money promotes the _transfer of capital,_
however, either as a means of purchase (medium of circulation) or as a
means of payment, it is _capital._ It is, therefore, neither its
function as a means of purchase, nor that as a means of payment, which
distinguishes it from coin, for it may also act as a means of purchase
between one dealer and another so far as they buy from one another in
hard cash, and also as a means of payment between dealer and consumer so
far as credit is given and the revenue consumed before it is paid. The
difference is, therefore, that in the second case this money not only
replaces the capital for one side, the seller, but is expended,
advanced, by the other side, the buyer, as capital. The difference,
then, is in fact that between _the money-form of revenue_ and _the
money-form of capital,_ but not that between currency and capital, for a
certain quantity of money _circulates_ in the transactions between
dealers as well as in the transactions between consumers and dealers. It
is, therefore, equally _currency_ in _both_ functions. Tooke's
conception introduces confusion into this question in various ways:

1) By confusing the functional distinctions;

2) By introducing the question of the quantity of money circulating
together in both functions;

3) By introducing the question of the relative proportions of the
quantities of currency circulating in the two functions and thus in the
two spheres of the process of reproduction.

Ad 1) Confusing the functional distinctions that money in one form is
currency, and capital in the other. In so far as money serves in one or
another function, be it to realise revenue or transfer capital, it
functions in buying and selling, or in paying, as a means of purchase or
a means of payment, and, in the wider sense of the word, as currency.
The further purpose which it has in the calculations of its spender or
recipient, of being capital or revenue for him, alters absolutely
nothing, and this is doubly demonstrated. Although the kinds of money
circulating in the two spheres are different, the same piece of money,
for instance a five-pound note, passes from one sphere into the other
and alternately performs both functions; which is inevitable, if only
because the retail merchant can give his capital the form of money only
in the shape of the coin which he receives from his customers. It may be
assumed that the actual small change has its circulation centre of
gravity in the domain of retail trade; the retail dealer needs it
continually to make change and receives it back continually in payment
from his customers. But he also receives money, _i.e._, coin, in that
metal which serves as a standard of value, hence in England one-pound
coins, or even bank-notes, particularly notes of small denominations,
such as five- and ten-pound notes. These gold coins and notes, with
whatever small change he has to spare, are deposited by the retail
dealer every day, or every week, in his bank, and he pays for his
purchases by drawing cheques on his bank deposit. But the same gold
coins and hank-notes are just as steadily withdrawn from the bank,
directly or indirectly (for instance, small change by manufacturers for
the payment of wages), as the money-form of its revenue by the entire
public in its capacity of consumer, and flow continually back to the
retail dealers, for whom they thus again realise a portion of their
capital, but at the same time also a portion of their revenue. This last
circumstance is important, and is wholly overlooked by Tooke. Only where
money is expended as money-capital, early in the reproduction process
(Book II, Part 1), does capital-value exist purely as such. For the
produced commodities contain not merely capital, but also surplus-value;
they are not only capital in themselves, but already capital realised as
capital, capital with the source of revenue incorporated in it. What the
retail dealer gives away for the money returning to him, his
commodities, therefore, is for him capital plus profit, capital plus
revenue.

Furthermore, in returning to the retailer, circulating money restores
the money-form of his capital.

To reduce the difference between circulation as circulation of revenue
and circulation of capital into a difference between currency and
capital is, therefore, altogether wrong. This mode of expression is in
Tooke's case due to his simply assuming the standpoint of a banker
issuing his own bank-notes. Those of his notes which are continually in
the public's hands (even if consisting of ever different notes) and
serving as currency cost him nothing, save the cost of the paper and the
printing. They are circulating certificates of indebtedness (bills of
exchange) made out in his own name, but they bring him money and thus
serve as a means of expanding his capital. They differ from his capital,
however, whether it be his own or borrowed. That is why there is a
special distinction for him between currency and capital, which,
however, has nothing to do with the definition of these terms as such,
least of all with that made by Tooke.

The distinct attribute — whether it serves as the money-form of revenue
or of capital — changes nothing in the character of money as a medium of
circulation; it retains this character no matter which of the two
functions it performs. True, money serves more as an actual medium of
circulation (coin, means of purchase) when acting as the money-form of
revenue, due to the dispersion of purchases and sales, and because the
majority of disbursers of revenue, the labourers, can buy relatively
little on credit; whereas in the traffic of the business world, where
the medium of circulation is the money-form of capital, money serves
mainly as a means of payment, partly on account of the concentration,
and partly on account of the prevailing credit system. But the
distinction between money as a means of payment and money as a means of
purchase (means of circulation) is a distinction that refers to the
money itself. It is not a distinction between money and capital. More
copper and silver circulate in the retail business, and more gold in the
wholesale business. Yet the distinction between silver and copper on the
one hand, and gold on the other, is not the distinction between
circulation and capital.

Ad 2) Introducing the question of the quantity of money circulating
together in both functions: So far as money circulates, be it as a means
of purchase or as a means of payment — no matter in which of the two
spheres and independently of its function of realising revenue or
capital — the quantity of its circulating mass comes under the laws
developed previously in discussing the simple circulation of commodities
(Vol. I, Ch. III, 2, b). The velocity of circulation, hence the number
of repetitions of the same function as means of purchase and means of
payment by the same pieces of money in a given term, the mass of
simultaneous purchases and sales, or payments, the sum of the prices of
the circulating commodities, and finally the balances of payments to be
settled in the same period, determine in either case the mass of
circulating money, of currency. Whether money so employed represents
capital or revenue for the payer or receiver, is immaterial, and in no
way alters the matter. Its mass is simply determined by its function as
a medium of purchase and payment.

Ad 3) On the question of the relative proportions of the amounts of
currency circulating in both functions and thus in both spheres of the
reproduction process. Both spheres of circulation are connected
internally, for, on the one hand, the mass of revenues to be spent
expresses the volume of consumption, and, on the other, the magnitude of
the masses of capital circulating in production and commerce expresses
the volume and velocity of the reproduction process. Nevertheless, the
same circumstances have a different effect, working even in opposite
directions, upon the quantities of money circulating in both functions
or spheres, or on the amount of currency, as the English put it in
banking parlance. And this gives new cause for Tooke's vulgar
distinction between capital and currency. The fact that the gentlemen of
the Currency Theory confuse two different things is no reason to present
them as two different concepts.

In times of prosperity, intense expansion, acceleration and vigour of
the reproduction process, labourers are fully employed. Generally, there
is also a rise in wages which makes up in some measure for their fall
below average during other periods of the business cycle. At the same
time, the revenues of the capitalists grow considerably. Consumption
increases generally. Commodity-prices also rise regularly, at least in
the various vital branches of business. Consequently, the quantity of
circulating money grows at least within definite limits, since the
greater velocity of circulation, in turn, sets up certain barriers to
the growth of the amount of currency. Since that portion of the social
revenue which consists of wages is originally advanced by the industrial
capitalist in the form of variable capital, and always in money-form, it
requires more money for its circulation in times of prosperity. But we
must not count this twice — first as money required for the circulation
of variable capital, and then as money required for the circulation of
the labourers' revenue. The money paid to the labourers as wages is
spent in retail trade and returns about once a week to the banks as the
retailers' deposits, after negotiating miscellaneous intermediary
transactions in smaller cycles. In times of prosperity the reflux of
money proceeds smoothly for the industrial capitalists, and thus the
need for money accommodation does not increase because more wages have
to be paid and more money is required for the circulation of their
variable capital.

The total result is that the mass of circulating media serving the
expenditure of revenue grows decidedly in periods of prosperity.

As concerns the circulation required for the transfer of capital, hence
required exclusively between capitalists, a period of brisk business is
simultaneously a period of the most elastic and easy credit. The
velocity of circulation between capitalist and capitalist is regulated
directly by credit, and the mass of circulating medium required to
settle payments, and even in cash purchases, decreases accordingly. It
may increase in absolute terms, but decreases relatively under all
circumstances compared to the expansion of the reproduction process. On
the one hand, greater mass payments are settled without the mediation of
money; on the other, owing to the vigour of the process, there is a
quicker movement of the same amounts of money, both as means of purchase
and of payment. The same quantity of money promotes the reflux of a
greater number of individual capitals.

On the whole, the currency of money in such periods appears full,
although its Department II (transfer of capital) is, at least
relatively, contracted, while its Department I (expenditure of revenue)
expands in absolute terms.

The refluxes express the reconversion of commodity-capital into money, M
— C — M', as we have seen in the discussion of the reproduction process,
Book II, Part I. Credit renders the reflux in money-form independent of
the time of actual reflux both for the industrial capitalist and the
merchant. Both of them sell on credit; their commodities are thus
alienated before they are reconverted into money for them, hence before
they flow back to them in money-form. On the other hand, they buy on
credit, and in this way the value of their commodities is reconverted,
be it into productive capital or commodity-capital, even before this
value has really been transformed into money, _i.e._, before the
commodity-price is due and paid for. In such times of prosperity the
reflux passes off smoothly and easily. The retailer securely pays the
wholesaler, the wholesaler pays the manufacturer, the manufacturer pays
the importer of raw materials, etc. The appearance of rapid and reliable
refluxes always keeps up for a longer period after they are over. In
reality by virtue of the credit that is under way, since credit refluxes
take the place of the real ones. The banks scent danger as soon as their
clients deposit more bills of exchange than money. See the testimony of
the Liverpool bank director, p. 398. [Present edition: Ch. XXV. — _Ed._]

To insert what I have noted earlier: "In periods of predominant credit,
the velocity of the circulation of money increases faster than
commodity-prices, whereas in times of declining credit commodity-prices
drop slower than the velocity of circulation." (_Zur Kritik der
politischen Oekonomie,_ 1859, S. 83, 84.)

The reverse is true in a period of crisis. Circulation No. I contracts,
prices fall, similarly wages; the number of employed labourers is
reduced, the mass of transactions decreases. On the contrary, the need
for money accommodation increases in circulation No. II with the
contraction of credit. We shall examine this point in greater detail
immediately.

There is no doubt that with the decrease of credit which goes hand in
hand with stagnation in the reproduction process, the circulation mass
required for No. I, the expenditure of revenue, contracts, while that
required for No. II, the transfer of capital, expands. But to what
extent this statement coincides with what is maintained by Fullarton and
others still remains to he analysed:

"A demand for capital on loan and a demand for additional circulation
are quite distinct things, and not often found associated." (Fullarton,
1. c., p. 82, title of Chapter 5.) ^([2])

In the first place it is evident that in the first of the two cases
mentioned above, during times of prosperity, when the mass of the
circulating medium must increase, the demand for it increases. But it is
likewise evident that, when a manufacturer draws more or less of his
deposit out of a bank in gold or bank-notes because he has to expend
more capital in the form of money, his demand for capital does not
thereby increase. What increases is merely his demand for this
particular form in which he expends his capital. The demand refers only
to the technical form, in which he throws his capital into circulation.
Just as in the case of a different development of the credit system, the
same variable capital, for example, or the same quantity of wages,
requires a greater mass of means of circulation in one country than in
another; in England more than in Scotland, for instance, and in Germany
more than in England. Likewise in agriculture, the same capital active
in the reproduction process requires different quantities of money in
different seasons for the performance of its function.

But the contrast drawn by Fullarton is not correct. It is by no means
the strong demand for loans as he says, which distinguishes the period
of depression from that of prosperity, but the ease with which this
demand is satisfied in periods of prosperity, and the difficulties which
it meets in periods of depression. It is precisely the enormous
development of the credit system during a prosperity period, hence also
the enormous increase in the demand for loan capital and the readiness
with which the supply meets it in such periods, which brings about a
shortage of credit during a period of depression. It is not, therefore,
the difference in volume of demand for loans which characterises both
periods.

As we have previously remarked, both periods are primarily distinguished
by the fact that the demand for currency between consumers and dealers
predominates in periods of prosperity, and the demand for currency
between capitalists predominates in periods of depression. During a
depression the former decreases, and the latter increases.

What strikes Fullarton and others as decisively important is the
phenomenon that in such periods when securities in possession of the
Bank of England are on the increase, its circulation of notes decreases,
and vice versa. The level of the securities, however, expresses the
volume of the pecuniary accommodation, the volume of discounted bills of
exchange and of advances made against marketable collateral. Thus
Fullarton says in the above passage that the securities in the hands of
the Bank of England fluctuate mostly in an opposite direction to its
circulation, and this corroborates the view long held by private banks
that no bank can increase its issue of bank-notes beyond a certain point
determined by the needs of its public; but if a bank wants to make
advances beyond this limit, it must make them out of its capital, hence
it must either realise on securities or utilise deposits which it would
otherwise have invested in securities.

This, however, reveals also what Fullarton means by capital. What does
capital signify here? That the Bank can no longer make advances with its
own bank-notes, or promissory notes, which, of course, cost it nothing.
But what does it make advances with in that case? With the sums realised
from the sale of securities held in reserve, _i.e._, government bonds,
stocks, and other interest-bearing paper. And what does it get in
payment for the sale of such paper? Money-gold or bank-notes, so far as
the latter are legal tender, such as those of the Bank of England. What
the bank advances, therefore, is under all circumstances money. This
money, however, now constitutes a part of its capital. If it advances
gold, this is understandable. If it advances notes, then these notes
represent capital, because it has given up some actual value for them,
such as interest-bearing paper. In the case of private banks the notes
secured by them through the sale of securities cannot be anything else,
in the main, but Bank of England notes or their own notes, since others
would hardly be taken in payment for securities. If it is the Bank of
England itself, then its own notes, which it receives in return, cost it
capital, that is, interest-bearing paper. Besides, it thereby withdraws
its own notes from circulation. Should it reissue these notes, or issue
new notes in their stead to the same amount, they now represent capital.
And they do so equally well, when used for advances to capitalists, or
when used later, when the demand for such pecuniary accommodation
decreases, for reinvestment in securities. In all these cases the term
capital is employed only from the banker's point of view, and means that
the banker is compelled to loan more than his mere credit.

As is known, the Bank of England makes all its advances in its own
notes. Now, if despite this, as a rule, the bank-note circulation of the
Bank decreases in proportion as the discounted bills of exchange and
collateral in its hands, and thus its advances increase — what becomes
of the notes thrown into circulation? How do they return to the Bank?

To begin with, if the demand for money accommodation arises from an
unfavourable national balance of payments and thereby implies a drain of
gold, the matter is very simple. The bills of exchange are discounted in
bank-notes. The bank-notes are exchanged for gold by the Bank itself, in
its issue department, and this gold is exported. It is as though the
Bank paid out gold directly, without the mediation of notes, on
discounting bills. Such an increased demand, which may in certain cases
be £7 to £10 million, naturally does not add a single five-pound note to
the country's domestic circulation. If it is now said that the Bank
advances capital, and not currency, this means two things. First, that
it does not advance credit, but actual values, a part of its own capital
or of capital deposited with it. Secondly, that it does not advance
money for inland, but for international circulation, that it advances
world-money; and for this purpose money must always exist in its form of
a hoard, in its metallic state; in the form in which it is not merely a
form of value, but value itself, whose money-form it is. Although this
gold now represents capital, both for the Bank and the exporting
gold-dealer, _i.e._, banking or commercial capital, the demand for it is
not for capital, but for the absolute form of money-capital. This demand
arises precisely at the moment when foreign markets are overcrowded with
unsaleable English commodity-capital. What is wanted, therefore, is
capital, not as _capital,_ but capital as _money,_ in the form in which
money serves as a universal world-market commodity; and this is its
original form of precious metal. The drain of gold is not, therefore, as
Fullarton, Tooke, etc., claim, "a mere question of capital." Rather, it
is a "question of money," even if in a specific function. The fact that
it is not a question of _inland_ circulation as the advocates of the
Currency Theory maintain, does not prove at all, as Fullarton and others
think, that it is merely a question of capital. It is a question of
money in the form in which money is an international means of payment.

"Whether that capital" (the purchase price for the million of quarters
of foreign wheat after a crop failure in the home country) "is
transmitted in merchandise or in specie, is a point which in no way
affects the nature of the transaction." (Fullarton, 1. c., p. 131.)

But it significantly affects the question, whether there is a drain of
gold, or not. Capital is transferred in the form of precious metal,
because it either cannot be transferred at all, or only at a great loss
in the shape of commodities. The fear which the modern banking system
has of gold drain exceeds anything ever imagined by the monetary system,
which considers precious metals as the only true wealth. Take, for
instance, the following evidence of the Governor of the Bank of England,
Morris, before the Parliamentary Committee on the crisis of 1847-48:

(3846. Question:) "When I spoke of the depreciation of stocks and fixed
capital, are you not aware that all property invested in stocks and
produce of every description was depreciated in the same way; that raw
cotton, raw silk, and unmanufactured wool were sent to the continent at
the same depreciated price, and that sugar, coffee and tea were
sacrificed as at forced sales? — It was inevitable that the country
should make _a considerable sacrifice_ for the purpose of meeting the
_efflux of bullion_ which had taken place in consequence of the large
importation of food." — "3848. Do not you think it would have been
better to trench upon the £8 million lying in the coffers of the Bank,
than to have endeavoured to get the gold back again at such a sacrifice?
— _No, I do not." —_

It is gold which here stands for the only true wealth.

Fullarton quotes the discovery by Tooke that

"with only one or two exceptions, and those admitting of satisfactory
explanation, every remarkable fall of exchange, followed by a drain of
gold, that has occurred during the last half-century, has been
coincident throughout with a comparatively low state of the circulating
medium, and vice versa." (Fullarton, p. 121.)

This discovery proves that such drains of gold occur generally after a
period of animation and speculation, as

"the signal of a collapse already commenced an indication of overstocked
markets, of a cessation of the foreign demand for our productions, of
delayed returns, and, as the necessary sequel of all these, of
commercial discredit, manufactories shut up, artisans starving, and a
general stagnation of industry and enterprise" (p. 129).

This, naturally, is at once the best refutation of the claim of the
advocates of the Currency Theory, that

"a full circulation drives out bullion and a low circulation attracts
it."

On the contrary, while the Bank of England generally carries a strong
gold reserve during a period of prosperity, this hoard is generally
formed during the slack period, which follows after a storm.

All this sagacity concerning the drain of gold, then, amounts to saying
that the demand for _international_ media of circulation and payment
differs from the demand for _internal_ media of circulation and payment
(and it goes without saying, therefore, that "the existence of a drain
does not necessarily imply any diminution of the internal demand for
circulation," as Fullarton has it on page 112 of his work) and that the
export of precious metal and its being thrown into international
circulation is not the same as throwing notes or specie into internal
circulation. As for the rest, I have shown on a previous occasion
[English edition: Vol. 1. — _Ed_.] that the movements of a hoard
concentrated as a reserve fund for international payments have as such
nothing to do with the movements of money as a medium of circulation. At
any rate, the question. is complicated by the fact that the different
functions of a hoard, which I have developed from the nature of money —
such as its function as a reserve fund of means of payment to cover due
bills in domestic business; the function of a reserve fund of currency;
and finally, the function of a reserve fund of world-money — are here
attributed to one sole reserve fund. It also follows from this that
under certain circumstances a drain of gold from the Bank to the home
market may combine with a drain abroad. The question is further
complicated however by the fact that this hoard is arbitrarily burdened
with the additional function of serving as a fund guaranteeing the
convertibility of bank-notes in countries, in which the credit system
and credit-money are developed. And in addition to all this comes 1) the
concentration of the national reserve fund in one single central bank,
and 2) its reduction to the smallest possible minimum. Hence, also,
Fullarton's complaint (p.143):

"One cannot contemplate the perfect silence and facility with which
variations of the exchange usually pass off in continental countries,
compared with the state of feverish disquiet and alarm always produced
in England whenever the treasure at the Bank seems to be at all
approaching to exhaustion, without being struck with the great advantage
in this respect which a metallic currency possesses."

However, if we now leave aside the drain of gold, how can a bank that
issues notes, like the Bank of England, increase the amount of money
accommodation granted by it without increasing its issue of bank-notes?

So far as the bank itself is concerned, all the notes outside its walls,
whether circulating or in private hoards, are in circulation, _i.e._,
are out of its hands. Hence, if the bank extends its discounting and
money-lending business, its advances on securities, all the bank-notes
issued by it for that purpose must return, for otherwise they would
increase the volume of circulation, something which is not supposed to
happen. This return may take place in two ways.

_First_: The bank pays A notes against securities; A uses them to pay
for bills of exchange due to B, and B deposits notes once more in the
bank. This brings to a close the circulation of these notes, but the
loan remains.

"The loan remains, and the currency, if not wanted, finds its way back
to the issuer." (Fullarton, p. 97.)

The notes, which the bank advanced to A, have now returned to it; but it
is the creditor of A, or whoever may have been the drawer of the bill
discounted by A, and the debtor of B for the amount of value expressed
in these notes, and B thus disposes of a corresponding portion of the
capital of the bank.

_Secondly_: A pays to B, and B himself, or C, to whom he pays the notes,
uses these notes to pay bills due to the bank, directly or indirectly.
In that case the bank is paid in its own notes. This concludes the
transaction (pending A's return payment to the bank).

To what extent, now, shall the bank's advance to A be regarded as an
advance of capital, or as a mere advance of means of payment?^([3])

[This depends on the nature of the loan itself. Three cases must be
distinguished.

_First case_. — A receives from the bank amounts loaned on his own
personal credit, without giving any security for them. In this case he
does not merely receive means of payment, but also unquestionably a new
capital, which he may employ in his business and realise as an
additional capital until the maturity date.

_Second case_. — A has given to the bank securities, national bonds, or
stocks as collateral, and received for them, say, up to two-thirds of
their momentary value as a cash loan. In this case he has received the
means of payment he needed, but no additional capital, for he entrusted
to the bank a larger capital-value than he received from it. But this
larger capital-value was, on the one hand, unavailable for his momentary
needs (means of payment), because invested in a particular
interest-bearing form; on the other hand, A had his own reasons for not
wanting to convert this capital-value directly into means of payment by
selling it. His securities served, among other things, as a reserve
capital, and he set them in motion as such. The transaction between A
and the bank, therefore, consists in a temporary mutual transfer of
capital, so that A does not receive any additional capital (quite the
contrary!) although he receives the desired means of payment. For the
bank, on the other hand, this transaction constitutes a temporary
lodgement of money-capital in the form of a loan, a conversion of
money-capital from one form into another, and this conversion is
precisely the essential function of the banking business.

_Third case_. — A had the bank discount a bill of exchange and received
its value in cash after the deduction of discount. In this case he sold
a non-convertible money-capital to the bank for the amount of value in
convertible form. He sold his still running bill for cash money. The
bill is now the property of the bank. It does not alter the matter that
A as last endorser of the bill is responsible for it to the bank in
default of payment. He shares this responsibility with the other
endorsers and with the drawer of the bill, all of whom are duly
responsible to him. In this case, therefore, we do not have a loan, but
only an ordinary purchase and sale. For this reason, A has nothing to
pay back to the bank. It reimburses itself by cashing the bill when it
becomes due. Here, too, a transfer of capital has taken place between A
and the bank, and in exactly the same manner as in the sale and purchase
of any other commodity, and for this very reason A did not receive any
additional capital. What he needed and received were means of payment,
and he received them by having the bank convert one form of his
money-capital — his bill — into another — money.

It is therefore only in the first case that there is any question of a
real advance of capital; in the second and third cases, the matter can
be so regarded only in the sense that every investment of capital
implies an "advance of capital." In this sense the bank advances
money-capital to A; but for A it is _money-capital_ at best in the sense
that it is a portion of his capital in general. And he requires it and
uses it not specifically as capital, but rather as specifically a means
of payment. Otherwise, every ordinary sale of commodities by which means
of payment are secured might be considered as receiving an advance of
capital. — _F. E._]

In the case of private banks which issue their own notes we have this
difference, that if their notes remain neither in local circulation, nor
return to them in the form of deposits, or in payment for due bills of
exchange, they fall into the hands of persons who compel the private
bank to cash these notes in gold or in notes of the Bank of England. In
this event, therefore, its loan in fact represents an advance of notes
of the Bank of England, or, what amounts to the same thing for the
private bank, of gold, hence a portion of its bank capital. The same
holds good in case the Bank of England itself, or some other bank, which
has a fixed legal maximum for its issue of notes, must sell securities
to withdraw its own notes from circulation and then issue them once more
in the shape of advances; in that case, the bank's own notes represent a
portion of its mobilised bank capital.

Even if the circulation were purely metallic, it would be possible 1)
for a drain of gold [Marx evidently refers here to a drain of gold that
would, at least partially, go abroad — _F. E._] to empty the treasury,
and 2) since gold would be chiefly wanted by the bank to make payments
(in settlement of erstwhile transactions), the advance against
collateral could grow considerably, but would flow back to it in the
form of deposits or in payment of due bills of exchange; so that, on one
side, the total treasure of the bank would decrease with an increase of
the securities in its hands, while on the other, it would now be holding
the same amount, which it possessed formerly as owner, as debtor of its
depositors, and finally the total quantity of currency would decrease.

Our assumption so far has been that the loans are made in notes, so that
they carry with them at least a fleeting, even if instantly
disappearing, increase in the issue of notes. But this is not necessary.
Instead of a paper note, the bank may open a credit account for A, in
which case this A, the bank's debtor, becomes its imaginary depositor.
He pays his creditors with cheques on the bank, and the recipient of
these cheques passes them on to his own banker, who exchanges them for
the cheques outstanding against him in the clearing house. In this case
no mediation of notes takes place at all, and the entire transaction is
confined to the fact that the bank settles its own debt with a cheque
drawn on itself, and its actual recompense consists in its claim on A.
In this case the bank has loaned a portion of its own bank capital,
because its own debt claims, to A.

In so far as this demand for pecuniary accommodation is a demand for
capital, it is so only for money-capital. It is capital only from the
standpoint of the banker, namely gold (in the case of gold exports
abroad) or notes of the National Bank, which a private bank can obtain
only by purchase against an equivalent, and which, therefore, represent
capital for it. Or, again, it is a case of interest-bearing papers,
government bonds, stocks, etc., which must be sold in order to obtain
gold or bank-notes. Such papers, however, if in government bonds, are
capital only for the buyer, for whom they represent the purchase price,
the capital he invested in them. In themselves they are not capital, but
merely debt claims. If mortgages, they are mere titles on future
ground-rent. And if they are shares of stock, they are mere titles of
ownership, which entitle the holder to a share in future surplus-value.
All of these are not real capital. They do not form constituent parts of
capital, nor are they values in themselves. By way of similar
transactions money belonging to the bank may be transformed into
deposits, so that the bank becomes the debtor instead of owner of this
money, and holds it under a different title of ownership. However
important this may be to the bank, it alters nothing in the mass of
reserve capital, or even of money-capital available in a particular
country. Capital, therefore, represents here only money-capital, and, if
not available in the actual form of money, it represents a mere title on
capital. This is very important, since a scarcity of, and pressing
demand for, _banking_ capital is confounded with a decrease of _actual_
capital, which conversely is in such cases rather abundant in the form
of means of production and products, and swamps the markets.

It is, therefore, easy to explain how the mass of securities held by a
bank as collateral increases, hence how the growing demand for pecuniary
accommodation can be satisfied by the bank, while the total mass of
currency remains the same or decreases. This total mass is held in check
during such periods of money stringency in two ways: 1) by a drain of
gold; 2) by a demand for money in its capacity as a mere means of
payment, when the issued bank-notes return immediately; or when the
transactions take place without the mediation of notes by means of book
credit; when, therefore, payments are made simply through a credit
transaction, the settlement of these payments being the sole purpose of
the operation. It is a peculiarity of money, when it serves merely to
settle accounts (and in times of crises loans are taken up to pay,
rather than to buy; to wind up previous transactions, not to initiate
new ones), that its circulation is no more than fleeting, even where
balances are not settled by mere credit operations, without the
mediation of money, so that, when there is a strong demand for pecuniary
accommodation, an enormous quantity of such transactions can take place
without expanding the circulation. But the mere fact that the
circulation of the Bank of England remains stable or even decreases
simultaneously with an extensive accommodation of money on its part,
does not _prima facie_ prove, as Fullarton, Tooke and others assume
(owing to their erroneous notion that pecuniary accommodation is
identical with receiving capital on loan as additional capital), that
the circulation of money (of bank-notes) in its function as a means of
payment is not increased and extended. Since the circulation of notes as
means of purchase decreases during a business depression, when such
extensive accommodation is necessary, their circulation as means of
payment may increase, and the aggregate amount of the circulation, the
sum of notes functioning as means of purchase and payment, may remain
stable or may even decrease. The circulation as a means of payment of
bank-notes immediately returning to the bank that issues them is simply
not circulation in the eyes of those economists.

Should circulation as a means of payment increase at a higher rate than
it decreases as a means of purchase, the aggregate circulation would
increase, although the money serving as a means of purchase would
decrease considerably in quantity. And this actually occurs in certain
periods of crisis, namely, when credit collapses completely and when not
only commodities and securities are unsaleable but bills of exchange are
undiscountable and nothing counts any more but money payment, or, as the
merchant puts it, cash. Since Fullarton _et al._ do not understand that
the circulation of notes as means of payment is the characteristic
feature of such periods of money shortage, they treat this phenomenon as
accidental.

"With respect again to those examples of eager competition for the
possession of bank-notes, which characterise seasons of panic and which
may sometimes, as at the close of 1825, lead to a sudden, though only
temporary, enlargement of the issues, even while the efflux of bullion
is still going on, these, I apprehend, are not to be regarded as among
the natural or necessary concomitants of a low exchange; the demand in
such cases is not for circulation" (read circulation as a means of
purchase), "but for hoarding, a demand on the part of alarmed bankers
and capitalists which arises generally in the last act of the crisis"
(hence, for a reserve of means of payment), "after a long continuation
of the drain, and is the precursor of its termination." (Fullarton, p.
130.)

In the discussion of money as a means of payment (Vol. I, Ch. III, 3, b)
we have already explained, in what manner, when the chain of payments is
suddenly interrupted, money turns from its ideal form into a material
and, at the same time, absolute form of value vis-à-vis the commodities.
This was illustrated by some examples (footnotes 100 and 101). This
interruption itself is partly an effect, partly a cause of the
instability of credit and of the circumstances accompanying it, such as
overstocking of markets, depreciation of commodities, interruption of
production, etc.

It is evident, however, that Fullarton transforms the distinction
between money as a means of purchase and money as a means of payment
into a false distinction between currency and capital. This is again due
to the narrow-minded banker's conception of circulation.

It might yet be asked: which is it, capital or money in its specific
function as a means of payment that is in short supply in such periods
of stringency? And this is a well-known controversy.

In the first place, so far as the stringency is marked by a drain of
gold, it is evidently international means of payment that are demanded.
But money in its specific capacity of international means of payment is
gold in its metallic actuality, as a valuable substance in itself, as a
quantity of value. It is at the same time capital, not capital as
commodity-capital, but as money-capital, capital not in the form of
commodities but in the form of money (and, at that, of money in the
eminent sense of the word, in which it exists as universal world-market
commodity). It is not a contradiction here between a demand for money as
a means of payment and a demand for capital. The contradiction is rather
between capital in its money-form and capital in its commodity-form; and
the form which is here demanded and in which alone it can function, is
its money-form.

Aside from this demand for gold (or silver) it cannot be said that there
is any dearth whatever of capital in such periods of crisis. Under
extraordinary circumstances, such as rise in the price of corn, or a
cotton famine, etc., this may be the case; but these phenomena are not
necessary or regular accompaniments of such periods; and the existence
of such a lack of capital cannot be assumed beforehand without further
ado from the mere fact that there is a heavy demand for pecuniary
accommodation. On the contrary. The markets are overstocked, swamped
with commodity-capital. Hence, it is not, in any case, a lack of
_commodity-_capital which causes the stringency. We shall return to this
question later.

Notes

1. We here give the related passage from Tooke in the original, which
was cited in German on p. 390 [present edition: Ch. XXV:] "The business
of bankers, setting aside the issue of promissory notes payable on
demand, may be divided into two branches, corresponding with the
distinction pointed out by Dr. (Adam) Smith of the transactions between
dealers and dealers, and between dealers and consumers. One branch of
the bankers' business is to collect _capital_ from those who have not
immediate employment for it, and to distribute or transfer it to these
who have. The other branch is to receive deposits of the _incomes_ of
their customers, and to pay out the amount, as it is wanted for
expenditure by the latter in the objects of their consumption ... the
former being a circulation of _capital,_ the latter of
_currency._"(Tooke, _Inquiry into the Currency Principle,_ London, p.
36.) The first is "the concentration of capital on the one hand and the
distribution of it on the other"; the latter is "administering the
circulation for local purposes of the district." _(Ibid.,_ p. 37.) A far
more correct conception is outlined in the following passage by Kinnear:
"Money ... is employed to perform two operations essentially
distinct.... As a medium of exchange between dealers and dealers, it is
the instrument by which transfers of capital are effected; that is, the
exchange of a certain amount of capital in money for an equal amount of
capital in commodities. But money employed in the payment of wages and
in purchase and sale between dealers and consumers is not capital, but
income; that portion of the incomes of the community, which is devoted
to daily expenditure. It circulates in constant daily use, and is that
alone which can, with strict propriety, be termed currency. Advances of
capital depend entirely on the will of the Bank and other possessors of
capital, for borrowers are always to be found; but the amount of the
currency depends on the wants of the community, among whom the money
circulates, for the purposes of daily expenditure." (J. G. Kinnear, _The
Crisis and the Currency,_ London, 1847 [pp. 3-4].)

2. "It is a great error, indeed, to imagine that the demand for
pecuniary accommodation " (that is, for the loan of capital) "is
identical with a demand for additional means of circulation, or even
that the two are frequently associated. Each demand originates in
circumstances peculiarly affecting itself, and very distinct from each
other. It is when everything looks prosperous, when wages are high,
prices on the rise, and factories busy, that an additional supply of
_currency_ is usually required to perform the additional functions
inseparable from the necessity of making larger and more numerous
payments; whereas it is chiefly in a more advanced stage of the
commercial cycle, when difficulties begin to present themselves, when
markets are overstocked, and returns delayed, that interest rises, and a
pressure comes upon the Bank for advances of _capital._ It is true that
there is no medium through which the Bank is accustomed to advance
capital except that of its promissory notes; and that to refuse the
notes, therefore, is to refuse the accommodation. But the accommodation
once granted, everything adjusts itself in conformity with the
necessities of the market; the loan remains, and the currency, if not
wanted, finds its way hack to the issuer. Accordingly, a very slight
examination of the Parliamentary Returns may convince any one, that the
securities in the hands of the Bank of England fluctuate more frequently
in an opposite direction to its circulation than in concert with it, and
that the example, therefore, of that great establishment furnishes no
exception to the doctrine so strongly pressed by the country bankers, to
the effect that no hank can enlarge its circulation, if that circulation
he already adequate to the purposes to which a bank-note currency is
commonly applied; but that every addition to its advances, after that
limit is passed, must he made from its capital, and supplied by the sale
of some of its securities in reserve, or by abstinence from further
investment in such securities. The table compiled from the Parliamentary
Returns for the interval between 1833 and 1840, to which I have referred
in a preceding page, furnishes continued examples of this truth; but two
of these are so remarkable that it will be quite unnecessary for me to
go beyond them. On the 3rd of January, 1837, when the resources of the
Bank were strained to the uttermost to sustain credit and meet the
difficulties of the money-market, we find its advances on loan and
discount carried to the enormous sum of £17,022,000, an amount scarcely
known since the war, and almost equal to the entire aggregate issues
which, in the meanwhile, remain unmoved at so low a point as
£17,076,000! On the other hand, we have on the 4th of June, 1833, a
circulation of £18,892,000, with a return of private securities in hand,
nearly, if not the very lowest on record for the last half-century,
amounting to no more than £972,000!" (Fullarton, 1. c., pp. 97, 98.)
That a demand for pecuniary accommodation need not be identical by any
means with a demand for gold (what Wilson, Tooke and others call
capital) is seen from the following testimony of Mr. Weguelin, Governor
of the Bank of England: "The discounting of bills to that extent" (one
million daily for three successive days) "would not reduce the reserve"
(of bank-notes), "unless the public demanded a greater amount of active
circulation. The notes issued on the discount of bills would be returned
through the medium of the bankers and through deposits. Unless these
transactions were for the purpose of exporting bullion, and unless there
were an amount of internal panic which induced people to lock up their
notes, and not to pay them into the hands of the bankers ... the reserve
would not be affected by the magnitude of the transactions." — "The Bank
may discount a million and a half a day, and that is done constantly,
without its reserve being in the slightest degree affected, the notes
coming back again as deposits, and no other alteration taking place than
the mere transfer from one account to another." (Report on Bank Acts,
1857, Evidence Nos. 241, 500.) The notes therefore serve here merely as
means of transferring credits.

3. The passage that follows in the original is unintelligible in this
context and has been rewritten by the editor to the end of the brackets.
In another context this point has already been touched upon in Chapter
XXVI. — _F. E_

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 29. Component Parts of Bank Capital

 

It is now necessary to examine the component parts of bank capital in
greater detail.

We have just seen that Fullarton and others transform the distinction
between money as a medium of circulation and money as a means of payment
— also universal money in so far as it concerns a drain of gold — into a
distinction between currency and capital.

The peculiar role played by capital in this instance is the reason why
bankers' economics teaches that money is indeed capital _par excellence_
as insistently as enlightened economics taught that money is not
capital.

In subsequent analyses, we shall demonstrate that money-capital is being
confused here with moneyed capital in the sense of interest-bearing
capital, while in the former sense, money-capital is always merely a
transient form of capital — in contradistinction to the other forms of
capital, namely, commodity-capital and productive capital.

Bank capital consists of 1) cash money, gold or notes; 2) securities.
The latter can be subdivided into two parts: commercial paper or bills
of exchange, which run for a period, become due from time to time, and
whose discounting constitutes the essential business of the banker; and
public securities, such as government bonds, treasury notes, stocks of
all kinds, in short, interest-bearing paper which is however
significantly different from bills of exchange. Mortgages may also be
included here. The capital composed of these tangible component parts
can again be divided into the banker's invested capital and into
deposits, which constitute his banking capital, or borrowed capital. In
the case of banks which issue notes, these must be included. We shall
leave the deposits and notes out of consideration for the present. It is
evident at any rate that the actual component parts of the banker's
capital (money, bills of exchange, deposit currency) remain unaffected
whether the various elements represent the banker's own capital or
deposits, _i.e._, the capital of other people. The same division would
remain, whether he were to carry on his business with only his own
capital or only with deposited capital.

The form of interest-bearing capital is responsible for the fact that
every definite and regular money revenue appears as interest on some
capital, whether it arises from some capital or not. The money income is
first converted into interest, and from the interest one can determine
the capital from which it arises. In like manner, in the case of
interest-bearing capital, every sum of value appears as capital as long
as it is not expended as revenue; that is, it appears as principal in
contrast to possible or actual interest which it may yield.

The matter is simple. Let the average rate of interest be 5% annually. A
sum of £500 would then yield £25 annually if converted into
interest-bearing capital. Every fixed annual income of £25 may then be
considered as interest on a capital of £500. This, however, is and
remains a purely illusory conception, except in the case where the
source of the £25, whether it be a mere title of ownership or claim, or
an actual element of production such as real estate, is directly
transferable or assumes a form in which it becomes transferable. Let us
take the national debt and wages as illustrations.

The state has to annually pay its creditors a certain amount of interest
for the capital borrowed from them. In this case, the creditor cannot
recall his investment from his debtor, but can only sell his claim, or
his title of ownership. The capital itself has been consumed, _i.e._,
expended by the state. It no longer exists. What the creditor of the
state possesses is 1) the state's promissory note, amounting to, say,
£100; 2) this promissory note gives the creditor a claim upon the annual
revenue of the state, that is, the annual tax proceeds, for a certain
amount, _e.g._, £5 or 5%; 3) the creditor can sell this promissory note
of £100 at his discretion to some other person. If the rate of interest
is 5%, and the security given by the state is good, the owner A can sell
this promissory note, as a rule, to B for £100; for it is the same to B
whether he lends £100 at 5% annually, or whether he secures for himself
by the payment of £100 an annual tribute from the state amounting to £5.
But in all these cases, the capital, as whose offshoot (interest) state
payments are considered, is illusory, fictitious capital. Not only that
the amount loaned to the state no longer exists, but it was never
intended that it be expended as capital, and only by investment as
capital could it have been transformed into a self-preserving value. To
the original creditor A, the share of annual taxes accruing to him
represents interest on his capital, just as the share of the
spendthrift's fortune accruing to the usurer appears to the latter,
although in both cases the loaned amount was not invested as capital.
The possibility of selling the state's promissory note represents for A
the potential means of regaining his principal. As for B, his capital is
invested, from his individual point of view, as interest-bearing
capital. So far as the transaction is concerned, B has simply taken the
place of A by buying the latter's claim on the state's revenue. No
matter how often this transaction is repeated, the capital of the state
debt remains purely fictitious, and, as soon as the promissory notes
become unsaleable, the illusion of this capital disappears.
Nevertheless, this fictitious capital has its own laws of motion, as we
shall presently see.

We shall now consider labour-power in contrast to the capital of the
national debt, where a negative quantity appears as capital — just as
interest-bearing capital, in general, is the fountainhead of all manner
of insane forms, so that debts, for instance, can appear to the banker
as commodities. Wages are conceived here as interest, and therefore
labour-power as the capital yielding this interest. For example, if the
wage for one year amounts to £50 and the rate of interest is 5%, the
annual labour-power is equal to a capital of £1,000. The insanity of the
capitalist mode of conception reaches its climax here, for instead of
explaining the expansion of capital on the basis of the exploitation of
labour-power, the matter is reversed and the productivity of labour
power is explained by attributing this mystical quality of
interest-bearing capital to labour-power itself. In the second half of
the 17th century, this used to be a favourite conception (for example,
of Petty), but it is used even nowadays in all seriousness by some
vulgar economists and more particularly by some German
statisticians.^([1]) Unfortunately two disagreeably frustrating facts
mar this thoughtless conception. In the first place, the labourer must
work in order to obtain this interest. In the second place, he cannot
transform the capital-value of his labour-power into cash by
transferring it. Rather, the annual value of his labour-power is equal
to his average annual wage, and what he has to give the buyer in return
through his labour is this same value plus a surplus-value, _i.e._, the
increment added by his labour. In a slave society, the labourer has a
capital-value, namely, his purchase price. And when he is hired out, the
hirer must pay, in the first place, the interest on this purchase price,
and, in addition, replace the annual wear and tear on the capital.

The formation of a fictitious capital is called capitalisation. Every
periodic income is capitalised by calculating it on the basis of the
average rate of interest, as an income which would be realised by a
capital loaned at this rate of interest. For example, if the annual
income is £100 and the rate of interest 5%, then the £100 would
represent the annual interest on £2,000, and the £2,000 is regarded as
the capital-value of the legal title of ownership on the £100 annually.
For the person who buys this title of ownership, the annual income of
£100 represents indeed the interest on his capital invested at 5%. All
connection with the actual expansion process of capital is thus
completely lost, and the conception of capital as something with
automatic self-expansion properties is thereby strengthened.

Even when the promissory note — the security — does not represent a
purely fictitious capital, as it does in the case of state debts, the
capital-value of such paper is nevertheless wholly illusory. We have
previously seen in what manner the credit system creates associated
capital. The paper serves as title of ownership which represents this
capital. The stocks of railways, mines, navigation companies, and the
like, represent actual capital, namely, the capital invested and
functioning in such enterprises, or the amount of money advanced by the
stockholders for the purpose of being used as capital in such
enterprises. This does not preclude the possibility that these may
represent pure swindle. But this capital does not exist twice, once as
the capital-value of titles of ownership (stocks) on the one hand and on
the other hand as the actual capital invested, or to be invested, in
those enterprises. It exists only in the latter form, and a share of
stock is merely a title of ownership to a corresponding portion of the
surplus-value to be realised by it. A may sell this title to B, and B
may sell it to C. These transactions do not alter anything in the nature
of the problem. A or B then has his title in the form of capital, but C
has transformed his capital into a mere title of ownership to the
anticipated surplus-value from the stock capital.

The independent movement of the value of these titles of ownership, not
only of government bonds but also of stocks, adds weight to the illusion
that they constitute real capital alongside of the capital or claim to
which they may have title. For they become commodities, whose price has
its own characteristic movements and is established in its own way.
Their market-value is determined differently from their nominal value,
without any change in the value (even though the expansion may change)
of the actual capital. On the one hand, their market-value fluctuates
with the amount and reliability of the proceeds to which they afford
legal title. If the nominal value of a share of stock, that is, the
invested sum originally represented by this share, is £100, and the
enterprise pays 10% instead of 5%, then its market-value, everything
else remaining equal, rises to £200, as long as the rate of interest is
5%, for when capitalised at 5%, it now represents a fictitious capital
of £200. Whoever buys it for £200 receives a revenue of 5% on this
investment of capital. The converse is true when the proceeds from the
enterprise diminish. The market-value of this paper is in part
speculative, since it is determined not only by the actual income, but
also by the anticipated income, which is calculated in advance. But
assuming the expansion of the actual capital as constant, or where no
capital exists, as in the case of state debts, the annual income to be
fixed by law and otherwise sufficiently secured, the price of these
securities rises and falls inversely as the rate of interest. If the
rate of interest rises from 5% to 10%, then securities guaranteeing an
income of £5 will now represent a capital of only £50. Conversely, if
the rate of interest falls to 2½%; the same securities will represent a
capital of £200. Their value is always merely capitalised income, that
is, the income calculated on the basis of a fictitious capital at the
prevailing rate of interest. Therefore, when the money-market is tight
these securities will fall in price for two reasons: first, because the
rate of interest rises, and secondly, because they are thrown on the
market in large quantities in order to convert them into cash. This drop
in price takes place regardless of whether the income that this paper
guarantees its owner is constant, as is the case with government bonds,
or whether the expansion of the actual capital, which it represents, as
in industrial enterprises, is possibly affected by disturbances in the
reproduction process. In the latter event, there is only still another
depreciation added to that mentioned above. As soon as the storm is
over, this paper again rises to its former level, in so far as it does
not represent a business failure or swindle. Its depreciation in times
of crisis serves as a potent means of centralising fortunes. ^([2])

To the extent that the depreciation or increase in value of this paper
is independent of the movement of value of the actual capital that it
represents, the wealth of the nation is just as great before as after
its depreciation or increase in value.

"The public stocks and canal and railway shares had already by the 23rd
of October, 1847, been depreciated in the aggregate to the amount of
£114,752,225." (Morris, Governor of the Bank of England, testimony in
the Report on Commercial Distress, 1847-48 [No. 3800].)

Unless this depreciation reflected an actual stoppage of production and
of traffic on canals and railways, or a suspension of already initiated
enterprises, or squandering capital in positively worthless ventures,
the nation did not grow one cent poorer by the bursting of this soap
bubble of nominal money-capital.

All this paper actually represents nothing more than accumulated claims,
or legal titles, to future production whose money or capital value
represents either no capital at all, as in the case of state debts, or
is regulated independently of the value of real capital which it
represents.

In all countries based on capitalist production, there exists in this
form an enormous quantity of so-called interest-bearing capital, or
moneyed capital. And by accumulation of money-capital nothing more, in
the main, is connoted than an accumulation of these claims on
production, an accumulation of the market-price, the illusory
capital-value of these claims.

A part of the banker's capital is now invested in this so-called
interest-bearing paper. This is itself a portion of the reserve capital,
which does not perform any function in the actual business of banking.
The most important portion of this paper consists of bills of exchange,
that is, promises to pay made by industrial capitalists or merchants.
For the money-lender these bills of exchange are interest-bearing, in
other words, when he buys them, he deducts interest for the time which
they still have to run. This is called discounting. It depends on the
prevailing rate of interest, how much of a deduction is made from the
sum represented by the bill of exchange.

Finally, the last part of the capital of a banker consists of his money
reserve in gold and notes. The deposits, unless tied up by agreement for
a certain time, are always at the disposal of the depositors. They are
in a state of continual fluctuation. But while one depositor draws on
his account, another deposits, so that the general average sum total of
deposits fluctuates little during periods of normal business.

The reserve funds of the banks, in countries with developed capitalist
production, always express on the average the quantity of money existing
in the form of a hoard, and a portion of this hoard in turn consists of
paper, mere drafts upon gold, which have no value in themselves. The
greater portion of banker's capital is, therefore, purely fictitious and
consists of claims (bills of exchange), government securities (which
represent spent capital), and stocks (drafts on future revenue). And it
should not be forgotten that the money-value of the capital represented
by this paper in the safes of the banker is itself fictitious, in so far
as the paper consists of drafts on guaranteed revenue (_e.g._,
government securities), or titles of ownership to real capital (_e.g._,
stocks), and that this value is regulated differently from that of the
real capital, which the paper represents at least in part; or, when it
represents mere claims on revenue and no capital, the claim on the same
revenue is expressed in continually changing fictitious money-capital.
In addition to this, it must be noted that this fictitious banker's
capital represents largely, not his own capital, but that of the public,
which makes deposits with him, either interest-bearing or not.

Deposits are always made in money, in gold or notes, or in drafts upon
these. With the exception of the reserve fund, which contracts or
expands in accordance with the requirements of actual circulation, these
deposits are in fact always in the hands of the industrial capitalists
and merchants, on the one hand, whose bills of exchange are thereby
discounted and who thus receive advances; on the other hand, they are in
the hands of dealers in securities (exchange brokers), or in the hands
of private parties who have sold their securities, or in the hands of
the government (in the case of treasury notes and new loans). The
deposits themselves play a double role. On the one hand, as we have just
mentioned, they are loaned out as interest-bearing capital and are,
therefore, not in the safes of the banks, but figure merely on their
books as credits of the depositors. On the other hand, they function
merely as such book entries, in so far as the mutual claims of the
depositors are balanced by cheques on their deposits and can be written
off against each other. In this connection, it is immaterial whether
these deposits are entrusted to the same banker, who can thus balance
the various accounts against each other, or whether this is done in
different banks, which mutually exchange cheques and pay only the
balances to one another.

With the development of interest-bearing capital and the credit system,
all capital seems to double itself, and sometimes treble itself, by the
various modes in which the same capital, or perhaps even the same claim
on a debt, appears in different forms in different hands.^([3]) The
greater portion of this "money-capital" is purely fictitious. All the
deposits, with the exception of the reserve fund, are merely claims on
the banker, which, however, never exist as deposits. To the extent that
they serve in clearing-house transactions, they perform the function of
capital for the bankers — after the latter have loaned them out. They
pay one another their mutual drafts upon the non-existing deposits by
balancing their mutual accounts.

Adam Smith says with regard to the role played by capital in the loaning
of money:

"Even in the moneyed interest, however, the money is, as it were, but
the deed of assignment which conveys from one hand to another those
capitals which the owners do not care to employ themselves. Those
capitals may be greater in almost any proportion than the amount of the
money, which serves as the instrument of their conveyance, the same
pieces of money successively serving for many different loans, as well
as for many different purchases. A, for example, lends to W £1,000, with
which W immediately purchases of B £1,000 worth of goods. B, having no
occasion for the money himself, lends the identical pieces to X, with
which X immediately purchases of C another £1,000 worth of goods. C, in
the same manner, and for the same reason, lends them to Y, who again
purchases goods with them of D. In this manner the same pieces, either
of coin or of paper, may, in the course of a few days, serve as the
instrument of three different loans, and of three different purchases,
each of which is, in value, equal to the whole amount of those pieces.
What the three moneyed men, A, B and C, assign to the three borrowers,
W, X and Y, is the power of making those purchases. In this power
consist both the value and the use of the loans. The stock lent by the
three moneyed men is equal to the value of the goods which can be
purchased with it, and is three times greater than that of the money
with which the purchases are made. Those loans, however, may be all
perfectly well secured, the goods purchased by the different debtors
being so employed, as, in due time, to bring back, with a profit, an
equal value either of coin or of paper. And as the same pieces of money
can thus serve as the instrument of different loans to three, or for the
same reason, to thirty times their value, so they may likewise
successively serve as the instrument of repayment. ([_An Inquiry into
the Nature and Causes o/ the Wealth of Nations,_ Aberdeen, London, 1848,
p. _236. — Ed_.] Book II, Chap. IV.)

Since the same piece of money can be used for various purchases,
corresponding to its velocity of circulation, it can similarly be used
for various loans, since the purchases take it from one person to
another, and a loan is but a transfer from one person to another without
the mediation of a purchase. To every seller, money represents the
transformed shape of his commodities. Nowadays, when every value is
expressed as capital-value, it represents in the various loans various
capitals in succession. This is simply another way of expressing the
earlier statement that it can successively realise various
commodity-values. At the same time it serves as a medium of circulation,
in order to transfer the real capitals from person to person. In the
case of loans, it does not pass from person to person as a medium of
circulation. As long as it remains in the hands of the lender, it is in
his hands not a medium of circulation, but the value existence of his
capital. And in this form he transfers it when lending it to another. If
A had lent the money to B, and B to C, without the mediation of
purchases, the same money would not represent three capitals, but only
one — a _single_ capital-value. The number of capitals which it actually
represents depends on the number of times that it functions as the
value-form of various commodity-capitals.

The same thing that Adam Smith says about loans in general also applies
to deposits, which are merely another name for the loans which the
public makes to the bankers. The same pieces of money may serve as the
instruments for any number of deposits.

"It is unquestionably true that the £1,000 which you deposit at A today
may be reissued tomorrow, and form a deposit at B. The day after that,
reissued from B, it may form a deposit at C... and so on to infinitude;
and that the same £1,000 in money may, thus, by a succession of
transfers, multiply itself into a sum of deposits absolutely indefinite.
It is possible, therefore, that nine-tenths of all the deposits in the
United Kingdom may have no existence beyond their record in the books of
the bankers who are respectively accountable for them.... Thus in
Scotland, for instance, currency has never exceeded £3 million, the
deposits in the banks are estimated at £27 million. Unless a run on the
banks be made, the same £1,000 would, if sent back upon its travels,
cancel with the same facility a sum equally indefinite. As the same
£1,000, with which you cancel your debt to a tradesman today, may cancel
his debt to the merchant tomorrow, the merchant's debt to the bank the
day following, and so on without end; so the same £1,000 may pass from
hand to hand, and bank to bank, and cancel any conceivable sum of
deposits." (_The Currency Theory Reviewed,_ pp. 62-63.)

Just as everything in this credit system is doubled and trebled and
transformed into a mere phantom of the imagination, so it is with the
"reserve fund," where one would at last hope to grasp on to something
solid.

Let us listen once more to Mr. Morris, Governor of the Bank of England:

"The reserves of the private bankers are in the hands of the Bank of
England in the shape of deposits.... An export of gold acts exclusively,
in the first instance, upon the reserve of the Bank of England; but it
would also be acting upon the reserves of the bankers, inasmuch as it is
a withdrawal of a portion of the reserves which they have in the Bank of
England. It would be acting upon the reserves of all the bankers
throughout the country." (Commercial Distress, 1847-48, Nos. 3639,
3642.)

Ultimately, then, the reserve funds actually merge with the reserve fund
of the Bank of England.^([4]) However, this reserve fund also has a
double existence. The reserve fund of the banking department is equal to
the surplus of notes which the Bank is authorised to issue over and
above the notes in circulation. The legal maximum of the note issue is
£14 million (for which no bullion reserve is required; it is the
approximate amount owed by the state to the Bank) plus the amount of the
Bank's supply of precious metal. If the supply of precious metal in the
Bank amounts to £14 million, the Bank can thus issue £28 million in
notes, and if £20 million of these are in circulation, the reserve fund
of the banking department is £8 million. These £8 million's worth of
notes are then legally the banker's capital at the disposal of the Bank,
and at the same time the reserve fund for its deposits. Now, if a drain
of gold takes place, whereby the supply of precious metal in the Bank is
reduced by £6 million — requiring the destruction of an equivalent
number of notes — the reserve of the banking department would fall from
£8 million to £2 million. On the one hand, the Bank would raise its rate
of interest considerably; on the other hand, the banks having deposits
with it, and the other depositors, would observe a large decrease in the
reserve fund covering their own credits in the Bank. In 1857, the four
largest stock banks of London threatened to call in their deposits, and
thereby bankrupt the banking department, unless the Bank of England
would secure a "government letter" suspending the Bank Act of 1844.
^([5]) In this way the banking department could fail, as in 1847, while
any number of millions (_e.g._, 8 million in 1847) are held in its issue
department to guarantee the convertibility of the circulating notes. But
this is again illusory.

"That large portion (of deposits) for which the bankers themselves have
no immediate demand passes into the hands of the bill-brokers, who give
to the banker in return commercial bills already discounted by them for
persons in London and in different parts of the country as a security
for the sum advanced by the banker. The bill-broker is responsible to
the banker for payment of this money at call; and such is the magnitude
of these transactions, that Mr. Neave, the present Governor of the Bank
[of England], stated in evidence, 'We know that one broker had 5
million, and we were led to believe that another had between 8 and 10
million; there was one with 4, another with 3½, and a third with above
8. I speak of deposits with the brokers.'" (Report of Committee on Bank
Acts, 1857-58, p. 5, Section 8.)

"The London bill-brokers carried on their enormous transactions without
any cash reserve, relying on the run off of their bills falling due, or
in extremity, on the power of obtaining advances from the Bank of
England on the security of bills under discount." _Ibid.,_ p. VIII,
Section 17. "Two bill-broking houses in London suspended payment in
1847; both afterwards resumed business. In 1857, both suspended again.
The liabilities of one house in 1847 were, in round numbers, £2,683,000,
with a capital of £180,000; the liabilities of the same house, in 1857,
were £5,300,000, the capital probably not more than one-fourth of what
it was in 1847. The liabilities of the other firm were between
£3,000,000 and £4,000,000 at each period of stoppage, with a capital not
exceeding £45,000." _(Ibid.,_ p. XXI, Section 52.)

Notes

1. "The labourer possesses capital-value, which is arrived at by
considering the money-value or his annual wage as income from
interest.... Capitalising ... the average daily wage at 4%, we obtain
the average value of a male agricultural labourer to be: German Austria,
4,500 taler; Prussia, 4,500; England, 3,750; France, 2,000; inner
Russia, 750 taler." (Von Reden,_Vergleichende Kultur-Statistik,_ Berlin,
1848, p. 434.)

2. [Immediately after the February Revolution, when commodities and
securities were extremely depreciated and utterly unsaleable, a Swiss
merchant in Liverpool, Mr. B. Zwilchenbart — who told this to my father
— cashed all his belongings, travelled with cash in hand to Paris and
sought out Rothschild, offering to participate in a joint enterprise
with him. Rothschild looked at him fixedly, rushed towards him, grabbed
him by his shoulders and asked: _"Avez-vous de l'argent sur vous?" —
"Oui, M. le baron." — "Alors vous êtes mon homme!"_ ("Have you money in
your possession?" — "Yes, Baron." — "Then you are my man!") — And they
did a thriving business together. — _F.E._]

3. [This doubling and trebling of capital has developed considerably
further in recent years, for instance, through financial trusts, which
already occupy a heading of their own in the report of the London Stock
Exchange. A company is organised for the purchase of a certain class of
interest-bearing of foreign government securities, English municipal or
American public bonds, railway stocks, etc. The capital, for example, £2
million, is raised by stock subscriptions. The Board of Directors buys
up the values in question or speculates more or less actively therein,
and after deducting the expenses distributes among the stockholders the
annual interest as dividends. Furthermore, some stock companies have
adopted the custom of dividing the common stock into two classes,
preferred and deferred. The preferred receive a fixed rate of interest,
say, 5%, provided that the total profit permits it; if there is anything
left after that, the deferred receive it. In this manner, the "solid"
investment of capital in preferred shares is more or less separated from
actual speculation — with deferred shares. Since a few large enterprises
have been unwilling to adopt this new custom, the expedient has been
resorted to of organising new companies which invest a million or
several million pounds sterling in shares of the former companies and
then issue new shares amounting to the nominal value of the purchased
shares, but half of them are issued as preferred and the other half as
deferred. In such cases the original shares are doubled, since they
serve as a basis for a new issue of shares. — _F.E._]

4. [To what extent this has intensified since then is shown by the
following official tabulation of the bank reserves of the fifteen
largest London banks in November 1892, taken from the _Daily News_ of
December 15, 1892:

  ------------------------------------- -------------- --------------- -------------
  Name of Bank                          Liabilities    Cash Reserves   Percentages
  City                                  £9,317,629     £746,551        8.01
  Capital and Counties                  11,392,744     1,307,483       11.47
  Imperial                              3,987,400      447,157         11.22
  Lloyds                                23,800,937     2,966,806       12.46
  Lon. And Westminster                  24,671,559     3,818,885       15.50
  Lon. And S. Western                   5,570,268      812,353         14.58
  London Joint Stock                    12,127,993     1,288,977       10.62
  London and Midland                    8,814,499      1,127,280       12.79
  London and County                     37,111,035     3,600,374       9.70
  National                              11,163,829     1,426,225       12.77
  National Provincial.                  41,907,384     4,614,780       41.01
  Parrs and the Alliance                12,794,489     1,532,707       11.98
  Prescott & Co                         4,041,058      538,517         13.07
  Union of London.,                     15,502,618     2,300,084       14.84
  Williams, Deacon & Manchester & Co.   10,452,381     1,317,628       12.60
  TOTAL                                 £232,655,823   £27,845,807     11.97
  ------------------------------------- -------------- --------------- -------------

Of this total reserve of almost 28 million, at least 25 million are
deposited in the Bank of England, and at most 3 million are in cash in
the safes of the 15 banks themselves. But the cash reserve of the
banking department of the Bank of England amounted to less than 16
million during that same month of November 1892! — _F. E_.]

5. The suspension of the Bank Act of 1844 permits the Bank to issue any
quantity of bank-notes regardless of the gold reserve backing in its
possession; thus, to create an arbitrary quantity of fictitious paper
money-capital, and to use it for the purpose of making loans to banks,
exchange brokers, and through them to commerce. — _F. E._]

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 30. Money-Capital and Real Capital. I.

 

The only difficult questions, which we are now approaching in connection
with the credit system, are the following:

_First_: The accumulation of the actual money-capital. To what extent is
it, and to what extent is it not, an indication of an actual
accumulation of capital, _i.e._, of reproduction on an extended scale?
Is the so-called plethora of capital — an expression used only with
reference to the interest-bearing capital, _i.e._, moneyed capital —
only a special way of expressing industrial over-production, or does it
constitute a separate phenomenon alongside of it? Does this plethora, or
excessive supply of money-capital, coincide with the existence of
stagnating masses of money (bullion, gold coin and bank-notes), so that
this superabundance of actual money is the expression and external form
of that plethora of loan capital?

_Secondly_: To what extent does a scarcity of money, _i.e._, a shortage
of loan capital, express a shortage of real capital (commodity-capital
and productive capital)? To what extent does it coincide, on the other
hand, with a shortage of money as such, a shortage of the medium of
circulation?

In so far as we have hitherto considered the peculiar form of
accumulation of money-capital and of money wealth in general, it has
resolved itself into an accumulation of claims of ownership upon labour.
The accumulation of the capital of the national debt has been revealed
to mean merely an increase in a class of state creditors, who have the
privilege of a firm claim upon a certain portion of the tax
revenue.^([6]) By means of these facts, whereby even an accumulation of
debts may appear as an accumulation of capital, the height of distortion
taking place in the credit system becomes apparent. These promissory
notes, which are issued for the originally loaned capital long since
spent, these paper duplicates of consumed capital, serve for their
owners as capital to the extent that they are saleable commodities and
may, therefore, be reconverted into capital.

Titles of ownership to public works, railways, mines, etc., are indeed,
as we have also seen, titles to real capital. But they do not place this
capital at one's disposal. It is not subject to withdrawal. They merely
convey legal claims to a portion of the surplus-value to be produced by
it. But these titles likewise become paper duplicates of the real
capital; it is as though a bill of lading were to acquire a value
separate from the cargo, both concomitantly and simultaneously with it.
They come to nominally represent non-existent capital. For the real
capital exists side by side with them and does not change hands as a
result of the transfer of these duplicates from one person to another.
They assume the form of interest-bearing capital, not only because they
guarantee a certain income, but also because, through their sale, their
repayment as capital-values can be obtained. To the extent that the
accumulation of this paper expresses the accumulation of railways,
mines, steamships, etc., to that extent does it express the extension of
the actual reproduction process — just as the extension of, for example,
a tax list on movable property indicates the expansion of this property.
But as duplicates which are themselves objects of transactions as
commodities, and thus able to circulate as capital-values, they are
illusory, and their value may fall or rise quite independently of the
movement of value of the real capital for which they are titles. Their
value, that is, their quotation on the Stock Exchange, necessarily has a
tendency to rise with a fall in the rate of interest — in so far as this
fall, independent of the characteristic movements of money-capital, is
due merely to the tendency for the rate of profit to fall; therefore,
this imaginary wealth expands, if for this reason alone, in the course
of capitalist production in accordance with the expressed value for each
of its aliquot parts of specific original nominal value.^([7])

Gain and loss through fluctuations in the price of these titles of
ownership, and their centralisation in the hands of railway kings, etc.,
become, by their very nature, more and more a matter of gamble, which
appears to take the place of labour as the original method of acquiring
capital wealth and also replaces naked force. This type of imaginary
money wealth not only constitutes a very considerable part of the money
wealth of private people, but also of banker’s capital, as we have
already indicated.

In order to quickly settle this question, let us point out that one
could also mean by the accumulation of money-capital the accumulation of
wealth in the hands of bankers (money-lenders by profession), acting as
middlemen between private money-capitalists on the one hand, and the
state, communities, and reproducing borrowers on the other. For the
entire vast extension of the credit system, and all credit in general,
is exploited by them as their private capital. These fellows always
possess capital and incomes in money-form or in direct claims on money.
The accumulation of the wealth of this class may take place completely
differently than actual accumulation, but it proves at any rate that
this class pockets a good deal of the real accumulation.

Let us reduce the scope of the problem before us. Government securities,
like stocks and other securities of all kinds, are spheres of investment
for loanable capital — capital intended for bearing interest. They are
forms of loaning such capital. But they themselves are not the loan
capital, which is invested in them. On the other hand, in so far as
credit plays a direct role in the reproduction process, what the
industrialist or merchant needs when he wishes to have a bill discounted
or a loan granted is neither stocks nor government securities. What he
needs is money. He, therefore, pledges or sells those securities if he
cannot secure money in any other way. It is the accumulation of _this_
loan capital with which we have to deal here, and more particularly
accumulation of loanable money-capital. We are not concerned here with
loans of houses, machines, or other fixed capital. Nor are we concerned
with the advances industrialists and merchants make to one another in
commodities and within the compass of the reproduction process; although
we must also investigate this point beforehand in more detail. We are
concerned exclusively with money loans, which are made by bankers, as
middlemen, to industrialists and merchants.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Let us then, to begin with, analyse commercial credit, that is, the
credit which the capitalists engaged in reproduction give to one
another. It forms the basis of the credit system. It is represented by
the bill of exchange, a promissory note with a definite term of payment,
_i.e._, a document of deferred payment. Everyone gives credit with one
hand and receives credit with the other. Let us completely disregard,
for the present, banker’s credit, which constitutes an entirely
different sphere. To the extent that these bills of exchange circulate
among the merchants themselves as means of payment again, by endorsement
from one to another — without, however, the mediation of discounting —
it is merely a transfer of the claim from A to B and does not change the
picture in the least. It merely replaces one person by another. And even
in this case, the liquidation can take place without the intervention of
money. Spinner A, for example, has to pay a bill to cotton broker B, and
the latter to importer C. Now, if C also exports yarn, which happens
often enough, he may buy yarn from A on a bill of exchange and the
spinner A may pay the broker B with the broker’s own bill which was
received in payment from C. At most, a balance will have to be paid in
money. The entire transaction then consists merely in the exchange of
cotton and yarn. The exporter represents only the spinner, and the
cotton broker, the cotton planter.

Two things are now to be noted in the circuit of this purely commercial
credit.

_First_: The settlement of these mutual claims depends upon the return
flow of capital, that is, on C — M, which is merely deferred. If the
spinner has received a bill of exchange from a cotton goods
manufacturer, then manufacturer can pay if the cotton goods which he has
on the market have been sold in the interim. If the corn speculator has
a bill of exchange drawn upon his agent, the agent can pay the money if
the corn has been sold in the interim at the expected price. These
payments, therefore, depend on the fluidity of reproduction, that is,
the production and consumption processes. But since the credits are
mutual, the solvency of one depends upon the solvency of another; for in
drawing his bill of exchange, one may have counted either on the return
flow of the capital in his own business or on the return flow of the
capital in a third party’s business whose bill of exchange is due in the
meantime. Aside from the prospect of return flow of capital, payment can
only be possible by means of reserve capital at the disposal of the
person drawing the bill of exchange, in order to meet his obligations in
case the return flow of capital should be delayed.

_Secondly_: This credit system does not do away with the necessity for
cash payments. For one thing, a large portion of expenses must always be
paid in cash, _e.g._, wages, taxes, etc. Furthermore, capitalist B, who
has received from C a bill of exchange in place of cash payment, may
have to pay a bill of his own which has fallen due to D before C’s bill
becomes due, and so he must have ready cash. A complete circuit of
reproduction as that assumed above, _i.e._, from cotton planter to
cotton spinner and back again, can only constitute an exception; it will
be constantly interrupted at many points. We have seen in the discussion
of the reproduction process (Vol II, Part III) that the producers of
constant capital exchange, in part, constant capital among themselves.
As a result, the bills of exchange can, more or less, balance each other
out. Similarly, in the ascending line of production, where the cotton
broker draws on the cotton spinner, the spinner on the manufacturer of
cotton goods, the manufacturer on the exporter, the exporter on the
importer (perhaps of cotton again). But the circuit of transactions,
and, therefore, the turn about of the series of claims, does not take
place at the same time. For example, the claim of the spinner on the
weaver is not settled by the claim of the coal-dealer on the
machine-builder. The spinner never has any counter-claims on the
machine-builder, in his business, because his product, yarn, never
enters as an element in the machine-builder’s reproduction process. Such
claims must, therefore, be settled by money.

The limits of this commercial credit, considered by themselves, are 1)
the wealth of the industrialists and merchants, that is, their command
of reserve capital in case of delayed returns; 2) these returns
themselves. These returns may be delayed, or the prices of commodities
may fall in the meantime or the commodities may become momentarily
unsaleable due to a stagnant market. The longer the bills of exchange
run, the larger must be the reserve capital, and the greater the
possibility of a diminution or delay of the returns through a fall in
prices or a glut on the market. And, furthermore, the returns are so
much less secure, the more the original transaction was conditioned upon
speculation on the rise or fall of commodity-prices. But it is evident
that with the development of the productive power of labour, and thus of
production on a large scale: 1) the markets expand and become more
distant from the place of production; 2) credits must, therefore, be
prolonged; 3) the speculative element must thus more and more dominate
the transactions. Production on a large scale and for distant markets
throws the total product into the hands of commerce; but it is
impossible that the capital of a nation should double itself in such a
manner that commerce should itself be able to buy up the entire national
product with its own capital and to sell it again. Credit is, therefore,
indispensable here; credit, whose volume grows with the growing volume
of value of production and whose time duration grows with the increasing
distance of the markets. A mutual interaction takes place here. The
development of the production process extends the credit, and credit
leads to an extension of industrial and commercial operations.

When we examine this credit detached from banker’s credit, it is evident
that it grows with an increasing volume of industrial capital itself.
Loan capital and industrial capital are identical here. The loaned
capital is commodity-capital which is intended either for ultimate
individual consumption or for the replacement of the constant elements
of productive capital. What appears here as loan capital is always
capital existing in some definite phase of the reproduction process, but
which by means of purchase and sale passes from one person to another,
while its equivalent is not paid by the buyer until some later
stipulated time. For example, cotton is transferred to the spinner for a
bill of exchange, yarn to the manufacturer of cotton goods for a bill of
exchange, cotton goods to the merchant for a bill, from whose hands they
go to the exporter for a bill, and then, for a bill to some merchant in
India, who sells the goods and buys indigo instead, etc. During this
transfer from hand to hand the transformation of cotton into cotton
goods is effected, and the cotton goods are finally transported to India
and exchanged for indigo, which is shipped to Europe and there enters
into the reproduction process again. The various phases of the
reproduction process are promoted here by credit, without any payment on
the part of the spinner for the cotton, the manufacturer of cotton goods
for the yarn, the merchant for the cotton goods, etc. In the first
stages of the process, the commodity, cotton, goes through its various
production phases, and this transition is promoted by credit. But as
soon as the cotton has received in production its ultimate form as a
commodity, the same commodity-capital passes only through the hands of
various merchants who promote its transportation to distant markets, and
the last of whom finally sells these commodities to the consumer and
buys other commodities in their stead, which either become consumed or
go into the reproduction process. It is necessary, then, to
differentiate between two stages here:

In the first stage, credit promotes the actual successive phases in the
production of the same article; in the second, credit merely promotes
the transfer of the article, including its transportation, from one
merchant to another, in other words, the process C — M. But here also
the commodity is at least in the process of circulation, that is, in a
phase of the reproduction process.

It follows, then, that it is never idle capital which is loaned here,
but capital which must change its form in the hands of its owner; it
exists in a form that for him is merely commodity-capital, _i.e._,
capital which must be retransformed, and, to begin with, at least
converted into money. It is, therefore, the metamorphosis of commodities
that is here promoted by credit; not merely C — M, but also M — C and
the actual production process. A large quantity of credit within the
reproductive circuit (banker’s credit excepted) does not signify a large
quantity of idle capital, which is being offered for loan and is seeking
profitable investment. It means rather a large employment of capital in
the reproduction process. Credit, then, promotes here 1) as far as the
industrial capitalists are concerned, the transition of industrial
capital from one phase into another, the connection of related and
dovetailing spheres of production; 2) as far as the merchants are
concerned, the transportation and transition of commodities from one
person to another until their definite sale for money or their exchange
for other commodities.

The maximum of credit is here identical with the fullest employment of
industrial capital, that is, the utmost exertion of its reproductive
power without regard to the limits of consumption. These limits of
consumption are extended by the exertions of the reproduction process
itself. On the one hand, this increases the consumption of revenue on
the part of labourers and capitalists, on the other hand, it is
identical with an exertion of productive consumption.

As long as the reproduction process is continuous and, therefore, the
return flow assured, this credit exists and expands, and its expansion
is based upon the expansion of the reproduction process itself. As soon
as a stoppage takes place, as a result of delayed returns, glutted
markets, or fallen prices, a superabundance of industrial capital
becomes available, but in a form in which it cannot perform its
functions. Huge quantities of commodity-capital, but unsaleable. Huge
quantities of fixed capital, but largely idle due to stagnant
reproduction. Credit is contracted 1) because this capital is idle,
_i.e._, blocked in one of its phases of reproduction because it cannot
complete its metamorphosis; 2) because confidence in the continuity of
the reproduction process has been shaken; 3) because the demand for this
commercial credit diminishes. The spinner, who curtails his production
and has a large quantity of unsold yarn in stock, does not need to buy
any cotton on credit; the merchant does not need to buy any commodities
on credit because he has more than enough of them.

Hence, if there is a disturbance in this expansion or even in the normal
flow of the reproduction process, credit also becomes scarce; it is more
difficult to obtain commodities on credit. However, the demand for cash
payment and the caution observed toward sales on credit are particularly
characteristic of the phase of the industrial cycle following a crash.
During the crisis itself, since everyone has products to sell, cannot
sell them, and yet must sell them in order to meet payments, it is not
the mass of idle and investment-seeking capital, but rather the mass of
capital impeded in its reproduction process, that is greatest just when
the shortage of credit is most acute (and therefore the rate of discount
highest for banker’s credit). The capital already invested is then,
indeed, idle in large quantities because the reproduction process is
stagnant. Factories are closed, raw materials accumulate, finished
products flood the market as commodities. Nothing is more erroneous,
therefore, than to blame a scarcity of productive capital for such a
condition. It is precisely at such times that there is a superabundance
of productive capital, partly in relation to the normal, but temporarily
reduced scale of reproduction, and partly in relation to the paralysed
consumption.

Let us suppose that the whole of society is composed only of industrial
capitalists and wage-workers. Let us furthermore disregard price
fluctuations, which prevent large portions of the total capital from
replacing themselves in their average proportions and which, owing to
the general interrelations of the entire reproduction process as
developed in particular by credit, must always call forth general
stoppages of a transient nature. Let us also disregard the sham
transactions and speculations, which the credit system favours. Then, a
crisis could only be explained as the result of a disproportion of
production in various branches of the economy, and as a result of a
disproportion between the consumption of the capitalists and their
accumulation. But as matters stand, the replacement of the capital
invested in production depends largely upon the consuming power of the
non-producing classes; while the consuming power of the workers is
limited partly by the laws of wages, partly by the fact that they are
used only as long as they can be profitably employed by the capitalist
class. The ultimate reason for all real crises always remains the
poverty and restricted consumption of the masses as opposed to the drive
of capitalist production to develop the productive forces as though only
the absolute consuming power of society constituted their limit.

A real lack of productive capital, at least among capitalistically
developed nations, can be said to exist only in times of general crop
failures, either in the principal foodstuffs or in the principal
industrial raw materials.

However, in addition to this commercial credit we have actual money
credit. The advances of the industrialists and merchants among one
another are amalgamated with the money advances made to them by the
bankers and money-lenders. In discounting bills of exchange the advance
is only nominal. A manufacturer sells his product for a bill of exchange
and gets this bill discounted by some bill-broker. In reality, the
latter advances only the credit of his banker, who in turn advances to
the broker the money-capital of his depositors. The depositors consist
of the industrial capitalists and merchants themselves and also of
workers (through savings-banks) — as well as ground-rent recipients and
other unproductive classes. In this way every individual industrial
manufacturer and merchant gets around the necessity of keeping a large
reserve fund and being dependent upon his actual returns. On the other
hand, the whole process becomes so complicated, partly by simply
manipulating bills of exchange, partly by commodity transactions for the
sole purpose of manufacturing bills of exchange, that the semblance of a
very solvent business with a smooth flow of returns can easily persist
even long after returns actually come in only at the expense partly of
swindled money-lenders and partly of swindled producers. Thus business
always appears almost excessively sound right on the eve of a crash. The
best proof of this is furnished, for instance, by the Reports on Bank
Acts of 1857 and 1858, in which all bank directors, merchants, in short
all the invited experts with Lord Overstone at their head, congratulated
one another on the prosperity and soundness of business — just one month
before the outbreak of the crisis in August 1857. And, strangely enough,
Tooke in his _History of Prices_ succumbs to this illusion once again as
historian for each crisis. Business is always thoroughly sound and the
campaign in full swing, until suddenly the debacle takes place.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

We revert now to the accumulation of money-capital.

Not every augmentation of loanable money-capital indicates a real
accumulation of capital or expansion of the reproduction process. This
becomes most evident in the phase of the industrial cycle immediately
following a crisis, when loan capital lies around idle in great
quantities. At such times, when the production process is curtailed
(production in the English industrial districts was reduced by one-third
after the crisis of 1847), when the prices of commodities are at their
lowest level, when the spirit of enterprise is paralysed, the rate of
interest is low, which in this case indicates nothing more than an
increase in loanable capital precisely as a result of contraction and
paralysation of industrial capital. It is quite obvious that a smaller
quantity of a circulation medium is required when the prices of
commodities have fallen, the number of transactions decreased, and the
capital laid out for wages reduced; that, on the other hand, no
additional money is required to function as world-money after foreign
debts have been liquidated either by the export of gold or as a result
of bankruptcies; that, finally, the volume of business connected with
discounting bills of exchange diminishes in proportion with the reduced
number and magnitudes of the bills of exchange them-selves. Hence the
demand for loanable money-capital, either to act as a medium of
circulation or as a means of payment (the investment of new capital is
still out of the question), decreases and this capital, therefore,
becomes relatively abundant. Under such circumstances, however, the
supply of loanable money-capital also increases, as we shall later see.

Thus, the situation after the crisis of 1847 was characterised by "a
limitation of transaction and a great superabundance of money."
(Commercial Distress, 1847-48, Evidence No. 1664.) The rate of interest
was very low because of the "almost perfect destruction of commerce and
the almost total want of means of employing money" (_loc. cit.,_ p. 45,
testimony of Hodgson, Director of the Royal Bank of Liverpool). What
nonsense these gentlemen concocted (and Hodgson is, moreover, one of the
best of them) in order to explain these facts, can be seen from the
following remark:

"The pressure" (1847) "arose from the real diminution of the moneyed
capital of the country, caused partly by the necessity of paying in gold
for imports from all parts of the world, and partly by the absorption of
floating into fixed capital." [1. c., p. 39.]

How the conversion of floating capital into fixed capital reduces the
money-capital of a country is unintelligible. For, in the case of
railways, _e.g._, in which capital was mainly invested at that time,
neither gold nor paper is used for viaducts and rails, and the money for
the railway stocks, to the extent that it had been deposited solely in
payment, performed exactly the same functions as any other money
deposited in banks and even increased the loanable money-capital
temporarily, as already shown above; but to the extent that it had
actually been spent for construction, it circulated in the country as a
medium of purchase and of payment. Only in so far as fixed capital
cannot be exported, so that with the impossibility of its export the
available capital secured from returns for exported articles also drops
out of the picture — including the returns in cash or bullion — only to
that extent could the money-capital be affected. But at that time
English export articles were also piled up in huge quantities on the
foreign markets without being able to be sold. It is true, the floating
capital of the merchants and manufacturers of Manchester, etc., who had
a portion of their normal business capital tied up in railway stocks and
were therefore dependent upon borrowed capital for running their
business, had become fixed, and they, therefore, had to suffer the
consequences. But it would have been the same, if the capital belonging
to their business, but withdrawn from it, had been invested, say, in
mines instead of railways-mining products like iron, coal, copper being
themselves in turn floating capital. The actual reduction of available
money-capital through crop failures, corn imports, and gold exports
constituted, naturally, an event that had nothing to do with the railway
swindle.

"Almost all mercantile houses had begun to starve their business more or
less ... by taking part of their commercial capital for railways." —
"Loans to so great an extent by commercial houses to railways [_loc.
cit.,_ p. 42] induced them to lean too much upon... banks by the
discount of paper, whereby to carry on their commercial operations" (the
same Hodgson, _loc. cit., p._ 67). "In Manchester there have been
immense losses in consequence of the speculation in railways" (R.
Gardner, previously cited in Vol. I, Ch. XIII, 3, c, and in several
other places; Evidence No. 4884, _loc. cit_.).

One of the principal causes of the crisis of 1847 was the colossal
flooding of the market and the fabulous swindle in the East Indian trade
with commodities. But there were also other circumstances which
bankrupted very rich firms in this line:

"They had large means, but not available. The whole of their capital was
locked up in estates in the Mauritius, or indigo factories, or sugar
factories. Having incurred liabilities to the extent of
£500,000-600,000, they had no available assets to pay their bills, and
eventually it proved that to pay their bills they were entirely
dependent upon their credit." (Ch. Turner, big East Indian merchant in
Liverpool, No. 730, _loc. cit_.)

See also Gardner (No. 4872, _loc. cit_.):

"Immediately after the China treaty, so great a prospect was held out to
the country of a great extension of our commerce with China, that there
were many large mills built with a view to that trade exclusively, in
order to manufacture that class of cloth which is principally taken for
the China market, and our previous manufactures had the addition of all
those." — "4874. How has that trade turned out? — Most ruinous, almost
beyond description; I do not believe, that of the whole of the shipments
that were made in 1844 and 1845 to China, above two-thirds of the amount
have ever been returned; in consequence of tea being the principal
article of repayment and of the expectation that was held out, we, as
manufacturers, fully calculated upon a great reduction in the duty on
tea."

And now, naively expressed, comes the characteristic credo of the
English manufacturer:

"Our commerce with no foreign market is limited by their power to
purchase the commodity, but it is limited in this country by our
capability of consuming that which we receive in return for our
manufactures."

(The relatively poor countries, with whom England trades, are, of
course, able to pay for and consume any amount of English products, but
unfortunately wealthy England cannot assimilate the products sent in
return.)

"4876. I sent out some goods in the first instance, and the goods sold
at about 45 per cent loss, from the full conviction that the price, at
which my agents could purchase tea, would leave so great a profit in
this country as to make up the deficiency... but instead of profit, I
lost in some instances 25 and up to 50 per cent." — "4877. Did the
manufacturers generally export on their own account? — Principally; the
merchants, I think, very soon saw that the thing would not answer, and
they rather encouraged the manufacturers to consign than take a direct
interest themselves."

In 1857, on the other hand, the losses and failures fell mainly upon the
merchants, since the manufacturers left them the task of flooding the
foreign markets "on their own account."

An expansion of money-capital, which arises out of the fact that, in
view of the expansion of banking (see, below, the example of Ipswich,
where in the course of a few years immediately preceding 1857 the
deposits of the capitalist farmers quadrupled), what was formerly a
private hoard or coin reserve is always converted into loanable capital
for a definite time, does not indicate a growth in productive capital
any more than the increasing deposits with the London stock banks when
the latter began to pay interest on deposits. As long as the scale of
production remains the same, this expansion leads only to an abundance
of loanable money-capital as compared with the productive. Hence the low
rate of interest.

After the reproduction process has again reached that state of
prosperity which precedes that of over-exertion, commercial credit
becomes very much extended; this forms, indeed, the "sound" basis again
for a ready flow of returns and extended production. In this state the
rate of interest is still low, although it rises above its minimum. This
is, in fact, the _only_ time that it can be said a low rate of interest,
and consequently a relative abundance of loanable capital, coincides
with a real expansion of industrial capital. The ready flow and
regularity of the returns, linked with extensive commercial credit,
ensures the supply of loan capital in spite of the increased demand for
it, and prevents the level of the rate of interest from rising. On the
other hand, those cavaliers who work without any reserve capital or
without any capital at all and who thus operate completely on a money
credit basis begin to appear for the first time in considerable numbers.
To this is now added the great expansion of fixed capital in all forms,
and the opening of new enterprises on a vast and far-reaching scale. The
interest now rises to its average level. It reaches its maximum again as
soon as the new crisis sets in. Credit suddenly stops then, payments are
suspended, the reproduction process is paralysed, and with the
previously mentioned exceptions, a superabundance of idle industrial
capital appears side by side with an almost absolute absence of loan
capital.

On the whole, then, the movement of loan capital, as expressed in the
rate of interest, is in the opposite direction to that of industrial
capital. The phase wherein a low rate of interest, but above the
minimum, coincides with the "improvement" and growing confidence after a
crisis, and particularly the phase wherein the rate of interest reaches
its average level, exactly midway between its minimum and maximum, are
the only two periods during which an abundance of loan capital is
available simultaneously with a great expansion of industrial capital.
But at the beginning of the industrial cycle, a low rate of interest
coincides with a contraction, and at the end of the industrial cycle, a
high rate of interest coincides with a superabundance of industrial
capital. The low rate of interest that accompanies the "improvement"
shows that the commercial credit requires bank credit only to a slight
extent because it is still self-supporting.

The industrial cycle is of such a nature that the same circuit must
periodically reproduce itself, once the first impulse has been
given.^([8]) During a period of slack, production sinks below the level,
which it had attained in the preceding cycle and for which the technical
basis has now been laid. During prosperity — the middle period — it
continues to develop on this basis. In the period of over-production and
swindle, it strains the productive forces to the utmost, until it
exceeds the capitalistic limits of the production process.

It is clear that there is a shortage of means of payment during a period
of crisis. The convertibility of bills of exchange replaces the
metamorphosis of commodities themselves, and so much more so exactly at
such times the more a portion of the firms operates on pure credit.
Ignorant and mistaken bank legislation, such as that of 1844-45, can
intensify this money crisis. But no kind of bank legislation can
eliminate a crisis.

In a system of production, where the entire continuity of the
reproduction process rests upon credit, a crisis must obviously occur —
a tremendous rush for means of payment — when credit suddenly ceases and
only cash payments have validity. At first glance, therefore, the whole
crisis seems to be merely a credit and money crisis. And in fact it is
only a question of the convertibility of bills of exchange into money.
But the majority of these bills represent actual sales and purchases,
whose extension far beyond the needs of society is, after all, the basis
of the whole crisis. At the same time, an enormous quantity of these
bills of exchange represents plain swindle, which now reaches the light
of day and collapses; furthermore, unsuccessful speculation with the
capital of other people; finally, commodity-capital which has
depreciated or is completely unsaleable, or returns that can never more
be realised again. The entire artificial system of forced expansion of
the reproduction process cannot, of course, be remedied by having some
bank, like the Bank of England, give to all the swindlers the deficient
capital by means of its paper and having it buy up all the depreciated
commodities at their old nominal values. Incidentally, everything here
appears distorted, since in this paper world, the real price and its
real basis appear nowhere, but only bullion, metal coin, notes, bills of
exchange, securities. Particularly in centres where the entire money
business of the country is concentrated, like London, does this
distortion become apparent; the entire process becomes incomprehensible;
it is less so in centres of production.

Incidentally in connection with the superabundance of industrial capital
which appears during crises the following should be noted:
commodity-capital is in itself simultaneously money-capital, that is, a
definite amount of value expressed in the price of the commodities. As
use-value it is a definite quantum of objects of utility, and there is a
surplus of these available in times of crises. But as money-capital as
such, as potential money-capital, it is subject to continual expansion
and contraction. On the eve of a crisis, and during it,
commodity-capital in its capacity as potential money-capital is
contracted. It represents less money-capital for its owner and his
creditors (as well as security for bills of exchange and loans) than it
did at the time when it was bought and when the discounts and mortgages
based on it were transacted. If this is the meaning of the contention
that the money-capital of a country is reduced in times of stringency,
this is identical with saying that the prices of commodities have
fallen. Such a collapse in prices merely balances out their earlier
inflation.

The incomes of the unproductive classes and of those who live on fixed
incomes remain in the main stationary during the inflation of prices
which goes hand in hand with over-production and over-speculation. Hence
their consuming capacity diminishes relatively, and with it their
ability to replace that portion of the total reproduction which would
normally enter into their consumption. Even when their demand remains
nominally the same, it decreases in reality.

It should be noted in regard to imports and exports, that, one after
another, all countries become involved in a crisis and that it then
becomes evident that all of them, with few exceptions, have exported and
imported too much, so that _they all have an unfavourable balance of
payments._ The trouble, therefore, does not actually lie with the
balance of payments. For example, England suffers from a drain of gold.
It has imported too much. But at the same time all other countries are
over-supplied with English goods. They have thus also imported too much,
or have been made to import too much. (There is, indeed, a difference
between a country which exports on credit and those which export little
or nothing on credit. But the latter then import on credit; and this is
only then not the case when commodities are sent to them on
consignment.) The crisis may first break out in England, the country
which advances most of the credit and takes the least, because the
balance of payments, the balance of payments due, which must be settled
immediately, is _unfavourable,_ even though the general balance of trade
is _favourable._ This is explained partly as a result of the credit
which it has granted, and partly as a result of the huge quantity of
capital loaned to foreign countries, so that a large quantity of returns
flow back to it in commodities, in addition to the actual trade returns.
(However, the crisis has at times first broken out in America, which
takes most of the commercial and capital credit from England.) The crash
in England, initiated and accompanied by a gold drain, settles England’s
balance of payments, partly by a bankruptcy of its importers (about
which more below), partly by disposing of a portion of its
commodity-capital at low prices abroad, and partly by the sale of
foreign securities, the purchase of English securities, etc. Now comes
the turn of some other country. The balance of payments was momentarily
in its favour; but now the time lapse normally existing between the
balance of payments and balance of trade has been eliminated or at least
reduced by the crisis: all payments are now suddenly supposed to be made
at once. The same thing is now repeated here. England now has a return
flow of gold, the other country a gold drain. What appears in one
country as excessive imports, appears in the other as excessive exports,
and vice versa. But over-imports and over-exports have taken place in
all countries (we are not speaking here about crop failures, etc., but
about a general crisis); that is over-production promoted by credit and
the general inflation of prices that goes with it.

In 1857, the crisis broke out in the United States. A flow of gold from
England to America followed. But as soon as the bubble in America burst,
the crisis broke out in England and the gold flowed from America to
England. The same took place between England and the continent. The
balance of payments is in times of general crisis unfavourable to every
nation, at least to every commercially developed nation, but always to
each country in succession, as in volley firing, _i.e._, as soon as each
one’s turn comes for making payments; and once the crisis has broken
out, _e.g._, in England, it compresses the series of these terms into a
very short period. It then becomes evident that all these nations have
simultaneously over-exported (thus over-produced) and over-imported
(thus over-traded), that prices were inflated in all of them, and credit
stretched too far. And the same break-down takes place in all of them.
The phenomenon of a gold drain then takes place successively in all of
them and proves precisely by its general character 1) that gold drain is
just a phenomenon of a crisis, not its cause; 2) that the sequence in
which it hits the various countries indicates only when their
judgement-day has come, _i.e._, when the crisis started and its latent
elements come to the fore there.

It is characteristic of the English economic writers — and the economic
literature worth mentioning since 1830 resolves itself mainly into a
literature on currency, credit, and crises — that they look upon the
export of precious metals in times of crisis, in spite of the turn in
the rates of exchange, only from the standpoint of England, as a purely
national phenomenon, and resolutely close their eyes to the fact that
all other European banks raise their rate of interest when their bank
raises its own in times of crisis, and that, when the cry of distress
over the drain of gold is raised in their country today, it is taken up
in America tomorrow and in Germany and France the day after.

In 1847, "the engagements running upon this country had to be met"
[mostly for corn]. "Unfortunately, they were met to a great extent by
failures" [wealthy England secured relief by bankruptcies in its
obligations toward the continent and America], "but to the extent to
which they were not met by failures, they were met by the exportation of
bullion." (Report of Committee on Bank Acts, 1857.)

In other words, in so far as a crisis in England is intensified by bank
legislation, this legislation is a means of cheating the corn-exporting
countries in periods of famine, first on their corn and then on the
money for the corn. A prohibition on the export of corn during such
periods for countries which are themselves labouring more or less under
scarcities, is, therefore, a very rational measure to thwart this plan
of the Bank of England to "meet obligations" for corn imports "by
bankruptcies." It is after all much better that the corn producers and
speculators lose a portion of their profit for the good of their own
country than their capital for the good of England.

It follows from the above that commodity-capital, during crises and
during periods of business depression in general, loses to a large
extent its capacity to represent potential money-capital. The same is
true of fictitious capital, interest-bearing paper, in so far as it
circulates on the stock exchange as money-capital. Its price falls with
rising interest. It falls, furthermore, as a result of the general
shortage of credit, which compels its owners to dump it in large
quantities on the market in order to secure money. It falls, finally, in
the case of stocks, partly as a result of the decrease in revenues for
which it constitutes drafts and partly as a result of the spurious
character of the enterprises which it often enough represents. This
fictitious money-capital is enormously reduced in times of crisis, and
with it the ability of its owners to borrow money on it on the market.
However, the reduction of the money equivalents of these securities on
the stock exchange list has nothing to do with the actual capital which
they represent, but very much indeed with the solvency of their owners.

Notes

6. The public fund is nothing but imaginary capital, which represents
that portion of the annual revenue, which is set aside to pay the debt.
An equivalent amount of capital has been spent; it is this which serves
as a denominator for the loan, but it is not this which is represented
by the public fund; for the capital no longer exists. New wealth must be
created by the work of industry; a portion of this wealth is annually
set aside in advance for those who have loaned that wealth which has
been spent; this portion is taken by means of taxes from those who
produce it, and is given to the creditors of the state, and, according
to the customary proportion between capital and interest in the country,
an imaginary capital is assumed equivalent to that which could give rise
to the annual income which these creditors are to receive. (Sismondi,
_Nouveaux principes_ [Seconde édition, Paris, 1827], II, p. 230.)

7. A portion of the accumulated loanable money-capital is indeed merely
an expression of industrial capital. For instance, when England, in
1857, had invested 180 million in American railways and other
enterprises, this investment was transacted almost completely by the
export of English commodities for which the Americans did not have to
make payment in return. The English exporter drew bills of exchange for
these commodities on America, which the English stock subscribers bought
up and which were sent to America for purchasing the stock
subscriptions.

8. [As I have already stated elsewhere [English edition: Vol. I. —
_Ed_.], a change has taken place here since the last major general
crisis. The acute form of the periodic process with its former ten-year
cycle, appears to have given way to a more chronic, long drawn out,
alternation between a relatively short and slight business improvement
and a relatively long, indecisive depression-taking place in the various
industrial countries at different times. But perhaps it is only a matter
of a prolongation of the duration of the cycle. In the early years of
world commerce, 1845-47, it can be shown that these cycles lasted about
five years; from 1847 to 1867 the cycle is clearly ten years; is it
possible that we are now in the preparatory stage of a new world crash
of unparalleled vehemence? Many things seem to point in this direction.
Since the last general crisis of 1867 many profound changes have taken
place. The colossal expansion of the means of transportation and
communication — ocean liners, railways, electrical telegraphy, the Suez
Canal — has made a real world-market a fact. The former monopoly of
England in industry has been challenged by a number of competing
industrial countries; infinitely greater and varied fields have been
opened in all parts of the world for the investment of surplus European
capital, so that it is far more widely distributed and local
over-speculation may be more easily overcome. By means of all this, most
of the old breeding-grounds of crises and opportunities for their
development have been eliminated or strongly reduced. At the same time,
competition in the domestic market recedes before the cartels and
trusts, while in the foreign market it is restricted by protective
tariffs, with which all major industrial countries, England excepted,
surround themselves. But these protective tariffs are nothing but
preparations for the ultimate general industrial war, which shall decide
who has supremacy on the world-market. Thus every factor, which works
against a repetition of the old crises, carries within itself the germ
of a far more powerful future crisis. — _F. E_.]

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 31. Money Capital and Real Capital. II.

 

We are still not finished with this question: to what extent does the
accumulation of capital in the form of loanable money-capital coincide
with actual accumulation, _i.e._, the expansion of the reproduction
process.

The transformation of money into loanable money-capital is a much
simpler matter than the transformation of money into productive capital.
But two things should be distinguished here:

1) the mere transformation of money into loan capital;

2) the transformation of capital or revenue into money, which is
transformed into loan capital.

It is only the latter point which can involve a positive accumulation of
loan capital connected with an actual accumulation of industrial
capital.

1. TRANSFORMATION OF MONEY INTO LOAN CAPITAL

We have already seen that a large build-up or surplus of loan capital
can occur, which is connected with productive accumulation only to the
extent that it is inversely proportional to it. This is the case in two
phases of the industrial cycle, namely, first, when industrial capital
in both its forms of productive and commodity-capital is contracted,
_i.e._, at the beginning of the cycle after the crisis; and, secondly,
when the improvement begins, but when commercial credit still does not
use bank credit to a great extent. In the first case, money-capital,
which was formerly employed in production and commerce, appears as idle
loan capital; in the second case, it appears used to an increasing
extent, but at a very low rate of interest, because the industrial and
commercial capitalists now prescribe terms to the money-capitalist. The
surplus of loan capital expresses, in the first case, a stagnation of
industrial capital, and in the second, a relative independence of
commercial credit from banking credit — based on the fluidity of the
returns, short-term credit, and a preponderance of operations with one's
own capital. The speculators, who count on the credit capital of other
people, have not yet appeared on the field; the people who work with
their own capital are still far removed from approximately pure credit
operations. In the former phase, the surplus of loan capital is directly
opposite to expressing actual accumulation. In the second phase, it
coincides with a renewed expansion of the reproduction process — it
accompanies it, but is not its cause. The surplus of loan capital is
already decreasing, _i.e._, it is still only relative compared to the
demand. In both cases, the expansion of the actual process of
accumulation is promoted by the fact that the low interest — which
coincides in the first case with low prices and in the second, with
slowly rising prices — increases that portion of the profit which is
transformed into profit of enterprise. This takes place to an even
greater extent when interest rises to its average level during the
height of the period of prosperity, when it has indeed grown, but not
relative to profit.

We have seen, on the other hand, that an accumulation of loan capital
can take place without any actual accumulation, _i.e._, by mere
technical means such as an expansion and concentration of the banking
system; and a saving in the circulation reserve, or in the reserve fund
of private means of payment, which are then always transformed into loan
capital for a short time. Although this loan capital, which, for this
reason, is also called floating capital, always retains the form of loan
capital only for short periods of time (and should indeed also be used
for discounting only for short periods of time), there is a continual
ebb and flow of it. If one draws some away, another adds to it. The mass
of loanable money-capital thus grows quite independently of the actual
accumulation (we are not speaking here at all about loans for a number
of years but only of short-term ones on bills of exchange and deposits).

Bank Committee, 1857. Question 501. "What do you mean by 'floating
capital'?"-[Answer of Mr. Weguelin, Governor of the Bank of England:]
"It is capital applicable to loans of money for short periods.... (502)
The Bank of England notes ... the country banks circulation, and the
amount of coin which is in the country." [Question:] "It does not appear
from the returns before the Committee, if by floating capital you mean
the active circulation" [of the notes of the Bank of England], "that
there is any very great variation in the active circulation?" [But there
is a very great difference whether this active circulation is advanced
by the money-lender or by the reproductive capitalist himself.
Weguelin's answer:] "I include in floating capital the reserves of the
bankers, in which there is a considerable fluctuation."

That is to say, there is considerable fluctuation in that portion of the
deposits which the bankers have not loaned out again, but which figures
as their reserve and for the greater part also as the reserve of the
Bank of England, where they are deposited. Finally, the same gentleman
says: floating capital may be bullion, that is, bar and coin (503). It
is truly wonderful how in this credit gibberish of the money-market all
categories of political economy receive a different meaning and a
different form. Floating capital is the expression there for circulating
capital, which is, of course, something quite different, and money is
capital, and bullion is capital, and bank-notes are circulation, and
capital is a commodity, and debts are commodities, and fixed capital is
money invested in hard-to-sell paper!

"The joint-stock banks of London ... have increased their deposits from
£8,850,774 in _1847_ to £43,100,724 in 1857.... The evidence given to
your Committee leads to the inference that of this vast amount, a large
part has been derived from sources not heretofore made available for
this purpose; and that the practice of opening accounts and depositing
money with bankers has extended to numerous classes who did not formerly
employ their capital (!) in that way. It is stated by Mr. Rodwell, the
Chairman of the Association of the Private Country Bankers"
[distinguished from joint-stock banks], "and delegated by them to give
evidence to your Committee, that in the neighbourhood of Ipswich this
practice has lately increased four-fold among the farmers and
shopkeepers of that district; that almost every farmer, even those
paying only £50 per annum rent, now keeps deposits with bankers. The
aggregate of these deposits of course finds its way to the employments
of trade, and especially gravitates to London, the centre of commercial
activity, where it is employed first in the discount of bills, or in
other advances to the customers of the London bankers. That large
portion, however, for which the bankers themselves have no immediate
demand passes into the hands of the bill-brokers, who give to the banker
in return commercial bills already discounted by them for persons in
London and in different parts of the country, as a security for the sum
advanced by the banker." (Bank Committee, 1858, p. V.)

By making advances to the bill-broker on bills of exchange which this
broker has already discounted once, the banker does, in fact, rediscount
them; but in reality, very many of these bills have already been
rediscounted by the bill-broker, and with the same money that the banker
uses to rediscount the bills of the bill-broker, the latter rediscounts
new bills. What this leads to is shown by the following:

"Extensive fictitious credits have been created by means of
accommodation bills, and open credits, great facilities for which have
been afforded by the practice of joint-stock country banks discounting
such bills, and rediscounting them with the bill-brokers in the London
market, upon the credit of the bank alone, without reference to the
quality of the bills otherwise" (_loc. cit.,_ p. XXI).

Concerning this rediscounting and the assistance which this purely
technical increase of loanable money-capital gives to credit swindles,
the following extract from the _Economist_ is of interest:

"For some years past capital" [namely, loanable money-capital] "has
accumulated in some districts of the country more rapidly than it could
be used, while, in others, the means of employing capital have increased
more rapidly than the capital itself. While the bankers in the purely
agricultural districts throughout the kingdom found no sufficient means
of profitably and safely employing their deposits in their own
districts, those in the large mercantile towns, and in the manufacturing
and mining districts, have found a larger demand for capital than their
own means could supply. The effect of this relative state of different
districts has led, of late years, to the establishment and rapid
extension of a new class of houses in the distribution of capital, who,
though usually called bill-brokers, are in reality bankers upon an
immense scale. The business of these houses has been to receive, for
such periods, and at such rates of interest as were agreed upon, the
surplus-capital of bankers in those districts where it could not be
employed, as well as the temporary unemployed moneys of public companies
and extensive mercantile establishments, and advance them at higher
rates of interest to banker in those districts where capital was more in
demand, generally by rediscounting the bills taken from their customers
... and in this way Lombard Street has become the great centre in which
the transfer of spare capital has been made from one part of the
country, where it could not be profitably employed, to another, where a
demand existed for it, as well as between individuals similarly
circumstanced. At first these transactions were confined almost
exclusively to borrowing and lending on banking securities. But as the
capital of the country rapidly accumulated, and became more economised
by the establishment of banks, the funds at the disposal of these
'discount houses' became so large that they were induced to make
advances first on dock warrants of merchandise (storage bills on
commodities in docks), and next on bills of lading, representing produce
not even arrived in this country, though sometimes, if not generally,
secured by bills drawn by the merchant upon his broker. This practice
rapidly changed the whole character of English commerce. The facilities
thus afforded in Lombard Street gave extensive powers to the brokers in
Mincing Lane, who on their part ... offered the full advantage of them
to the importing merchant; who so far took advantage of them, that,
whereas 25 years ago, the fact that a merchant received advances on his
bills of lading, or even his dock warrants, would have been fatal to his
credit, the practice has become so common of late years that it may be
said to be now the general rule, and not the rare exception, as it was
25 years ago. Nay, so much further has this system been carried, that
large sums have been raised in Lombard Street on bills drawn against the
_forthcoming_ crops of distant colonies. The consequence of such
facilities being thus granted to the importing merchants led them to
extend their transactions abroad, and to invest their floating capital
with which their business has hitherto been conducted, in the most
objectionable of all fixed securities-foreign plantations — over which
they could exercise little or no control. And thus we see the direct
change of credit through which the capital of the country, collected in
our rural districts, and in small amounts in the shape of deposits in
country banks, and centres in Lombard Street for employment, has been,
first, made available for the extending operations in our mining and
manufacturing districts, by the rediscount of bills to banks in those
localities; next, for granting greater facilities for the importation of
foreign produce by advances upon dock warrants and bills of lading, and
thus liberating the 'legitimate' mercantile capital of houses engaged in
foreign and colonial trade, and inducing to its most objectionable
advances on foreign plantations." (_Economist,_November 20, 1847, p.
1334.)

This is how credits are "nicely" devoured. The rural depositor fancies
that he deposits only with his banker, and fancies furthermore that when
his banker lends to others, it is done to private persons whom he knows.
He has not the slightest suspicion that this banker places his deposit
at the disposal of some London bill-broker, over whose operations
neither of them have the slightest control.

We have already seen how large public enterprises, such as railways, may
momentarily increase loan capital, owing to the circumstance that the
deposited amounts always remain at the disposal of the bankers for a
certain length of time until they are really used.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Incidentally, the mass of loan capital is quite different from the
quantity of circulation. By the quantity of circulation we mean here the
sum of all the bank-notes and coin, including bars of precious metals,
existing and circulating in a country. A portion of this quantity
constitutes the reserve of the banks which continuously vary in
magnitude.

"On November 12, 1857" [the date of the suspension of the Bank Act of
1844], "the entire reserve of the Bank of England was only £580,751
(including London and all its branches); their deposits at the same time
amounting to £22,500,000; of which near six and a half million belonged
to London bankers. " (Bank Acts, 1858, p. LVII.)

The variations in the interest rate (aside from those occurring over
longer periods or the variation in the interest rate among various
countries; the former are dependent upon variations in the general rate
of profit, the latter on differences in the rates of profit and in the
development of credit) depend upon the supply of loan capital (all other
circumstances, state of confidence, etc. being equal), that is, of
capital loaned in the form of money, coin and notes; in
contradistinction to industrial capital, which, as such — in
commodity-form — is loaned by means of commercial credit among the
agents of reproduction themselves.

However, the mass of this loanable money-capital is different from, and
independent of, the mass of circulating money.

For example, if £20 were loaned five times per day, a money-capital of
£100 would be loaned, and this would imply at the same time that this
£20 would have served, moreover, at least four times as a means of
purchase or payment; for, if no purchase and payment intervened — so
that it would not have represented at least four times the converted
form of capital (commodities, including labour-power) — it would not
constitute a capital of £100, but only five claims of £20 each.

In countries with a developed credit, we can assume that all
money-capital available for lending exists in the form of deposits with
banks and money-lenders. This is at least true for business as a whole.
Moreover, in times of flourishing business, before the real speculation
gets underway — when credit is easy and confidence is growing — most of
the functions of circulation are settled by a simple transfer of credit,
without the help of coin or paper money.

The mere possibility of large sums of deposits existing when a
relatively small quantum of a medium of circulation is available,
depends solely on:

1) the number of purchases and payments which the same coin performs;

2) the number of return excursions, whereby it goes back to the banks as
deposits, so that its repeated function as a means of purchase and
payment is promoted through its renewed transformation into deposits.
For example, a small dealer deposits weekly with his banker £100 in
money; the banker pays out a portion of the deposit of a manufacturer
with this; the latter pays it to his workers; and the workers use it to
pay the small dealer, who deposits it in the bank again. The £100
deposited by this small dealer have served, therefore, first, to pay the
manufacturer a deposit of his; secondly, to pay the workers; thirdly, to
pay the dealer himself; fourthly, to deposit another portion of the
money-capital of the same small dealer; thus at the end of twenty weeks,
if he himself did not have to draw against this money, he would have
deposited £2,000 in the bank by means of the same £100.

To what extent this money-capital is idle, is shown only by the ebb and
flow in the reserve fund of the banks. Therefore, Mr. Weguelin, Governor
of the Bank of England in 1857, concludes that the gold of the Bank of
England is the "only" reserve capital:

"1258. Practically, I think, the rate of discount is governed by the
amount of unemployed capital which there is in the country. The amount
of unemployed capital is represented by the reserve of the Bank of
England, which is practically a reserve of bullion. When, therefore, the
bullion is drawn upon, it diminishes the amount of unemployed capital in
the country, and consequently raises the value of that which remains." —
[Newmarch] "1364. The reserve of bullion in the Bank of England is, in
truth, the central reserve, or hoard of treasure, upon which the whole
trade of the country is carried on... And it is upon that hoard or
reservoir that the action of the foreign exchanges always falls."
(Report on Bank Acts, 1857 [PP. 108, 119].)

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The statistics of exports and imports furnish a measure of the
accumulation of real, _i.e._, productive and commodity-capital. These
always show that, during the ten-year cyclical periods of development of
British industry (1815 to 1870), the maximum of the last prosperity
_before_ the crisis always reappears as the minimum of the following
prosperity, whereupon it rises to a new and far higher peak.

The actual or declared value of the exported products from Great Britain
and Ireland in the prosperity year of 1824 was £40,396,300. With the
crisis of 1825, the amount of exports then falls below this sum and
fluctuates between 35 and 39 million annually. With the return of
prosperity in 1834, it rises above the former maximum to _£41,649,191,_
and reaches in 1836 the new maximum of £53,368,571. Beginning with 1837,
it falls again to 42 million, so that the new minimum is already higher
than the old maximum, and then fluctuates between 50 and 53 million. The
return of prosperity lifts the amount of exports in 1844 to £58,500,000,
whereby the peak of 1836 is again already far exceeded. In 1845, it
reaches £60,111,082; it then falls to something over 57 million in 1846,
reaches in 1847 almost 59 million, in 1848 almost 53 million, rises in
1849 to 63,500,000, in 1853 to nearly 99 million, in 1854 to 97 million,
in 1855 to 94,500,000, in 1856 almost 116 million and reaches a peak of
122 million in 1857. It falls in 1858 to 116 million, rises already in
1859 to 130 million, in 1860 to nearly 136 million, in 1861 only 125
million (the new low is here again higher than the former peak), in 1863
to 146,500,000.

Of course, the same thing could be demonstrated in the case of imports,
which shows the expansion of the market; here it is only a matter of the
scale of production. [Of course, this holds true of England only for the
time of its actual industrial monopoly; but it applies in general to the
whole complex of countries with modern large-scale industries, as long
as the world-market is still expanding. — _F. E_.]

2. TRANSFORMATION OF CAPITAL OR REVENUE INTO MONEY THAT IS TRANSFORMED INTO LOAN CAPITAL

We will consider here the accumulation of money-capital, in so far as it
is not an expression either of a stoppage in the flow of commercial
credit or of an economy — whether it be an economy in the actual
circulating medium or in the reserve capital of the agents engaged in
reproduction.

Aside from these two cases, an accumulation of money-capital can arise
through an unusual inflow of gold, as in 1852 and 1853 as a result of
the new Australian and Californian gold mines. This gold was deposited
in the Bank of England. The depositors received notes for it, which they
did not directly redeposit with bankers. By this means the Circulating
medium was unusually increased. (Testimony of Weguelin, Bank Committee,
1857, No. 1329.) The Bank strove to utilise these deposits by lowering
its discount to 2%. The mass of gold accumulated in the Bank rose during
six months of 1853 to 22-23 million.

The accumulation of all money-lending capitalists naturally always takes
place directly in money-form, whereas we have seen that the actual
accumulation of industrial capitalists is accomplished, as a rule, by an
increase in the elements of reproductive capital itself. Hence, the
development of the credit system and the enormous concentration of the
money-lending business in the hands of large banks must, by themselves
alone, accelerate the accumulation of loanable capital, as a form
distinct from actual accumulation. This rapid development of loan
capital is, therefore, a result of actual accumulation, for it is a
consequence of the development of the reproduction process, and the
profit which forms the source of accumulation for these
money-capitalists is only a deduction from the surplus-value which the
reproductive ones filch (and it is at the same time the appropriation of
a portion of the interest from the savings _of others_). Loan capital
accumulates at the expense of both the industrial and commercial
capitalists. We have seen that in the unfavourable phases of the
industrial cycle the rate of interest may rise so high that it
temporarily consumes the whole profit of some lines of business which
are particularly handicapped. At the same time, prices of government and
other securities fall. It is at such times that the money-capitalists
buy this depreciated paper in huge quantities which in the later phases
soon regains its former level and rises above it. It is then sold again
and a portion of the money-capital of the public is thus appropriated.
That portion which is not sold yields a higher interest because it was
bought below par. But the money-capitalists convert all profits made,
end reconverted by them into capital, first into loanable money-capital.
The accumulation of the latter — as distinct from the actual
accumulation, although its offshoot — thus takes place, even when we
consider only the money-capitalists, bankers, etc., by themselves, as an
accumulation of this particular class of capitalists. And it must grow
with every expansion of the credit system which accompanies the actual
expansion of the reproduction process.

If the interest rate is low, this depreciation of the money-capital
falls principally upon the depositors, not upon the banks. Before the
development of stock banks, ¾ of all the deposits in England lay in the
banks without yielding interest. While interest is now paid on them, it
amounts to at least 1% less than the current rate of interest.

As for the money accumulation of the other classes of capitalists, we
disregard that portion of it which is invested in interest-bearing paper
and accumulates in this form. We consider only that portion which is
thrown upon the market as loanable money-capital.

In the first place, we have here that portion of the profit which is not
spent as revenue, but is set aside for accumulation — for which,
however, the industrial capitalists have no use in their own business at
the moment. This profit exists directly in commodity-capital, a part of
whose value it constitutes, and along with which it is realised in
money. Now, if it is not reconverted into the production elements of
commodity-capital (we leave out of consideration for the present the
merchant, whom we shall discuss separately), it must remain for a length
of time in the form of money. This amount increases with the amount of
capital itself, even when the rate of profit declines. That portion
which is to be spent as revenue is gradually consumed, but, in the
meantime, as deposits, it constitutes loan capital with the banker.
Thus, even the growth of that portion of profit which is spent as
revenue expresses itself as a gradual and continually repeated
accumulation of loan capital. The same is true of the other portion,
which is intended for accumulation. Therefore, with the development of
the credit system and its organisation, even an increase in revenue,
_i.e._, the consumption of the industrial and commercial capitalists,
expresses itself as an accumulation of loan capital. And this holds true
for all revenues so far as they are consumed gradually, in other words,
for ground-rent, wages in their higher form, incomes of unproductive
classes, etc. All of them assume for a certain time the form of money
revenue and are, therefore, convertible into deposits and thus into loan
capital. All revenue — whether it be intended for consumption or
accumulation — as long as it exists in some form of money, is a part of
the value of commodity-capital transformed into money, and is, for this
reason, an expression and result of actual accumulation, but is not
productive capital itself. When a spinner has exchanged his yarn for
cotton — that portion which constitutes revenue however for money, the
real existence of his industrial capital is the yarn, which has passed
into the hands of the weaver or, perhaps, of some private consumer, and
the yarn is, in fact, the existence — whether it is for reproduction or
consumption — of the capital-value as well as the surplus-value
contained in it. The magnitude of the surplus-value transformed into
money depends upon the magnitude of the surplus-value contained in the
yarn. But as soon as it has been transformed into money, this money is
only the value existence of this surplus-value. And as such it becomes a
moment of loan capital. For this purpose, nothing more is required than
that it be transformed into a deposit, if it has not already been loaned
out by its owner. But in order to be retransformed into productive
capital, it must, on the other hand, already have reached a certain
minimum limit.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 32. Money Capital and Real Capital. III.

 

The mass of money to be transformed back into capital in this manner is
a result of the enormous reproduction process, but considered by itself,
as loanable money-capital, it is not itself a mass of reproductive
capital.

The most important point of our presentation so far is that the
expansion of the part of the revenue intended for consumption (leaving
out of consideration the worker, because his revenue is equal to the
variable capital) shows itself at first as an accumulation of
money-capital. A factor, therefore, enters into the accumulation of
money-capital that is essentially different from the actual accumulation
of industrial capital; for the portion of the annual product which is
intended for consumption does not by any means become capital. A portion
of it _replaces_ capital, _i.e._, the constant capital of the producers
of means of consumption, but to the extent that it is actually
transformed into capital, it exists in the natural form of the revenue
of the producers of this constant capital. The same money, which
represents the revenue and serves merely for the promotion of
consumption, is regularly transformed into loanable money-capital for a
period of time. In so far as this money represents wages, it is at the
same time the money-form of the variable capital; and in so far as it
replaces the constant capital of the producers of means of consumption,
it is the money-form temporarily assumed by their constant capital and
serves to purchase the components of their constant capital to be
replaced in kind. Neither in the one nor in the other form does it
express in itself accumulation, although its quantity increases with the
growth of the reproduction process. But it performs temporarily the
function of loanable money, _i.e._, of money-capital. In this respect,
therefore, the accumulation of money-capital must always reflect a
greater accumulation of capital than actually exists, owing to the fact
that the extension of individual consumption, because it is promoted by
means of money, appears as an accumulation of money-capital, since it
furnishes the money-form for actual accumulation, _i.e._, for money
which permits new investments of capital.

Thus, the accumulation of loanable money-capital expresses in part only
the fact that all money into which industrial capital is transformed in
the course of its circuit assumes the form not of money _advanced_ by
the reproductive capitalists, but of money _borrowed_ by them; so that
indeed the advance of money that must take place in the reproduction
process appears as an advance of borrowed money. In fact, on the basis
of commercial credit, one person lends to another the money required for
the reproduction process. But this now assumes the following form: the
banker, who receives the money as a loan from one group of the
reproductive capitalists, lends it to another group of reproductive
capitalists, so that the banker appears in the role of a supreme
benefactor; and at the same time, the control over this capital falls
completely into the hands of the banker in his capacity as middleman.

A few special forms of accumulation of money-capital still remain to be
mentioned. For example, capital is released by a fall in the price of
the elements of production, raw materials, etc. If the industrial
capitalist cannot expand his reproduction process immediately, a portion
of his money-capital is expelled from the circuit as superfluous and is
transformed into loanable money-capital. Secondly, however, capital in
the form of money is released especially by the merchant, whenever
interruptions in his business take place. If the merchant has completed
a series of transactions and cannot begin a new series because of such
interruptions until later, the money realised represents for him only a
hoard, surplus-capital. But at the same time, it represents a direct
accumulation of loanable money-capital. In the first case, the
accumulation of money-capital expresses a repetition of the reproduction
process under more favourable conditions, an actual release of a portion
of formerly tied-up capital; in other words, an opportunity for
expanding the reproduction process with the same amount of money. But in
the other case, it expresses merely an interruption in the flow of
transactions. However, in both cases it is converted into loanable
money-capital, represents its accumulation, influences equally the
money-market and the rate of interest — although it expresses a
promotion of the actual accumulation process in one case and its
obstruction in the other. Finally, accumulation of money-capital is
influenced by the number of people who have feathered their nests and
have withdrawn from reproduction. Their number increases as more profits
are made in the course of the industrial cycle. In this case, the
accumulation of loanable money-capital expresses, on the one hand, an
actual accumulation (in accordance with its relative extent), and, on
the other hand, only the extent of the transformation of the industrial
capitalists into mere money-capitalists.

As for the other portion of profit, which is not intended to be consumed
as revenue, it is converted into money-capital only when it is not
immediately able to find a place for investment in the expansion of
business in the productive sphere in which it has been made. This may be
due to two causes. Either because this sphere of production is saturated
with capital, or because accumulation must first reach a certain volume
before it can serve as capital, depending on the investment magnitudes
of new capital required in this particular sphere. Hence it is converted
for a while into loanable money-capital and serves in the expansion of
production in other spheres. Assuming all other conditions being equal,
the quantity of profits intended for transformation back into capital
will depend on the quantity of profits made and thus on the extension of
the reproduction process itself. But if this new accumulation meets with
difficulties in its employment, through a lack of spheres for
investment, _i.e._, due to a surplus in the branches of production and
an over-supply of loan capital, this plethora of loanable money-capital
merely shows the limitations of _capitalist_ production. The subsequent
credit swindle proves that no real obstacle stands in the way of the
employment of this surplus-capital. However, an obstacle is indeed
immanent in its laws of expansion, _i.e._, in the limits in which
capital can realise itself as capital. A plethora of money-capital as
such does not necessarily indicate over-production, not even a shortage
of spheres of investment for capital.

The accumulation of loan capital consists simply in the fact that money
is precipitated as loanable money. This process is very different from
an actual transformation into capital; it is merely the accumulation of
money in a form in which it can be transformed into capital. But this
accumulation can reflect, as we have shown, events which are greatly
different from actual accumulation. As long as actual accumulation is
continually expanding, this extended accumulation of money-capital may
be partly its result, partly the result of circumstances which accompany
it but are quite different from it, and, finally, even partly the result
of impediments to actual accumulation. If for no other reason than that
accumulation of loan capital is inflated by such circumstances, which
are independent of actual accumulation but nevertheless accompany it,
there must be a continuous plethora of money-capital in definite phases
of the cycle and this plethora must develop with the expansion of
credit. And simultaneously with it, the necessity of driving the
production process beyond its capitalistic limits must also develop:
over-trade, over-production, and excessive credit. At the same time,
this must always take place in forms that call forth a reaction.

As far as accumulation of money-capital from ground-rent, wages, etc.,
is concerned, it is not necessary to discuss that matter here. Only one
aspect should be emphasised and that is that the business of actual
saving and abstinence (by hoarders), to the extent that it furnishes
elements of accumulation, is left by the division of labour, which comes
with the progress of capitalist production, to those who receive the
minimum of such elements, and who frequently enough lose even their
savings, as do the labourers when banks fail. On the one hand, the
capital of the industrial capitalist is not "saved" by himself, but he
has command of the savings of others in proportion to the magnitude of
his capital; on the other hand, the money-capitalist makes of the
savings of others his own capital, and of the credit, which the
reproductive capitalists give to one another and which the public gives
to them, a private source for enriching himself. The last illusion of
the capitalist system, that capital is the fruit of one’s own labour and
savings, is thereby destroyed. Not only does profit consist in the
appropriation of other people’s labour, but the capital, with which this
labour of others is set in motion and exploited, consists of other
people’s property, which the money-capitalist places at the disposal of
the industrial capitalists, and for which he in turn exploits the
latter.

A few remarks remain to be made about credit capital.

How often the same piece of money can figure as loan capital, wholly
depends, as we have already previously shown, on:

1) how often it realises commodity-values in sale or payment, thus
transfers capital, and furthermore how often it realises revenue. How
often it gets into other hands as realised value, either of capital or
of revenue, obviously depends, therefore, on the extent and magnitude of
the actual transactions;

2) this depends on the economy of payments and the development and
organisation of the credit system;

3) finally, the concatenation and velocity of action of credits, so that
when a deposit is made at one point it immediately starts off as a loan
at another.

Even assuming that the form in which loan capital exists is exclusively
that of real money, gold or silver — the commodity whose substance
serves as a measure of value — a large portion of this money-capital is
always necessarily purely fictitious, that is, a title to value — just
as paper money. In so far as money functions in the circuit of capital,
it constitutes indeed, for a moment, money-capital; but it does not
transform itself into loanable money-capital; it is rather exchanged for
the elements of productive capital, or paid out as a medium of
circulation in the realisation of revenue, and cannot, therefore,
transform itself into loan capital for its owner. But in so far as it is
transformed into loan capital, and the same money repeatedly represents
loan capital, it is evident that it exists only at one point in the form
of metallic money; at all other points it exists only in the form of
claims to capital. With the assumption made, the accumulation of these
claims arises from actual accumulation, that is, from the transformation
of the value of commodity-capital, etc., into money; but nevertheless
the accumulation of these claims or titles as such differs from the
actual accumulation from which it arises, as well as from the future
accumulation (the new production process), which is promoted by the
lending of this money.

_Prima facie_ loan capital always exists in the form of money,^([9])
later as a claim to money, since the money in which it originally exists
is now in the hands of the borrower in actual money-form. For the lender
it has been transformed into a claim to money, into a title of
ownership. The same mass of actual money can, therefore, represent very
different masses of money-capital. Mere money, whether it represents
realised capital or realised revenue, becomes loan capital through the
simple act of lending, through its transformation into a deposit, if we
consider the general form in a developed credit system. The deposit is
money-capital for the depositor. But in the hands of the banker it may
be only potential money-capital, which lies idle in his safe instead of
in its owner’s.^([10])

With the growth of material wealth the class of money-capitalists grows;
on the one hand, the number and the wealth of retiring capitalists,
rentiers, increases; and on the other hand, the development of the
credit system is promoted, thereby increasing the number of bankers,
money-lenders, financiers, etc. With the development of the available
money-capital, the quantity of interest-bearing paper, government
securities, stocks, etc., also grows as we have previously shown.
However, at the same time the demand for available money-capital also
grows, the jobbers, who speculate with this paper, playing a prominent
role on the money-market. If all the purchases and sales of this paper
were only an expression of actual investments of capital, it would be
correct to say that they could have no influence on the demand for loan
capital, since when A sells his paper, he draws exactly as much money as
B puts into the paper. But even if the paper itself exists though not
the capital (at least not as money-capital) originally represented by
it, it always creates _pro tanto_ a new demand for such money-capital.
But at any rate it is then money-capital, which was previously at the
disposal of B but is now at the disposal of A.

B. A. 1857. No. 4886. "Do you consider that it is a correct description
of the causes which determined the rate of discount, to say that it is
fixed by the quantity of capital on the market, which is applicable to
the discount of mercantile bills, as distinguished from other classes of
securities?" — [Chapman:] "No, I think that the question of interest is
affected by all convertible securities of a current character; it would
be wrong to limit it simply to the discount of bills, because it would
be absurd to say that when there is a great demand for money upon [the
deposit of] consols, or even upon Exchequer bills, as has ruled very
much of late, at a rate much higher than the commercial rate, our
commercial world is not affected by it; it is very materially affected
by it." — "4890. When sound and current securities, such as bankers
acknowledge to be so, are on the market, and people want to borrow money
upon them, it certainly has its effect upon commercial bills; for
instance, I can hardly expect a man to let me have money at 5% upon
commercial bills, if he can lend his money at the same moment at 6% upon
consols, or whatever it may be; it affects us in the same manner; a man
can hardly expect me to discount bills at 5½%, if I can lend my money at
6%." — "4892. We do not talk of investors who buy their £2,000, or
£5,000, or £40,000, as affecting the money-market materially. If you ask
me as to the rate of interest upon [a deposit of] consols, I allude to
people, who deal in hundreds of thousands of pounds, who are what are
called jobbers, who take large portions of loans, or make purchases on
the market, and have to hold that stock till the public take it off
their hands at a profit; these men, therefore, want money."

With the development of the credit system; great concentrated
money-markets are created, such as London, which are at the same time
the main seats of trade in this paper. The bankers place huge quantities
of the public’s money-capital at the disposal of this unsavoury crowd of
dealers, and thus this brood of gamblers multiplies.

"Money upon the Stock Exchange is, generally speaking, cheaper than it
is elsewhere," says James Morris the incumbent of the Governor’s chair
of the Bank of England in 1848 before the Secret Committee of Lords (C.
D. 1848, printed 1857, No. 219).

In the discussion on interest-bearing capital, we have already shown
that the average interest over a long period of years, other conditions
remaining equal, is determined by the average rate of profit; not profit
of enterprise, which is nothing more than profit minus interest.
[Present edition: Ch. XXII. — _Ed_.]

It has also been mentioned, and will be further analysed in another
place, that also for the variations in commercial interest, that is,
interest calculated by the money-lenders for discounts and loans within
the commercial world, a phase is reached, in the course of the
industrial cycle, in which the rate of interest exceeds its minimum and
reaches its mean level (which it exceeds later) and that this movement
is a result of a rise in profits.

In the meantime, two things are to be noted here.

_First_: When the rate of interest stays up for a long time (we are
speaking here of the rate of interest in a given country like England,
where the average rate of interest is given over a lengthy period of
time, and also shows itself in the interest paid on long-term loans —
what could be called private interest), it is _prima facie_ proof that
the rate of profit is high during this period, but it does not prove
necessarily that the rate of profit of enterprise is high. This latter
distinction is more or less removed for capitalists, who operate mainly
with their own capital; they realise the high rate of profit, since they
pay the interest to themselves. The possibility of a high rate of
interest of long duration is present when the rate of profit is high;
this does not refer, however, to the phase of actual squeeze. But it is
possible that this high rate of profit may leave only a low rate of
profit of enterprise, after the high rate of interest has been deducted.
The rate of profit of enterprise may shrink, while the high rate of
profit continues. This is possible because the enterprises must be
continued, once they have been started. During this phase, operations
are carried on to a large extent with pure credit capital (capital of
other people); and the high rate of profit may be partly speculative and
prospective. A high rate of interest can be paid with a high rate of
profit but decreasing profit of enterprise. It can be paid (and this is
done in part during times of speculation), not out of the profit, but
out of the borrowed capital itself, and this can continue for a while.

_Secondly_: The statement that the demand for money-capital, and
therefore the rate of interest, grows, because the rate of profit is
high, is not identical with the statement that the demand for industrial
capital grows and therefore the rate of interest is high.

In times of crisis, the demand for loan capital, and therefore the rate
of interest, reaches its maximum; the rate of profit, and with it the
demand for industrial capital, has to all intents and purposes
disappeared. During such times, everyone borrows only for the purpose of
paying, in order to settle previously contracted obligations. On the
other hand, in times of renewed activity after a crisis, loan capital is
demanded for the purpose of buying and for the purpose of transforming
money-capital into productive or commercial capital. And then it is
demanded either by the industrial capitalist or the merchant. The
industrial capitalist invests it in means of production and in
labour-power.

The rising demand for labour-power can never by itself be a cause for a
rising rate of interest, in so far as the latter is determined by the
rate of profit. Higher wages are never a cause for higher profits,
although they may be one of the consequences of higher profits during
some particular phases of the industrial cycle.

The demand for labour-power can increase because the exploitation of
labour takes place under especially favourable circumstances, but the
rising demand for labour-power, and thus for variable capital, does not
in itself increase the profit; it, on the contrary, lowers it _pro
tanto._ But the demand for variable capital can nevertheless increase at
the same time, thus also the demand for money-capital — which can raise
the rate of interest. The market-price of labour-power then rises above
its average, more than the average number of labourers are employed, and
the rate of interest rises at the same time because under such
circumstances the demand for money-capital rises. The rising demand for
labour-power raises the price of this commodity, as every other,
increases its price; but not the profit, which depends mainly upon the
relative cheapness of this commodity in particular. But it raises at the
same time — under the assumed conditions — the rate of interest, because
it increases the demand for money-capital. If the money-capitalist,
instead of lending the money, should transform himself into an
industrial capitalist, the fact that he has to pay more for labour-power
would not increase his profit but would rather decrease it
correspondingly. The state of business may be such that his profit may
nevertheless rise, but it would never be so because he pays more for
labour. The latter circumstance, in so far as it increases the demand
for money-capital, is, however, sufficient to raise the rate of
interest. If wages should rise for some reason during an otherwise
unfavourable state of business, the rise in wages would lower the rate
of profit, but raise the rate of interest to the extent that it
increased the demand for money-capital.

Leaving labour aside, the thing called "demand for capital" by Overstone
consists only in a demand for commodities. The demand for commodities
raises their price, either because it rises above average, or because
the supply of commodities falls below average. If the industrial
capitalist or merchant must now pay, _e.g._, £150 for the same amount of
commodities for which he used to pay £100, he would now have to borrow
£150 instead of the former £100, and if the rate of interest were 5%, he
would now have to pay an interest of £7½ as compared with £5 formerly.
The amount of interest to be paid by him would rise because he now has
to borrow more capital.

The whole endeavour of Mr. Overstone consists in representing the
interests of loan capital and industrial capital as being identical,
whereas his Bank Act is precisely calculated to exploit this very
difference of interests to the advantage of money-capital.

It is possible that the demand for commodities, in case their supply has
fallen below average, does not absorb any more money-capital than
formerly. The same sum, or perhaps a smaller one, has to be paid for
their total value, but a smaller quantity of use-values is received for
the same sum. In this case, the demand for loanable capital will be
unchanged and therefore rate of interest will not rise, although the
demand for commodities would have risen as compared to their supply and
consequently the price of commodities would have become higher. The rate
of interest cannot be affected, unless the total demand for loan capital
increases, and this is not the case under the above assumptions.

The supply of an article can also fall below average, as it does when
crop failures in corn, cotton, etc., occur; and the demand for loan
capital can increase because speculation in these commodities counts on
further rise in prices and the easiest way to make them rise is to
temporarily withdraw a portion of the supply from the market. But in
order to pay for the purchased commodities without selling them, money
is secured by means of the commercial "bill of exchange operations." In
this case, the demand for loan capital increases, and the rate of
interest can rise as a result of this attempt to artificially prevent
the supply of this commodity from reaching the market. The higher rate
of interest then reflects an artificial reduction in the supply of
commodity-capital. On the other hand, the demand for an article can grow
because its supply has increased and the article sells below its average
price.

In this case, the demand for loan capital can remain the same, or even
fall, because more commodities can be had for the same sum of money.
Speculative stock-piling could also occur, either for the purpose of
taking advantage of the most favourable moment for production purposes,
or in expectation of a future rise in prices. In this case, the demand
for loan capital could grow, and the rise in the rate of interest would
then be a reflection of capital investment in surplus stock-piling of
elements of productive capital. We are only considering here the demand
for loan capital as it is influenced by the demand for, and supply of,
commodity-capital. We have already discussed how the varying state of
the reproduction process in the phases of the industrial cycle
influences the supply of loan capital. The trivial proposition that the
market rate of interest is determined by the supply and demand of (loan)
capital is shrewdly jumbled up by Overstone with his own postulate,
namely, that loan capital is identical with capital in general; and in
this way he tries to transform the usurer into the only capitalist and
his capital into the only capital.

In times of stringency, the demand for loan capital is a demand for
means of payment and nothing else; it is by no means a demand for money
as a means of purchase. At the same time, the rate of interest may rise
very high, regardless whether real capital, _i.e._, productive and
commodity capital, exists in abundance or is scarce. The demand for
means of payment is a mere demand for convertibility into _money,_ so
far as merchants and producers have good securities to offer; it is a
demand for _money-capital_ whenever there is no collateral, so that an
advance of means of payment gives them not only the _form of money_ but
also the _equivalent_ they lack, whatever its form, with which to make
payment. This is the point where both sides of the controversy on the
prevalent theory of crises are at the same time right and wrong. Those
who say that there is merely a lack of means of payment, either have
only the owners of _bona fide_ securities in mind, or they are fools who
believe that it is the duty and power of banks to transform all bankrupt
swindlers into solvent and respectable capitalists by means of pieces of
paper. Those who say that there is merely a lack of capital, are either
just quibbling about words, since precisely at such times there is a
mass of _inconvertible_ capital as a result of over-imports and
over-production, or they are referring only to such cavaliers of credit
who are now, indeed, placed in the position where they can no longer
obtain other people’s capital for their operations and now demand that
the bank should not only help them to pay for the lost capital, but also
enable them to continue with their swindles.

It is a basic principle of capitalist production that money, as an
independent form of value, stands in opposition to commodities, or that
exchange-value must assume an independent form in money; and this is
only possible when a definite commodity becomes the material whose value
becomes a measure of all other commodities, so that it thus becomes the
general commodity, the commodity _par excellence_ — as distinguished
from all other commodities. This must manifest itself in two respects,
particularly among capitalistically developed nations, which to a large
extent replace money, on the one hand, by credit operations, and on the
other by credit-money. In times of a squeeze, when credit contracts or
ceases entirely, money suddenly stands as the only means of payment and
true existence of value in absolute opposition to all other commodities.
Hence the universal depreciation of commodities, the difficulty or even
impossibility of transforming them into money, _i.e._, into their own
purely fantastic form. Secondly, however, credit-money itself is only
money to the extent that it absolutely takes the place of actual money
to the amount of its nominal value. With a drain on gold its
convertibility, _i.e._, its identity with actual gold becomes
problematic. Hence coercive measures, raising the rate of interest,
etc., for the purpose of safeguarding the conditions of this
convertibility. This can be carried more or less to extremes by mistaken
legislation, based on false theories of money and enforced upon the
nation by the interests of the money-dealers, the Overstones and their
ilk. The basis, however, is given with the basis of the mode of
production itself. A depreciation of credit-money (not to mention,
incidentally, a purely imaginary loss of its character as money) would
unsettle all existing relations. Therefore, the value of commodities is
sacrificed for the purpose of safeguarding the fantastic and independent
existence of this value in money. As money-value, it is secure only as
long as money is secure. For a few millions in money, many millions in
commodities must therefore be sacrificed. This is inevitable under
capitalist production and constitutes one of its beauties. In former
modes of production, this does not occur because, on the narrow basis
upon which they stand, neither credit nor credit-money can develop
greatly. As long as the _social_ character of labour appears as the
_money-existence_ of commodities, and thus as a _thing_ external to
actual production, money crises — independent of or as an
intensification of actual crises — are inevitable. On the other hand, it
is clear that as long as the credit of a bank is not shaken, it will
alleviate the panic in such cases by increasing credit-money and
intensify it by contracting the latter. The entire history of modern
industry shows that metal would indeed be required only for the
balancing of international commerce, whenever its equilibrium is
momentarily disturbed, if only domestic production were organised. That
the domestic market does not need any metal even now is shown by the
suspension of the cash payments of the so-called national banks, which
resort to this expedient in all extreme cases as the sole relief.

In the case of two individuals, it would be ridiculous to say that in
their transactions with one another both have an unfavourable balance of
payments. If they are reciprocally creditor and debtor of one another,
it is evident that when their claims do not balance, one must be the
creditor and the other the debtor for the balance. With nations this is
by no means the case. And that this is not the case is acknowledged by
all economists when they admit that the balance of payments can be
favourable or unfavourable for a nation, though its trade balance must
ultimately be settled. The balance of payments differs from the balance
of trade in that it is a balance of trade which must be settled at a
definite time. What the crises now accomplish is to narrow the
difference between the balance of payments and the balance of trade to a
short interval; and the specific conditions which develop in the nation
suffering from a crisis and, therefore, having its payments become due —
these conditions already lead to such a contraction of the time of
settlement. First, shipping away precious metals; then selling consigned
commodities at low prices; exporting commodities to dispose of them or
to obtain money advances on them at home; increasing the rate of
interest, recalling credit, depreciating securities, disposing of
foreign securities, attracting foreign capital for investment in these
depreciated securities, and finally bankruptcy, which settles a mass of
claims. At the same time, metal is still often sent to the country where
a crisis has broken out, because the drafts drawn on it are insecure and
payment in specie is most trustworthy. Furthermore, in regard to Asia,
all capitalist nations are usually simultaneously — directly or
indirectly — its debtors. As soon as these various circumstances exert
their full effect upon the other involved nation, it likewise begins to
export gold and silver, in short, its payments become due and the same
phenomena are repeated.

In commercial credit, the interest — as the difference between credit
price and cash price — enters into the price of commodities only in so
far as the bills of exchange have a longer than ordinary running time.
Otherwise it does not. And this is explained by the fact that everyone
takes credit with one hand and gives it with the other. [This does not
agree with my experience. — _F.E_.] But in so far as discount in this
form enters here, it is not regulated by this commercial credit, but by
the money-market.

If supply and demand of money-capital, which determine the rate of
interest, were identical with supply and demand of actual capital, as
Overstone maintains, the interest would be simultaneously low and high,
depending on whether various commodities or various phases (raw
material, semi-finished product, finished product) of the same commodity
were being considered. In 1844, the rate of interest of the Bank of
England fluctuated between 4% (from January to September) and 2½ and 3%
(from November to the end of the year). In 1845, it was 2½, 2¾, and 3%
from January to October, and between 3 and 5% during the remaining
months. The average price of fair Orleans cotton was 6¼d. in 1844 and 4
7/8d. in 1845. On March 3, 1844, the cotton supply in Liverpool was
627,042 bales, and on March 3, 1845, it was 773,800 bales. To judge by
the low price of cotton, the rate of interest should have been low in
1845, and it was indeed for the greater part of this time. But to judge
by the yarn, the rate of interest should have been high, for the prices
were relatively high and the profits absolutely high. From cotton at 4d.
per pound, yarn could be spun, in 1845 with a spinning cost of 4d. (good
secunda mule twist No. 40), or a total cost of 8d. to the spinner, which
he could sell in September and October 1845 at 10½ or 11½d. per pound.
(See the testimony of Wylie below.)

The entire matter can be resolved as follows:

Supply and demand of loan capital would be identical with supply and
demand of capital generally (although this last statement is absurd; for
the industrial or commercial capitalist a commodity is a form of his
capital, yet he never asks for capital as such, but only for the
particular commodity as such, he buys and pays for it as a commodity,
_e.g._, corn or cotton, regardless of the role that it has to play in
the circuit of his capital), if there were no money-lenders, and if in
their stead the lending capitalists were in possession of machinery, raw
materials, etc., which they would lend or hire out, as houses are rented
out now, to the industrial capitalists, who are themselves owners of
some of these objects. Under such circumstances, the supply of loan
capital would be identical with the supply of elements of production for
the industrial capitalist and commodities for the merchant. But it is
clear that the division of profit between the lender and borrower would
then, to begin with, completely depend on the relation of the capital
which is lent to that which is the property of the one who employs it.

According to Mr. Weguelin (B. A. 1857), the rate of interest is
determined by "the amount of unemployed capital" (252); it is "but an
indication of a large amount of capital seeking employment" (271); later
this unemployed capital becomes "floating capital" (485) and by this he
means "the Bank of England notes and other kinds of circulation in the
country, for instance, the country banks circulation and the amount of
coin which is in the country. I include in floating capital the reserves
of the bankers" (502, 503), and later also gold bullion (503). Thus the
same Mr. Weguelin says that the Bank of England exerts great influence
upon the rate of interest in times, when "we" [the Bank of England] "are
holders of the greater portion of the unemployed capital" (1198), while,
according to the above testimony of Mr. Overstone, the Bank of England
"is no place for capital." Mr. Weguelin further says:

"I think the rate of discount is governed by the amount of unemployed
capital which there is in the country. The amount of unemployed capital
is represented by the reserve of the Bank of England, which is
practically a reserve of bullion. When, therefore, the bullion is drawn
upon, it diminishes the amount of unemployed capital in the country and
consequently raises the value of that which remains" (1258).

J. Stuart Mill says (2102):

"The Bank is obliged to depend for the solvency of its banking
department upon what it can do to replenish the reserve in that
department; and therefore as soon as it finds that there is any drain in
progress, it is obliged to look to the safety of its reserve, and to
commence contracting its discounts or selling securities."

The reserve, in so far as only the banking department is considered, is
a reserve for the deposits only. According to the Overstones, the
banking department is supposed to act only as a banker, without regard
to the "automatic" issue of notes. But in times of actual stringency the
Bank, independently of the reserve of the banking department which
consists only of notes, keeps a sharp eye on the bullion reserve, and
must do so if it does not wish to fail. For, to the extent that the
bullion reserve dwindles, so the reserve of bank-notes also dwindles,
and no one should be better informed of this than Mr. Overstone, who
precisely by his Bank Act of 1844 has so sagaciously arranged this.

Notes

9. B. A. 1857. Testimony of Twells, banker: "4516. As a banker, do you
deal in capital or in money? — We deal in money." — "4517. How are the
deposits paid into your bank? — In money." — "4518. How are they paid
out? — In money." — "4519. Then can they be called anything else but
money? — No."

Overstone (see Chapter XXVI) confuses continually "capital" and "money."
"Value of money" also means interest to him, but in so far as it is
determined by the mass of money, "value of capital" is supposed to be
interest, in so far as it is determined by the demand for productive
capital and the profit made by it. He says: "4140. The use of the word
‘capital’ is very dangerous." — "4148. The export of bullion from this
country is a diminution of the quantity of money in this country, and a
diminution of the quantity of money in this country must of course
create a pressure upon the money-market generally" [but not in the
capital-market, according to this]. — "4112. As the money goes out of
the country, the quantity in the country is diminished. That diminution
of the quantity remaining in the country produces an increased value of
that money" [this originally means in his theory an increase in the
value of money as such through a contraction of circulation, as compared
to the values of commodities; in other words, an increase in the value
of money is the same as a fall in the value of commodities. But since in
the meantime even he has been convinced beyond peradventure that the
mass of circulating money _does not_ determine prices, it is now the
diminution in money as a medium of circulation which is supposed to
raise its value as interest-bearing capital, and thus the rate of
interest]. "And that increased value of what remains stops the exit of
money, and is kept up until it has brought back that quantity of money
which is necessary to restore the equilibrium." — More of Overstone’s
contradictions later on.

10. At this point the confusion starts: both of these things are
supposed to be "money", namely, the deposit as a claim to payment from
the banker, and the deposited money in the hands of the banker. Banker
Twells, before the Banking Committee of 1857, offers the following
example: "If I begin business with £10,000, I buy with £5,000
commodities and put them into warehouse. I deposit the other £5,000 with
a banker, to draw upon it and use it as I require it. I consider it
still £10,000 capital to me, though £5,000 is in the shape of deposits
or money" (4528). — This now gives rise to the following peculiar
debate. — "4531. You have parted with your £5,000 of notes to somebody
else? — Yes." — "4532. Then he has £5,000 of deposits?-Yes." — "4533.
And you have £5,000 of deposits left? — Exactly." — "4534. He has £5,000
in money, and you have £5,000 in money? — Yes." — "4535. But it is
nothing but money at last? — No." This confusion is due partly to the
circumstance that A, who has deposited £5,000, can draw on it and
dispose of it as though he still had it. To that extent it serves him as
potential money. However, in all cases in which he draws on it he
destroys his deposit _pro tanto._ If he draws out real money, and his
own money has already been lent to someone else, he is not paid with his
own money, but with that of some other depositor. If he pays a debt to B
with a cheque on his banker, and B deposits this cheque with his banker,
and the banker of A also has a cheque on the banker of B, so that the
two bankers merely exchange cheques, the money deposited by A has
performed the function of money twice; first, in the hands of the one
who has received the money deposited by A; secondly, in the hands of A
himself. In the second function, it is a balancing of claims (the claim
of A on his banker, and the claim of the latter on the banker of B)
without using money. Here the deposit acts twice as money, namely, as
real money and then as a claim on money. Mere claims to money can take
the place of money only by a balancing of claims.

 

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 33. The Medium of Circulation in the Credit System

 

"The great regulator of the velocity of the currency is credit. This
explains why a severe pressure upon the money-market is generally
coincident with a full circulation." (_The Currency Theory Reviewed,_ p.
65.)

This is to be taken in a double sense. On the one hand, all methods
which save on medium of circulation are based upon credit. On the other
hand, however, take, for example, a 500-pound note. A gives it to B on a
certain day in payment for a bill of exchange; B deposits it on the same
day with his banker; the latter discounts a bill of exchange with it on
the very same day for C; C pays it to his bank, the bank gives it to the
bill-broker as an advance, etc. The velocity with which the note
circulates here, to serve for purchases and payments, is effected by the
velocity with which it repeatedly returns to someone in the form of a
deposit and passes over to someone else again in the form of a loan. The
pure economy in medium of circulation appears most highly developed in
the clearing house — in the simple exchange of bills of exchange that
are due — and in the preponderant function of money as a means of
payment for merely settling balances. But the very existence of these
bills of exchange depends in turn on credit, which the industrialists
and merchants mutually give one another. If this credit declines, so
does the number of bills, particularly long-term ones, and consequently
also the effectiveness of this method of balancing accounts. And this
economy, which consists in eliminating money from transactions and rests
entirely upon the function of money as a means of payment, which in turn
is based upon credit, can only be of two kinds (aside from the more or
less developed technique in the concentration of these payments): mutual
claims, represented by bills of exchange or cheques, are balanced out
either by the same banker, who merely transcribes the claim from the
account of one to that of another, or by the various bankers among
themselves.^([11]) The concentration of 8 to 40 million bills of
exchange in the hands of one bill-broker, such as the firm of Overend,
Gurney & Co., was one of the principal means of expanding the scale of
such balancing locally. The effectiveness of the medium of circulation
is increased through this economy in so far as a smaller quantity of it
is required simply to balance accounts. On the other hand the velocity
of the money flowing as medium of circulation (by which it is also
economised) depends entirely upon the flow of purchases and sales, and
on the chain of payments, in so far as they occur successively in money.
But credit effects and thereby increases the velocity of circulation. A
single piece of money, for instance, can effect only five moves, and
remains longer in the hands of each individual as mere medium of
circulation without credit mediating — when A, its original owner, buys
from B, B from C, C from D, D from E, and E from F, that is, when its
transition from one hand to another is due only to actual purchases and
sales. But when B deposits the money received in payment from A with his
banker and the latter uses it in discounting bills of exchange for C, C
in turn buys from D, D deposits it with his banker and the latter lends
it to E, who buys from F, then even its velocity as mere medium of
circulation (means of purchase) is effected by several credit
operations: B's depositing with his banker and the latter's discounting
for C, D's depositing with his banker, and the latter's discounting for
E; in other words through four credit operations. Without these credit
operations, the same piece of money would not have performed five
purchases successively in the given period of time. The fact that it
changed bands without mediation of actual sales and purchases, through
depositing and discounting, has here accelerated its change of hands in
the series of actual transactions.

We have seen previously that one and the same bank-note can constitute
deposits in several banks. Similarly, it can also constitute various
deposits in the same bank. The banker discounts, with the note which A
has deposited, B's bill of exchange, B pays C, and C deposits the same
note in the same bank that issued it.

We have already demonstrated in the discussion of simple money
circulation (Vol I, Ch. III, 2) that the mass of actual circulating
money, assuming the velocity of circulation and economy of payments as
given, is determined by the prices of commodities and the quantity of
transactions. The same law governs the circulation of notes.

In the following table, the annual average number of notes of the Bank
of England, in so far as they were in the hands of the public, are
recorded, namely, the 5- and 10-pound notes, the 20- to 100-pound notes,
and the larger denominations between 200 and 1,000 pounds sterling; also
the percentages of the total circulation that each one of these
groupings constitutes. The amounts are in thousands, _i.e._, the last
three figures are omitted.

  ------ ------------- ------ --------------- ------ ------------------ ------ --------
  Year   £5-10 Notes   %      £20-100 Notes   %      £200-1,000 Notes   %      Total
  1844   9,263         45.7   5,735           28.3   5,253              26.0   20,241
  1845   9,698         46.9   6,082           29.3   4,942              23.8   20,722
  1846   9,918         48.9   5,778           28.5   4,590              22.6   20,286
  1847   9,591         50.1   5,498           28.7   4,066              21.2   19,155
  1848   8,732         48.3   5,046           27.9   4,307              23.8   18,085
  1849   8,692         47.2   5,234           28.5   4,477              24.3   18,403
  1850   9,164         47.2   5,587           28.8   4,646              24.0   19,398
  1851   9,362         48.1   5,554           28.5   4,557              23.4   19,473
  1852   9,839         45.0   6,161           28.2   5,856              26.8   21,856
  1853   10,699        47.3   6,393           28.2   5,541              24.5   22,653
  1854   10,565        51.0   5,910           28.5   4,234              20.5   20,709
  1855   10,628        53.6   5,706           28.9   3,459              17.5   19,793
  1856   10,680        54.4   5,645           28.7   3,323              16.9   19,648
  1857   10,659        54.7   5,567           28.6   3,241              16.7   19,467
  ------ ------------- ------ --------------- ------ ------------------ ------ --------

(B. A. 1858, p. XXVI.) The total sum of circulating bank-notes,
therefore, positively decreased from 1844 to 1857, although commercial
business, as indicated by exports and imports, had more than doubled.
The smaller bank-notes of £5 and £10 increased, as the table shows, from
£9,263,000 in 1844 to £10,659,000 in 1857. And this took place
simultaneously with the particularly heavy increase in gold circulation
at that time. On the other hand, there was a decrease in the notes of
higher denominations (£200 to £1,000) from £5,856,000 in 1852 to
£3,241,000 in 1857, _i.e._, a decrease of more than £2½ million. This is
explained as follows:

"On the 8th June 1854, the private bankers of London admitted the
joint-stock banks to the arrangements of the clearing house, and shortly
afterwards the final clearing was adjusted in the Bank of England. The
daily clearances are now effected by transfers in the accounts which the
several banks keep in that establishment. In consequence of the adoption
of this system, the large notes which the bankers formerly employed for
the purpose of adjusting their accounts are no longer necessary." (B. A.
1858, p. V.)

To what small minimum the use of money in wholesale trade has been
reduced, can be deduced from the table reprinted in Book I (Ch. III,
Footnote), which was presented to the Bank Committee by Morrison, Dillon
& Co., one of the largest of those London firms from which a small
dealer can buy his entire assortment of commodities.

According to the testimony of W. Newmarch before the Bank Committee
1857, No. 1741, other circumstances also contributed to economy in the
circulating medium: penny postage, railways, telegraphy, in short, the
improved means of communication; thus England can now carry on five to
six times more business with about the same circulation of bank-notes.
This is also essentially due to the withdrawal from circulation of notes
of higher denomination than £10. Here Newmarch sees a natural
explanation for the phenomenon that in Scotland and Ireland, where
one-pound notes also circulate, note circulation has risen by about 31%
(1747). The total circulation of bank-notes in the United Kingdom,
including one-pound notes, is said to be £39 million (1749). The gold
circulation, £70 million (1750). In Scotland, the circulation of notes
was £3,120,000 in 1834; £3,020,000 in 1844; and £4,050,000 in 1854
(1752).

From these figures alone, it is evident that banks issuing notes can by
no means increase the number of circulating notes at will, as long as
these notes are at all times exchangeable for money. [Inconvertible
paper money is not considered here at all; inconvertible bank-notes can
become a universal medium of circulation only where they are actually
backed by state credit, as is the case in Russia at present. They then
fall under the laws of inconvertible paper money issued by the state,
which have already been developed in Book I (Ch. III, 2, c) "Coin and
Symbols of Value." — _F.E_.]

The quantity of circulating notes is regulated by the turnover
requirements, and every superfluous note wends its way back immediately
to the issuer. Since in England only the notes of the Bank of England
circulate universally as legal means of payment, we can disregard at
this point the insignificant, and merely local, note circulation of the
country banks.

Before the Bank Committee 1858, Mr. Neave, Governor of the Bank of
England, testifies:

"No. 947. (Question:) Whatever measures you resort to, the amount of
notes with the public, you say, remains the same; that is somewhere
about £20,000,000? — In ordinary times, the uses of the public seem to
want about £20,000,000. There are special periodical moments when,
through the year, they rise to another £1,000,000 or £1,500,000. I
stated that, if the public wanted more, they could always take it from
the Bank of England." — "948. You stated that during the panic the
public would not allow you to diminish the amount of notes; I want you
to account for that. — In moments of panic, the public have, as I
believe, the full power of helping themselves as to notes; and of
course, as long as the Bank has a liability, they may use that liability
to take the notes from the Bank." — "949. Then there seems to be
required, at all times, somewhere about £20,000,000 of legal tender? —
£20,000,000 of notes with the public; it varies. It is £18,500,000,
£19,000,000, £20,000,000, and so on; but taking the average, you may
call it from £19,000,000 to £20,000,000."

Testimony of Thomas Tooke before the Committee of Lords on Commercial
Distress (C. D. 1848/57), No. 3094:

"The Bank has no power of its own volition to extend the amount of its
circulation in the hands of the public; but it has the power of reducing
the amount of the notes in the hands of the public, not however without
a very violent operation."

J. C. Wright, a banker for 30 years in Nottingham, having explained at
length the impossibility for a country bank to be able to keep more
notes in circulation than the public needs and wants, says about notes
of the Bank of England (C. D. 1848/57), No. 2844:

"I am not aware that there is any check" (for note issue) "upon the Bank
of England, but any excess of circulation will go into the deposits and
thus assume a different name."

The same holds true for Scotland, where almost nothing but paper
circulates, because there as well as in Ireland one-pound notes are also
in use and "the Scotch hate gold." Kennedy, Director of a Scottish bank,
declares that banks could not even contract their circulation of notes
and

"conceives that so long as there are internal transactions requiring
notes or gold to perform them, bankers must, either through the demands
of their depositors or in one shape or another, furnish as much currency
as those transactions require.... The Scottish banks can restrict their
transactions, but they cannot control their currency." (_Ibid.,_ Nos.
3446, 3448.)

Similarly, Anderson, Director of the Union Bank of Scotland, states
(_ibid.,_ No. 3578):

"The system of exchanges between yourselves " [among the Scottish banks]
"prevents any over-issue on the part of any one bank? — Yes; there is a
more powerful preventive than the system of exchanges" [which has really
nothing to do with this, but does indeed guarantee the ability of the
notes of each bank to circulate throughout Scotland], "the universal
practice in Scotland of keeping a bank account; everybody who has any
money at all has a bank account and puts in every day the money which he
does not immediately want, so that at the close of the business of the
day there is no money scarcely out of the banks except what people have
in their pockets."

The same applies to Ireland, as indicated in the testimony of the
Governor of the Bank of Ireland, MacDonnell, and the Director of the
Provincial Bank of Ireland, Murray, before the same Committee.

Note circulation is just as independent of the state of the gold reserve
in the vaults of the bank which guarantees the convertibility of these
notes, as it is of the will of the Bank of England.

"On September 18, 1846, the circulation of the Bank of England was
£20,900,000 and the bullion in the Bank £16,273,000; and on April 5,
1847, the notes in circulation were £20,815,000 and the bullion
£10,246,000.... It is evident that six million of gold were exported,
without any contraction of the currency of the country." (J. G. Kinnear,
_The Crisis and the Currency,_ London, 1847, p. 5.)

Of course, this applies only under present conditions prevailing in
England, and even here only in so far as legislation does not decree a
different relationship between the note issue and metal reserve.

Hence only the requirements of business itself exert an influence on the
quantity of circulating money-notes and gold. To be noted here, in the
first instance, are the periodic fluctuations, which repeat themselves
annually regardless of the general condition of business, so that for
the past 20 years

"the circulation is high in one month, and it is low in another month,
and in a certain other month occurs a medium point." (Newmarch, B. A.
1857, No. 1650.)

Thus, in August of every year a few millions, generally in gold, pass
from the Bank of England into domestic circulation to pay the harvest
expenses; since wages are the principal payments to be made here,
bank-notes are less serviceable in England for this purpose. By the
close of the year this money has streamed back to the Bank. In Scotland,
there are almost nothing but one-pound notes instead of sovereigns;
here, then, the note circulation is expanded in the corresponding
situation, namely, twice a year — in May and November — from 3 million
to 4 million; after a fortnight the return flow begins, and is almost
completed in one month. (Anderson, C. D. 1848/57, Nos. 3595-3600.)

The note circulation of the Bank of England also experiences a momentary
fluctuation every three months because of the quarter]y payment of
"dividends," that is, interest on the national debt, whereby bank-notes
are first withdrawn from circulation and then again released to the
public; but they flow back very soon again. Weguelin (B. A. 1857, No.
38) states that this fluctuation in the note circulation amounts to 2½.
Mr. Chapman of the notorious firm of Overend, Gurney & Co., however,
estimates the amount of disturbance thus created in the money-market as
being much higher.

"When you abstract from the circulation £6,000,000 or £7,000,000 of
revenue in anticipation of dividends, somebody must be the medium of
supplying that in the intermediate times." (B. A. 1857, No. 5196.)

Far more significant and enduring are the fluctuations in quantity of
circulating medium corresponding to the various phases of the industrial
cycle. Let us listen to another _associe_ of that firm on this question,
the esteemed Quaker Samuel Gurney (C. D. 1848/57, No. 2645):

"At the end of October (1847) the amount of bank-notes in the hands of
the public was £20,800,000. At that period there was great difficulty in
getting possession of bank-notes in the money-market. This arose from
the alarm of not being able to get them in consequence of the
restriction of the Act of 1844. At present [March 1848] the amount of
bank-notes in the hands of the public is ... £17,700,000, but there
being now no commercial alarm whatsoever, it is much beyond what is
required. There is no banking house or money-dealer in London, but what
has a larger amount of bank-notes than they can use." — "2650. The
amount of bank-notes ... out of the custody of the Bank of England
affords a totally insufficient exponent of the active state of the
circulation, without taking into consideration likewise ... the state of
the commercial world and the state of credit." — "2651. The feeling of
surplus that we have under the present amount of circulation in the
hands of the public arises in a large degree from our present state of
great stagnation. In a state of high prices and excitement of
transaction £17,700,000 would give us a feeling of restriction."

[As long as the state of business is such that returns of loans made
come in regularly and credit thus remains unshaken, the expansion and
contraction of circulation depend simply upon the requirements of
industrialists and merchants. Since gold, at least in England, does not
come into question in the wholesale trade and the circulation of gold,
aside from seasonal fluctuations, may be regarded as rather constant
over a long period of time, the note circulation of the Bank of England
constitutes a sufficiently accurate measure of these changes. In the
period of stagnation following a crisis, circulation is smallest; with
the renewed demand, a greater need for circulating medium develops,
which increases with rising prosperity; the quantity of circulating
medium reaches its apex in the period of over-tension and
over-speculation — the crisis precipitously breaks out and overnight
bank-notes which yesterday were still so plentiful disappear from the
market and with them the discounters of bills, lenders of money on
securities, and buyers of commodities. The Bank of England is called
upon for help — but even its powers are soon exhausted, for the Bank Act
of 1844 compels it to contract its note circulation at the very moment
when the whole world cries out for notes; when owners of commodities
cannot sell, yet are called upon to pay and are prepared for any
sacrifice, if only they can secure bank-notes.

"During an alarm," says the earlier mentioned banker Wright (_loc.
cit.,_ No. 2930), "the country requires twice as much circulation as in
ordinary times, because the circulation is hoarded by bankers and
others."

Once the crisis has broken out, it becomes from then on only a question
of means of payment. But since every one is dependent upon someone else
for the receipt of these means of payment, and no one knows whether the
next one will be able to meet his payments when due, a regular stampede
ensues for those means of payment available on the market, that is, for
bank-notes. Everyone hoards as many of them as he can lay hand on, and
thus the notes disappear from circulation on the very day when they are
most needed. Samuel Gurney (C. D. 1848/57, No. 1116) estimates the
amount of bank notes brought under lock and key in October 1847, at a
time of such alarm, to have reached £4 to £5 million. — _F.E._)

In this connection, the cross-examination of Chapman, Gurney's associate
who has been previously mentioned, before the Bank Committee of 1857 is
especially interesting. I present here its principal contents in
context, although certain points are touched upon which we shall not
examine until later.

Mr. Chapman has the following to say:

"4963. I have also no hesitation in saying that I do not think it is a
proper condition of things that the money-market should be under the
power of any individual capitalist (such as does exist in London), to
create a tremendous scarcity and pressure, when we have a very low state
of circulation out. That is possible ... there is more than one
capitalist, who can withdraw from the circulating medium £1,000,000 or
£2,000,000 of notes, if they have an object to attain by it." — 4965.
[In the German 1894 edition this reads: 4995. — _Ed._ ] A big speculator
can sell £1,000,000 or £2,000,000 of consols and thus take the money out
of the market. Something similar to this has happened quite recently,
"it creates a very violent pressure."

4967. The notes are then indeed unproductive.

"But that is nothing, if it effects his great object; his great object
is to knock down the funds, to create a scarcity, and he has it
perfectly in his power to do so."

An illustration: One morning there was a great demand for money in the
Stock Exchange; nobody knew its cause; somebody asked Chapman to lend
him £50,000 at 7%. Chapman was astonished, for his rate of interest was
much lower; he accepted. Soon after that the man returned, borrowed
another £50,000 at 7½%, then £100,000 at 8%, and wanted still more at
8½%. Then even Chapman became uneasy. Later it turned out that a
considerable sum of money had been suddenly withdrawn from the market.
But, says Chapman,

"I did lend a large sum at 8%; I was afraid to go beyond; I did not know
what was coming."

It must never be forgotten that, although £19 to £20 million in notes
are almost constantly supposed to be in the hands of the public,
nevertheless, the portion of these notes which actually circulates, and,
on the other hand, the portion which is held idle by the banks as a
reserve, continually and significantly vary with respect to each other.
If this reserve is large, and therefore the actual circulation small, it
means, from the point of view of the money-market, that the circulation
is full, money is plentiful; if the reserve is small, and therefore the
actual circulation full, in the language of the money-market the
circulation is low, money is scarce — in other words, the portion
representing idle loan capital is small. A real expansion or contraction
of the circulation, that is independent of the phases of the industrial
cycle — with the amount needed by the public, however, remaining the
same — occurs only for technical reasons, for instance, on the dates
when taxes or the interest on the national debt are due. When taxes are
paid, more notes and gold than usual flow into the Bank of England and,
in effect, contract the circulation without regard to its needs. The
reverse takes place when the dividends on the national debt are paid
out. In the former case, loans are made from the Bank in order to obtain
circulating medium. In the latter case, the rate of interest falls in
private banks because of the momentary growth of their reserves. This
has nothing to do with the absolute quantity of circulating medium; it
does, however, concern the banking firm which sets this circulating
medium in motion and for which this process consists in the alienation
of loan capital and for which it pockets the profits thereby.

In the one case, there is merely a temporary displacement of circulating
medium, which the Bank of England balances by short-term loans at low
interest shortly before the quarterly taxes and also before the
quarterly dividends on the national debt become due; the issue of these
supernumerary notes first fills up the gap caused by the payment of
taxes, while their return payment to the Bank soon thereafter brings
back the excess of notes obtained by the public through the payment of
dividends.

In the other case, low or full circulation is always simply a matter of
different distribution of the same quantity of circulating medium into
active circulation and deposits, _i.e._, an instrument of loans.

On the other hand, if, for example, the number of notes issued is
increased on the basis of a flow of gold into the Bank of England, these
notes assist in discounting bills outside of the Bank and return to it
through the repayment of loans, so that the absolute quantity of
circulating notes is only momentarily increased.

If the circulation is full because of business expansion (which may take
place even though prices are relatively low), then the rate of interest
can be relatively high because of the demand for loan capital as a
result of rising profits and increased new investments. If it is low,
because of business contraction, or perhaps because credit is very
plentiful, the rate of interest can be low even though prices are high.
(See Hubbard. Present edition: Ch. XXXIII. — _Ed_)

The absolute amount of circulation has a determining influence on the
rate of interest only in times of stringency. The demand for full
circulation can either reflect merely a demand for a hoarding medium
(disregarding the reduced velocity of the money circulation and the
continuous conversion of the same identical pieces of money into loan
capital) owing to lack of credit, as was the case in 1847 when the
suspension of the Bank Act did not cause any expansion of the
circulation, but sufficed to draw forth the hoarded notes and to channel
them into circulation; or it may be that more means of circulation are
actually required under the circumstances, as was the case in 1857 when
the circulation actually expanded for some time after the suspension of
the Bank Act.

Otherwise, the absolute quantity of circulation has no influence
whatever upon the rate of interest, since — assuming the economy and
velocity of currency to be constant — it is determined in the first
place by commodity-prices and the quantity of transactions (whereby one
of these generally neutralises the effect of the other), and finally by
the state of credit, whereas it by no means exerts the reverse effect
upon the latter; and, secondly, since commodity-prices and interest do
not necessarily stand in any direct correlation to each other.

During the life of the Bank Restriction Act (1797-1819) a surplus of
currency existed and the rate of interest was always much higher than
after the resumption of cash payments. Later, it fell rapidly with the
restriction of the note issue and rising bill quotations. In 1822, 1823,
and 1832, the general circulation was low, and so was the rate of
interest. In 1824, 1825, and 1836, the circulation was full and the rate
of interest rose. In the summer of 1830 the circulation was full and the
rate of interest low. Since the gold discoveries, money circulation
throughout Europe has expanded, and the rate of interest risen.
Therefore, the rate of interest does not depend upon the quantity of
circulating money.

The difference between the issue of circulating medium and the lending
of capital is best demonstrated in the actual reproduction process. We
have seen (Vol. II, Part III) in what manner the different component
parts of production are exchanged for one another. For example, variable
capital consists materially of the means of subsistence of the
labourers, a portion of their own product. But this is paid out to them
piecemeal in money. The capitalist has to advance this, and it is very
greatly dependent on the credit system organisation whether he can pay
out the new variable capital the following week with the old money which
he paid out in the previous week. The same holds for exchange among
various component parts of the total social capital, for instance,
between means of consumption and means of production of means of
consumption. The money for their circulation, as we have seen, must be
advanced by one or both of the exchanging parties. It remains thereupon
in circulation, but returns after the exchange has been completed to the
one who advanced it, since it had been advanced by him over and above
his actually employed industrial capital (Vol. II, Ch. XX). Under a
developed system of credit, with the money concentrated in the hands of
bankers, it is they, at least nominally, who advance it. This advance
refers only to money in circulation. It is an advance of circulation,
not an advance of capitals which it circulates.

Chapman: "5062. There may be times, when the notes in the hands of the
public, though they may be large, are not to be had. Money also exists
during a panic; but everyone takes good care not to convert it into
loanable capital, _i.e._, loanable money; everyone holds on to it for
the purpose of meeting real payment needs.

"5099. The country bankers in rural districts send up their unemployed
balances to yourselves and other houses? — Yes." — "5100. On the other
hand, the Lancashire and Yorkshire districts require discounts from you
for the use of their trades? — Yes." — "5101. Then by that means the
surplus money of one part of the country is made available for the
demands of another part of the country? — Precisely so."

Chapman states that the custom of banks to invest their surplus
money-capital for short periods in consols and treasury notes has
decreased considerably of late, ever since it has become customary to
lend this money at call, _i.e._, payable on demand. He personally
considers the purchase of such paper for his business very impractical.
He, therefore, invests his money in reliable bills of exchange, some of
which become due every day, so that he always knows how much ready money
he can count on from day to day. [5101 to 5105.]

Even the growth of exports expresses itself more or less for every
country, but particularly for the country granting credit, as an
increasing demand on the domestic money-market, which is not felt,
however, until a period of stringency. When exports increase, British
manufacturers usually draw long-term bills of exchange on the export
merchants against consignments of British goods (5126).

"5127. Is it not frequently the case that an understanding exists that
those bills are to be redrawn from time to time? — [Chapman:] That is a
thing which they keep from us; we should not admit any bill of that
sort. ... I dare say it is done, but I cannot speak to a thing of the
kind." [The innocent Chapman.] "5129. If there is a large increase of
the exports of the country, as there was last year, of £20 million, will
not that naturally lead to a great demand for capital for the discount
of bills representing those exports? — No doubt." — "5130. Inasmuch as
this country gives credit, as a general rule, to foreign countries for
all exports, it would be an absorption of a corresponding increase of
capital for the time being? — This country gives an immense credit; but
then it takes credit for its raw material. We are drawn upon from
America always at 60 days, and from other parts at 90 days. On the other
hand we give credit; if we send goods to Germany, we give two or three
months."

Wilson inquires of Chapman (5131), whether bills of exchange on England
are not drawn simultaneously with the loading of these imported raw
materials and colonial goods and whether these bills of exchange do not
arrive simultaneously with the bills of lading. Chapman believes so, but
does not profess to know anything about such "commercial" transactions
and suggests that experts in this field be questioned. — In exporting to
America, remarks Chapman, "the goods are symbolised in transit" 5133;
this gibberish is supposed to mean that the English export merchant
draws against his commodities bills of exchange with a four-month term
on one of the big American banking houses in London and this firm
receives collateral from America.

"5136. As a general rule, are not the more remote transactions conducted
by the merchant, who waits for his capital until the goods are sold? —
There may be houses of great private wealth, who can afford to lay out
their own capital and not take any advance upon the goods; but the most
part are converted into advances by the acceptances of some well-known
established houses." — "5137. Those houses are resident in ... London,
or Liverpool, or elsewhere." — "5138. Therefore, it makes no difference,
whether the manufacturer lays out his money, or whether he gets a
merchant in London or Liverpool to advance it; it is still an advance in
this country? — Precisely. The manufacturer in few cases has anything to
do with it" [but in 1847 in almost every case]. "A man dealing in
manufactured goods, for instance, at Manchester, will buy his goods and
ship them through a house of respectability in London; when the London
house is satisfied that they are all packed according to the
understanding, he draws upon this London house for six months against
these goods to India or China, or wherever they are going; then the
banking world comes in and discounts that bill for him; so that, by the
time he has to pay for those goods, he has the money all ready by the
discount of that bill." — "5139. Although he has the money, the banker
is laying out of his money? — The _banker has the bill; the banker has
bought the bill;_ he uses his banking capital in that form, namely, in
discounting commercial bills."

[Hence even Chapman does not regard the discounting of bills as an
advance of money, but as a purchase of commodities. — _F.E_.]

"5140. Still that forms part of the demand upon the money-market in
London? — No doubt; it is a substantial occupation of the money-market
and of the Bank of England. The Bank of England are as glad to get these
bills as we are, because they know them to be good property." — "5141.
In that way, as the export trade increases, the demand upon the
money-market increases also? — As the prosperity of the country
increases, we" [the Chapmans] "partake of it." — "5142. Then when these
various fields for the employment of capital increase suddenly, of
course, the natural consequence is that the rate of interest is higher?
— No doubt about it."

In 5143 Chapman cannot "quite understand, that under our large exports
we have had such occasion for bullion."

In 5144 the esteemed Wilson asks:

"May it not be that we give larger credits upon our exports than we take
credits upon our imports? — I rather doubt that point myself. If a man
accepts against his Manchester goods sent to India, you cannot accept
for less than ten months. We have had to pay America for her cotton
(that is perfectly true) some time before India pays us; but still it is
rather refined in its operation." — "5145. If we have had an increase,
as we had last year, of £20 million in our exports of manufactures we
must have had a very large increase of imports of raw material
previously to that" [and in this way over-exports are already identified
with over-imports, and over-production with over-trading], "in order to
make up that increased quantity of goods? — No doubt." — "5146. We
should have to pay a very considerable balance, that is to say, the
balance, no doubt, would run against us during that time, but in the
long run, with America ... the exchanges are in our favour, and we have
been receiving for some time past large supplies of bullion from
America."

5148. Wilson asks the arch-usurer Chapman, whether he does not regard
his high rate of interest as a sign of great prosperity and a high rate
of profit. Chapman, evidently surprised at the naïveté of this
sycophant, affirms this, of course, but has enough integrity to add the
following:

"There are some, who cannot help themselves; they have engagements to
meet, and they must fulfil them, whether it is profitable or not; but,
for a continuance" [of the high rate of interest], "it would indicate
prosperity."

Both forget that a high rate of interest can also indicate, as it did in
1857, that the country is undermined by the roving cavaliers of credit
who can afford to pay a high interest because they pay it out of other
people's pockets (whereby, however, they help to determine the rate of
interest for all), and meanwhile they live in grand style on anticipated
profits. Simultaneously, precisely this can incidentally provide a very
profitable business for manufacturers and others. Returns become wholly
deceptive as a result of the loan system. This also explains the
following, which should require no explanation so far as the Bank of
England is concerned, since it discounts at a lower rate than others
when the interest rate is high.

"5156. I should say," says Chapman, "that our discounts, taking the
present moment, when we have had for so long a high rate of interest,
are at their maximum."

[Chapman made this statement on July 21, 1857, a couple of months before
the crash.]

"5157. In 1852" [when the interest rate was low] "they were not nearly
so large."

For business was indeed a great deal sounder then.

"5159. If there was a great flood of money in the market ... and the
bank-rate low, we should get a decrease of bills ... In 1852 there was a
totally different phase of things. The exports and imports of the
country were as nothing then compared to the present." — "5161. Under
this high rate of discount our discounts are as large as they were in
1854." [When the rate of interest was between 5 and 5½%.]

A very amusing part of Chapman's testimony reveals how these people
really regard public money as their own and assume for themselves the
right to constant convertibility of the bills of exchange discounted by
them. The questions and replies show great naïveté. It becomes the
obligation of legislation to make those bills which are accepted by
large firms convertible at all time; to ensure that the Bank of England
should under all circumstances continue to rediscount them for
bill-brokers. And yet three of such bill-brokers went bankrupt in 1857,
owing about 8 million and their own infinitesimally small capital
compared with these debts.

"5177. Do you mean by that that you think that they" [that is bills
accepted by Barings or Loyds] "ought to be discountable on compulsion,
in the same way that a Bank of England note is now exchangeable against
gold by compulsion? — I think it would be a very lamentable thing, that
they should not be discountable; a most extraordinary position, that a
man should stop payment, who had the acceptances of Smith, Payne & Co.,
or Jones, Loyd & Co. in his hands, because he could not get them
discounted." — "5178. Is not the engagement of Messrs. Baring an
engagement to pay a certain sum of money when the bill is due? — That is
perfectly true; but Messrs. Baring, when they contract that engagement,
and every other merchant who contracts an engagement, never dream that
they are going to pay it in sovereigns; they expect that they are going
to pay it at the Clearing House." — "5180. Do you think that there
should be any machinery contrived by which the public would have a right
to claim money before that bill was due by calling upon somebody to
discount it? — No, not from the acceptor; but if you mean by that that
we are not to have the possibility of getting commercial bills
discounted, we must alter the whole constitution of things." — "5182.
Then you think that it" [commercial bill] "ought to be convertible into
money, exactly in the same way that a Bank of England note ought to be
convertible into gold? — Most decidedly so, under certain
circumstances." — "5184. Then you think that the provisions of the
currency should be so shaped that a bill of exchange of undoubted
character ought at all times to be as readily exchangeable against money
as a bank-note? — I do." — "5185. You do not mean to say that either the
Bank of England or any individual should, by law, be compelled to
exchange it? — I mean to say this, that in framing a bill for the
currency, we should make provision to prevent the possibility of an
inconvertibility of the bills of exchange of the country arising,
assuming them to be undoubtedly solid and legitimate."

This is the convertibility of the commercial bill as compared with the
convertibility of bank-notes.

"5190. The money-dealers of the country only, in point of fact,
represent the public."

As did Mr. Chapman later before the court of assizes in the Davidson
case. See the _Great City Frauds._ [S. Laing, _New Series of the Great
City Frauds of Cole, Davison, and Cordon,_ London. — _Ed_.]

"5196. During the quarters" [when the dividends are paid] "it is ...
absolutely necessary that we should go to the Bank of England. When you
abstract from the circulation £6,000,000 or £7,000,000 of revenue in
anticipation of the dividends, somebody must be the medium of supplying
that in the intermediate time."

[In this case it is then a question of a supply of money, not of capital
or loan capital.]

"5169. Everybody acquainted with our commercial circle must know that
when we are in such a state that we find it impossible to sell Exchequer
bills, when India bonds are perfectly useless, when you cannot discount
the first commercial bills, there must be great anxiety on the part of
those whose business renders them liable to pay the circulating medium
of the realm on demand, which is the case with all bankers. Then the
effect of that is to make every man double his reserve. Just see what
the result of that is throughout the country, that every country banker,
of whom there are about 500, has to send up to his London correspondent
to remit him £5,000 in bank-notes. Taking such a limited sum as that as
the average, which is quite absurd, you come to £2,500,000 taken out of
the circulation. How is that to be supplied?"

On the other hand, the private capitalists, etc., who have money do not
let go of it at any interest, for they say after the manner of Chapman,

"5195. We would rather have no interest at all, than have a doubt about
our getting the money in case we require it."

"5173. Our system is this: That we have £300,000,000 of liabilities
which may be called for at a single moment to be paid in the coin of the
realm, and that coin of the realm, if the whole of it is substituted,
amounts to £23,000,000, or whatever it may be; is not that a state which
may throw us into convulsions at any moment?"

Hence the sudden change of the credit system into a monetary system
during crises.

Aside from the domestic panic during crises, one can speak of the
quantity of money only in so far as it concerns bullion, universal
money. And this is precisely what Chapman excludes; he speaks only of 23
million in _bank-notes._

The same Chapman:

"5218. The primary cause of the derangement of the money-market" [in
April and later in October 1847] "no doubt was in the quantity of money
which was required to regulate our exchanges, in consequence of the
extraordinary importations of the year."

In the first place, this reserve of world-market money had then been
reduced to its minimum. Secondly, it served at the same time as security
for the convertibility of credit-money, bank-notes. It combined in this
manner two quite different functions, both of which, however, stem from
the nature of money, since real money is always world-market money, and
credit-money always rests upon world-market money.

In 1847, without the suspension of the Bank Act of 1844,

"the clearing houses could not have been settled." (5221.)

That Chapman had an inkling of the imminent crisis, after all:

"5236. There are certain conditions of the money-market (and the present
is not very far from it), where money is exceedingly difficult, and
recourse must he had to the Bank."

"5239. With reference to the sums which we took from the Bank on the
Friday, Saturday and Monday, the 19th, 20th, and 22nd of October, 1847,
we should only have been too thankful to have got the bills back on the
Wednesday following; the money reflowed to us directly the panic was
over."

On Tuesday, October 23, the Bank Act was suspended and the crisis was
thus broken.

Chapman believes (5274) that the bills of exchange running
simultaneously on London amount to £100 or £120 million. This does not
include local bills made on provincial firms.

"5287. Whereas in October 1856, the amount of the notes in the hands of
the public ran up to £21,155,000, there was an extraordinary difficulty
in obtaining money; notwithstanding that the public held so much, we
could not touch it."

This was due to the fear caused by the squeeze in which the Eastern Bank
found itself for a period of time (March 1856).

5290-92. As soon as the panic is over,

"all bankers deriving their profit from interest begin to employ the
money immediately."

5302. Chapman does not explain the uneasiness that exists when the bank
reserve decreases as being due to apprehension concerning deposits, but
rather that all those who suddenly may be compelled to pay large sums of
money are well aware they may be driven to seek their last refuge in the
bank when there is a stringency in the money-market; and

"if the banks have a very small reserve, they are not glad to receive
us; but on the contrary."

It is pretty, incidentally, to observe how the reserve as a real
magnitude dwindles away. Bankers hold a minimum for current business
needs either in their own hands or the Bank of England. Bill-brokers
hold the "loose bank money of the country" without any reserve. And the
Bank of England has nothing to offset its liabilities for deposits but
the reserves of bankers and others, together with some public deposits,
etc., which it permits to drop to a very low level, for instance, to £2
million. Aside from these £2 million in paper, then, this whole swindle
has absolutely no other reserve but the bullion reserve in times of
stringency (and this reduces the reserve, because the notes which come
in to replace outgoing bullion must be cancelled), and thus every
reduction of this reserve by drain on gold increases the crisis.

"5306. If there should not be currency to settle the transactions at the
clearing house, the only next alternative which I can see is to meet
together, and to make our payments in first-class bills, bills upon the
Treasury, and Messrs. Smith, Payne, and so forth." — "5307. Then, if the
government failed to supply you with a circulating medium, you would
create one for yourselves? — What can we do? The public come in, and
take the circulating medium out of our hands; it does not exist." —
"5308. You would only then do in London what they do in Manchester every
day of the week? — Yes."

Particularly clever is Chapman's reply to a question posed by Cayley (a
Birmingham man of the Attwood school) regarding Overstone's conception
of capital:

"5315. It has been stated before this Committee, that in a pressure like
that of 1847, men are not looking for money, but are looking for
capital; what is your opinion in that respect? — I do not understand it;
we only deal in money; I do not understand what you mean by it." —
"5316. If you mean thereby" [commercial capital] "the quantity of money
which a man has of his own in his business, if you call that capital, it
forms, in most cases, a very small proportion of the money which he
wields in his affairs through the credit which is given him by the
public" — through the mediation of the Chapmans.

"5339. Is it the want of property that makes us give up our specie
payments? — Not at all.... It is not that we want property, but it is
that we are moving under a highly artificial system; and if we have an
immense superincumbent demand upon our currency, circumstances may arise
to prevent our obtaining that currency. Is the whole commercial industry
of the country to be paralysed? Shall we shut up all the avenues of
employment?" — "5338. If the question should arise whether we should
maintain specie payments, or whether we should maintain the industry of
the country, I have no hesitation in saying which I should drop."

Concerning the hoarding of bank-notes "with a view to aggravate the
pressure and to take advantage of the consequences" he says that this
can very easily occur. Three large banks would be sufficient.

"5383. Must it not be within your knowledge, as a man conversant with
the great transactions of this metropolis, that capitalists do avail
themselves of these crises to make enormous profit out of the ruin of
the people who fall victims to them? — There can be no doubt about it."

And we may well believe Mr. Chapman on this score, although he finally
broke his own neck, commercially speaking, in an attempt at making
"enormous profit out of the ruin of victims." For while his associate
Gurney says: Every change in business is advantageous for one who is
well informed, Chapman says:

"The one section of the community knows nothing of the other; one is the
manufacturer, for instance; who exports to the continent, or imports his
raw commodity; he knows nothing of the man who deals in bullion."
(5046.)

And thus it happened that one fine day Gurney and Chapman themselves
"were not well informed" and went into ill-famed bankruptcy.

We have previously seen that note issue does not in all cases signify an
advance of capital. The following testimony by Tooke before the C. D.
Committee of Lords, 1848, indicates merely that an advance of capital,
even if accomplished by the bank through an issue of new notes, does not
unqualifiedly signify an increase in the number of circulating notes:

"3099. Do you think that the Bank of England for instance might enlarge
its advances greatly, and yet lead to no additional issue of notes? —
There are facts in abundance to prove it; one of the most striking
instances was in 1835, when the Bank made use of the West India deposits
and of the loan from the East India Company in extended advances to the
public. At that time the amount of notes in the hands of the public was
actually rather diminished. And something like the same discrepancy is
observable in 1846 at the time of the payment of the railway deposits
into the Bank; the securities [in discount and deposits] were increased
to about thirty million, while there was no perceptible effect upon the
amount of notes in the hands of the public."

Aside from bank-notes, wholesale trade has another medium of
circulation, which is far more important to it, namely, bills of
exchange. Mr. Chapman showed us how essential it is for the regular flow
of business that good hills of exchange be accepted in payment
everywhere and under all conditions.

_"Gilt nicht mehr der Tausves Jontof, was soll gelten, Zeter, Zeter!"_
["If the Tausves-Jontof's nothing, What is left? O vile detractor!" —
Heine, _Disputation._ — Ed.]

How are these two media of circulation related to one another?

Gilbart writes on this score:

"The reduction of the amount of the note circulation uniformly increases
the amount of the bill circulation. These bills are of two classes —
commercial bills and bankers' bills ... when money becomes scarce, the
money-lenders say, 'draw upon us and we will accept'. And when a country
banker discounts a bill for his customer, instead of giving him the
cash, he will give him his own draft at twenty-one days upon his London
agent. These bills serve the purpose of a currency." (J. W. Gilbart, _An
Inquiry into the Causes of the Pressure, etc.,_ p. 31.)

This is corroborated in somewhat modified form by Newmarch, B. A. 1857,
No. 1426:

"There is no connection between the variations in the amount of bill
circulation and the variations in the bank-note circulation ... the only
pretty uniform result is ...that whenever there is any pressure upon the
money-market, as indicated by a rise in the rate of discount, then the
volume of the bill circulation is very much increased, and vice versa."

However, the bills of exchange drawn at such times are by no means only
the short-term bank-bills mentioned by Gilbart. On the contrary, they
are largely bills of accommodation, which represent no real transaction
at all, or simply transactions made for the sole purpose of drawing
bills of exchange on them; we have presented sufficient illustrations of
both. Hence the _Economist_ (Wilson) says in comparing the security of
such bills with that of bank-notes:

"Notes payable on demand can never be kept out in excess, because the
excess would always return to the bank for payment, while bills at two
months may be issued in great excess, there being no means of checking
the issue till they have arrived at maturity, when they may have been
replaced by others. For a people to admit the safety of the circulation
of bills payable only on a distant day, and to object to the safety of a
circulation of paper payable on demand, is, to us, perfectly
unaccountable." _(Economist,_ May 22, 1847, p. 575.)

The quantity of circulating bills of exchange, therefore, like that of
bank-notes, is determined solely by the requirements of commerce; in
ordinary times, there circulated in the fifties in the United Kingdom,
in addition to 39 million in bank-notes, about 300 million in bills of
exchange — of which 100-120 million were made out on London alone. The
volume of circulating bills of exchange has no influence on note
circulation and is influenced by the latter only in times of money
tightness, when the quantity of hills increases and their quality
deteriorates. Finally, in a period of crisis, the circulation of bills
collapses completely; nobody can make use of a promise to pay since
everyone will accept only cash payment; only the bank-note retains, at
least thus far in England, its ability to circulate, because the nation
with its total wealth backs up the Bank of England.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

We have seen that even Mr. Chapman, who after all was himself a magnate
on the money-market in 1857, complains bitterly that there were several
large money-capitalists in London strong enough to disrupt the whole
money-market at any given moment and thereby bleed white the smaller
money-dealers. There were several such money sharks, he said, who could
considerably intensify a stringency by selling one or two million's
worth of consols and thereby withdrawing an equal amount of bank-notes
(and simultaneously available loan capital) from the market. The joint
action of three large banks would suffice to transform a stringency into
a panic by a similar manoeuvre.

The largest capital power in London is, of course, the Bank of England,
which, however, is prevented by its status as a semi-government
institution from showing its domination in such a brutal manner.
Nevertheless it also knows enough about ways and means of feathering its
nest, particularly since the Bank Act of 1844.

The Bank of England has a capital of £14,553,000, and in addition has at
its disposal about £3 million "balance," that is, undistributed profits,
as well as all money collected by the government for taxes, etc., which
must be deposited with the Bank until it is needed. If we add to this
the sum of other deposits, about £30 million in ordinary times, and the
bank-notes issued without reserve backing, we shall find that Newmarch
made a rather conservative estimate in stating (B. A. 1857, No. 4889):

"I satisfied myself that the amount of funds constantly employed in the
[London] money-market may be described as something like £420,000,000;
and of that £120,000,000 a very considerable proportion, something like
15 or 20 per cent, is wielded by the Bank of England."

In so far as the Bank issues notes which are not covered by the bullion
reserve in its vaults, it creates symbols of value that constitute for
it not only circulating medium, but also additional — even if fictitious
— capital to the nominal amount of these unbacked notes. And this
additional capital yields additional profit. — In B. A. 1857, Wilson
questions Newmarch:

"1563. The circulation of a banker, so far as it is kept out upon the
average, is an addition to the effective capital of that banker, is it
not? — Certainly." — "1564. Then whatever profit he derives from that
circulation is a profit derived from credit, and not from a capital
which he actually possesses? — Certainly."

The same is true, of course, for private banks issuing notes. In his
replies Nos. 1866 to 1868, Newmarch considers two-thirds of all
bank-notes issued by them (the last third has to be covered by bullion
reserve in these banks) as "the creation of so much capital", because
this amount of coin is saved. The profit of the banker as a result of
this may not be larger than that of other capitalists. The fact remains
that he draws the profit out of this national saving of coin. The fact
that a national saving becomes a private profit does not shock the
bourgeois economist in the least, since profit is generally the
appropriation of national labour. Is there anything more absurd, for
instance, than the Bank of England (1797 to 1817) — whose notes have
credit only thanks to the state — taking payment from the state, _i.e._,
from the public, in the form of interest on government loans, for the
power granted it by the state to transform these same notes from paper
into money and then to lend it back to the state?

The banks, incidentally, have still other means of creating capital.
Again according to Newmarch, the country banks, as mentioned above, are
accustomed to send their superfluous funds (that is, Bank of England
notes) to London bill-brokers, in return for discounted bills of
exchange. With these bills of exchange, the bank serves its customers,
since it follows a rule not to reissue bills of exchange received from
its local customers, in order to prevent their business transactions
from becoming known in their own neighbourhood. These bills received
from London not only serve the purpose of being issued to customers who
have to make direct payments in London, in the event they do not prefer
to get the bank's own draft on London; they also serve to settle
payments locally, since the banker's endorsement secures local credit
for them. Thus, in Lancashire, for instance, all the local banks' own
notes and a large portion of Bank of England notes have been pushed out
of circulation by such bills. (_Ibid.,_1568 to 1574.)

Thus we see here how banks create credit and capital by 1) issuing their
own notes, 2) writing out drafts on London running up to 21 days, but
paid in cash to them immediately on issue and 3) paying out discounted
bills of exchange, which are endowed with credit primarily and
essentially by endorsement through the bank — at least as far as
concerns the local district.

The power of the Bank of England is revealed by its regulation of the
market rate of interest. In times of normal activity, it may happen that
the Bank cannot prevent a moderate drain of gold from its bullion
reserve by raising the discount rate ^([12]) because the demand for
means of payment is satisfied by private banks, stock banks and
bill-brokers, who have gained considerably in capital power during the
last thirty years. In such case, the Bank of England must have recourse
to other means. But the statement made by banker Glyn (of Glyn, Mills,
Currie & Co.) before the C. D. 1848/57 still holds good for critical
periods:

"1709. Under circumstances of great pressure upon the country the Bank
of England commands the rate of interest." — "1740. In times of
extraordinary pressure ... whenever the discounts of the private bankers
or brokers become comparatively limited, they fall upon the Bank of
England, and then it is that the Bank of England has the power of
commanding the market rate."

Nevertheless, the Bank of England, being a public institution under
government protection and enjoying corresponding privileges, cannot
exploit its power as ruthlessly as does private business. For this
reason Hubbard remarks before the Banking Committee (B. A. 1857):

"2844. [Question:] Is not it the case that when the rate of discount is
highest, the Bank is the cheapest place to go, and that when it is the
lowest, the bill-brokers are the cheapest parties? — [Hubbard:] That
will always be the case, because the Bank of England never goes quite so
low as its competitors, and when the rate is highest, it is never quite
as high."

But it is a serious event in business life nevertheless when, in time of
stringency, the Bank of England puts on the screw, as the saying goes,
that is, when it raises still higher the interest rate which is already
above average.

"As soon as the Bank puts on the screw, all purchases for foreign
exportation immediately cease ... the exporters wait until prices have
reached the lowest point of depression; and then, and not till then,
they make their purchases. But when this point has arrived, the
exchanges have been rectified — gold ceases to be exported before the
lowest point of depression has arrived. Purchases of goods for
exportation may have the effect of bringing back some of the gold which
has been sent abroad, but they come too late to prevent the drain." (J.
W. Gilbart, _An Inquiry into the Causes of the Pressure on the
Money-Market,_ London, 1840, p. 35.) "Another effect of regulating the
currency by the foreign exchanges is that it leads in seasons of
pressure to an enormous rate of interest." (_Loc. cit.,_ p. 40.) "The
cost of rectifying the exchanges falls upon the productive industry of
the country, while during the process the profits of the Bank of England
are actually augmented in consequence of carrying on her business with a
less amount of treasure." (_Loc. cit.,_ p. 52.)

But, says friend Samuel Gurney,

"The great fluctuations in the rate of interest are advantageous to
bankers and dealers in money — all fluctuations in trade are
advantageous to the knowing man."

And even though the Gurneys skim off the cream by ruthlessly exploiting
the precarious state of business, whereas the Bank of England cannot do
so with the same liberty, nevertheless it also makes a very pretty
profit — not to mention the personal profits falling into the laps of
its directors, as a result of their exceptional opportunity for
ascertaining the general state of business. According to data submitted
to the Lords' Committee of 1817 when cash payments were resumed, these
profits accruing to the Bank of England for the entire period from 1797
to 1817 were as follows:

  ------------------------------------- ------------
  Bonuses and increased dividends       7,451,136
  New stock divided among proprietors   7,276,500
  Increased value of capital            14,553,000
  Total                                 29,280,636
  ------------------------------------- ------------

This, on a capital of £11,642,400 over a period of 19 years. (D.
Hardcastle, _Banks and Bankers,_ 2nd ed., London, 1843, p. 120.) If we
estimate the total gain of the Bank of Ireland, which also suspended
cash payments in 1797, by the same method, we obtain the following
result:

  ---------------------------------- ------------
  Dividends as by returns due 1821   4,736,085
  Declared bonus                     1,225,000
  Increased assets                   1,214,800
  Increased value of capital         4,185,000
  Total                              11,360,885
  ---------------------------------- ------------

This, on a capital of £3 million. (_Ibid.,_ pp. 363-64.)

Talk about centralisation! The credit system, which has its focus in the
so-called national banks and the big money-lenders and usurers
surrounding them, constitutes enormous centralisation, and gives to this
class of parasites the fabulous power, not only to periodically despoil
industrial capitalists, but also to interfere in actual production in a
most dangerous manner — and this gang knows nothing about production and
has nothing to do with it. The Acts of 1844 and 1845 are proof of the
growing power of these bandits, who are augmented by financiers and
stock-jobbers.

Should anyone still doubt that these esteemed bandits exploit the
national and world production solely in the interests of production and
the exploited themselves, he will surely learn better from the following
homily on the high moral worth of bankers:

"Banking establishments are ... moral and religious Institutions.... How
often has the fear of being seen by the watchful and reproving eye of
his banker deterred the young tradesman from joining the company of
riotous and extravagant friends? ... What has been his anxiety to stand
well in the estimation of his banker? ... Has not the frown of his
banker been of more influence with him than the jeers and
discouragements of his friends? Has he not trembled to be supposed
guilty of deceit or the slightest misstatement, lest it should give rise
to suspicion, and his accommodation be in consequence restricted or
discontinued? ... And has not that friendly advice been of more value to
him than that of priest?" (G. M. Bell, a Scottish bank director, in _The
Philosophy of Joint Stock Banking,_ London, 1840, pp. 46, 47.)

Notes

11. Average number of days during which a bank-note remained in
circulation:

  ------ --------- ---------- --------- ---------- --------
  Year   £5 Note   £10 Note   £20-100   £200-500   £1,000
  1792   ?         236        209       31         22
  1818   148       137        121       18         13
  1846   79        71         34        12         8
  1856   70        58         27        9          7
  ------ --------- ---------- --------- ---------- --------

(Compilation by Marshall, Cashier of the Bank of England, in Report on
Bank Act, 1857. Appendix II, pp. 300-01.)

12. At the general meeting of stockholders of the Union Bank of London
on January 17, 1894, President Ritchie relates that the Bank of England
raised the discount in 1893 from 2½% in July to 3 and 4% in August, and
since it lost within four weeks fully £4½ million in gold despite this,
it raised the bank-rate to 5%, whereupon gold flowed back to it and the
bank rate was reduced to 4% in September and then to 3% in October. But
this bank-rate was not recognised in the market. "When the bank-rate was
5%, the discount rate was 3½%, and the rate for money 2½%; when the
bank-rate fell to 4%, the discount rate was 2 3/8% and the money rate
1¾%; when the bank-rate was 3%, the discount rate fell to 1½% and the
money rate to something below that." _(Daily News,_ January 18, 1894.) —
_F.E._

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 34. The Currency Principle and the English Bank Legislation of 1844

 

[In a former work, Ricardo's theory on the value of money as related to
commodity-prices has been analysed; we can, therefore, confine ourselves
here to the indispensable. According to Ricardo, the value of metallic
money is determined by the labour-time incorporated in it, but only as
long as the quantity of money stands in correct relationship to the
amount and price of commodities to be exchanged. If the quantity of
money rises above this ratio, its value falls and commodity-prices rise;
if it fails below the correct ratio, its value rises and
commodity-prices fall — assuming all other conditions equal. In the
first case, the country in which this excess gold exists will export the
gold whose value has depreciated and import commodities; in the second
case, gold will flow to those countries in which it is assessed above
its value, while the under-assessed commodities flow from these
countries to other markets, where they command normal prices. Since
under these circumstances "gold itself may become, either as coin or
bullion, a token of metallic value of greater or smaller magnitude than
its own value, it is self-evident that convertible bank-notes in
circulation must share the same fate. Although bank-notes are
convertible, and therefore their real value corresponds to their nominal
value, the aggregate currency consisting of metal and of convertible
notes may appreciate or depreciate in accordance with its aggregate
quantity, for reasons already stated, rising above or falling below the
level determined by the exchange-value of circulating commodities and
the metallic value of gold.... This depreciation, not of paper as
compared with gold, but of gold and paper taken together, or of the
aggregate currency of a country, is one of Ricardo's principal
discoveries which Lord Overstone and Co. pressed into their service and
made a fundamental principle of Sir Robert Peel's bank legislation of
1844 and 1845." (_Zur Kritik der Politischen Ökonomie_, p.155.)

We need not here repeat a demonstration of the incorrectness of this
Ricardian theory which is given in the cited work. We are merely
interested in the way Ricardo's theses were elaborated by that school of
bank theorists who dictated Peel's above-mentioned Bank Acts.

"The commercial crises of the 19th century, especially the great crises
of 1825 and 1836, did not result in any new developments in the
Ricardian theory of money, but they did furnish new applications for it.
These were no longer isolated economic phenomena, such as the
depreciation of precious metals in the 16th and 17th centuries according
to Hume, or the depreciation of paper money in the 18th and early 19th
centuries according to Ricardo; these were instead the violent storms in
the world-market wherein the conflict of all elements of the capitalist
production process discharges itself, and whose origin and cure were
sought in the most superficial and abstract sphere of this process, the
sphere of money circulation. The actual theoretical assumption from
which the school of economic weather prophets proceeds, is actually
reduced to the dogma that Ricardo discovered the laws governing the
purely metallic currency. The only thing remaining for them to do was to
subordinate credit and bank-note circulation to these laws.

"The most general and palpable phenomenon in commercial crises is the
sudden general decline in prices following a prolonged overall rise. The
general decline in commodity-prices may be expressed as a rise in the
relative value of money with respect to all commodities, and the general
price rise as a decline in the relative value of money. In either
expression the phenomenon is described but not explained.... The
different wording leaves the problem as little changed as would its
translation from German into English. Ricardo's theory of money was
therefore exceedingly opportune, because it lends to a tautology the
semblance of a statement of causal relationship. Whence comes the
periodic general fall in commodity-prices? From the periodic rise of the
relative value of money. Whence the general periodic rise in prices?
From the periodic decline in the relative value of money. It might have
been stated with equal truth that the periodic rise and fall of prices
is due to their periodic rise and fall. ...Once the tautology is
admitted as a causal relationship, the rest follows easily. A rise in
commodity-prices is caused by a decline in the value of money and a
decline in the value of money is caused, as we know from Ricardo, by an
over-supply of currency, _i.e._, a rise in the volume of currency over
the level determined by its own intrinsic value and the intrinsic value
of commodities. Similarly, a general decline in commodity-prices is
explained by a rise in the value of money above its intrinsic value in
consequence of under-supply of currency. Thus, prices rise and fall
periodically, because there is periodically too much or too little money
in circulation. Should a price rise happen to coincide with contracted
money circulation, and a fall in prices with expanded circulation, it
may be asserted despite this that the quantity of money in circulation
has, though not absolutely, yet relatively increased or declined in
consequence of a contraction or expansion of the volume of commodities
in the market, even if this cannot be statistically proved. We have seen
that according to Ricardo these general price fluctuations must take
place even with a purely metallic currency, but that they alternatively
balance one another; thus, _e.g._, an under-supply of currency causes a
fall in prices, the export of commodities abroad, but this export causes
an import of gold from abroad, which in turn brings about a price rise;
the opposite movement taking place in the case of an over-supply of
currency, when commodities are imported and gold is exported. But, since
despite these general price fluctuations which are in perfect accord
with Ricardo's metallic currency, their turbulent and violent form,
their crisis form, belongs to the period of developed credit system, it
is crystal clear that the issue of bank-notes is not exactly regulated
by the laws of metallic currency. Metallic currency has its remedy in
the import and export of precious metal, which immediately enters
circulation as coin and thus, by its inflow or outflow, causes
commodity-prices to fall or rise. The same effect on prices must now be
exerted artificially by banks through imitating the laws of metallic
currency. If gold is coming in from abroad it proves that currency is in
under-supply, that the value of money is too high and commodity-prices
too low, and, consequently, that bank-notes must be put into circulation
in proportion to the newly imported gold. On the other hand, notes must
be withdrawn from circulation in proportion to the gold exported from
the country. The issue of bank-notes, in other words, must be regulated
by the import and export of precious metal or by the rate of exchange.
Ricardo's false assumption that gold is only coin, and, therefore, all
imported gold swells the currency, causing prices to rise, while all
exported gold reduces the currency, leading to a fall in prices — this
theoretical assumption is here turned _into the practical experiment of
putting an amount of coin in circulation equal in every case to the
amount of gold available_. Lord Overstone (banker of Jones Loyd),
Colonel Torrens, Norman, Clay, Arbuthnot and a host of other writers,
known in England as advocates of the 'Currency Principle', have not only
preached this doctrine, but succeeded in 1844 and 1845 with the aid of
Sir Robert Peel's Bank Acts in making it the basis of English and
Scottish bank legislation. Its ignominious failure, both theoretical as
well as practical, following upon experiments on the broadest national
scale, can be treated only in connection with the theory of credit."
(_Loc. cit._, pp. 165-68.)

The critique of this school was furnished by Thomas Tooke, James Wilson
(in the _Economist_ of 1844 to 1847) and John Fullarton. But we have
seen on several occasions, particularly in Chapter XXVIII of this book,
how incompletely they, too, saw through the nature of gold, and how
unclear they were about the relationship of money and capital. We quote
here merely a few instances in connection with the transactions of the
Committee of the Lower House of 1857 concerning Peel's Bank Acts (B. C.
1857). — _F.E._]

J. G. Hubbard, former Governor of the Bank of England, testifies:

"2400. The effect of the export of bullion ... has no reference whatever
to the prices of commodities. It has an effect, and a very important
one, upon the price of interest-bearing securities, because, as the rate
of interest varies, the value of commodities which embodied that
interest is necessarily powerfully affected."

He presents two tables covering the years 1834 to 1843, and 1845 to
1853, which show that the price variations of fifteen major commercial
articles were quite independent of the export and import of gold and the
interest rate. On the other hand, they show a close connection between
the export and import of gold, which is, indeed, the "representative of
our uninvested capital," and the interest rate.

"[2402] In 1847, a very large amount of American securities were
retransferred to America, and Russian securities to Russia, and other
continental securities were transferred to those places from which we
drew our supplies of grain."

The fifteen major articles on which the following tables of Hubbard are
based include cotton, cotton yarn, cotton fabrics, wool, woollen cloth,
flax, linen, indigo, pig-iron, tin, copper, tallow, sugar, coffee, and
silk.

I. 1834-1843

  --------------- ----------------------------- ----------------------------- ------------------ ------------------ ------------
  _Date_          _Bullion Reserve of Bank £_   _Market Rate of Discount *_   _Price increase_   _Price Decrease_   _
                                                                                                                    Unchanged_

  1834, March 1   9,104,000                     2¾%                           -                  -                  -

  1835, March 1   6,274,000                     3¾%                           7                  7                  1

  1836, March 1   7,918,000                     3¼%                           11                 3                  1

  1837, March 1   4,077,000                     5%                            5                  9                  1

  1838, March 1   10,471,000                    2¾%                           4                  11                 -

  1839, Sept. 1   2,684,000                     6%                            8                  5                  2

  1840, June 1    4,571,000                     4¾%                           5                  9                  1

  1840, Dec. 1    3,642,000                     5¾%                           7                  6                  2

  1841, Dec. 1    4,873,000                     5%                            3                  2                  -

  1842, Dec. 1    10,603,000                    2½%                           2                  13                 -

  1843, June 1    11,566,000                    2¼%                           1                  14                 -
  --------------- ----------------------------- ----------------------------- ------------------ ------------------ ------------

Price changes on 15 major items

II. 1844-1853

  --------------- --------------------------- ------------------------- ---------------- ---------------- -----------
  Date            Bullion Reserve of Bank £   Market Rate of Discount   Price Increase   Price Decrease   Unchanged

  1844, March 1   16,162,000                  2¼%                       -                -                -

  1845, Dec 1     13,237,000                  4½%                       11               4                -

  1846, Sept. 1   16,366,000                  3%                        7                8                -

  1847, Sept. 1   9,140,000                   6%                        6                6                3

  1850, March 1   17,126,000                  2½%                       5                9                1

  1851, June 1    13,705,000                  3%                        2                11               2

  1852, Sept. 1   21,853,000                  1¾%                       9                5                1

  1853, Dec. 1    15,093,000                  5%                        14               -                1
  --------------- --------------------------- ------------------------- ---------------- ---------------- -----------

Price changes on 15 major items

Hubbard comments in this regard:

"As in the 10 years 1834-43, so in 1844-53, movements in the bullion of
the Bank were invariably accompanied by a decrease or increase in the
loanable value of money advanced on discount; and the variations in the
prices of commodities in this country exhibit an entire independence of
the amount of circulation as shown in the fluctuations in bullion at the
Bank of England" (Bank Acts Report, 1857, II, pp. 290, 291).

Since the demand and supply of commodities regulate their market-prices,
it becomes evident here how wrong Overstone is in identifying the demand
for loanable money-capital (or rather the deviations of supply
therefrom), as expressed by the discount rate, with the demand for
actual "capital." The contention that commodity-prices are regulated by
fluctuations in the quantity of currency is now concealed by the phrase
that discount rate fluctuations express fluctuations in the demand for
actual material capital, as distinct from money-capital. We have seen
that before the same Committee both Norman and Overstone actually
contended this, and that the latter especially was compelled to resort
to very lame subterfuges, until he was finally cornered (Chap. XXVI). It
is indeed an old humbug that changes in the existing quantity of gold in
a particular country must raise or lower commodity-prices within this
country by increasing or decreasing the quantity of the medium of
circulation. If gold is exported, then, according to this Currency
Theory, commodity-prices must rise in the country importing this gold,
and thereby the value of exports from the gold-exporting country on the
gold-importing country's market; on the other hand, the value of the
gold-importing country's exports would fall on the gold-exporting
country's market while it would rise on the domestic market, _i.e._, the
country receiving the gold. But, in fact, a decrease in the quantity of
gold raises only the interest rate, whereas an increase in the quantity
of gold lowers the interest rate; and if not for the fact that the
fluctuations in the interest rate enter into the determination of
cost-prices, or in the determination of demand and supply, commodity
prices would be wholly unaffected by them.

In the same report, N. Alexander, head of a large firm doing business
with India, expresses the following views on the heavy drain of silver
to India and China in the mid-fifties. This was partly due to the
Chinese Civil War, which checked the sale of English fabrics in China,
and partly due to the disease among silkworms in Europe, which sharply
reduced silkworm breeding in Italy and France:

"4337. Is the drain for China or for India? — You send the silver to
India, and you buy opium with a great deal of it, all of which goes on
to China to lay down funds for the purchase of the silk; and the state
of the markets in India" (in spite of the accumulation of silver there)
"makes it a more profitable investment for the merchant to lay down
silver than to send piece-goods or English manufactures." — "4338. In
order to obtain the silver, has there not been a great drain from
France? — Yes, very large." — "4344. Instead of bringing in silk from
France and Italy, we are sending it there in large quantities, both from
Bengal and from China."

In other words, silver, the money metal of that continent, was sent to
Asia instead of commodities, not because commodity-prices had risen in
the country which produced them (England), but because prices had
fallen, as a result of over-imports in the country which imported them;
and this despite the fact that the silver was received by England from
France and had to be paid for partly in gold. According to the Currency
Theory, prices should have fallen in England and risen in India and
China as a result of such imports.

Another illustration. Before the Lords' Committee (C. D. 1848/57),
Wylie, one of the first Liverpool merchants, testifies as follows:

"1994. At the close of 1845 there was no trade that was more
remunerating, and in which there were such large profits [than cotton
spinning]. The stock of cotton was large and good, useful cotton could
be bought at 4d. per pound, and from such cotton good secunda mule twist
No. 40 was made at an expense not exceeding a like amount, say at a cost
of 8d. per pound in all to the spinner. This yarn was largely sold and
contracted for in September and October 1845 at 10½ and 11½d. per pound,
and in some instances the spinners realised a profit equal to the first
cost of the cotton." — "1996. The trade continued to be remunerative
until the beginning of 1846." — "2000. On March 3, 1844, the stock of
cotton [627,042 bales] was more than double what it is this day [on
March 3, 1848, when it was 301,070 bales] and yet the price then was
1¼d. per pound dearer." [6¼d. as against 5d.] — At the same time yarn,
good secunda mule twist No. 40, had fallen from 11½-12d. to 9½d. per lb.
in October, and to 7¾d. at the end of December 1847; yarn was sold at
the purchase price of the cotton from which it had been spun (_ibid.,_
Nos. 2021 and 2022).

This shows the self-interest of Overstone's sagacity according to which
money should be "dear" because capital is "scarce." On March 3, 1844,
the bank interest rate stood at 3%; in October and November of 1847 it
rose to 8 and 9%, and was still 4% on March 3, 1848. The prices of
cotton were depressed far below the price which corresponded to the
state of supply by the complete stoppage of sales and the panic with its
ensuing high rate of interest. As a result, there was an enormous
decrease in imports in 1848, on the one hand, and, on the other, a
decrease in production in America; hence a new rise in cotton prices in
1849. According to Overstone, the commodities were too dear because
there was too much money in the country.

"2002. The late decline in the condition of the cotton manufactories is
not to be ascribed to the want of the raw material, as the price seems
to have been lower, though the stock of the raw material is very much
diminished."

How nicely Overstone confuses prices, or the value of commodities, with
the value of money, that is, the interest rate. In his reply to Question
2026, Wylie sums up his general judgement of the Currency Theory, based
on which Cardwell and Sir Charles Wood, in May 1847,

"asserted the necessity of carrying out the Bank Act of 1844 in its full
and entire integrity." — "These principles seemed to me to be of a
nature that would give an artificial high value to money and an
artificial and ruinously low value to all commodities and produce."

He says, furthermore, concerning the effects of this Bank Act on
business in general:

"As bills at four months, which is the regular course of drafts, from
manufacturing towns on merchants and bankers for the purchase of goods
going to the United States, could not be discounted except at great
sacrifices, the execution of orders was checked to a great extent, until
after the Government Letter of October 25 (suspension of the Bank Act),
when those four months' bills became discountable" (2097).

We see, then, that the suspension of this Bank Act was received with
relief in the provinces as well.

"2102. Last October [1847] there was scarcely an American buyer
purchasing goods here who did not at once curtail his orders as much as
he possibly could; and when our advices of the dearness of money reached
America, all fresh orders ceased." — "2134. Corn and sugar were special.
The corn market was affected by the prospects of the harvest, and sugar
was affected by the immense stocks and imports." — "2463. Of our
indebtedness to America ... much was liquidated by forced sales of
consigned goods, and I fear that much was cancelled by the failures
here." — "2196. If I recollect rightly, _70 per cent was paid on our
Stock Exchange in October 1847._"

[The crisis of 1837 with its protracted aftermath, followed in 1842 by a
regular post-crisis, and the self-interested blindness of industrialists
and merchants, who absolutely refused to see any over-production — for
such a thing was absurd and impossible according to vulgar economy — had
ultimately achieved that confusion of thought which enabled the Currency
School to put its dogma into practice on a national scale. The bank
legislation of 1844 and 1845 was passed.

The Bank Act of 1844 divides the Bank of England into an issue
department and a banking department. The former receives securities —
principally government obligations — amounting to 14 million, and the
entire metal hoard, of which not more than one-quarter is to consist of
silver, and issues notes to the full amount of the total. In so far as
these notes are not in the hands of the public, they are held in the
banking department and, together with the small amount of coin required
for daily use (about one million), constitute its ever ready reserve.
The issue department gives the public gold for notes and notes for gold;
the remaining transactions with the public are carried on by the banking
department. Private banks in England and Wales authorised in 1844 to
issue their own notes retained this privilege, but their note issue was
fixed; if one of these banks ceases to issue its own notes, the Bank of
England can increase its unbacked notes by two-thirds of the quota thus
made available; in this way its issue was increased by 1892 from £14 to
£16½ million (to be exact, £16,450,000).

Thus, for every five pounds in gold which leave the bank treasury, a
five-pound note returns to the issue department and is destroyed; for
every five sovereigns going into the treasury a new five-pound note
comes into circulation. In this manner, Overstone's ideal paper
circulation, which strictly follows the laws of metallic circulation, is
carried out in practice, and by this means, according to the advocates
of the Currency Theory, crises are made impossible for all time.

But in reality the separation of the Bank into two independent
departments deprived its management of the possibility of freely
utilising its entire available means at critical times, so that
situations could arise in which the banking department might be on the
verge of bankruptcy while the issue department still had intact several
millions in gold and, in addition, its entire 14 million in securities.
And this could take place so much more easily since there is a period in
almost every crisis when heavy exports of gold take place which must be
covered in the main by the metal reserve of the bank. But for every five
pounds in gold which then go abroad, the domestic circulation is
deprived of a five-pound note, so that the quantity of circulating
medium is reduced precisely at a time when the largest quantity is most
needed. The Bank Act of 1844 thus directly induces the entire commercial
world forthwith to hoard a reserve fund of bank-notes at the outbreak of
a crisis; in other words, to accelerate and intensify the crisis. By
such artificial intensification of demand for money accommodation, that
is, for means of payment at the decisive moment, and the simultaneous
restriction of the supply the Bank Act drives the rate of interest to a
hitherto unknown height during a crisis. Hence, instead of eliminating
crises, the Act, on the contrary, intensifies them to a point where
either the entire industrial world must go to pieces, or else the Bank
Act. Both on October 25, 1847, and on November 12, 1857, the crisis
reached such a point; the government then lifted the restriction for the
Bank in issuing notes by suspending the Act of 1844, and this sufficed
in both cases to overcome the crisis. In 1847, the assurance that
bank-notes would again be issued for first-class securities sufficed to
bring to light the £4 to £5 million of hoarded notes and put them back
into circulation; in 1857, the issue of notes exceeding the legal amount
reached almost one million, but this lasted only for a very short time.

It should also be mentioned that the 1844 legislation still shows traces
recalling the first twenty years of the 19th century, the period when
specie payments were suspended and notes devaluated. The fear that notes
may lose their credit is still plainly in evidence. But this fear is
quite groundless, since even in 1825 the issue of a discovered old
supply of one-pound notes, which had been taken out of circulation,
broke the crisis and proved thereby that the credit of the notes
remained unshaken even in times of the most general and deepest
mistrust. And this is quite understandable; for, after all, the entire
nation backs up these symbols of value with its credit. — _F.E._]

Let us now turn to a few comments on the effect of the Bank Act. John
Stuart Mill believes that the Bank Act of 1844 [In the German 1894
edition this reads: 1847. — _Ed_] kept down over-speculation. Happily
this sage spoke on June 12, 1857. Four months later the crisis broke
out. He literally congratulated the "bank directors and the commercial
public generally" on the fact that they

"understand much better than they did the nature of a commercial crisis,
and the extreme mischief which they do both to themselves and to the
public by upholding over-speculation." (B.C. 1857, No. 2031.)

The sagacious Mr. Mill thinks that if one-pound notes are issued

"as advances to manufacturers and others, who pay wages ... the notes
may get into the hands of others who expend them for consumption, and in
that case the notes do constitute in themselves a demand for commodities
and may for some time tend to promote a rise of prices" [2066].

Does Mr. Mill assume, then, that manufacturers will pay higher wages
because they pay them in paper instead of gold? Or does he believe that
if a manufacturer receives his loan in £100 notes and exchanges them for
gold, these wages would constitute less demand than if paid immediately
in one-pound notes? And does he not know that, for instance, in certain
mining districts wages were paid in the notes of local banks, so that
several labourers together received one five-pound note? Does this
increase their demand? Or will bankers advance money to manufacturers
more easily and in larger quantities in small notes than in large ones?

[This singular fear which Mill has for one-pound notes would be
inexplicable if his whole work on political economy did not reveal an
eclecticism which shows no hesitation in the face of any contradiction.
On the one hand, he agrees on many points with Tooke as opposed to
Overstone; on the other, he believes that commodity-prices are
determined by the quantity of available money. He is thus by no means
convinced that, all other conditions being equal, a sovereign will find
its way into the coffers of the Bank for every one-pound note issued. He
fears that the quantity of circulating medium could be increased and
thereby devaluated, that is, commodity-prices might rise. This and
nothing more is concealed behind the above-mentioned apprehension. —
_F.E._)

Tooke expresses the following views before the C. D. 1848/57 concerning
the division of the Bank into two departments and the excessive
precautions taken to safeguard the cashing of notes:

The greater fluctuations of the interest rate in 1847, as compared with
1837 and 1839, are due solely to the separation of the Bank into two
departments (3010). — The safety of bank-notes was affected neither in
1825 nor in 1837 and 1839 (3015). — The demand for gold in 1825 was
aimed only at filling the vacuum created by the complete discredit of
the one-pound notes of country banks; this vacuum could be filled only
by gold, until such time as the Bank of England also issued one-pound
notes (3022). — In November and December 1825 not the slightest demand
existed for gold for export purposes (3023).

"In point of discredit at home as well as abroad, a failure in paying
the dividends and the deposits would be of far greater consequence than
the suspending of the payment of the bank-notes (3028)."

"3035. Would you not say that any circumstance, which had the effect of
ultimately endangering the convertibility of the note, would be one
likely to add serious difficulty in a moment of commercial pressure? —
Not at all."

"In the course of 1847 ... an increased issue from the circulating
department might have contributed to replenish the coffers of the Bank,
as it did in 1825" (3058).

Before the Committee on B. A. 1857, Newmarch testifies:

"1357. The first mischievous effect ... of that separation of
departments" (of the Bank) " and ... a necessary consequence from the
cutting in two of the reserve of bullion has been that the banking
business of the Bank of England, that is to say, the whole of that part
of the operation of the Bank of England which brings it more immediately
into contact with the commerce of the country, has been carried on upon
a moiety only of its former amounts of reserve. Out of that division of
the reserve has arisen, therefore, this state of things, that whenever
the reserve of the banking department has been diminished, even to a
small extent, it has rendered necessary an action by the Bank upon its
rate of discount. That diminished reserve, therefore, has produced a
frequent succession of changes and jerks in the rate of discount." —
"1358. The alterations since 1844" [until June 1857] "have been some 60
in number, whereas the alterations prior to 1844 in the same space of
time certainly did not amount to a dozen."

Of special interest is the testimony of Palmer, a Director of the Bank
of England since 1811 and for a while its Governor, before the Lords'
Committee on C. D. 1848/57:

"828. In December 1825, there was about £1,100,000 of bullion remaining
in the Bank. At that period it must undoubtedly have failed _in toto,_
if this Act had been in existence" [meaning the Act of 1844]. "The issue
in December, I think, was 5 or 6 millions of notes in a week, which
relieved the panic that existed at that period."

"825. The first period" [since July 1, 1825] "when the present Act would
have failed, if the Bank had attempted to carry out the transactions
then undertaken, was on the 28th of February 1837; at that period there
were £3,900,000 to £4,000,000 of bullion in the possession of the Bank,
and then the Bank would have been left with £650,000 only in the
reserve. Another period is in the year 1839, which continued from the
9th of July to the 5th of December." — "826. What was the amount of the
reserve in that case? — The reserve was minus altogether £200,000 upon
the 5th of September. On the 5th of November it rose to about a million
or a million and a half." — "830. The Act of 1844 would have prevented
the Bank giving assistance to the American trade in 1837." — "831. There
were three of the principal American houses that failed. ... Almost
every house connected with America was in a state of discredit, and
unless the Bank had come forward at that period, I do not believe that
there would have been more than one or two houses that could have
sustained themselves." — "836. The pressure in 1837 is not to be
compared with that of 1847. The pressure in the former year was chiefly
confined to the American trade." — 838. (Early in June 1837 the
management of the Bank discussed the question of overcoming the
pressure.) "Some gentlemen advocated the opinion ... that the correct
principle was to raise the rate of interest, by which the price of
commodities would be lowered; in short, to make money dear and
commodities cheap, by which the foreign payment would be accomplished."
— "906. The establishment of an artificial limitation of the powers of
the Bank under the Act of 1844, instead of the ancient and natural
limitation of the Bank's powers, namely, the actual amount of its
specie, tends to create artificial difficulty, and therefore an
operation upon the prices of merchandise that would have been
unnecessary but for the provisions of the Act." — "968. You cannot, by
the working of the Act of 1844, materially reduce the bullion, under
ordinary circumstances, below nine million and a half. It would then
cause a pressure upon prices and credit which would occasion such an
advance in the exchange with foreign countries as 10 increase the import
of bullion, and to that extent add to the amount in the issue
department." — "996. Under the limitation that you" [the Bank] "are now
subject to, you have not the command of silver to an extent that you
require at a time when silver would be required for an action upon the
foreign exchanges." — "999. What was the object of the regulation
restricting the Bank as to the amount of silver to one-fifth? — I cannot
answer that question."

The purpose was to make money dear; aside from the Currency Theory, the
separation of the two bank departments and the requirement for Scottish
and Irish banks to hold gold in reserve for backing notes issued beyond
a certain amount had the same purpose. This brought about a
decentralisation of the national metal reserve, which decreased its
capability of correcting unfavourable exchange rates. All the following
stipulations aim to raise the interest rate: that the Bank of England
shall not issue notes exceeding 14 million except against gold reserve;
that the banking department shall be administered as an ordinary bank,
forcing the interest rate down when money is plentiful and driving it,
up when money is scarce; limiting the silver reserve, the principal
means of rectifying the rates of exchange with the continent and Asia;
the regulations concerning the Scottish and Irish banks, which never
require gold for export but must now keep it under the pretence of
ensuring an actually illusory convertibility of their notes. The fact is
that the Act of 1844 caused a run on the Scottish banks for gold in 1857
for the first time. Nor does the new bank legislation make any
distinction between a drain of gold abroad or for domestic purposes,
although it goes without saying that their effects are quite different.
Hence the continual large fluctuations in the market rate of interest.
With reference to silver, Palmer says on two separate occasions, 992 and
994, that the Bank can buy silver for notes only when the rate of
exchange is favourable for England, _i.e._, silver is superfluous; for:

"1003. The only object in holding a considerable amount of bullion in
silver is to facilitate making the foreign payment so long as the
exchanges are against the country." — "1004. Silver is ... a commodity
which, being money in every other part of the world, is therefore the
most direct commodity for the purpose" [payments abroad]. "The United
States latterly have taken gold alone."

In his opinion, the Bank did not have to raise the interest rate above
its old level of 5% in times of stringency, so long as unfavourable
exchange rates do not drain gold to foreign countries. Were it not for
the Act of 1844, the Bank would be able to discount all first-class
bills presented to it without difficulty. [1018-20.] But under the Act
of 1844 and in the state in which the Bank found itself in October 1847,

"there was no rate of interest which the Bank could have charged to
houses of credit, which they would not have been willing to pay to carry
on their payments" [1022].

And this high interest rate was precisely the purpose of the Act.

"1029. ... Great distinction which I wish to draw between the action of
the rate of interest upon a foreign demand" [for precious metal] "and an
advance in the rate for the object of checking a demand upon the Bank
during a period of internal discredit." — "4023. Previously to the Act
of 1844 ... when the exchanges were in favour of the country, and
positive panic and alarm existed through the country, there was no limit
put upon the issue, by which alone that state of distress could be
relieved."

So speaks a man who has occupied a post for 39 years in the
administration of the Bank of England. Let us now listen to a private
banker, Twells, an associate of Spooner, Attwood & Co. since 1801. He is
alone among the witnesses before the B. C. 4857 who provides us with an
insight into the country's actual state of affairs and who sees the
crisis approaching. In other respects, however, he is a sort of
little-shilling man from Birmingham, like his associates, the Attwood
brothers, who are the founders of this school. (See _Zur Kritik der pol.
Oek.,_ S. 59.) He testifies:

"4488. How do you think that the Act of 1844 has operated? — If I were
to answer you as a banker, I should say that it has operated exceedingly
well, for it has afforded a rich harvest to bankers and
[money-]capitalists of all kinds. But it has operated very badly to the
honest industrious trades-man who requires steadiness in the rate of
discount, that he may be enabled to make his arrangements with
confidence.... It has made money-lending a most profitable pursuit." —
"4489. It [the Bank Act,] enables the London joint-stock banks to return
from 20 to 22% to their proprietors? — The other day one of them was
paying 18% and I think another 20%; they ought to support the Act of
1844 very strongly." — "4490. The little tradesmen and respectable
merchants, who have not a large capital ... it pinches them very much
indeed ... The only means that I have of knowing is that I observe such
an amazing quantity of their acceptances unpaid. They are always small,
perhaps ranging from £20 to £400, a great many of them are unpaid and go
back unpaid to all parts of the country, which is always an indication
of suffering amongst ... little shopkeepers."

4494. He declares that business is not profitable now. The following
remarks of his are important because they show that he saw the latent
existence of the crisis when none of the others had even an inkling of
it.

"4494. Things keep their prices in Mincing Lane, but we sell nothing, we
cannot sell upon any terms; we keep the nominal price."

4495. He relates the following case: A Frenchman sends a broker in
Mincing Lane commodities for £3,000 to be sold at a certain price. The
broker cannot obtain the requested price, and the Frenchman cannot sell
below this price. The commodities remain unsold, but the Frenchman needs
money. The broker therefore makes him an advance of £1,000 and has the
French man draw a bill of exchange of £1,000 for three months on the
broker against his commodities as security. At the end of the three
months the bill becomes due, but the commodities still remain unsold.
The broker must then pay the bill, and although he possesses security
for £3,000, he cannot convert it into cash and as a result faces
difficulties. In this manner, one person drags another down with him.

"4496. With regard to the large exports ... where there is a depressed
state of trade at home, it necessarily forces large exportation." —
"4497. Do you think that the home consumption has been diminished? —
_Very much indeed ... immensely ..._ the shopkeepers are the best
authorities." — "4498. Still the importations are very large; does not
that indicate a large consumption? — It does, _if you can sell;_ but
many of the warehouses are full of these things; in this very instance
which I have been relating, there is £3,000 worth imported, which cannot
be sold."

"4514. When money is dear, would you say that capital would be cheap? —
Yes.

This man, then, is by no means of Overstone's opinion that a high rate
of interest is the same as dear capital.

The following shows how business is now conducted:

"4616. Others are going to a very great extent, carrying on a prodigious
trade in exports and imports, to an extent far beyond what their capital
justifies them in doing; there can be no doubt of all of that. These men
may succeed; they may by some lucky venture get large fortunes, and put
themselves right. That is very much the system in which a great deal of
trade is now carried on. Persons will consent to lose 20, 30, and 40 per
cent upon a shipment; the next venture may bring it back to them. If
they fail in one after another, then they are broken up; and that is
just the case which we have often seen recently; mercantile houses have
broken up, without one shilling of property being left."

"4791. The low rate of interest" [during the last ten years] "operates
against bankers, it is true, but I should have very great difficulty in
explaining to you, unless I could show you the books, how much higher
the profits" [his own] " are now than they used to be formerly. When
interest is low, from excessive issues, we have large deposits; when
interest is high, we get the advantage in that way." — "4794. When money
is at a moderate rate, we have more demand for it; we lend more; it
operates in that way" [for us, the bankers]. "When it gets higher, we
get more than a fair proportion for it; we get more than we ought to
do."

We have seen that the credit of Bank of England notes is considered
beyond question by all experts. Nevertheless, the Bank Act completely
ties up nine to ten million in gold for the convertibility of these
notes. The sacredness and inviolability of this reserve is thereby
carried much farther than among hoarders of olden times. Mr. Brown
(Liverpool) testifies, C. D. 1847/57:

"2311: This money" [the metal reserve in the issue department] "might as
well have been thrown into the sea from any use that it was of at that
time, there being no power to employ any of it without violating the Act
of Parliament."

The building contractor E. Capps, already cited earlier, whose testimony
is also used to illustrate the modern building system in London (Vol.
II, Ch. XII), sums up his opinion of the Bank Act of 1844 as follows [B.
A. 1857]:

"5508. Then upon the whole ... you think that the present system" [of
bank legislation] "is a somewhat adroit scheme for bringing the profits
of industry periodically into the usurer's bag? — I think so. I know
that it has operated so in the building trade."

As mentioned before, the Scottish banks were forced by the Bank Act of
1845 into a system resembling that of the English. They were obliged to
hold gold in reserve for their note issue beyond the limit fixed for
each bank. The effect of this may be seen from the following testimony
before the C. D. 1848/57.

Kennedy, Director of a Scottish bank:

"3375. Was there anything that you can call a circulation of gold in
Scotland previously to the passing of the Act of 1845? — None whatever."
— "3376. Has there been any additional circulation of gold since? — None
whatever; the people dislike gold." — 3450.

The sum of about £900,000 in gold, which the Scottish banks are
compelled to keep since 1845, can only be injurious in his opinion and

"absorbs unprofitably so much of the capital of Scotland."

Furthermore, Anderson, Director of the Union Bank of Scotland:

"3588. The only pressure upon the Bank of England by the banks in
Scotland for gold was for foreign exchanges? — It was; and that is not
to be relieved by holding gold in Edinburgh." — "3590. Having the same
amount of securities in the Bank of England" [or in the private banks of
England] "we have the same power that we had before of making a drain
upon the Bank of England."

Finally, we quote an article from the _Economist_ (Wilson):

"The Scotch banks keep unemployed amounts of cash with their London
agents; these keep them in the Bank of England. This gives to the Scotch
banks, within the limits of these amounts, command over the metal
reserve of the Bank, and here it is always in the place where it is
needed, when foreign payments are to be made."

This system was disturbed by the Act of 1845:

"In consequence of the Act of 1845 for Scotland of late a large drain of
the coin of the Bank has taken place, to supply a mere contingent demand
in Scotland, which may never occur... Since that period there has been a
large sum uniformly locked up in Scotland, and another considerable sum
constantly travelling back and forward between London and Scotland. If a
period arrives when a Scotch bank expects an increased demand for its
notes, a box of gold is brought down from London; when this period is
past, the same box, generally unopened, is sent back to London."
(_Economist_, October 23, 1847 [pp. 1214-1215].)

[And what does the father of the Bank Act, banker Samuel Jones Loyd,
alias Lord Overstone, say to all this?

Already in 1848 he repeated before the Lords' Committee on Commercial
Distress that

"pressure, and a high rate of interest caused by the want of sufficient
capital, cannot be relieved by an extra issue of bank-notes" (1514),

in spite of the fact that the mere _authority_ to increase the note
issue, given by the Government's Letter of October 25, 1847, had
sufficed to take the edge off the crisis.

He holds to the view that

"the high rate of interest and the depression of the manufacturing
interests was the necessary result of the diminution of the _material_
capital applicable to manufacturing and trading purposes" (1604).

And yet the depressed condition of the manufacturing industry had for
months consisted in material commodity-capital filling the warehouses to
overflowing and being actually unsaleable; so that for precisely this
reason, material productive capital lay wholly or partly idle, in order
not to produce still more unsaleable commodity-capital.

And before the Bank Committee of 1857 he says:

"By strict and prompt adherence to the principles of the Act of 1844,
everything has passed off with regularity and ease, the monetary system
is safe and unshaken, the prosperity of the country is undisputed, the
public confidence in the wisdom of the Act of 1844 is daily gaining
strength, and if the Committee wish for further practical illustration
of the soundness of the principles on which it rests, or of the
beneficial results which it has ensured, the true and sufficient answer
to the Committee is, look around you, look at the present state of the
trade of this country, ... look at the contentment of the people, look
at the wealth and prosperity which pervades every class of the
community, and then having done so, the Committee may be fairly called
upon to decide whether they will interfere with the continuance of an
Act under which those results have been developed." (B. C. 1857, No.
4189.)

To this song of praise by Overstone before the Committee on July 14, the
antistrophe was given on November 12 of the same year in the shape of a
letter to the Bank's management, in which the government suspended the
miracle-working law of 1844 to save what could still be saved. — _F.
E._]

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 35. Precious Metal and Rate of Exchange

 

I. MOVEMENT OF THE GOLD RESERVE

It should be noted in regard to the accumulation of notes in times of
stringency, that it is a repetition of the hoarding of precious metal as
used to take place in troubled times in the most primitive conditions of
society. The Act of 1844 is interesting in its operation because it
seeks to transform all precious metal existing in the country into a
circulating medium; it seeks to equate a drain of gold with a
contraction of the circulating medium and a return flow of gold with an
expansion of the circulating medium. As a result, the experiment proved
the contrary to be the case. With a single exception, which we shall
mention shortly, the quantity of circulating notes of the Bank of
England has never, since 1844, reached the maximum which it was
authorised to issue. The crisis of 1857 proved on the other hand that
this maximum does not suffice under certain circumstances. From November
13 to 30, 1857, a daily average of £488,830 above this maximum was
circulating (B. A. 1858, p. XI). The legal maximum was at that time
£14,475,000, plus the amount of metal reserve in the vaults of the Bank.

Concerning the outflow and inflow of precious metal, the following is to
be noted:

_First,_ a distinction should be made between the back and forth
movement of metal within a region which does not produce any gold and
silver, on the one hand, and, on the other, the flow of gold and silver
from their sources of production to various other countries and the
distribution of this additional metal among them.

Before the gold mines of Russia, California and Australia made Their
influence felt, the supply since the beginning of the 19th century
sufficed only for the replacement of worn-out coins, for general use in
articles of luxury, and for the export of silver to Asia.

However, in the first place, silver exports to Asia have since increased
extraordinarily, owing to the Asiatic trade of America and Europe. The
silver exported from Europe was largely replaced by the additional
supply of gold. Secondly, a portion of the newly imported gold was
absorbed by internal money circulation. It is estimated that up to 1857
about 30 million in gold were added to England's internal
circulation.^([14]) Furthermore, the average level of metal reserves in
all the central banks of Europe and America increased since 1844. The
expansion of domestic money circulation resulted at the same time in
bank reserves growing more rapidly in the period of stagnation following
upon the panic, because of the larger quantity of gold coins thrust out
of domestic circulation and immobilised. Finally, the consumption of
precious metal for luxury articles increased since the discovery of new
gold deposits as a consequence of the increased wealth.

_Secondly,_ precious metal flows back and forth between countries which
do not produce any gold or silver, the same country continually
importing, and also exporting. It is only the preponderance of this
movement in one or another direction which, in the final analysis,
determines whether a drain or an augmentation has taken place, since the
mere oscillations and frequently parallel movements largely neutralise
one another. But for this reason, in so far as the result is concerned,
the continuity and, in the main, the parallel course of both movements
is overlooked. A greater import or a greater export of precious metal is
always interpreted to be solely the effect and expression of the
relation between the imports and exports of commodities, whereas it is
simultaneously indicative of the relation between exports and imports of
precious metal itself, quite independent of commodity trade.

_Thirdly,_ the preponderance of imports over exports, and vice versa, is
measured on the whole by the increase or decrease in metal reserves of
the central banks. The greater or lesser precision of this criterion
naturally depends primarily on the degree of centralisation of the
banking business in general. For on this depends the extent that
precious metal in general accumulated in the so-called national banks
represents the national metal reserve. But assuming this to be the case,
the criterion is not accurate because an additional import may be
absorbed under certain circumstances by domestic circulation and the
growing consumption of gold and silver in producing luxury articles;
furthermore, because without additional import, a withdrawal of gold
coin for domestic circulation could take place, and thus the metal
reserve could decrease even without a simultaneous increase in exports.

_Fourthly,_ an export of metal assumes the aspect of a drain when the
movement of decrease continues for a long time, so that the decrease
represents a tendency of movement and depresses the metal reserve of the
bank considerably below its average level, down to approximately its
average minimum. This minimum is more or less arbitrarily fixed, in so
far as it is differently determined in every individual case by
legislation concerning backing for the cashing of notes, etc. Concerning
the quantitative limits which such a drain can reach in England,
Newmarch testified before the Committee on B. A. 1857, Evidence No.
1494:

"Judging from experience, it is very unlikely that the efflux of
treasure arising from any oscillation in the foreign trade will proceed
beyond £3,000,000 or £4,000,000."

In 1847, the lowest gold reserve level of the Bank of England, occurring
on October 23, showed a decrease of £5,198,156 as compared with that of
December 26, 1846, and a decrease of £6,453,748 as compared with the
highest level of 1846 (August 29).

_Fifthly,_ the determination of the metal reserve of the so-called
national banks, a determination, however, which does not by itself
regulate the magnitude of this metal hoard, for it can grow solely by
the paralysis of domestic and foreign trade, is threefold: 1) reserve
fund for international payments, in other words, reserve fund of
world-money; 2) reserve fund for alternately expanding and contracting
domestic metal circulation; 3) reserve fund for the payment of deposits
and for the convertibility of notes (this is connected with the function
of the bank and has nothing to do with the functions of money as such).
The reserve fund can, therefore, also be influenced by conditions which
affect every one of these three functions. Thus, as an international
fund it can be influenced by the balance of payments, no matter by what
factors the latter may be determined and whatever its relation to the
balance of trade may be. As a reserve fund for domestic metal
circulation it can be influenced by the latter's expansion or
contraction. The third function — that of a security fund — does not,
admittedly, determine the independent movement of the metal reserve, but
has a two-fold effect. If notes are issued which replace metallic money
(also including silver coins in countries where silver is a measure of
value) in domestic circulation, the function of the reserve fund under
2) drops away. And a portion of the precious metal, which served to
perform this function, will for a long time find its way abroad. In this
case metallic coins are not withdrawn for domestic circulation, and thus
the temporary augmentation of the metal reserve by immobilising a part
of the circulating coined metal simultaneously falls away. Furthermore,
if a minimum metal reserve must be maintained under all circumstances
for the payment of deposits and for the convertibility of notes, this
affects in its own way the results of a drain or return flow of gold; it
affects that part of the reserve which the bank is obliged to maintain
under all circumstances, or that part which it seeks to get rid of as
useless at certain times. If the circulation were purely metallic and
the banking system concentrated, the bank would likewise have to
consider its metal reserve as security for the payment of its deposits,
and a drain of metal could cause a panic such as was witnessed in
Hamburg in 1857.

_Sixthly,_ with the exception of perhaps 1837, the real crisis always
broke out only after a change in the rates of exchange, that is, as soon
as the import of precious metal had again gained preponderance over its
export.

In 1825, the real crash came after the drain on gold had ceased. In
1839, there was a drain on gold, but it did not bring about a crash. In
1847, the drain on gold ceased in April and the crash came in October.
In 1857, the drain on gold to foreign countries had ceased in early
November, and the crash did not come until later that same month.

This is particularly evident in the crisis of 1847, when the drain on
gold ceased in April after causing a slight preliminary crisis, and the
real business crisis did not come until October.

The following testimony was presented at the Secret Committee of the
House of Lords on Commercial Distress, 1848. This evidence was not
printed until 1857 (also cited as C. D. 1848/57).

Evidence of Tooke:

In April 1847, a stringency arose, which, strictly speaking, equalled a
panic, but was of relatively short duration and not accompanied by any
commercial failures of importance. In October the stringency was far
more intensive than at any time during April, an almost unheard-of
number of commercial failures taking place (2996). — In April the rates
of exchange, particularly with America, compelled us to export a
considerable amount of gold in payment for unusually large imports; only
by an extreme effort did the Bank stop the drain and drive the rates
higher (2997). — In October the rates of exchange favoured England
(2998). — The change in the rates of exchange had begun in the third
week of April (3000). — They fluctuated in July and August; since the
beginning of August they always favoured England (3001). — The drain on
gold in August arose from a demand for internal circulation [3003].

J. Morris, Governor of the Bank of England:

Although the rate of exchange favoured England since August 1847, and an
import of gold had taken place in consequence, the bullion reserve of
the Bank decreased.

"£2,200,000 went out into the country in consequence of the internal
demand" (137). — This is explained on the one hand by an increased
employment of labourers in railway construction, and on the other by the
"circumstance of the bankers wishing to provide themselves with gold in
times of distress" (147).

Palmer, ex-governor and a Director of the Bank of England since 1811:

"684. During the whole period from the middle of April 1847 to the day
of withdrawing the restrictive clause in the Act of 1844 the foreign
exchanges were in favour of this country."

The drain of bullion, which created an independent money panic in April
1847 was here therefore, as always, but a precursor of the crisis, and a
turn had already taken place before it broke out. In 1839, a heavy drain
of bullion took place for grain, etc., while business was strongly
depressed, but there was no crisis or money panic.

_Seventhly,_ as soon as general crises have spent themselves, gold and
silver — leaving aside the inflow of new precious metal from the
producing countries — distribute themselves once more in the proportions
in which they existed in a state of equilibrium as individual hoards of
the various countries. Other conditions being equal, the relative
magnitude of a hoard in each country will be determined by the role of
that country in the world-market. They flow from the country which had
more than its normal share to those with less than a normal amount.
These movements of outgoing and incoming metal merely restore the
original distribution among the various national reserves. This
redistribution, however, is brought about by the effects of various
circumstances, which will be taken up in our treatment of rates of
exchange. As soon as the normal distribution is once more restored —
beginning with this moment — a stage of growth sets in and then again a
drain. [This last statement applies, of course, only to England, as the
centre of the world money-market. — _F.E._]

_Eighthly,_ a drain of metal is generally the symptom of a change in the
state of foreign trade, and this change in turn is a premonition that
conditions are again approaching a crisis.^([15])

_Ninthly,_ the balance of payments can favour Asia against Europe and
America.^([16])

An import of precious metal takes place mainly during two periods. On
the one hand, it takes place in the first phase of a low interest rate,
which follows upon a crisis and reflects a restriction of production;
and then in the second phase, when the interest rate rises, but before
it attains its average level. This is the phase during which returns
come quickly, commercial credit is abundant, and therefore the demand
for loan capital does not grow in proportion to the expansion of
production. In both phases, with loan capital relatively abundant, the
superfluous addition of capital existing in the form of gold and silver,
_i.e._, a form in which it can primarily serve only as loan capital,
must seriously affect the rate of interest and concomitantly the
atmosphere of business in general.

On the other hand, a drain, a continued and heavy export of precious
metal, takes place as soon as returns no longer flow, markets are
overstocked, and an illusory prosperity is maintained only by means of
credit; in other words, as soon as a greatly increased demand for loan
capital exists and the interest rate, therefore, has reached at least
its average level. Under such circumstances, which are reflected
precisely in a drain of precious metal, the effect of continued
withdrawal of capital, in a form in which it exists directly as loanable
money-capital, is considerably intensified. This must have a direct
influence on the interest rate. But instead of restricting credit
transactions, the rise in interest rate extends them and leads to an
over-straining of all their resources. This period, therefore, precedes
the crash.

Newmarch is asked, B. A. 1857:

"1520. But then the volume of bills in circulation increases with the
rate of discount? — It seems to do so." — "1522. In quiet ordinary times
the ledger is the real instrument of exchange; but when any difficulty
arises; when, for example, under such circumstances as I have suggested,
there is a rise in the bank-rate of discount ... then the transactions
naturally resolve themselves into drawing bills of exchange, those bills
of exchange being not only more convenient as regards legal proof of the
transaction which has taken place, but also being more convenient in
order to effect purchases elsewhere, and being pre-eminently convenient
as a means of credit by which capital can be raised."

Furthermore, as soon as somewhat threatening conditions induce the bank
to raise its discount rate — whereby the probability exists at the same
time that the bank will cut down the running time of the bills to be
discounted by it — the general apprehension spreads that this will rise
in crescendo. Everyone, and above all the credit swindler, will
therefore strive to discount the future and have as many means of credit
as possible at his command at the given time. These reasons, then,
amount to this: it is not that the mere quantity of imported or exported
precious metal as such which makes its influence felt, but that it
exerts its effect, firstly, by virtue of the specific character of
precious metal as capital in money-form, and secondly, by acting like a
feather which, when added to the weight on the scales, suffices to tip
the oscillating balance definitely to one side; it acts because it
arises under conditions when any addition decides in favour of one or
the other side. Without these grounds, it would be quite inexplicable
why a drain of gold amounting to, say, £5,000,000 to £8,000,000 — and
this is the limit of experience to date — should have any appreciable
effect. This small decrease or increase of capital, which seems
insignificant even compared to the £70 million in gold which circulate
on an average in England, is really a negligibly small magnitude when
compared to production of such volume as that of the English.^([17]) But
it is precisely the development of the credit and banking system, which
tends, on the one hand, to press all money-capital into the service of
production (or what amounts to the same thing, to transform all money
income into capital), and which, on the other hand, reduces the metal
reserve to a minimum in a certain phase of the cycle, so that it can no
longer perform the functions for which it is intended — it is the
developed credit and banking system which creates this
over-sensitiveness of the whole organism. At less developed stages of
production, the decrease or increase of the hoard below or above its
average level is a relatively insignificant matter. Similarly, on the
other hand, even a very considerable drain of gold is relatively
ineffective if it does not occur in the critical period of the
industrial cycle.

In the given explanation we have not considered cases in which a drain
of gold takes place as a result of crop failures, etc. In such cases the
large and sudden disturbance of the equilibrium of production, which is
expressed by this drain, requires no further explanation as to its
effect. This effect is that much greater the more such a disturbance
occurs in a period when production is in full swing.

We have also omitted from consideration the function of the metal
reserve as a security for bank-note convertibility and as the pivot of
the entire credit system. The central bank is the pivot of the credit
system. And the metal reserve, in turn, is the pivot of the bank.^([18])
The change-over from the credit system to the monetary system is
necessary, as I have already shown in Vol. I (Ch. III) in discussing
means of payment. That the greatest sacrifices of real wealth are
necessary to maintain the metallic basis in a critical moment has been
admitted by both Tooke and Loyd-Overstone. The controversy revolves
merely round a plus or a minus, and round the more or less rational
treatment of the inevitable.^([19]) A certain quantity of metal,
insignificant compared with the total production, is admitted to be the
pivotal point of the system. Hence the superb theoretical dualism, aside
from the appalling manifestation of this characteristic that it
possesses as the pivotal point during crises. So long as enlightened
economy treats "of capital" _ex professo,_ it looks down upon gold and
silver with the greatest disdain, considering them as the most
indifferent and useless form of capital. But as soon as it treats of the
banking system, everything is reversed, and gold and silver become
capital _par excellence,_ for whose preservation every other form of
capital and labour is to be sacrificed. But how are gold and silver
distinguished from other forms of wealth? Not by the magnitude of their
value, for this is determined by the quantity of labour incorporated in
them; but by the fact that they represent independent incarnations,
expressions of the _social_ character of wealth. [The wealth of society
exists only as the wealth of private individuals, who are its private
owners. It preserves its social character only in that these individuals
mutually exchange qualitatively different use-values for the
satisfaction of their wants. Under capitalist production they can do so
only by means of money. Thus the wealth of the individual is realised as
social wealth only through the medium of money. It is in money, in this
thing, that the social nature of this wealth is incarnated. — _F.E._]
This social existence of wealth therefore assumes the aspect of a world
beyond, of a thing, matter, commodity, alongside of and external to the
real elements of social wealth. So long as production is in a state of
flux this is forgotten. Credit, likewise a social form of wealth, crowds
out money and usurps its place. It is faith in the social character of
production which allows the money-form of products to assume the aspect
of something that is only evanescent and ideal, something merely
imaginative. But as soon as credit is shaken — and this phase of
necessity always appears in the modern industrial cycle — all the real
wealth is to be actually and suddenly transformed into money, into gold
and silver — a mad demand, which, however, grows necessarily out of the
system itself. And all the gold and silver which is supposed to satisfy
these enormous demands amounts to but a few millions in the vaults of
the Bank. ^([20])

Among the effects of the gold drain, then, the fact that production as
social production is not really subject to social control, is strikingly
emphasised by the existence of the social form of wealth as a thing
external to it. The capitalist system of production, in fact, has this
feature in common with former systems of production, in so far as they
are based on trade in commodities and private exchange. But only in the
capitalist system of production does this become apparent in the most
striking and grotesque form of absurd contradiction and paradox,
because, in the first place, production for direct use-value, for
consumption by the producers themselves, is most completely eliminated
under the capitalist system, so that wealth exists only as a social
process expressed as the intertwining of production and circulation; and
secondly, with the development of the credit system, capitalist
production continually strives to overcome the metal barrier, which is
simultaneously a material and imaginative barrier of wealth and its
movement, but again and again it breaks its back on this barrier.

In the crisis, the demand is made that all bills of exchange, securities
and commodities shall be simultaneously convertible into bank money, and
all this bank money, in turn, into gold.

 

II. THE RATE OF EXCHANGE

[The rate of exchange is known to be the barometer for the international
movement of money metals. If England has more payments to make to
Germany than Germany to England, the price of marks, expressed in
sterling, rises in London, and the price of sterling, expressed in
marks, falls in Hamburg and Berlin. If this preponderance of England's
payment obligations towards Germany is not balanced again, for instance,
by a preponderance of purchases by Germany in England, the sterling
price of bills of exchange in marks on Germany must rise to the point
where it will pay to send metal (gold coin or bullion) from England to
Germany in payment of obligations, instead of sending bills of exchange.
This is the typical course of events.

If this export of precious metal assumes a larger scope and lasts for a
longer period, then the English bank reserve is affected, and the
English money-market, particularly the Bank of England, must take
protective measures. These consist mainly, as we have already seen, in
raising the interest rate. When the drain on gold is considerable, the
money-market as a rule becomes tight, that is, the demand for loan
capital in the form of money significantly exceeds the supply and the
higher interest rate follows quite naturally from this; the discount
rate fixed by the Bank of England corresponds to this situation and
asserts itself on the market. However there are cases when the drain on
bullion is due to other than ordinary combinations of business
transactions (for instance, loans to foreign states, investment of
capital in foreign countries, etc.), and the London money-market as such
does not justify an effective rise in the interest rate; the Bank of
England must then first "make money scarce," as the phrase goes, through
heavy loans in the "open market" and thus artificially create a
situation which justifies, or renders necessary, a rise in the interest
rate; such a manoeuvre becomes more difficult from year to year. —
_F.E_.]

How this raising of the interest rate affects the rates of exchange is
shown by the following testimony before the Committee of the Lower House
concerning bank legislation in 1857 (quoted as B. A. or B. C. 1857).

John Stuart Mill: "2176. When there is a state of commercial difficulty
there is always ... a considerable fall in the price of securities ...
foreigners send over to buy railway shares in this country, or English
holders of foreign railway shares sell their foreign railway shares
abroad ... there is so much transfer of bullion prevented." — "2182. A
large and rich class of bankers and dealers in securities, through whom
the equalisation of the rate of interest and the equalisation of
commercial pressure between different countries usually takes place ...
are always on the look out to buy securities which are likely to
rise.... The place for them to buy securities will be the country which
is sending bullion away." — "2184. These investments of capital took
place to a very considerable extent in 1847, to a sufficient extent to
have relieved the drain considerably."

J. G. Hubbard, ex-Governor, and a Director of the Bank of England since
1838:

"2545. There are great quantities of European securities ... which have
a European currency in all the different money-markets, and those bonds,
as soon as their value is reduced by 1 or 2 per cent in one market, are
immediately purchased for transmission to those markets where their
value is still unimpaired." — "2565. Are not foreign countries
considerably in debt to the merchants of this country? — Very largely."
— "2566. Therefore, the cashment of those debts might be sufficient to
account for a very large accumulation of capital in this country? — In
1847, the ultimate restoration of our position was effected by our
striking off so many millions previously due by America, and so many
millions due by Russia to this country."

[At the same time, England owed these same countries "so and so many
millions" for grain and also did not fail to "draw a line" through the
greater portion of these millions via the bankruptcy of the English
debtors. See the report on Bank Acts, 1857, Chapter XXX above_. — F.E_.]

"2572. In 1847, the exchange between this country and St. Petersburg was
very high. When the Government Letter came out authorising the Bank to
issue irrespectively of the limitation of £14,000,000 [above and beyond
the gold reserve — _F.E._], the stipulation was that the rate of
discount should be 8%. At that moment, with the then rate of discount,
it was a profitable operation to order gold to be shipped from St.
Petersburg to London and on its arrival to lend it at 8% up to the
maturity of the three months' bills drawn against the purchase of gold."
— "2573. In all bullion operations there are many points to be taken
into consideration; there is the rate of exchange and the rate of
interest, which is available for the investment during the period of the
maturity of the bill [drawn against it — _F.E_.]."

 

RATE OF EXCHANGE WITH ASIA

The following points are important because, on the one hand, they show
how England recoups its losses when its rate of exchange with Asia is
unfavourable, at the expense of other countries, whose imports from Asia
are paid through English middlemen. On the other hand, they are
important because Mr. Wilson once again makes the foolish attempt here
to identify the effects of the export of precious metal on the rates of
exchange with the effect of the export of capital in general upon these
rates; the export being in both cases not as a means of paying or
buying, but for capital investment. In the first place, it goes without
saying that whether so many millions of pounds sterling are sent to
India in precious metal or iron rails, to be invested in railways there,
these are merely two different forms of transferring the same amount of
capital to another country; namely, a transfer which does not enter the
calculation of ordinary mercantile business, and for which the exporting
country expects no other return than the future annual revenue from the
income of these railways. If this export is made in the form of precious
metal, it will exert a direct influence upon the money-market and with
it upon the interest rate of the country exporting this precious metal;
if not necessarily under all circumstances, then under the previously
outlined conditions, since it is precious metal and as such is directly
loanable money-capital and the basis of the entire money system.
Similarly, this export also directly affects the rate of exchange.
Precious metal is exported only for the reason, and to the extent, that
bills of exchange, say on India, which are offered in the London
money-market, do not suffice to make these extra remittances. In other
words, there is a demand for Indian bills of exchange which exceeds
their supply, and so the rates turn for a time against England, not
because it is in debt to India, but because it has to send extraordinary
sums to India. In the long run, such a shipment of precious metal to
India must have the effect of increasing the Indian demand for English
commodities, because it indirectly increases the consuming power of
India for European goods. But, if the capital is shipped in the form of
rails, etc., it cannot have any influence on the rates of exchange,
since India has no return payment to make for it. Precisely for this
reason, it need not have any influence on the money-market. Wilson seeks
to establish the existence of such an influence by declaring that such
an extra expenditure would bring about an additional demand for money
accommodation and would thus influence the interest rate. This may be
the case; but to maintain that it must take place under all
circumstances is totally wrong. No matter where the rails are shipped
and whether laid on English or Indian soil, they represent nothing but a
definite expansion of English production in a particular sphere. To
contend that an expansion of production, even within very broad limits,
cannot take place without driving up the interest rate, is absurd. Money
accommodation, _i.e._, the amount of business transacted which includes
credit operations, may grow; but these credit operations can increase
while the interest rate remains unchanged. This was actually the case
during the railway mania in England in the forties. The interest rate
did not rise. And it is evident that, so far as actual capital is
concerned, in this case commodities, the effect on the money-market will
he just the same, whether these commodities are destined for foreign
countries or for domestic consumption. It could only make a difference
when capital investments by England in foreign countries exerted a
restraining influence upon its commercial exports, _i.e._, exports for
which payment must be made, thus giving rise to a return flow, or to the
extent that these capital investments are already general symptoms
indicating the over-expansion of credit and the initiation of swindling
operations.

In the following, Wilson puts the questions and Newmarch replies.

"1786. On a former day you stated, with reference to the demand for
silver for the East, that you believed that the exchanges with India
were in favour of this country, notwithstanding the large amount of
bullion that is continually transmitted to the East; have you any ground
for supposing the exchanges to be in favour of this country? — Yes, I
have.... I find that the real value of the exports from the United
Kingdom to India in 1851 was £7,420,000; to that is to be added the
amount of India House drafts, that is, the funds drawn from India by the
East India Company for the purpose of their own expenditure. Those
drafts in that year amounted to £3,200,000, making, therefore, the total
export from the United Kingdom to India £10,620,000. In 1855... the
actual value of the export of goods from the United Kingdom had risen to
£10,350,000 and the India House drafts were £3,700,000, making,
therefore, the total export from this country £14,050,000. Now as
regards 1851, I believe there are no means of stating what was the real
value of the import of goods from India to this country, but in 1854 and
1855 we have a statement of the real value; in 1855, the total real
value of the imports of goods from India to this country was £12,670,000
and that sum, compared with the £14,050,000 I have mentioned, left a
balance in favour of the United Kingdom, as regards the direct trade
between the two countries, of £1,380,000" [B. A. 1857].

Thereupon Wilson remarks that the rates of exchange are also affected by
indirect commerce. For instance, exports from India to Australia and
North America are covered by drafts on London, and therefore affect the
rate of exchange just as though the commodities had gone directly from
India to England. Furthermore, when India and China are considered
together, the balance is against England, since China has constantly to
make heavy payments to India for opium, and England has to make payments
to China, so that the sums go by this circuitous route to India (1787,
1788).

1791. Wilson now asks if the effect on the rates of exchange will not be
the same whether capital

"went in the form of iron rails and locomotives, or whether it went in
the form of coin."

Newmarch correctly answers:

"The £12 million which have been sent during the last few years to India
for railway construction served to purchase an annuity which India has
to pay at regular intervals to England. "But as far as regards the
immediate operation on the bullion market, the investments of the £12
million would only be operative as far as bullion was required to be
sent out for actual money disbursements."

1797. [Weguelin asks:) "If no return is made for this iron (rails), how
can it be said to affect the exchanges? — I do not think that that part
of the expenditure which is sent out in the form of commodities affects
the computation of the exchange.... The computation of the exchange
between two countries is affected, one might say, solely by the quantity
of obligations or bills offering in one country, as compared with the
quantity offering in the other country against it; that is the rationale
of the exchange. Now, as regards the transmission of those £12,000,000,
the money in the first place is subscribed in this country ... now, if
the nature of the transaction was such that the whole of that
£12,000,000 was required to be laid down in Calcutta, Bombay, and Madras
in treasure ... a sudden demand would very violently operate upon the
price of silver, and upon the exchange, just the same as if the India
Company were to give notice tomorrow that their drafts were to be raised
from £3,000,000 to £12,000,000. But half of those £12,000,000 is spent
... in buying commodities in this country ... iron rails and timber, and
other materials it is an expenditure in this country of the capital of
this country for a particular kind of commodity to be sent out to India,
and there is an end of it." — "1798. [Weguelin:] But the production of
those articles of iron and timber necessary for the railways produces a
large consumption of foreign articles, which might affect the exchange?
— Certainly."

Wilson now thinks that iron represents labour to a large extent, and
that the wage paid for this labour largely represents imported goods
(1799), and then questions further:

"1801. But speaking quite generally, it would have the effect of turning
the exchanges against this country if you sent abroad the articles which
were produced by the consumption of the imported articles without
receiving any remittance for them either in the shape of produce or
otherwise? — That principle is exactly what took place in this country
during the time of the great railway expenditure [1845]. For three or
four or five years, you spent upon railways £30,000,000, nearly the
whole of which went in the payment of wages. You sustained in three
years a larger population employed in constructing railways, and
locomotives, and carriages, and stations than you employed in the whole
of the factory districts. The people ... spent those wages in buying tea
and sugar and spirits and other foreign commodities; those commodities
were imported; but it was a fact, that during the time this great
expenditure was going on the foreign exchanges between this country and
other countries were not materially deranged. There was no efflux of
bullion, on the contrary, there was rather an influx."

1802. Wilson insists that with an equalised trade balance and par rates
between England and India the extra shipment of iron and locomotives
"would affect the exchanges with India." Newmarch cannot see it that way
so long as the rails are sent out as capital investment and India has no
payment to make for them in one form or another; he adds:

"I agree with the principle that no one country can have permanently
against itself an adverse state of exchange with all the other
countries, with which it deals; an adverse exchange with one country
necessarily produces a favourable exchange with another."

Wilson retorts with this triviality:

"1803. But would not a transfer of capital be the same whether it was
sent in one form or another? — As regards the obligation it would." —
"1804. The effect therefore of making railways in India, whether you
send bullion or whether you send materials, would be the same upon the
capital-market here in increasing the value of capital as if the whole
was sent out in bullion?

If iron prices did not rise, it was in any case proof that the "value"
of "capital" contained in the rails had not been increased. What we are
here concerned with is the value of money-capital, _i.e._, the interest
rate. Wilson would like to identify money-capital with capital in
general. The simple fact is essentially that 12 million were subscribed
in England for Indian railways. This is a matter which has nothing
directly to do with the rates of exchange, and the designation of the
£12 million is also the same to the money-market. If the money-market is
in good shape, it need not produce any effect at all on it, just as the
English railway subscriptions in 1844 and 1845 left the money-market
unaffected. If the money-market is already in somewhat difficult
straits, the interest rate might indeed be affected by it, but certainly
only in an upward direction, and this, according to Wilson's theory,
would favourably affect the rates of exchange for England, that is, it
would work against the tendency to export precious metal; if not to
India, then to some other country. Mr. Wilson jumps from one thing to
another. In Question 1802 it is the rates of exchange that are supposed
to be affected, and In Question 1804 the "value of capital" — which are
two very different things. The interest rate may affect the rates of
exchange, and the rates of exchange may affect the interest rate, but
the latter can be stable while the rates of exchange fluctuate, and the
rates of exchange can be stable while the interest rate fluctuates.
Wilson cannot get it through his head that the mere form in which
capital is shipped abroad makes such a difference in the effect, _i.e._,
that the difference in the form of capital is of such importance, and
particularly its money-form, which runs very much counter to enlightened
economy. Newmarch replies to Wilson one-sidedly in that he does not
indicate that he has jumped so suddenly and without reason from rate of
exchange to interest rate. Newmarch answers Question 1804 with
uncertainty and equivocation:

"No doubt, if there is a demand for £12,000,000 to be raised, it is
immaterial, as regards the general rate of interest, whether that £12
million is required to be sent in bullion or in materials. I think,
however"

[a fine transition, this "however," when he intends to say the exact
opposite]

"it is not quite immaterial"

[it is immaterial, but, nevertheless, it is not immaterial]

"because in the one case the £6 million would be returned immediately;
in the other case it would not be returned so rapidly. Therefore it
would make some"

[what definiteness!]

"difference, whether the £6 million was expended in this country or sent
wholly out of it."

What does he mean when he says six million would return immediately? In
so far as the £6 million have been expended in England, they exist in
rails, locomotives, etc., which are shipped to India, whence they do not
return; their value returns very slowly through amortisation, whereas
the six million in precious metal may perhaps return very quickly in
kind. In so far as the six million have been expended in wages, they
have been consumed; but the money used for payment circulates in the
country the same as ever, or forms a reserve. The same holds true for
the profits of rail producers and that portion of the six million which
replaces their constant capital. Thus, this ambiguous statement about
returns is used by Newmarch only to avoid saying directly: The money has
remained in the country, and in so far as it serves as loanable
money-capital the difference for the money-market (aside from the
possibility that circulation could have absorbed more coin) is only that
it is charged to the account of A instead of B. An investment of this
kind, where capital is transferred to other countries in commodities,
not in precious metal, can affect the rate of exchange (but not the rate
of exchange with the country in which the exported capital is invested)
only in so far as the production of these exported commodities requires
an additional import of other foreign commodities. This production then
cannot balance out the additional import. However, the same thing
happens with every export on credit, no matter whether intended for
capital investment or ordinary commercial purposes. Moreover, this
additional import can also call forth by way of reaction an additional
demand for English goods, for instance, on the part of the colonies or
the United States.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Previously (1786), Newmarch stated that, owing to drafts of the East
India Company, exports from England to India were larger than imports.
Sir Charles Wood cross-examines him on this score. This preponderance of
English exports to India over imports from India is actually brought
about by imports from India for which England does not pay any
equivalent. The drafts of the East India Company (now the East India
government) reserve themselves into a tribute levied on India. For
instance, in 1855, imports from India to England amounted to
£12,670,000; English exports to India amounted to £10,350,000; balance
in India's favour £2,250,000. [_i.e_, approximately 2¼ million: more
precisely, £2,320,000. — _Ed._]

"If that was the whole state of the case, that £2,250,000 would have to
be remitted in some form to India. But then come in the advertisements
from the India House. The India House advertise to this effect that they
are prepared to grant drafts on the various presidencies in India to the
extent of £3,250,000."

[This amount was levied for the London expenses of the East India
Company and for the dividends to be paid to stockholders.]

"And that not merely liquidates the £2,250,000 which arose out of the
course of trade, but it presents £1,000,000 of surplus" (1917) [B. A.
1857].

"1922. [Wood:] Then the effect of those India House drafts is not to
increase the exports to India, but _pro tanto_ to diminish them?"

[This should read: to reduce the necessity of covering the imports from
India by exports to that country to the same amount.] Mr. Newmarch
explains this by saying that the British import "good government" into
India for these £3,700,000 (1925). Wood, as a former Minister for India,
knows full well the kind of "good government" which the British import
to India, and correctly replies with irony:

"1926. Then the export, which, you state, is caused by the East India
drafts, is an export of good government, and not of produce."

Since England exports a good deal "in this way" for "good government"
and as capital investment in foreign countries — thus obtaining imports
which are completely independent of the ordinary run of business,
tribute partly for exported "good government" and partly in the form of
revenues from capital invested in the colonies or elsewhere, _i.e._,
tribute for which it does not have to pay any equivalent — it is evident
that the rates of exchange are not affected when England simply consumes
this tribute without exporting anything in return. Hence, it is also
evident that the rates of exchange are not affected when it reinvests
this tribute, not in England, but productively or unproductively in
foreign countries; for instance, when it sends munitions for it to the
Crimea. Moreover, to the extent that imports from abroad enter into the
revenue of England — of course, they must be paid for in the form of
tribute, for which no equivalent return is necessary, or by exchange for
this unpaid tribute or in the ordinary course of commerce — England can
either consume them or reinvest them as capital. In neither case are the
rates of exchange affected, and this is overlooked by the sage Wilson.
Whether a domestic or a foreign product constitutes a part of the
revenue — whereby the latter case merely requires an exchange of
domestic for foreign products — the consumption of this revenue, be it
productive or unproductive, alters nothing in the rates of exchange,
even though it may alter the scale of production. The following should
be read with the foregoing in mind:

1934. Wood asks Newmarch how the shipment of war supplies to the Crimea
would affect the rate of exchange with Turkey. Newmarch replies:

"I do not see that the mere transmission of warlike stores would
necessarily affect the exchange, but certainly the transmission of
treasure would affect the exchange."

In this case he thus distinguishes capital in the form of money from
capital in other forms. But now Wilson asks:

"1935. If you make an export of any article to a great extent, for which
there is to be no corresponding import"

[Mr. Wilson forgets that there are very considerable imports into
England for which corresponding exports have never taken place, except
in the form of "good government" or of previously exported investment
capital; in any case imports which do not enter into normal commercial
movement. But these imports are again exchanged, for instance, for
American products, and the circumstance that American goods are exported
without corresponding imports does not alter the fact that the value of
these imports can be consumed without an equivalent flow abroad; they
have been received without reciprocal exports and can therefore be
consumed without entering into the balance of trade],

"you do not discharge the foreign debt you have created by your imports"

[but, if you have previously paid for these imports, for instance, by
credit given abroad, then no debt is contracted thereby, and the
question has nothing to do with the international balance; it resolves
itself into productive and unproductive expenditures, no matter whether
the products so consumed are domestic or foreign],

"and therefore you must by that transaction affect the exchanges by not
discharging the foreign debt, by reason of your export having no
corresponding imports? — That is true as regards countries generally."

This lecture by Wilson amounts to saying that every export with no
corresponding import is simultaneously an import with no corresponding
export, because foreign, _i.e._, imported, commodities enter into the
production of the exported article. The assumption is that every export
of this kind is based on, or creates, an unpaid import and thus
presupposes a debt abroad. This is wrong, even when the following two
circumstances are disregarded: 1) England receives certain imports free
of charge for which it pays no equivalent, _e.g._, a portion of its
Indian imports. It can exchange these for American imports and export
the latter without importing in return; in any case, so far as the value
is concerned, it has only exported something that has cost it nothing.
2) England may have paid for imports, for instance, American imports,
which constitute additional capital; if it consumes these
unproductively, for instance, as war materials, this does not constitute
any debt towards America and does not affect the rate of exchange with
America. Newmarch contradicts himself in Nos. 1934 and 1935, and Wood
calls this to his attention in No. 1938:

"If no portion of the goods which are employed in the manufacture of the
articles exported without return [war materials], came from the country
to which those articles are sent, how is the exchange with that country
affected; supposing the trade with Turkey to be in an ordinary state of
equilibrium, how is the exchange between this country and Turkey
affected by the export of warlike stores to the Crimea?"

Here Newmarch loses his equanimity; he forgets that he has answered the
same simple question correctly in No. 1934, and says:

"We seem, I think, to have exhausted the practical question, and to have
now attained a very elevated region of metaphysical discussion."

------------------------------------------------------------------------

[Wilson has still another version of his claim that the rate of exchange
is affected by every transfer of capital from one country to another, no
matter whether in the form of precious metal or commodities. Wilson
knows, of course, that the rate of exchange is affected by the interest
rate, particularly by the relation of the rates of interest prevailing
in the two countries whose mutual rates of exchange are under
discussion. If he can now demonstrate that surpluses of capital in
general, _i.e._, in the first place, commodities of all kinds including
precious metal, have a hand in influencing the interest rate, then he is
a step closer to his goal; a transfer of any considerable portion of
this capital to some other country must then change the interest rate in
both countries, with the change taking place in opposite directions.
Thereby, in a secondary way, the rate of exchange between both countries
is also altered. — _F. E_.]

He then says in the _Economist,_ May 22, 1847, page 574, which he edited
at the time:

"No doubt, however, such abundance of capital as is indicated by large
stocks of commodities of all kinds, including bullion, would necessarily
lead, not only to low prices of commodities in general, but also to a
lower rate of interest for the use of capital. If we have a stock of
commodities on hand, which is sufficient to serve the country for two
years to come, a command over those commodities would be obtained for a
given period, at a much lower rate than if the stocks were barely
sufficient to last us two months. All loans of money, in whatever shape
they are made, are simply a transfer of a command over commodities from
one to another. Whenever, therefore, commodities are abundant, the
interest of money must be low, and when they are scarce, the interest of
money must be high. As commodities become abundant, the number of
sellers, in proportion to the number of buyers, increases, and, in
proportion as the quantity is more than is required for immediate
consumption, so must a larger portion be kept for future use. Under
these circumstances, the terms on which a holder becomes willing to sell
for a future payment, or on credit, become lower than if he were certain
that his whole stock would be required within a few weeks".

In regard to the statement, it is to be noted that a large _influx_ in
precious metal can take place simultaneously with a _contraction_ in
production, as is always the case in the period following a crisis. In
the subsequent phase, precious metal may come in from countries which
mainly produce precious metal; imports of other commodities are
generally balanced by exports during this period. In these two phases,
the interest rate is low and rises but slowly; we have already discussed
the reason for this. This low interest rate could always be explained
without recourse to the influence of any "large stocks of commodities of
all kinds." And how is this influence to take place? The low price of
cotton, for instance, renders possible the high profits of the spinners,
etc. Now why is the interest rate low? Surely not because the profit,
which may be made on borrowed capital, is high. But simply and solely
because, under existing conditions, the demand for loan capital does not
grow in proportion to this profit; in other words, because loan capital
has a movement different from industrial capital. What the _Economist_
wants to prove is exactly the reverse, namely, that the movements of
loan capital are identical with those of industrial capital.

In regard to the statement, if we reduce the absurd assumption of stocks
for two years in advance to the point where it begins to take on some
meaning, it signifies that the market is overstocked. This would cause a
fall in prices. Less would have to be paid for a bale of cotton. This
would by no means justify the conclusion that money for the purchase of
this cotton is more easily borrowed. This depends on the state of the
money-market. If money can be borrowed more easily, it is only because
commercial credit is in a state requiring it to make less use than usual
of bank credit. The commodities glutting the market are either means of
subsistence or means of production. The low price of both increases the
industrial capitalist's profit. Why should it depress the interest rate,
unless it be through the antithesis, rather than the identity, between
the abundance of industrial capital and the demand for money
accommodation? Circumstances are such that the merchant and industrial
capitalist can more easily advance credit to one another; owing to this
facilitation of commercial credit, both industrialist as well as
merchant need less bank credit; hence the interest rate can be low. This
low interest rate has nothing to do with the influx in precious metal,
although both may run parallel to each other, and the same causes
bringing about low prices of imported articles may also produce a
surplus of imported precious metal. If the import market were really
glutted, it would prove that a decrease in the demand for imported
articles had taken place, and this would be inexplicable at low prices,
unless it were attributed to a contraction of domestic industrial
production; but this, again, would be inexplicable, so long as there is
excessive importing at low prices. A mass of absurdities — in order to
prove that a fall in prices = a fall in the interest rate. Both may
simultaneously exist side by side. But if they do, it will be a
reflection of the opposition in the directions of the movement of
industrial capital and the movement of loanable money-capital. It will
not be a reflection of their identity.

In regard to the statement, it is hard to understand even after this
exposition why money interest should be low when commodities are
available in abundance. If commodities are cheap, then I may need only
£1,000 instead of the previous £2,000 to buy a definite quantity. But
perhaps I nevertheless invest £2,000, and thus buy twice the quantity
which I could have bought formerly. In this way, I expand my business by
advancing the same capital, which I may have to borrow. I buy £2,000
worth of commodities, the same as before. My demand on the money-market
therefore remains the same, even though my demand on the
commodity-market rises with the fall in commodity-prices. But if this
demand for commodities should decrease, that is, if production should
not expand with the fall in commodity-prices, an event which would
contradict all the laws of the _Economist,_ then the demand for loanable
money-capital would decrease, although the profit would increase. But
this increasing profit would create a demand for loan capital.
Incidentally, a low level of commodity-prices may be due to three
causes. First, to lack of demand. In such a case, the interest rate is
low because production is paralysed and not because commodities are
cheap, for the low prices are but a rejection of that paralysis. Second,
it may be due to supply exceeding demand. This may be the result of a
glut on the market, etc., which may lead to a crisis and coincide with a
high interest rate during the crisis itself; or, it may be the result of
a fall in the value of commodities, so that the same demand can be
satisfied at lower prices. Why should the interest rate fall in the last
case? Because profits increase? If this were due to less money-capital
being required for obtaining the same productive or commodity-capital,
it would merely prove that profit and interest are inversely
proportional to each other. In any case, the general statement of the
_Economist_ is false. Low money-prices for commodities and a low
interest rate do not necessarily go together. Otherwise, the interest
rate would be lowest in the poorest countries, where money-prices for
produce are lowest, and highest in the richest countries, where
money-prices for agricultural products are highest. In general, the
_Economist_ admits: If the value of money falls, it exerts no influence
on the interest rate. £100 bring £105 the same as ever. If the £100 are
worth less, so are the £5 interest. This relation is not affected by the
appreciation or depreciation of the original sum. Considered from the
point of view of value, a definite quantity of commodities is equal to a
definite sum of money. If this value increases, it is equal to a larger
sum of money. The opposite is true when it falls. If the value is equal
to 2,000, then 5% = 100; if it is equal to 1,000, then 5% = 50. But this
does not alter the interest rate in any way. The rational part of this
matter is merely that greater money accommodation is required when it
takes £2,000 to sell the same quantity of commodities than when only
£1,000 are required. But this merely shows that profit and interest are
here inversely proportional to each other. For the lower the prices of
the components of constant and variable capital, the higher the profit
and the lower the interest. But the opposite can also be and is often
the case. For instance, cotton may be cheap because no demand exists for
yarn and fabrics; and cotton may be relatively expensive because a large
profit in the cotton industry creates a great demand for it. On the
other hand, the profits of industrialists may be high precisely because
the price of cotton is low. Hubbard's table proves that the interest
rate and the prices of commodities execute completely independent
movements, whereas the movements of the interest rate adhere closely to
those of the metal reserve and the rates of exchange.

The _Economist_ states:

"Whenever, therefore, commodities are abundant, the interest of money
must be low."

Precisely the opposite obtains during crises. Commodities are
superabundant, inconvertible into money, and therefore the interest rate
is high; in another phase of the cycle the demand for commodities is
great and therefore quick returns are made, but at the same time, prices
are rising and because of the quick returns the interest rate is low.

"When they [the commodities] are scarce, the interest of money must be
high."

The opposite is again true in the slack period following a crisis.
Commodities are scarce, absolutely speaking, not with reference to
demand; and the interest rate is low.

In regard to the statement, it is pretty evident that an owner of
commodities, provided he can sell the latter at all, will get rid of
them at a lower price when the market is glutted than he would when
there is a prospect of the existing supply becoming rapidly exhausted.
But why the interest rate should fall because of that is not so clear.

If the market is glutted with imported commodities, the interest rate
may rise as a result of an increased demand on the part of the owners
for loan capital, in order to avoid dumping their commodities on the
market. The interest rate may fall, because the fluidity of commercial
credit may keep the demand for bank credit relatively low.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The _Economist_ mentions the rapid effect on rates of exchange in 1847
of the raising of the interest rate and other circumstances exerting
pressure on the money-market. But it should be borne in mind that the
gold drain continued until the end of April in spite of the change in
the rates of exchange; a turn did not take place here until early May.

On January 1, 1847, the metal reserve of the Bank was £15,066,691; the
interest rate 3½%; three months' rates of exchange on Paris 25.75; on
Hamburg 13.10; on Amsterdam 12.3¼. On March 5, the metal reserve had
fallen to £11,595,535; the discount had risen to 4%; the rate of
exchange fell to 25.67½ on Paris; 13.9¼ on Hamburg; and 12.2½ on
Amsterdam. The drain of gold continued. See the following table:

  ---------- --------------------- --------------------- ------------- --------- -----------
  1847       Bullion Reserve of    Money-Market          Highest                 
             the Bank of England                         Three-Month             
                                                         Rates                   

                                                         Paris         Hamburg   Amsterdam

  March 20   11,231,630            Bank disc. 4%         25.67½        13.9¾     12.2½

  April 3    10,246,410            ,, ,, 5%              25.80         13.10     12.3½

  April 10   9,867,053             Money very scarce     25.90         13.10½    12.4½

  April 17   9,329,841             Bank disc. 5.5%       26.02½        13.40¾    12.5½

  April 24   9,213,890             Pressure              26.05         13.12     12.6

  May 4      9,337,746             Increasing pressure   26.45         13.12¾    12.6½

  May 8      9,588,759             Highest pressure      26.27½        13.15½    12.7¾
  ---------- --------------------- --------------------- ------------- --------- -----------

In 1847, the total export of precious metal from England amounted to
£8,602,597.

Of this to the

  --------------- ------------
  United States   £3,226,411
  France          £2,479,892
  Hanse towns     £958,781
  Holland         £247,743
  --------------- ------------

In spite of the change in the rates at the end of March, the drain of
gold continued for another full month, probably to the United States.

"We thus see" [says the _Economist,_ August 2, 1847, p. 954] "how rapid
and striking was the effect of a rise in the rate of interest, and the
pressure which ensued in correcting an adverse exchange, and in turning
the tide of bullion back to this country. This effect was produced
entirely independent of the balance of trade. A higher rate of interest
caused a lower price of securities, both foreign and English, and
induced large purchases to be made on foreign account, which increased
the amount of bills to be drawn from this country, while, on the other
hand, the high rate of interest and the difficulty of obtaining money
was such that the demand of those bills fell off, while their amount
increased.... For the same cause orders for imports were countermanded,
and investments of English funds abroad were realised and brought home
for employment here. Thus, for example, we read in the _Rio de Janeiro
Price Current_ of the 10th May, 'Exchange [on England] has experienced a
further decline, principally caused by a pressure on the market for
remittance of the proceeds of large sales of [Brazilian] government
stock, on English account. Capital belonging to this country, which has
been invested in public and other securities abroad, when the interest
was very low here, was thus again brought back when the interest became
high."

 

ENGLAND'S BALANCE OF TRADE

India alone has to pay 5 million in tribute for "good government,"
interest and dividends on British capital, etc., not counting the sums
sent home annually by officials as savings from their salaries, or by
English merchants as part of their profit to be invested in England.
Every British colony continually has to make large remittances for the
same reason. Most of the banks in Australia, the West Indies, and
Canada, have been founded with English capital, and the dividends are
payable in England. In the same way, England owns many foreign
securities — European, North American and South American — on which it
draws interest. In addition to this it has interests in foreign
railways, canals, mines, etc., with corresponding dividends. Remittance
on all these items is made almost exclusively in products over and above
the amount of English exports. On the other hand what is sent from
England to owners of English securities abroad and for consumption by
Englishmen abroad, is insignificant in comparison.

The question, so far as it concerns the balance of trade and the rates
of exchange, is "at any particular moment one of time."

"Practically speaking ... England gives long credits upon her exports,
while the imports are paid for in ready money. At particular moments
this difference of practice has a considerable effect upon the
exchanges. At a time when our exports are very considerably increasing,
_e.g._, 1850, a continual increase of investment of British capital must
be going on ... in this way remittances of 1850 may be made against
goods exported in 1849. But if the exports of 1850 exceed those of 1849
by more than 6 million, the practical effect must he that more money is
sent abroad, to this amount, than returned in the same year. And in this
way an effect is produced on the rates of exchange and the rate of
interest. When, on the contrary, our trade is depressed after a
commercial crisis, and when our exports are much reduced, the
remittances due for the past years of larger exports greatly exceed the
value of our imports; the exchanges become correspondingly in our
favour, capital rapidly accumulates at home, and the rate of interest
becomes less." _(Economist,_ January 11, 1851 [p. 30].)

The foreign rates of exchange can change:

1) In consequence of the immediate balance of payments, no matter what
the cause — a purely mercantile one, or capital investment abroad, or
government expenditures for wars, etc., in so far as cash payments
thereby are made to foreign countries.

2) In consequence of money depreciation — whether metal or paper — in a
particular country. This is purely nominal. If £1 should represent only
half as much money as formerly, it would naturally be counted as 12.5
francs instead of 25 francs.

3) When it is a matter of a rate of exchange between countries, of which
one uses silver and the other gold as "money," the rate of exchange
depends upon the relative fluctuations of the value of these two metals,
since these necessarily alter the parity between them. This is
illustrated by the rates of exchange in 1850; they were unfavourable to
England, although that country's export rose enormously. Yet no drain of
gold took place. This was a result of a momentary rise in the value of
silver as against gold. (See _Economist,_ November 30, 1850 [pp.
1319-1320].)

Parity for the rate of exchange of £1 is: Paris, 25 francs 20 cent.;
Hamburg, 13 marks banko 10.5 shillings; Amsterdam, 11 florins 97 cent.
To the extent that the Paris rate of exchange exceeds 25.20 francs, it
becomes more favourable to the English debtor of France, or the buyer of
French commodities. In both cases he needs fewer pounds sterling in
order to accomplish his purpose. — In remoter countries, where precious
metal is not easily obtained when bills of exchange are scarce and
insufficient for remittances to be made to England, the natural effect
is to drive up the prices of such products as are generally shipped to
England since a greater demand arises for them, in order to send them to
England in place of bills of exchange; this is often the case in India.

An unfavourable rate of exchange, or even a drain on gold, can take
place when there is a great abundance of money in England, the interest
rate is low and the price for securities is high.

In the course of 1848 England received large quantities of silver from
India, since good bills of exchange were rare and mediocre ones were not
readily accepted in consequence of the crisis of 1847 and the general
lack of credit in business with India. All this silver had barely
arrived before it found its way to the continent, where the revolution
led to the formation of many hoards. The bulk of the same silver made
the trip back to India in 1850, since the rate of exchange now made this
profitable.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The monetary system is essentially a Catholic institution, the credit
system essentially Protestant. "The Scotch hate gold." In the form of
paper the monetary existence of commodities is only a social one. It is
_Faith_ that brings salvation. Faith in money-value as the immanent
spirit of commodities, faith in the mode of production and its
predestined order, faith in the individual agents of production as mere
personifications of self-expanding capital. But the credit system does
not emancipate itself from the basis of the monetary system any more
than Protestantism has emancipated itself from the foundations of
Catholicism.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

14. The effect this had on the money-market is indicated by the
following testimony of Newmarch: "1509. At the close of 1853, there was
a considerable apprehension in the public mind, and in September of that
year the Bank of England raised its discount on three occasions... In
the early part of October there was a considerable degree of
apprehension and alarm in the public mind. That apprehension and alarm
was relieved to a very great extent before the end of November, and was
almost wholly removed, in consequence of the arrival of nearly
£5,000,000 of treasure from Australia... The same thing happened in the
autumn of 1854, by the arrival in the months of October and November of
nearly £6,000,000 of treasure. The same thing happened again in the
autumn of 1855, which we know was a period of excitement and alarm, by
the arrivals, in the three months of September, October and November, of
nearly £8,000,000 of treasure; and then at the close of last year, 1856,
we find exactly the same occurrence. In truth, I might appeal to the
observation almost of any member of the Committee, whether the natural
and complete solvent to which we have got into the habit of looking for
any financial pressure, is not the arrival of a gold ship" [B. A. 1857].

15. According to Newmarch, a drain of gold to foreign countries can
arise from three causes: 1) from purely commercial conditions, that is,
if imports have exceeded exports, as was the case in 1836 to 1844, and
again in 1847 — principally a heavy import of grain; 2) in order to
secure the means for investing English capital in foreign countries, as
in 1857 for railways in India, and 3) for definite expenditures abroad,
as in 1853 and 1854 for war purposes in the Orient.

16. 1918. Newmarch. "When you combine India and China, when you bring
into account the transactions between India and Australia, and the still
more important transactions between China and the United States, the
trade being a triangular one, and the adjustment taking place through us
... then it is true that the balance of trade was not merely against
this country, but against France, and against the United States." — (B.
A. 1857.)

17. See, for instance, the ridiculous reply of Weguelin [B.A. 1857]
where he states that a drain of five million in gold is so much capital
less, and thus attempts to explain certain phenomena which do _not_ take
place when there is an infinitely greater increase in prices or
depreciation, expansion or contraction of real industrial capital. On
the other hand, it is just as ridiculous to attempt to explain these
phenomena directly as symptoms of an expansion or contraction of the
mass of real capital (considered from the viewpoint of its material
elements).

18. Newmarch (B. A. 1857): "1364. The reserve of bullion in the Bank of
England is, in truth, the central reserve or hoard of treasure upon
which the whole trade of the country is made to turn; all the other
banks in the country look to the Bank of England as the central hoard or
reservoir from which they are to draw their reserve of coin; and it is
upon that hoard or reservoir that the action of the foreign exchanges
always falls."

19. "Practically, then, both Mr. Tooke and Mr. Loyd would meet an
additional demand for gold ... by an early ... contraction of credit by
raising the rate of interest, and restricting advances of capital....
But the principles of Mr. Loyd lead to certain [legal] restrictions and
regulations which produce the most serious inconvenience." _(Economist_
[December 11], 1847, p. 1418.)

20. "You quite agree that there is no mode by which you can modify the
demand for bullion except by raising the rate of interest?" — Chapman
[associate member of the great bill-brokers' firm of Overend, Gurney &
Co.]: "I should say so.... When our bullion falls to a certain point, we
had better sound the tocsin at once and say we are drooping, and every
man sending money abroad must do it at his own peril." (B. A. 1857,
Evidence No. 5057.)

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 36. Pre-Capitalist Relationships

 

Interest-bearing capital, or, as we may call it in its antiquated form,
usurer's capital, belongs together with its twin brother, merchant's
capital, to the antediluvian forms of capital, which long precede the
capitalist mode of production and are to be found in the most diverse
economic formations of society.

The existence of usurer's capital merely requires that at least a
portion of products should be transformed into commodities, and that
money should have developed in its various functions along with trade in
commodities.

The development of usurer's capital is bound up with the development of
merchant's capital and especially that of money-dealing capital. In
ancient Rome, beginning with the last years of the Republic, when
manufacturing stood far below its average level of development in the
ancient world, merchant's capital, money-dealing capital, and usurer's
capital developed to their highest point within the ancient form.

We have seen (English edition: Vol. I, pp. 130-34. — _Ed._) that
hoarding necessarily appears along with money. But the professional
hoarder does not become important until he is transformed into a usurer.

The merchant borrows money in order to make a profit with it, in order
to use it as capital, that is, to expend it. Hence in earlier forms of
society the money-lender stands in the same relation to him as to the
modern capitalist. This specific relation was also experienced by the
Catholic universities.

"The universities of Alcalá, Salamanca, Ingolstadt, Freiburg in
Breisgau, Mayence, Cologne, Trèves, one after another recognized the
legality of interest for commercial loans. The first five of these
approbations were deposited in the archives of the Consulate of the city
of Lyons and published in the appendix to the _Traitè de l'usure et des
intérêts_, by Bruyset-Ponthus, Lyons." (M. Augier, _Le Crèdit public,
etc._, Paris, 1842, p. 206.)

In all the forms in which slave economy (not the patriarchal kind, but
that of later Grecian and Roman times) serves as a means of amassing
wealth, where money therefore is a means of appropriating the labour of
others through the purchase of slaves, land, etc., money can be expanded
as capital, i.e., bear interest, for the very reason that it can be so
invested.

The characteristic forms, however, in which usurer's capital exists in
periods antedating capitalist production are of two kinds. I purposely
say characteristic forms. The same forms repeat themselves on the basis
of capitalist production, but as mere subordinate forms. They are then
no longer the forms which determine the character of interest-bearing
capital. These two forms are: first, usury by lending money to
extravagant members of the upper classes, particularly landowners;
secondly, usury by lending money to small producers who possess their
own conditions of labour — this includes the artisan, but mainly the
peasant, since particularly under pre-capitalist conditions, in so far
as they permit of small independent individual producers, the peasant
class necessarily constitutes the overwhelming majority of them.

Both the ruin of rich landowners through usury and the impoverishment of
the small producers lead to the formation and concentration of large
amounts of money-capital. But to what extent this process does away with
the old mode of production, as happened in modern Europe, and whether it
puts the capitalist mode of production in its stead, depends entirely
upon the stage of historical development and the attendant
circumstances.

Usurer's capital as the characteristic form of interest-bearing capital
corresponds to the predominance of small-scale production of the
self-employed peasant and small master craftsman. When the labourer is
confronted by the conditions of labour and by the product of labour in
the shape of capital, as under the developed capitalist mode of
production, he has no occasion to borrow any money as a producer. When
he does any money borrowing, he does so, for instance, at the pawnshop
to secure personal necessities. But wherever the labourer is the owner,
whether actual or nominal, of his conditions of labour and his product,
he stands as a producer in relation to the money-lender's capital, which
confronts him as usurer's capital. Newman expresses the matter insipidly
when he says the banker is respected, while the usurer is hated and
despised, because the banker lends to the rich, whereas the usurer lends
to the poor. (F. W. Newman, _Lectures on Political Economy_, London,
1851, p. 44.) He overlooks the fact that a difference between two modes
of social production and their corresponding social orders lies at the
heart of the matter and that the situation cannot be explained by the
distinction between rich and poor. Moreover, the usury which sucks dry
the small producer goes hand in hand with the usury which sucks dry the
rich owner of a large estate. As soon as the usury of the Roman
patricians had completely ruined the Roman plebeians, the small
peasants, this form of exploitation came to an end and a pure slave
economy replaced the small-peasant economy.

In the form of interest, the entire surplus above the barest means of
subsistence (the amount that later becomes wages of the producers) can
be consumed by usury (this later assumes the form of profit and
ground-rent), and hence it is highly absurd to compare the level of this
interest, which assimilates all the surplus-value excepting the share
claimed by the state, with the level of the modern interest rate, where
interest constitutes at least normally only a part of the surplus-value.
Such a comparison overlooks that the wage-worker produces and gives to
the capitalist who employs him, profit, interest and ground-rent, i.e.,
the entire surplus-value. Carey makes this absurd comparison in order to
show how advantageous the development of capital, and the fall in the
interest rate that accompanies it, are for the labourer. Furthermore,
while the usurer, not content with squeezing the surplus-labour out of
his victim, gradually acquires possession even of his very conditions of
labour, land, house, etc., and is continually engaged in thus
expropriating him, it is again forgotten that, on the other hand, this
complete expropriation of the labourer from his conditions of labour is
not a result which the capitalist mode of production seeks to achieve,
but rather the established condition for its point of departure. The
wage-slave, just like the real slave, cannot become a creditor's slave
due to his position — at least in his capacity as producer; the
wage-slave, it is true, can become a creditor's slave in his capacity as
consumer. Usurer's capital in the form whereby it indeed appropriates
all of the surplus-labour of the direct producers, without altering the
mode of production; whereby the ownership or possession by the producers
of the conditions of labour and small-scale production corresponding to
this — is its essential prerequisite; whereby, in other words, capital
does not directly subordinate labour to itself, and does not, therefore,
confront it as industrial capital — this usurer's capital impoverishes
the mode of production, paralyses the productive forces instead of
developing them, and at the same time perpetuates the miserable
conditions in which the social productivity of labour is not developed
at the expense of labour itself, as in the capitalist mode of
production.

Usury thus exerts, on the one hand, an undermining and destructive
influence on ancient and feudal wealth and ancient and feudal property.
On the other hand, it undermines and ruins small-peasant and
small-burgher production, in short, all forms in which the producer
still appears as the owner of his means of production. Under the
developed capitalist mode of production, the labourer is not the owner
of the means of production, i.e., the field which he cultivates, the raw
materials which he processes, etc. But under this system separation of
the producer from the means of production reflects an actual revolution
in the mode of production itself. The isolated labourers are brought
together in large workshops for the purpose of carrying out separate but
interconnected activities; the tool becomes a machine. The mode of
production itself no longer permits the dispersion of the instruments of
production associated with small property; nor does it permit the
isolation of the labourer himself. Under the capitalist mode of
production usury can no longer separate the producer from his means of
production, for they have already been separated.

Usury centralizes money wealth where the means of production are
dispersed. It does not alter the mode of production, but attaches itself
firmly to it like a parasite and makes it wretched. It sucks out its
blood, enervates it and compels reproduction to proceed under ever more
pitiable conditions. Hence the popular hatred against usurers, which was
most pronounced in the ancient world where ownership of means of
production by the producer himself was at the same time the basis for
political status, the independence of the citizen.

To the extent that slavery prevails, or in so far as the surplus product
is consumed by the feudal lord and his retinue, while either the
slave-owner or the feudal lord fall into the clutches of the usurer, the
mode of production still remains the same; it only becomes harder on the
labourer. The indebted slave holder or feudal lord becomes more
oppressive because he is himself more oppressed. Or he finally makes way
for the usurer, who becomes a landed proprietor or a slave-holder
himself, like the knights in ancient Rome. The place of the old
exploiter, whose exploitation was more or less patriarchal because it
was largely a means of political power, is taken by a hard, money mad
parvenu. But the mode of production itself is not altered thereby.

Usury has a revolutionary effect in all pre-capitalist modes of
production only in so far as it destroys and dissolves those forms of
property on whose solid foundation and continual reproduction in the
same form the political organization is based. Under Asian forms, usury
can continue a long time, without producing anything more than economic
decay and political corruption. Only where and when the other
prerequisites of capitalist production are present does usury become one
of the means assisting in establishment of the new mode of production by
ruining the feudal lord and small-scale producer, on the one hand, and
centralizing the conditions of labour into capital, on the other.

In the Middle Ages no country had a general rate of interest. The Church
forbade, from the outset, all lending at interest. Laws and courts
offered little protection for loans. Interest was so much the higher in
individual cases. The limited circulation of money, the need to make
most payments in cash, compelled people to borrow money, and all the
more so when the exchange business has still undeveloped. Therefore
large divergences both in interest rates and the conceptions of usury.
In the time of Charlemagne it was considered usurious to charge 100%. In
Lindau on Lake Constance, some local burghers took 216⅔% in 1348. In
Zurich, the City Council decreed that 43⅓% should be the legal interest
rate. In Italy 40% had to be paid sometimes, although the usual rate
from the 12th to the 14th century did not exceed 20%. Verona ordered
that 12½% be the legal rate. Emperor Friedrich II fixed the rate at 10%,
but only for Jews. He did not deign to speak for Christians. In the
German Rhine provinces, 10% was the rule as early as the 13th century.
(Hullmann, _Geschichte des Städtewesens,_ II, S. 55-57.)

Usurer's capital employs the method of exploitation characteristic of
capital yet without the latter's mode of production. This condition also
repeats itself within bourgeois economy, in backward branches of
industry or in those branches which resist the transition to the modern
mode of production. For instance, if we wish to compare the English
interest rate with the Indian, we should not take the interest rate of
the Bank of England, but rather, e.g., that charged by lenders of small
machinery to small producers in domestic industry.

Usury, in contradistinction to consuming wealth, is historically
important, inasmuch as it is in itself a process generating capital.
Usurer's capital and merchant's wealth promote the formation of moneyed
wealth independent of landed property. The less products assume the
character of commodities, and the less intensively and extensively
exchange-value has taken hold of production, the more does money appear
as actual wealth as such, as wealth in general — in contrast to its
limited representation in use-values. This is the basis of hoarding.
Aside from money as world-money and as hoard, it is, in particular, the
form of means of payment whereby it appears as the absolute form of
commodities. And it is especially its function as a means of payment
which develops interest and thereby money-capital. What squandering and
corrupting wealth desires is money as such, money as a means of buying
everything (also as a means of paying debts). The small producer needs
money above all for making payments. (The transformation of services and
taxes in kind to landlords and the state into money-rent and money-taxes
plays a great role here.) In either case, money is needed as such. On
the other hand, it is in usury that hoarding first becomes reality and
that the hoarder fulfills his dream. What is sought from the owner of a
hoard is not capital, but money as such; but by means of interest he
transforms this hoard of money into capital, that is, into a means of
appropriating surplus labour in part or in its entirety, and similarly
securing a hold on a part of the means of production themselves, even
though they may nominally remain the property of others. Usury lives in
the pores of production, as it were, just as the gods of Epicurus lived
in the space between worlds. Money is so much harder to obtain, the less
the commodity-form constitutes the general form of products. Hence the
usurer knows no other barrier but the capacity of those who need money
to pay or to resist. In small-peasant and small-burgher production money
serves as a means of purchase, mainly, whenever the means of production
of the labourer (who is still predominantly their owner under these
modes of production) are lost to him either by accident or through
extraordinary upheavals, or at least are not replaced in the normal
course of reproduction. Means of subsistence and raw materials
constitute an essential part of these requirements of production. If
these become more expensive, it may make it impossible to replace them
out of the returns for the product, just as ordinary crop failures may
prevent the peasant from replacing his seed in kind. The same wars
through which the Roman patricians ruined the plebe jails by compelling
them to serve as soldiers and which prevented them from reproducing
their conditions of labour, and therefore made paupers of them (and
pauperization, the crippling or loss of the prerequisites of
reproduction is here the predominant form) these same wars filled the
store-rooms and coffers of the patricians with looted copper, the money
of that time. Instead of directly giving plebeians the necessary
commodities, i.e., grain, horses, and cattle, they loaned them this
copper for which they had no use themselves, and took advantage of this
situation to exact enormous usurious interest, thereby turning the
plebeians into their debtor slaves. During the reign of Charlemagne, the
Frankish peasants were likewise ruined by wars, so that they faced no
choice but to become serfs instead of debtors. In the Roman Empire, as
is known, extreme hunger frequently resulted in the sale of children and
also in free men selling themselves as slaves to the rich. So much for
general turning-points. In individual cases the maintenance or loss of
the means of production on the part of small producers depends on a
thousand contingencies, and every one of these contingencies or losses
signifies impoverishment and becomes a crevice into which a parasitic
usurer may creep. The mere death of his cow may render the small peasant
incapable of renewing his reproduction on its former scale. He then
falls into the clutches of the usurer, and once in the usurer's power he
can never extricate himself.

The really important and characteristic domain of the usurer, however,
is the function of money as a means of payment. Every payment of money,
ground-rent, tribute, tax, etc., which becomes due on a certain date,
carries with it the need to secure money for such a purpose. Hence from
the days of ancient Rome to those of modern times, wholesale usury
relies upon tax-collectors, _fermiers gènèraux_, _receveurs gènèraux_.
Then, there develops with commerce and the generalization of commodity-
production the separation, in time, of purchase and payment. The money
has to be paid on a definite date. How this can lead to circumstances in
which the money-capitalist and usurer, even nowadays, merge into one is
shown by modern money crises. This same usury, however, becomes one of
the principal means of further developing the necessity for money as a
means of payment — by driving the producer ever more deeply into debt
and destroying his usual means of payment, since the burden of interest
alone makes his normal reproduction impossible. At this point, usury
sprouts up out of money as a means of payment and extends this function
of money as its very own domain.

The credit system develops as a reaction against usury. But this should
not be misunderstood, nor by any means interpreted in the manner of the
ancient writers, the church fathers, Luther or the early socialists. It
signifies no more and no less than the subordination of interest-bearing
capital to the conditions and requirements of the capitalist mode of
production.

On the whole, interest-bearing capital under the modern credit system is
adapted to the conditions of the capitalist mode of production. Usury as
such does not only continue to exist, but is even freed, among nations
with a developed capitalist production, from the fetters imposed upon it
by all previous legislation. Interest-bearing capital retains the form
of usurer's capital in relation to persons or classes, or in
circumstances where borrowing does not, nor can, take place in the sense
corresponding to the capitalist mode of production; where borrowing
takes place as a result of individual need, as at the pawnshop; where
money is borrowed by wealthy spendthrifts for the purpose of
squandering; or where the producer is a non-capitalist producer, such as
a small farmer or craftsman, who is thus still, as the immediate
producer, the owner of his own means of production; finally where the
capitalist producer himself operates on such a small scale that he
resembles those self-employed producers.

What distinguishes interest-bearing capital — in so far as it is an
essential element of the capitalist mode of production — from usurer's
capital is by no means the nature or character of this capital itself.
It is merely the altered conditions under which it operates, and
consequently also the totally transformed character of the borrower who
confronts the money-lender. Even when a man without fortune receives
credit in his capacity of industrialist or merchant, it occurs with the
expectation that he will function as capitalist and appropriate unpaid
labour with the borrowed capital. He receives credit in his capacity of
potential capitalist. The circumstance that a man without fortune but
possessing energy, solidity, ability and business acumen may become a
capitalist in this manner — and the commercial value of each individual
is pretty accurately estimated under the capitalist mode of production —
is greatly admired by apologists of the capitalist system. Although this
circumstance continually brings an unwelcome number of new soldiers of
fortune into the field and into competition with the already existing
individual capitalists, it also reinforces the supremacy of capital
itself, expands its base and enables it to recruit ever new forces for
itself out of the substratum of society. In a similar way, the
circumstance that the Catholic Church in the Middle Ages formed its
hierarchy out of the best brains in the land, regardless of their
estate, birth or fortune, was one of the principal means of
consolidating ecclesiastical rule and suppressing the laity. The more a
ruling class is able to assimilate the foremost minds of a ruled class,
the more stable and dangerous becomes its rule.

The initiators of the modern credit system take as their point of
departure not an anathema against interest-bearing capital in general,
but on the contrary, its explicit recognition.

We are not referring here to such reactions against usury which
attempted to protect the poor against it, like the _Monts-de-piètè_
(1350 in Sarlins in Franche-Comté, later in Perugia and Savona in Italy,
1400 and 1479). These are noteworthy mainly because they reveal the
irony of history, which turns pious wishes into their very opposite
during the process of realization. According to a moderate estimate, the
English working-class pays 100% to the pawnshops, the modern successors
of _Monts-de-piètè_ ^([21]) We are also not referring to the credit
fantasies of such men as Dr. Hugh Chamberleyne or John Briscoe, who
attempted during the last decade of the 17th century to emancipate the
English aristocracy from usury by means of a farmers' bank using paper
money based on real estate. ^([22])

The credit associations established in the 12th and 14th centuries in
Venice and Genoa arose from the need for marine commerce and the
wholesale trade associated with it to emancipate themselves from the
domination of outmoded usury and the monopolization of the money
business. While the actual banks founded in those city-republics assumed
simultaneously the shape of public credit institutions from which the
state received loans on future tax revenues, it should not be forgotten
that the merchants founding those associations were themselves prominent
citizens of those states and as much interested in emancipating their
government as they were in emancipating themselves from the exactions of
usurers, ^([23]) and at the same time in getting tighter and more secure
control over the state. Hence, when the Bank of England was to be
established, the Tories also protested:

"Banks are republican institutions. Flourishing banks existed in Venice,
Genoa, Amsterdam, and Hamburg. But who ever heard of a Bank of France or
Spain?"

The Bank of Amsterdam, in 1609, was not epoch-making in the development
of the modern credit system any more than that of Hamburg in 1619. It
was purely a bank for deposits. The checks issued by the bank were
indeed merely receipts for the deposited coined and uncoined precious
metal, and circulated only with the endorsement of the acceptors. But in
Holland commercial credit and dealing in money developed hand in hand
with commerce and manufacture, and interest-bearing capital was
subordinated to industrial and commercial capital by the course of
development itself. This could already be seen in the low interest rate.
Holland, however, was considered in the 17th century the model of
economic development, as England is now. The monopoly of old-style
usury, based on poverty, collapsed in that country of its own weight.

During the entire 18th century there is the cry, with Holland referred
to as an example, for a compulsory reduction of the rate of interest
(and legislation acts accordingly), in order to subordinate
interest-bearing capital to commercial and industrial capital, instead
of the reverse. The main spokesman for this movement is Sir Josiah
Child, the father of ordinary English private banking. He declaims
against the monopoly of usurers in much the same way as the wholesale
clothing manufacturers, Moses & Son, do when leading the light against
the monopoly of "private tailors." This same Josiah Child is
simultaneously the father of English stock-jobbing. Thus, this autocrat
of the East India Company defends its monopoly in the name of free
trade. Versus Thomas Manley _(Interest of Money Mistaken_ — Thomas
Manley was not the author of this book. It was published anonymously in
London in 1668. — _Ed._) he says:

"As the champion of the timid and trembling band of usurers he erects
his main batteries at that point which I have declared to be the weakest
he denies point-blank that the low rate of interest is the cause of
wealth and vows that it is merely its effect." (_Traitès sur le
Commerce, etc._, 1669, trad. Amsterdam et Berlin, 1754.) "If it is
commerce that enriches a country, and if a lowering of interest
increases commerce, then a lowering of interest or a restriction of
usury is doubtless a fruitful primary cause of the wealth of a nation.
It is not at all absurd to say that the same thing may be simultaneously
a cause under certain circumstances, and an effect under others" (l. c.,
p. 155). "The egg is the cause of the hen, and the hen is the cause of
the egg. The lowering of interest may cause an increase of wealth, and
the increase of wealth may cause a still greater reduction of interest"
(l. c., p. 156). "I am the defender of industry and my opponent defends
laziness and sloth" (p. 179).

This violent battle against usury, this demand for the subordination of
interest-bearing capital to industrial capital, is but the herald of the
organic creations that establish these prerequisites of capitalist
production in the modern banking system, which on the one hand robs
usurer's capital of its monopoly by concentrating all idle money
reserves and throwing them on the money market, and on the other hand
limits the monopoly of the precious metal itself by creating
credit-money.

The same opposition to usury, the demand for the emancipation of
commerce, industry and the state from usury, which are observed here in
the case of Child, will be found in all writings on banking in England
during the last third of the 17th and the early 18th centuries. We also
find colossal illusions about the miraculous effects of credit,
abolition of the monopoly of precious metal, its displacement by paper,
etc. The Scotsman William Paterson, founder of the Bank of England and
the Bank of Scotland, is by all odds Law the First.

Against the Bank of England "all goldsmiths and pawnbrokers set up a
howl of rage." (Macaulay, _History of England_, IV, p.499.)

"During the first ten years the Bank had to struggle with great
difficulties; great foreign feuds; its notes were only accepted far
below their nominal value ... the goldsmiths" (in whose hands the trade
in precious metals served as a basis of a primitive banking business)
"were jealous of the Bank, because their business was diminished, their
discounts were lowered, their transactions with the government had
passed to their opponents." (3. Francis, l. c., p. 73.)

Even before the establishment of the Bank of England a plan was proposed
in 1683 for a National Bank of Credit, which had for its purpose, among
others,

"that tradesmen, when they have a considerable quantity of goods, may,
by the help of this bank, deposit their goods, by raising a credit on
their own dead stock, employ their servants, and increase their trade,
till they get a good market instead of selling them at a loss" [J.
Francis, l. c., pp. 39-40].

After many endeavors this Bank of Credit was established in Devonshire
House on Bishopsgate Street. It made loans to industrialists and
merchants on the security of deposited goods to the amount of
three-quarters of their value, in the form of bills of exchange. In
order to make these bills of exchange capable of circulating, a number
of people in each branch of business were organized into a society, from
which every possessor of such bills would be able to obtain goods with
the same facility as if he were to offer them cash payment. This bank's
business did not flourish. Its machinery was too complicated, and the
risk too great in case of a commodity depreciation.

If we go by the actual content of those records which accompany and
theoretically promote the formation of the modern credit system in
England, we shall not find anything in them but — as one of its
conditions — the demand for a subordination of interest-bearing capital
and of loanable means of production in general to the capitalist mode of
production. On the other hand, if we simply cling to the phraseology, we
shall be frequently surprised by the agreement — including the mode of
expression with the illusions of the followers of Saint-Simon about
banking and credit.

Just as in the writings of the physiocrats the _cultivateur_ does not
stand for the actual tiller of the soil, but for the big farmer, so the
_travailleur_ with Saint-Simon, and continuing on through his disciples,
does not stand for the labourer, but for the industrial and commercial
capitalist.

"_Un travailleur a besoin d'aides, de seconds, d'ouvriers; il les
cherche intelligents, habiles, dèvouès: il les met a l'oeuvre, et leurs
travaux sont productifs._" ( [Enfantin] A _travailleur_ (worker) needs
helpers, supporters, labourers; he looks for such as are intelligent,
able, devoted; he puts them to work, and their labour is productive."
(_Religion saint-simonienne, Economie politique et Politique_, Paris,
1831, p. 104.).

In fact, one should bear in mind that only in his last work, _Le Nouveau
Christianisme_, Saint-Simon speaks directly for the working-class and
declares their emancipation to be the goal of his efforts. All his
former writings are, indeed, mere encomiums of modern bourgeois society
in contrast to the feudal order, or of industrialists and bankers in
contrast to marshals and juristic law-manufacturers of the Napoleonic
era. What a difference compared with the contemporaneous writings of
Owen! [24] For the followers of Saint-Simon, the industrial capitalist
likewise remains the _travailleur par excellence_, as the above-quoted
passage indicates. After reading their writings critically, one will not
be surprised that their credit and bank fantasies materialized in the
_credit mobilier_, founded by an ex-follower of Saint-Simon, Emile
Péreire. This form, incidentally, could become dominant only in a
country like France, where neither the credit system nor large-scale
industry had reached the modern level of development. This was not at
all possible in England and America. The embryo of _Crédit mobilizer_ is
already contained in the following passages from _Doctrine de
Saint-Simon. Exposition. Premiere annèe, 1828-29_, 3me ed., Paris, 1831.
It is understandable that bankers can lend money more cheaply than the
capitalists and private usurers. These bankers are, therefore,

"able to supply tools to the industrialists far more cheaply, that is,
at lower interest, than the real estate owners and capitalists, who may
be more easily mistaken in their choice of borrowers" (p. 202).

But the authors themselves add in a footnote:

"The advantage that would accrue from the mediation of bankers between
the idle rich and the _travailleurs_ is often counterbalanced, or even
canceled, by the opportunities offered in our disorganized society to
egoism, which may manifest itself in various forms of fraud and
charlatanism. The bankers often worm their way between the travailleurs
and idle rich for the purpose of exploiting both to the detriment of
society."

_Travailleur_ here means _capitaliste industriel_. Incidentally, it is
wrong to regard the means at the command of the modern banking system
merely as the means of idle people. In the first place, it is the
portion of capital which industrialists and merchants temporarily hold
in the form of idle money, as a money reserve or as capital to be
invested. Hence it is idle capital, but not capital of the idle. In the
second place, it is the portion of all revenue and savings in general
which is to be temporarily or permanently accumulated. Both are
essential to the nature of the banking system.

But it should always be borne in mind that, in the first place, money —
in the form of precious metal — remains the foundation from which the
credit system, by its very nature, can _never_ detach itself. Secondly,
that the credit system presupposes the monopoly of social means of
production by private persons (in the form of capital and landed
property), that it is itself, on the one hand, an immanent form of the
capitalist mode of production, and on the other, a driving force in its
development to its highest and ultimate form.

The banking system, so far as its formal organization and centralization
is concerned, is the most artificial and most developed product turned
out by the capitalist mode of production, a fact already expressed in
1697 in _Some Thoughts of the Interests of England_. This accounts for
the immense power of an institution such as the Bank of England over
commerce and industry, although their actual movements remain completely
beyond its province and it is passive toward them. The banking system
possesses indeed the form of universal book-keeping and distribution of
means of production on a social scale, but solely the form. We have seen
that the average profit of the individual capitalist, or of every
individual capital, is determined not by the surplus-labour appropriated
at first hand by each capital, but by the quantity of total
surplus-labour appropriated by the total capital, from which each
individual capital receives its dividend only proportional to its
aliquot part of the total capital. This social character of capital is
first promoted and wholly realized through the full development of the
credit and banking system. On the other hand this goes farther. It
places all the available and even potential capital of society that is
not already actively employed at the disposal of the industrial and
commercial capitalists so that neither the lenders nor users of this
capital are its real owners or producers. It thus does away with the
private character of capital and thus contains in itself, but only in
itself, the abolition of capital itself. By means of the banking system
the distribution of capital as a special business, a social function, is
taken out of the hands of the private capitalists and usurers. But at
the same time, banking and credit thus become the most potent means of
driving capitalist production beyond its own limits, and one of the most
effective vehicles of crises and swindle.

The banking system shows, furthermore, by substituting various forms of
circulating credit in place of money, that money is in reality nothing
but a particular expression of the social character of labour and its
products, which, however, as antithetical to the basis of private
production, must always appear in the last analysis as a thing, a
special commodity, alongside other commodities.

Finally, there is no doubt that the credit system will serve as a
powerful lever during the transition from the capitalist mode of
production to the mode of production of associated labour; but only as
one element in connection with other great organic revolutions of the
mode of production itself. On the other hand, the illusions concerning
the miraculous power of the credit and banking system, in the socialist
sense, arise from a complete lack of familiarity with the capitalist
mode of production and the credit system as one of its forms. As soon as
the means of production cease being transformed into capital (which also
includes the abolition of private property in land), credit as such no
longer has any meaning. This, incidentally, was even understood by the
followers of Saint-Simon. On the other hand, as long as the capitalist
mode of production continues to exist, interest-bearing capital, as one
of its forms, also continues to exist and constitutes in fact the basis
of its credit system. Only that sensational writer, Proudhon, who wanted
to perpetuate commodity-production and abolish money, ^([25]) was
capable of dreaming up the monstrous crèdit gratuit, the ostensible
realization of the pious wish of the petty-bourgeois estate.

In _Religion saint-simonienne_, _èconomie politique et Politique_, we
read on page 45:

"Credit serves the purpose, in a society in which some own the
instruments of industry without the ability or will to employ them, and
where other industrious people have no instruments of labour, of
transferring these instruments in the easiest manner possible from the
hands of the former, their owners, to the hands of the others who know
how to use them. Note that this definition regards credit as a result of
the way in which _property_ is constituted."

Therefore, credit disappears with this constitution of property. We
read, furthermore, on page 98, that the present banks

"consider it their business to follow the movement initiated by
transactions taking place outside of their domain, but not themselves to
provide an impulse to this movement; in other words, the banks perform
the role of capitalists in relation to the travailleurs, whom they loan
money."

The notion that the banks themselves should take over the management and
distinguish themselves

"through the number and usefulness of their managed establishments and
of promoted works" (p. 101)

contains the _Crédit mobilier_ in embryo. In the same way, Charles
Pecqueur demands that the banks (which the followers of Saint-Simon call
a _Système general des banques_) "should rule production." Pecqueur is
essentially a follower of Saint-Simon, but much more radical. He wants

"the credit institution ... to control the entire movement of national
production." — "Try to create a national credit institution, which shall
advance the wherewithal to needy people of talent and merit, without,
however, forcibly tying these borrowers together through close
solidarity in production and consumption, but on the contrary enabling
them to determine their own exchange and production. In this way, you
will only accomplish what the private banks already accomplish now, that
is, anarchy, disproportion between production and consumption, the
sudden ruin of one person, and the sudden enrichment of another; so that
your institution will never get any farther than producing a certain
amount of benefits for one person, corresponding to an equivalent amount
of misfortune to be endured by another ... and you will have only
provided the wage-labourers assisted by you with the means to compete
with one another just as their capitalist masters now do." (Ch.
Pecqueur, _Thèorie Nouvelle èconomie sociale et Politique_, Paris, 1842,
p. 434.)

We have seen that merchant's capital and interest-bearing capital are
the oldest forms of capital. But it is in the nature of things that
interest-bearing capital assumes in popular conception the form of
capital _par excellence_. In merchant's capital there takes place the
work of the middleman, no matter whether considered as cheating, labour,
or anything else. But in the case of interest-bearing capital the
self-reproducing character of capital, the self-expanding value, the
production of surplus value, appears purely as an occult property. This
accounts for the fact that even some political economists, particularly
in countries where industrial capital is not yet fully developed, as in
France, cling to interest-bearing capital as the fundamental form of
capital and regard ground-rent, for example, merely as a modified form
of it, since the loan-form also predominates here. In this way, the
internal organisation of the capitalist mode of production is completely
misunderstood, and the fact is entirely overlooked that land, like
capital, is loaned only to capitalists. Of course, means of production
in kind, such as machines and business offices, can also be loaned
instead of money. But they then represent a definite sum of money, and
the fact that in addition to interest a part is paid for wear and tear
is due to their use-value, i.e., the specific natural form of these
elements of capital. The decisive factor here is again whether they are
loaned to direct producers, which would presuppose the non-existence of
the capitalist mode of production-at least in the sphere in which this
occurs — or whether they are loaned to industrial capitalists, which is
precisely the assumption based upon the capitalist mode of production.
It is still more irrelevant and meaningless to drag the lending of
houses, etc., for individual use into this discussion. That the
working-class is also swindled in this form, and to an enormous extent,
is self evident; but this is also done by the retail dealer, who sells
means of subsistence to the worker. This is secondary exploitation,
which runs parallel to the primary exploitation taking place in the
production process itself. The distinction between selling and loaning
is quite immaterial in this case and merely formal, and, as already
indicated, (Present edition: pp. 345-50. — Ed.) cannot appear as
essential to anyone, unless he be wholly unfamiliar with the actual
nature of the problem.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Usury, like commerce, exploits a given mode of production. It does not
create it, but is related to it outwardly. Usury tries to maintain it
directly, so as to exploit it ever anew; it is conservative and makes
this mode of production only more pitiable. The less elements of
production enter into the production process as commodities, and emerge
from it as commodities, the more does their origination from money
appear as a separate act. The more insignificant the role played by
circulation in the social reproduction, the more usury flourishes.

That money wealth develops as a special kind of wealth, means in respect
to usurer's capital that it possesses all its claims in the form of
money claims. It develops that much more in a given country, the more
the main body of production is limited to natural services, etc., that
is, to use-values.

Usury is a powerful lever in developing the preconditions for industrial
capital in so far as it plays the following double role, first, building
up, in general, an independent money wealth alongside that of the
merchant, and, secondly, appropriating the conditions of labour, that
is, ruining the owners of the old conditions of labour.

INTEREST IN THE MIDDLE AGES

"In the Middle Ages the population was purely agricultural. Under such a
government as was the feudal system there can be but little traffic, and
hence but little profit. Hence the laws against usury were justified in
the Middle Ages. Besides, in an agricultural country a person seldom
wants to borrow money except he be reduced to poverty or distress.... In
the reign of Henry VIII, interest was limited to 10 per cent. James I
reduced it to 8 per cent ... Charles II reduced it to 6 per cent; in the
reign of Queen Anne, it was reduced to 5 per cent.... In those times,
the lenders ... had, in fact, though not a legal, yet an actual
monopoly, and hence it was necessary that they, like other monopolists,
should be placed under restraint. In our times, it is the rate of profit
which regulates the rate of interest. In those times, it was the rate of
interest which regulated the rate of profit. If the money-lender charged
a high rate of interest to the merchant, the merchant must have charged
a higher rate of profit on his goods. Hence, a large sum of money would
be taken from the pockets of the purchasers to be put into the pockets
of the money-lenders." (Gilbart, _History and Principles of Banking_,
pp. 163, 164, 165.)

"I have been told that 10 gulden are now taken annually at every Leipzig
Fair, (The author has in mind the loan of 100 gulden with interest
payable in three installments at the Leipzig Fair, held three times
annually: Easter and St. Michael's Day) that is, 30 on each hundred,
some add the Neuenburg Fair, thus making 40 per hundred; whether that is
so, I don't know. For shame! What will be the infernal outcome of this?
... Whoever now has 100 florins at Leipzig takes 40 annually, which is
the same as devouring one peasant or burgher each year. If one has 1,000
florins, he takes 400 annually which means devouring a knight or a rich
nobleman per year. If one has 10,000 florins, he takes 4,000 per year,
which means devouring a rich count each year. If one has 100,000
florins, as the big merchants must possess, he takes 40,000 annually,
which means devouring one affluent prince each year. If one has
1,000,000 florins, he takes 400,000 annually, which means devouring one
mighty king every year. And he does not risk either his person or his
wares, does not work, sits near his fire-place and roasts apples; so
might a lowly robber sit at home and devour a whole world in ten years."
(Quoted from _Bücher vom Kaufhandel und Wucher_ vom Jahre 1524, Luther's
_Werke_, Wittenberg, 1589, Teil 6, S. 312.)

"Fifteen years ago I took pen in hand against usury when it had spread
so alarmingly that I could scarcely hope for any improvement. Since then
it has become so arrogant that it deigns not to be classed as vice, sin,
or shame, but achieves praise as pure virtue and honour, as though it
were performing a great favour and Christian service for the people.
What will help deliver us now that shame has turned into honour and vice
into virtue?" (Martin Luther, _An die Pfarherrn wider den Wucher zu
predigen_, Wittenberg, 1540.)

------------------------------------------------------------------------

"Jews, Lombards, usurers and extortioners were our first bankers, our
primitive traffickers in money, their character little short of
infamous... They were joined by London goldsmiths. As a body ... our
primitive bankers ... were a very bad set, they were gripping usurers,
iron-hearted extortioners." (D. Hardcastle, _Banks and Bankers_, 2nd
ed., London, 1843, pp. 19, 20.)

"The example shown by Venice" (in establishing a bank) "was thus quickly
imitated; all sea-coast towns, and in general all towns which had earned
fame through their independence and commerce, founded their first banks.
The return voyage of their ships, which often was of long duration,
inevitably led to the custom of lending on credit. This was further
intensified by the discovery of America and the ensuing trade with that
continent." (This is the main point.) "The chartering of ships made
large loans necessary-a procedure already obtaining in ancient Athens
and Greece. In 1308, the Hanse town of Bruges possessed an insurance
company. (M. Augier, l. c., pp. 202, 203.)

To what extent the granting of loans to landowners, and thus to the
pleasure-seeking wealthy in general, still prevailed in the last third
of the 17th century, even in England, before the development of modern
credit, may be seen, among others, in the works of Sir Dudley North. He
was not only one of the first English merchants, but also one of the
most prominent theoretical economists of his time:

"The moneys employed at interest in this nation, are not near the tenth
part, disposed to trading people, wherewith to manage their trades; but
are for the most part lent for the supplying of luxury, and to support
the expense of persons, who though great owners of lands, yet spend
faster than their lands bring in; and being loath to sell, choose rather
to mortgage their estates." (_Discourses upon Trade_, London, 1691,
pp.6-7.)

Poland in the 18th century:

"Warsaw carried on a large bustling business in bills of exchange which,
however, had as its principal basis and aim the usury of its bankers. In
order to secure money, which they could lend to spendthrift gentry at 8%
and more, they sought and obtained abroad open exchange credit, that is,
credit that had no commodity trade as its basis, but which the foreign
drawee continued to accept as long as the returns from these
manipulations did not fail to come in. However, they paid heavily for
this through bankruptcies of men like Tapper and other highly respected
Warsaw bankers." (J. G. Büsch, _Theoretisch-praktische Darstellung der
Handlung, etc_., 3rd ed., Hamburg, 1808, Vol. II, pp. 232, 233.)

ADVANTAGES DERIVED BY THE CHURCH FROM THE PROHIBITION OF INTEREST

"Taking interest had been interdicted by the Church. But selling
property for the purpose of finding succour in distress had not been
forbidden. It had not even been prohibited to transfer property to the
money-lender as security for a certain term, until a debtor repaid his
loan, leaving the money-lender free to enjoy the usufruct of the
property as a reward for his abstinence from his money.... The Church
itself, and its associated communes and _pia corpora_, derived much
profit from this practice, particularly during the crusades. This
brought a very large portion of national wealth into possession of the
so-called 'dead hand,' all the more so because the Jews were barred from
engaging in such usury, the possession of such fixed liens not being
concealable.... Without the ban on interest churches and cloisters would
never have become so affluent" (l. c., p. 55).

Notes

21. "It is by frequent fluctuations within the month, and by pawning one
article to relieve another, where a small sum is obtained, that the
premium for money becomes so excessive. There are about 240 licensed
pawnbrokers in the metropolis, and nearly 1,450 in the country. The
capital employed is supposed somewhat to exceed a million pounds
sterling; and this capital is turned round thrice in the course of the
year, and yields each time about 33½ per cent on an average; according
to which calculation, the inferior orders of society in England pay
about one million a year for the use of a temporary loan, exclusive of
what they lose by goods being forfeited." (J. D. Tuckett, _A History of
the Past and Present State of the Labouring Population_, London, 1846,
1, p. 114.)

22. Even in the titles of their works they state as their principal
purpose "the general good of the landed men, the great increase of the
value of land, the exemption of the nobility, gentry, etc., from taxes,
enlarging their yearly estates, etc." Only the usurers would stand to
lose, those worst enemies of the nation who had done more injury to the
nobility and yeomanry than an army of invasion from France could have
done.

23. "The rich goldsmith" (the precursor of the banker), "for example,
made Charles II of England pay twenty and thirty per cent for
accommodation. A business so profitable, induced the goldsmith 'more and
more to become lender to the King, to anticipate all the revenue, to
take every grant of Parliament into pawn as soon as it was given; also
to outvie each other in buying and taking to pawn bills, orders, and
tallies, so that, in effect, all the revenue passed through their
hands'." (John Francis, _History of the Bank of England_, London, 1848,
I, p.31.) "The erection of a bank had been suggested several times
before that. It was at last a necessity" (l. c., p. 38). "The bank was a
necessity for the government itself, sucked dry by usurers, in order to
obtain money at a reasonable rate, on the security of parliamentary
grants" (l. c., pp. 59, 60).

24. Marx would surely have modified this passage considerably, had he
reworked his manuscript. It was inspired by the role of the ex-followers
of Saint-Simon under France's Second Empire where just at the time that
Marx wrote the above, the world redeeming credit fantasies of this
school through the irony of history were being realised in the form of a
tremendous swindle on a scale never seen before. Later Marx spoke only
with admiration of the genius and encyclopaedic mind of Saint Simon.
When in his earlier works the latter ignores the antithesis between the
bourgeoisie and the proletariat which was just then coming into
existence in France when he includes among the _travailleurs_ that part
of the bourgeoisie which was active in production, this corresponds to
Fourier's conception of attempting to reconcile capital and labour and
is explained by the economic and political situation of France in those
days. The fact that Owen was more far sighted in this respect is due to
his different environment, for he lived in a period of industrial
revolution and of acutely sharpening class antagonisms. — _F. E._

25. Karl Marx, _Misère de la Philosophie_, Bruxelles et Paris, 1847. —
Karl Marx, _Zur Kritik der politischen Oekonomie_, S. 64.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III



PART VI. TRANSFORMATION OF SURPLUS-PROFIT INTO GROUND-RENT


 


Chapter 37. Introduction

 

The analysis of landed property in its various historical forms is
beyond the scope of this work. We shall be concerned with it only in so
far as a portion of the surplus-value produced by capital falls to the
share of the landowner. We assume, then, that agriculture is dominated
by the capitalist mode of production just as manufacture is; in other
words, that agriculture is carried on by capitalists who differ from
other capitalists primarily in the manner in which their capital, and
the wage-labour set in motion by this capital, are invested. So far as
we are concerned, the farmer produces wheat, etc., in much the same way
as the manufacturer produces yarn or machines. The assumption that the
capitalist mode of production has encompassed agriculture implies that
it rules over all spheres of production and bourgeois society, i.e.,
that its prerequisites, such as free competition among capitals, the
possibility of transferring the latter from one production sphere to
another, and a uniform level of the average profit, etc., are fully
matured. The form of landed property which we shall consider here is a
specifically historical one a form _transformed_ through the influence
of capital and of the capitalist mode of production, either of feudal
landownership, or of small-peasant agriculture as a means of livelihood,
in which the _possession_ of the land and the soil constitutes one of
the prerequisites of production for the direct producer, and in which
his _ownership_ of land appears as the most advantageous condition for
the prosperity of _his_ mode of production. Just as the capitalist mode
of production in general is based on the expropriation of the conditions
of labour from the labourers, so does it in agriculture presuppose the
expropriation of the rural labourers from the land and their
subordination to a capitalist, who carries on agriculture for the sake
of profit. Thus, for the purpose of our analysis, the objection that
other forms of landed property and of agriculture have existed, or still
exist, is quite irrelevant. Such an objection can only apply to those
economists who treat the capitalist mode of production in agriculture,
and the form of landed property corresponding to it, not as historical
but rather as eternal categories.

For our purposes it is necessary to study the modern form of landed
property, because our task is to consider the specific conditions of
production and circulation which arise from the investment of capital in
agriculture. Without this, our analysis of capital would not be
complete. We therefore confine ourselves exclusively to the investment
of capital in agriculture itself, that is, in producing the principal
agricultural crop which feeds a given people. We can use wheat for this
purpose, because it is the principal means of subsistence in modern
capitalistically developed nations. (Or, instead of agriculture, we can
use mining because the laws are the same for both.)

One of the big contributions of Adam Smith was to have shown that
ground-rent for capital invested in the production of such agricultural
products as flax and dye-stuffs, and in independent cattle-raising,
etc., is determined by the ground-rent obtained from capital invested in
the production of the principal article of subsistence. [Smith, _An
Inquiry into the Nature and Causes of the Wealth of Nations_, Aberdeen,
London, 1848, pp. 105-16. — _Ed_.] In fact, no further progress has been
made in this regard since then. Any limitations or additions would
belong in an independent study of landed property, not here. Hence, we
shall not speak of landed property _ex professo_ — in so far as it does
not refer to land destined for wheat production — but shall merely refer
to it on occasion by way of illustration.

It should be noted for the sake of completeness that we also include
water, etc., in the term land, in so far as it belongs to someone as an
accessory to the land.

Landed property is based on the monopoly by certain persons over
definite portions of the globe, as exclusive spheres of their private
will to the exclusion of all others.^([26]) With this in mind, the
problem is to ascertain the economic value, that is, the realisation of
this monopoly on the basis of capitalist production. With the legal
power of these persons to use or misuse certain portions of the globe,
nothing is decided. The use of this power depends wholly upon economic
conditions, which are independent of their will. The legal view itself
only means that the landowner can do with the land what every owner of
commodities can do with his commodities. And this view, this legal view
of free private ownership of land, arises in the ancient world only with
the dissolution of the organic order of society, and in the modern world
only with the development of capitalist production. It has been imported
by Europeans to Asia only here and there. In the section dealing with
primitive accumulation (Buch I, Kap. XXIV [English edition: Part VIII. —
_Ed_].), we saw that this mode of production presupposes, on the one
hand, the separation of the direct producers from their position as mere
accessories to the land (in the form of vassals, serfs, slaves, etc.),
and, on the other hand, the expropriation of the mass of the people from
the land. To this extent the monopoly of landed property is a historical
premise, and continues to remain the basis of the capitalist mode of
production, just as in all previous modes of production which are based
on the exploitation of the masses in one form or another. But the form
of landed property with which the incipient capitalist mode of
production is confronted does not suit it. It first creates for itself
the form required by subordinating agriculture to capital. It thus
transforms feudal landed property, clan property, small peasant property
in mark communes — no matter how divergent their juristic forms may be —
into the economic form corresponding to the requirements of this mode of
production. One of the major results of the capitalist mode of
production is that, on the one hand, it transforms agriculture from a
mere empirical and mechanical self-perpetuating process employed by the
least developed part of society into the conscious scientific
application of agronomy, in so far as this is at all feasible under
conditions of private property;^([27]) that it divorces landed property
from the relations of dominion and servitude, on the one hand, and, on
the other, totally separates land as an instrument of production from
landed property and landowner — for whom the land merely represents a
certain money assessment which he collects by virtue of his monopoly
from the industrial capitalist, the capitalist farmer; it dissolves the
connection between landownership and the land so thoroughly that the
landowner may spend his whole life in Constantinople, while his estates
lie in Scotland. Landed property thus receives its purely economic form
by discarding all its former political and social embellishments and
associations, in brief all those traditional accessories, which are
denounced, as we shall see later, as useless and absurd superfluities by
the industrial capitalists themselves, as well as their theoretical
spokesmen, in the heat of their struggle with landed property. The
rationalising of agriculture, on the one hand, which makes it for the
first time capable of operating on a social scale, and the reduction _ad
absurdum_ of property in land, on the other, are the great achievements
of the capitalist mode of production. Like all of its other historical
advances, it also attained these by first completely impoverishing the
direct producers.

Before we proceed to the problem itself, several more preliminary
remarks are necessary to avoid misunderstanding.

The prerequisites for the capitalist mode of production therefore are
the following: The actual tillers of the soil are wage labourers
employed by a capitalist, the capitalist farmer who is engaged in
agriculture merely as a particular field of exploitation for capital, as
investment for his capital in a particular sphere of production. This
capitalist farmer pays the landowner, the owner of the land exploited by
him, a sum of money at definite periods fixed by contract, for instance,
annually (just as the borrower of money-capital pays a fixed interest),
for the right to invest his capital in this specific sphere of
production. This sum of money is called ground-rent, no matter whether
it is paid for agricultural land, building lots, mines, fishing grounds,
or forests, etc. It is paid for the entire time for which the landowner
has contracted to rent his land to the capitalist farmer. Ground-rent,
therefore, is here that form in which property in land is realised
economically, that is, produces value. Here, then, we have all three
classes — wage-labourers, industrial capitalists, and landowners
constituting together, and in their mutual opposition, the framework of
modern society.

Capital may be fixed in the land, incorporated in it either in a
transitory manner, as through improvements of a chemical nature,
fertilisation, etc., or more permanently, as in drainage canals,
irrigation works, leveling, farm buildings, etc. Elsewhere I have called
the capital thus applied to land _la terre-capital_.^([28]) It belongs
to the category of fixed capital. The interest on capital incorporated
in the land and the improvements thus made in it as an instrument of
production can constitute a part of the rent paid by the capitalist
farmer to the landowner, ^([29]) but it does not constitute the actual
ground-rent, which is paid for the use of the land as such — be it in a
natural or cultivated state. In a systematic treatment of landed
property, which is not within our scope, this part of the landowner's
revenue would have to be discussed at length. But a few words about it
will suffice here. The more transitory capital investments, which
accompany the ordinary production processes in agriculture, are all made
without exception by the capitalist farmer. These investments, like
cultivation proper in general, improve the land,^([30]) increase its
output, and transform the land from mere material into land-capital when
the cultivation is carried on more or less rationally, i.e., when it is
not reduced to a brutal spoliation of the soil, as was in vogue, e.g.,
among the former slave-holders in the United States; however, the
gentlemen landowners secure themselves against such practice by
contract. A cultivated field is worth more than an uncultivated one of
the same natural quality. The more permanent fixed capital investments,
which are incorporated in the soil and used up in a longer period of
time, are also in the main, and in some spheres often exclusively, made
by the capitalist farmer. But as soon as the time stipulated by contract
has expired — and this is one of the reasons why with the development of
capitalist production the landowners seek to shorten the contract period
as much as possible — the improvements incorporated in the soil become
the property of the landowner as an inseparable feature of the
substance, the land. In the new contract made by the landowner he adds
the interest for capital incorporated in the land to the ground-rent
itself. And he does this whether he now leases the land to the
capitalist farmer who made these improvements or to some other farmer.
His rent is thus inflated; and should he wish to sell his land (we shall
see immediately how its price is determined), its value is now higher.
He sells not merely the land but the improved land, the capital
incorporated in the land for which he paid nothing. Quite aside from the
movements of ground-rent itself, here lies one of the secrets of the
increasing enrichment of landowners, the continuous inflation of their
rents, and the constantly growing money-value of their estates along
with progress in economic development. Thus they pocket a product of
social development created without their help — _fruges consumere nati_.
[Horace, _Epistles_, Book I, _Epistles 2, 27_. — _Ed_]. But this is at
the same time one of the greatest obstacles to a rational development of
agriculture, for the tenant farmer avoids all improvements and outlays
for which he cannot expect complete returns during the term of his
lease. We find this situation denounced as such an obstacle again and
again, not only in the 18th century by James Anderson, the actual
discoverer of the modern theory of rent [On J. Anderson's theory of rent
see K. Marx, _Theorien über den Mehrwert_ (K. Marx/F. Engels, _Werke_,
Band 26, 2. Teil, S. 103-05, 110-14, 134-39). — _Ed_.] — who was also a
practical capitalist farmer and an advanced agronomist for his time —
but also in our own day by opponents of the present constitution of
landed property in England.

A.A. Walton, in his _History of the Landed Tenures of Great Britain and
Ireland_, London, 1865, says on this score (pp.96, 97):

"All the efforts of the numerous agricultural associations throughout
the country must fail to produce any very extensive or really
appreciable results in the real advancement of agricultural improvement,
so long as such improvements mean in a far higher degree increased value
to the estate and rent-roll of the landlord, than bettering the
condition of the tenant farmer or the labourer. The farmers, generally,
are as well aware as either the landlord or his agent, or even the
president of the Agricultural Association, that good drainage, plenty of
manure, and good management, combined with the increased employment of
labour, to thoroughly cleanse and work the land, will produce wonderful
results both in improvement and production. To do all this, however,
considerable outlay is required, and the farmers are also aware, that
however much they may improve the land or enhance its value, the
landlords will, in the long run, reap the principal benefit, in higher
rents and the increased value of their estates.... They are shrewd
enough to observe what those orators” [landowners and their agents
speaking at agricultural festivities], "by some singular inadvertence,
omit to tell them —namely, that the lion's share of any improvements
they may make is sure to go into the pockets of the landlords in the
long run.... However much the former tenant may have improved the farm,
his successor will find that the landlord will always increase the rent
in proportion to the increased value of the land from former
improvements.”

In agriculture proper this process does not yet appear quite as plainly
as when the land is used for building purposes. By far the largest
portion of land used in England for building purposes but not sold as a
freehold is leased by the landowners for 99 years or, if possible, for a
shorter term. After the lapse of this period the buildings fall into the
hands of the landowner together with the land itself.

"They” [the tenants] "are bound to deliver up the house at the
expiration of the lease, in good tenantable condition, to the great
landlord, after having paid an exorbitant ground-rent up to the
expiration of the lease. No sooner is the lease expired, than the agent
or surveyor will come and examine your house, and see that you put it
into good repair, and then take possession of it, and annex it to his
lord's domains.... The fact is, if this system is permitted to be in
full operation for any considerable period longer, the whole of the
house property in the kingdom will be in the hands of the great
landlords, as well as the land. The whole of the West End of London,
north and south from Temple Bar, may be said to belong to about half a
dozen great landlords, all let at enormous rents, and where the leases
have not quite expired they are fast falling due. The same may be said
either more or less of every town in the kingdom. Nor does this grasping
system of exclusion and monopoly stop even here. Nearly the whole of the
dock accommodation in our seaport towns is by the same process of
usurpation in the hands of the great leviathans of the land” (1. c.,
pp.92-93).

and Wales in 1861 gives the total population as 20,066,224 and the
number of landlords as 36,032, the proportion of owners to the number of
houses and to population would look completely different if the large
landlords were placed on one side and the small ones on the other.

This illustration of ownership in buildings is important. In the first
place, it clearly shows the difference between actual ground-rent and
interest on fixed capital incorporated in the land, which may constitute
an addition to ground-rent. Interest on buildings, like that on capital
incorporated in the land by the tenant in agriculture, falls into the
hands of the industrial capitalist, the building speculator, or the
tenant, so long as the lease lasts, and has in itself nothing to do with
ground-rent, which must be paid on stated dates annually for the use of
the land. Secondly, it shows that capital incorporated in the land by
others ultimately passes into the hands of the landlord together with
the land, and that the interest for it inflates his rent.

Some writers, acting either as spokesmen of landlordism and taking up
the cudgels against the attacks of bourgeois economists, or in an
endeavour to transform the capitalist system of production from a system
of contradictions into one of "harmonies," like Carey, have tried to
represent ground-rent, the specific economic expression of landed
property, as identical with interest. This would eliminate the
opposition between landlords and capitalists. The opposite method was
employed in the early stages of capitalist production. In those days,
landed property was still regarded by popular conception as the pristine
and respectable form of private property, while interest on capital was
decried as usury. Dudley North, Locke and others, therefore, represented
interest on capital as a form analogous to ground-rent, just as Turgot
deduced the justification for interest from the existence of
ground-rent. — Aside from the fact that ground-rent may, and does, exist
in its pure form without any addition for interest on capital
incorporated in the land, those more recent writers forget that, in this
way, the landlord not only receives interest on other persons' capital
that costs him nothing, but also pockets this capital of others without
recompense. The justification of landed property, like that of all other
forms of property corresponding to a certain mode of production, is that
the mode of production itself is a transient historical necessity, and
this includes the relations of production and exchange which stem from
it. It is true, as we shall see later, that landed property differs from
other kinds of property in that it appears superfluous and harmful at a
certain stage of development, even from the point of view of the
capitalist mode of production.

Ground-rent may in another form be confused with interest and thereby
its specific character overlooked. Ground-rent assumes the form of a
certain sum of money, which the landlord draws annually by leasing a
certain plot on our planet. We have seen that every particular sum of
money may be capitalised, that is, considered as the interest on an
imaginary capital. For instance, if the average rate of interest is 5%,
then an annual ground-rent of £200 may be regarded as interest on a
capital of £4,000. Ground-rent so capitalised constitutes the purchase
price or value of the land, a category which like the price of labour is
_prima facie_ irrational, since the earth is not the product of labour
and therefore has no value. But on the other hand, a real relation in
production is concealed behind this irrational form. If a capitalist
buys land yielding a rent of £200 annually and pays £4,000 for it, then
he draws the average annual interest of 5% on his capital of £4,000,
just as if he had invested this capital in interest-bearing papers or
loaned it directly at 5% interest. It is the expansion of a capital of
£4,000 at 5%. On this assumption, he would recover the purchase price of
his estate through its revenues in twenty years. In England, therefore,
the purchase price of land is calculated in so many years' purchase
which is merely another way of expressing the capitalisation of
ground-rent. It is in fact the purchase price-not of the land, but of
the ground-rent yielded by it — calculated in accordance with the usual
interest rate. But this capitalisation of rent assumes the existence of
rent, while rent cannot inversely be derived and explained from its own
capitalisation. Its existence, independent of its sale, is rather the
starting-point for the inquiry.

It follows, then, that the price of land may rise or fall inversely as
the interest rate rises or falls if we assume ground-rent to be a
constant magnitude. If the ordinary interest rate should fall from 5% to
4%, then the annual ground-rent of £200 would represent the annual
realisation from a capital of £5,000 instead of £4,000. The price of the
same piece of land would thus have risen from £4,000 to £5,000, or from
20 years' to 25 years' purchase. The converse would take place in the
opposite case. This is a movement of the price of land which is
independent of the movement of ground-rent itself and regulated only by
the interest rate. But as we have seen that the rate of profit has a
tendency to fall in the course of social progress, and, therefore, the
interest rate has the same tendency, so far as it is regulated by the
rate of profit; and that, furthermore, the interest rate shows a
tendency to fall in consequence of the growth of loanable capital, apart
from the influence of the rate of profit, it follows that the price of
land has a tendency to rise, even independently of the movement of
ground-rent and the prices of the products of the land, of which rent
constitutes a part.

The confusion of ground-rent itself with the interest form which it
assumes for the buyer of the land — a confusion resulting from complete
lack of familiarity with the nature of ground-rent — must necessarily
lead to the most absurd conclusions. Since landed property is considered
in all ancient countries as a particularly genteel form of property, and
its purchase also as an eminently safe capital investment, the interest
rate at which ground-rent is bought is generally lower than that of
other long-term investments of capital, so that a buyer of real estate
draws, for instance, only 4% on his purchase price, whereas he would
draw 5% for the same capital in other investments. In other words, he
pays more capital for ground-rent than he would for the same annual
amount of income from other investments. This leads Mr. Thiers to
conclude in his generally very poor work on _La Propriété_ (a reprint of
his speech in the French National Assembly in 1849 directed against
Proudhon) [Proudhon's speech was published in "_Compte rendu des seances
de l'Assemblée Nationale_,” Tome II, Paris, 1849, pp. 666-71. — _Ed_.]
that ground-rent is low, whereas it merely proves that its purchase
price is high.

The fact that capitalised ground-rent appears as the price or value of
land, so that land, therefore, is bought and sold like any other
commodity, serves some apologists as a justification for landed property
since the buyer pays an equivalent for it, the same as for other
commodities; and the major portion of landed property has changed hands
in this way. The same reason in that case would also serve to justify
slavery, since the returns from the labour of the slave, whom the
slave-holder has bought, merely represent the interest on the capital
invested in this purchase. To derive a justification for the existence
of ground-rent from its sale and purchase means in general to justify
its existence by its existence.

As important as it may be for a scientific analysis of ground-rent —
that is, the independent and specific economic form of landed property
on the basis of the capitalist mode of production — study it in its pure
form free of all distorting and obfuscating irrelevancies, it is just as
important for an understanding of the practical effects of landed
property even for a theoretical comprehension of a multitude of facts
which contradict the concept and nature of ground-rent and yet appear as
modes of existence of ground-rent — to learn the sources which give rise
to such muddling in theory.

In practice, naturally, everything appears as ground-rent that is paid
as lease money by tenant to landlord for the right to cultivate the
soil. No matter what the composition of this tribute and no matter what
its sources, it has this in common with the actual ground-rent — that
the monopoly of the so-called landed proprietor of a portion of our
planet enables him to levy such tribute and impose such an assessment.
It has this in common with the actual ground-rent — that it determines
the price of land, which, as we have indicated earlier, is nothing but
the capitalised income from the lease of the land.

We have already seen that interest for the capital incorporated in the
land may constitute such an extraneous component of ground-rent, a
component which must become a continually growing extra charge on the
total rent of a country as economic development progresses. But aside
from this interest, it is possible that the lease money may conceal in
part, and in certain cases in its entirety, i.e., in complete absence of
the actual ground-rent when the land is, therefore, actually worthless —
a deduction from the average profit or from the normal wages, or both.
This portion, whether of profit or wages, appears here as ground-rent,
because instead of falling to the industrial capitalist or the
wage-worker, as would normally be the case, it is paid to the landlord
in the form of lease money. Economically speaking, neither the one nor
the other of these portions constitutes ground-rent; but, in practice,
it constitutes the landlord's revenue, an economic realisation of his
monopoly, much as actual ground-rent, and it has just as determining an
influence on land prices.

We are not speaking now of conditions in which ground-rent, the manner
of expressing landed property in the capitalist mode of production,
formally exists without the existence of the capitalist mode of
production itself, i.e., without the tenant himself being an industrial
capitalist, nor the type of his management being a capitalist one. Such
is the case, e.g., in _Ireland_. The tenant there is generally a small
farmer. What he pays to the landlord in the form of rent frequently
absorbs not merely a part of his profit, that is, his own surplus labour
(to which he is entitled as possessor of his own instruments of labour),
but also a part of his normal wage, which he would otherwise receive for
the same amount of labour. Besides, the landlord, who does nothing at
all for the improvement of the land, also expropriates his small
capital, which the tenant for the most part incorporates in the land
through his own labour. This is precisely what a usurer would do under
similar circumstances, with just the difference that the usurer would at
least risk his own capital in the operation. This continual plunder is
the core of the dispute over the Irish Tenancy Rights Bill. The main
purpose of this Bill is to compel the landlord when ordering his tenant
off the land to indemnify the latter for his improvements on the land,
or for his capital incorporated in the land. Palmerston used to wave
this demand aside with the cynical answer;

"The House of Commons is a house of landed proprietors.”

Nor are we referring to exceptional circumstances in which the landlord
may enforce a high rental — even in countries with capitalist production
— that stands in no relation to the yield from the soil. Of such a
nature, for example, is the leasing of small patches of land to
labourers in English factory districts, either as small gardens or for
amateur spare-time farming. (Reports of Inspectors of Factories.)

We are referring to ground-rent in countries with developed capitalist
production. Among English tenants, for instance, there are a number of
small capitalists who are destined and compelled by education, training,
tradition, competition, and other circumstances to invest their capital
as tenants in agriculture. They are forced to be satisfied with less
than the average profit, and to turn over part of it to the landlords as
rent. This is the only condition under which they are permitted to
invest their capital in the land, in agriculture. Since landlords
everywhere exert considerable, and in England even overwhelming,
influence on legislation, they are able to exploit this situation for
the purpose of victimising the entire class of tenants. For instance,
the Corn Laws of 1815 — a bread tax, admittedly imposed upon the country
to secure for the idle landlords a continuation of their abnormally
increased rentals during the anti-Jacobin war — had indeed the effect,
excluding cases of a few extraordinarily rich harvests, of maintaining
prices of agricultural products above the level to which they would have
fallen had corn imports been unrestricted. But they did not have the
effect of maintaining prices at the level decreed by the lawmaking
landlords to serve as normal prices in such manner as to constitute the
legal limit for imports of foreign corn. But the leaseholds were
contracted in an atmosphere created by these normal prices. As soon as
the illusion was dispelled, a new law was passed, containing new normal
prices, which were as much the impotent expression of a greedy
landlord's fantasy as the old ones. In this way, tenants were defrauded
from 1815 up to the thirties. Hence the standing problem of agricultural
distress during this entire period. Hence the expropriation and the ruin
of a whole generation of tenants during this period and their
replacement by a new class of capitalists.^([31])

A much more general and important fact, however, is the depression of
the actual farm-labourer's wage below its normal average, so that part
of it is deducted to become part of the lease money and thus, in the
guise of ground-rent, it flows into the pocket of the landlord rather
than the labourer. This is, for example, quite generally the case in
England and Scotland, with the exception of a few favourably situated
counties. The inquiries into the level of wages by the parliamentary
investigating committees, which were appointed before the passage of the
Corn Laws in England — so far the most valuable and almost unexploited
contributions to the history of wages in the 19th century, and at the
same time a pillory erected for themselves by the English aristocracy
and bourgeoisie — proved convincingly and beyond a doubt that the high
rates of rent, and the corresponding rise in land prices during the
anti-Jacobin war, were due in part to no other cause but deductions from
wages and their depression to a level that was even below the physical
minimum requirement; in other words, to part of the normal wage being
handed over to the landlords. Various circumstances, such as the
depreciation of money and the manipulation of the Poor Laws in the
agricultural districts, had made this operation possible at a time when
the incomes of the tenants were enormously increasing and the landlords
were amassing fabulous riches. Indeed, one of the main arguments of both
tenants and landlords for the introduction of duties on corn was that it
was physically impossible to depress farm labourers' wages any lower.
This state of affairs has not significantly changed, and in England, as
in all European countries, a portion of the normal wage is absorbed by
ground-rent just as ever. When Count Shaftesbury, then Lord Ashley, one
of the philanthropic aristocrats, was so extraordinarily moved by the
condition of English factory operatives and acted as their spokesman in
Parliament during the agitation for a ten-hour day, the spokesmen of the
industrialists took their revenge by publishing wage statistics of
agricultural labourers in the villages belonging to him (see Buch I,
Kap. XXIII, 5, e [English edition: Ch XXV 5 e — Ed])("_The British
Agricultural Proletariat_"), which clearly showed that a portion of the
ground-rent of this philanthropist consisted of loot filched for him by
his tenants out of the wages of agricultural labourers. This publication
is also interesting for the fact that its revelations may bravely take
their place beside the worst exposures made by the committees in 1814
and 1815. As soon as circumstances force a temporary increase in the
wage of agricultural labourers a cry goes up from the capitalist tenant
farmers that raising wages to the normal level, as done in other
branches of industry, would be impossible and would ruin them, unless
ground-rent were reduced at the same time. Therein lies the confession
that under the head of ground-rent there is a deduction of the
labourers' wages which is handed over to the landlords. For instance,
from 1849 to 1859 the wages of agricultural labourers rose in England
through a combination of momentous events: the exodus from Ireland,
which cut off the supply of agricultural labourers coming from there; an
extraordinary absorption of the agricultural population by factories; a
war-time demand for soldiers; an exceptionally large emigration to
Australia and the United States (California), and other circumstances
which need not be dwelt upon here. At the same time, average prices of
grain fell by more than 16% during this period, with the exception of
the poor agricultural years 1854 to 1856. The tenant farmers clamoured
for a reduction in rents. They were successful in individual cases, but
on the whole failed to achieve this demand. They had recourse to a
reduction of production costs, among other things by the mass production
of steam-engines and new machinery, which to some extent replaced horses
and pushed them out of the economy, but also brought about, in part, an
artificial over-population by throwing agricultural day-labourers out of
work, and thereby caused a new drop in wages. And this took place in
spite of the overall relative decrease in agricultural population during
that decade as compared with the growth of total population, and in
spite of an absolute decrease in agricultural population in some purely
agricultural districts.^([32]) Thus Fawcett, then professor of political
economy at Cambridge [who died in 1884 while Postmaster General], stated
at the Social Science Congress on October 12, 1865:

"The labourers were beginning to emigrate, and the farmers were already
beginning to complain that they would not be able to pay such high rents
as they have been accustomed to pay, because labour was becoming dearer
in consequence of emigration."

Here, then, high ground-rent is directly identified with low wages. And
in so far as the level of land prices is determined by this
circumstance-increasing rent — a rise in the value of land is identical
with a depreciation of labour, the high price of land is identical with
the low price of labour.

The same is true of France.

"The rental rises because the prices of bread, wine, meat, vegetables
and fruit rise, on the one hand, while, on the other hand, the price of
labour remains unchanged. If the older people examine the accounts of
their fathers, taking us back about 100 years, they will find that the
price of a day's labour in rural France was the same as it is now. The
price of meat has trebled since then.... Who is the victim of this
revolution? Is it the rich man, who is the proprietor of an estate, or
the poor man who works it? ... The increase in rental is evidence of a
public disaster.” (_Du Mécanisime de la Société en France et en
Angleterre_, by M. Rubichon, 2nd ed., Paris, 1837, p. 101.)

Illustrations of rent representing deductions, on the one hand, from
average profit and, on the other, from average wages:

Morton, [Here Marx quotes John Lockart Morton. — _Ed_.] real estate
agent and agricultural mechanic who was previously quoted, states that
it has been observed in many localities that rent for large estates is
lower than for small ones because

"the competition is usually greater for the latter than for the former,
and as few small farmers are able to turn their attention to any other
business than that of farming, their anxiety to get a suitable
occupation leads them in many instances to give more rent than their
judgement can approve of." (John L. Morton, _The Resources of Estates_,
London, 1858, p. 116.)

However, this difference is supposed to be gradually disappearing in
England; this he attributes largely to the emigration precisely of the
class of small tenants. The same Morton illustrates with an example in
which clearly the wage of the tenant himself, and even more surely that
of his labourers, suffers a deduction for ground-rent. This takes place
in the case of leaseholds with less than 70 to 80 acres (30-34 ha.)
where a two-horse plough cannot be maintained.

"Unless the tenant works with his own hands as laboriously as any
labourer, his farm will not keep him. If he entrusts the performance of
his work to workmen while he continues merely to observe them, the
chances are, that at no distant period, he will find he is unable to pay
his rent" (1. c., p. 148). Morton concludes, therefore, that unless the
tenants of a certain locality are very poor, the leaseholds should not
be smaller than 70 acres, so that the tenants may keep two or three
horses.

Extraordinary sagacity on the part of Monsieur Léonce de Lavergne,
_Membre de l'Institut et de la Société Centrale d'Agriculture._ In his
Economie Rurale de l'Angleterre (quoted from the English translation,
London, 1855), he makes the following comparison of the annual advantage
derived from cattle which is employed in France but not in England where
it is replaced by horses (p.42):

  -------- -------- ------------- --------- -------- -------------
  FRANCE   Milk     £4 million    ENGLAND   Milk     £16 million
           Meat     £16 million             Meat     £20 million
           Labour   £8 million              Labour   —
           TOTAL:   £28 million             TOTAL:   £36 million
  -------- -------- ------------- --------- -------- -------------

But the greater total for England is obtained here because according to
his own testimony milk is twice as expensive in England as in France
whereas he assumes the same prices for meat in both countries (p.35);
therefore, English milk production shrinks to £8 million and the total
to £28 million, which is the same as in France. It is indeed rather too
much when Mr. Lavergne allows the quantities and price differences to
enter simultaneously into his calculations so that when England produces
certain articles more dearly than France — this appears to be an
advantage of English agriculture, whereas at best it signifies a larger
profit for the tenants and landlords.

That Mr. Lavergne is not only familiar with the economic achievements of
English agriculture, but also subscribes to the prejudices of the
English tenants and landlords, is shown on page 48:

"One great drawback attends cereals generally ... they exhaust the soil
which bears them."

Not only does Mr. Lavergne believe that other plants do not do so, but
also believes that fodder crops and root crops enrich the soil:

"Forage plants derive from the atmosphere the principal elements of
their growth, while they give to the soil more than they take from it;
thus both directly and by their conversion into animal manure
contributing in two ways to repair the mischief done by cereals and
exhausting crops generally; one principle, therefore, is that they
should at least alternate with these crops; in this consists the Norfolk
rotation" (pp. 50, 51).

No wonder that Mr. Lavergne, who believes these English rustic
fairy-tales, also believes that the wages of English farm labourers have
lost their former abnormality since the duties on corn have been lifted.
(See what has been previously said on this point. Buch I, Kap. XXIII, 5,
pp.704 to 729. [English edition: Ch. XXV, 5, pp. 673-96. — _Ed_.] But
let us also listen to Mr. John Bright's speech in Birmingham, December
14, 1865. After mentioning the 5 million families entirely unrepresented
in Parliament, he continues:

"There is among them one million, or rather more than one million, in
the United Kingdom who are classed in the unfortunate list of paupers.
There is another million just above pauperism, but always in peril lest
they should become paupers. Their condition and prospects are not more
favourable than that. Now look at the ignorant and lower strata of this
portion of the community. Look to their abject condition, to their
poverty, to their suffering, to their utter hopelessness of any good.
Why, in the United States — even in the Southern States during the reign
of slavery every Negro had an idea that there was a day of jubilee for
him. But to these people — to this class of the lowest strata in this
country — I am here to state that there is neither the belief of
anything better nor scarcely an aspiration after it. Have you read a
paragraph which lately appeared in the newspapers about John Cross, a
Dorsetshire labourer? He worked six days in the week, had an excellent
character from his employer for whom he had worked twenty-four years at
the rate of eight shillings per week. John Cross had a family of seven
children to provide for out of these wages in his hovel — for a feeble
wife and an infant child. He took — legally, I believe he stole — a
wooden hurdle of the value of sixpence. For this offence he was tried
before the magistrates and sentenced to 14 or 20 days' imprisonment....
I can tell you that many thousands of cases like that of John Cross are
to be found throughout the country, and especially in the south, and
that their condition is such that hitherto the most anxious investigator
has been unable to solve the mystery as to how they keep body and soul
together. Now cast your eye over the country and look at these five
million of families and the desperate condition of this strata of them.
Is it not true that the unenfranchised nation may be said to toil and
toil and knowing almost no rest? Compare it with the ruling class — but
if I do I shall be charged with communism.... But compare this great
toiling and unenfranchised nation with the section who may be considered
the governing classes. Look at its wealth; look at its ostentation —
look at its luxury. Behold its weariness — for there is weariness
amongst them, but it is the weariness of satiety — and see how they rush
from place to place, as it were, to discover some new pleasure."
(_Morning Star_, December 14, 1865.)

It is shown in what follows how surplus-labour, and consequently
surplus-product, is generally confused with ground-rent that
qualitatively and quantitatively specifically determined, at least on
the basis of the capitalist mode of production, part of the
surplus-product. The natural basis of surplus-labour in general, that
is, a natural prerequisite without which such labour cannot be
performed, is that Nature must supply — in the form of animal or
vegetable products of the land, in fisheries, etc. — the necessary means
of subsistence under conditions of an expenditure of labour which does
not consume the entire working day. This natural productivity of
agricultural labour (which includes here the labour of simple gathering,
hunting, fishing and cattle-raising) is the basis of all surplus-labour,
as all labour is primarily and initially directed toward the
appropriation and production of food. (Animals also supply at the same
time skins for warmth in colder climates; also cave-dwellings, etc.)

The same confusion between surplus-product and ground-rent is found
differently expressed by Mr. Dove. [P. Dove, _The Elements of Political
Science_, Edinburgh, 1854, pp.264, 273. — _Ed_.] Originally agricultural
and industrial labour were not separated; the latter was an adjunct of
the former. The surplus-labour and the surplus-product of the
land-cultivating tribe, house commune, or family included both
agricultural and industrial labour. Both went hand in hand. Hunting,
fishing and agriculture were impossible without suitable tools. Weaving,
spinning, etc., were first carried on as an agrarian side line.

We have previously shown that just as the labour of an individual
workman breaks up into necessary and surplus labour, the aggregate
labour of the working-class may be so divided that the portion which
produces the total means of subsistence for the working-class (including
the means of production required for this purpose) performs the
necessary labour for the whole of society. The labour performed by the
remainder of the working-class may then be regarded as surplus labour.
But the necessary labour consists by no means only of agricultural
labour, but also of that labour which produces all other products
necessarily included in the average consumption of the labourer.
Furthermore, from the social standpoint, some perform only necessary
labour because others perform only surplus labour, and vice versa. It is
but a division of labour between them. The same holds for the division
of labour between agricultural and industrial labourers in general. The
purely industrial character of labour, on the one hand, corresponds to
the purely agricultural character on the other. This purely agricultural
labour is by no means natural, but is rather a product — and a very
modern one at that, which has not yet been achieved everywhere — of
social development and corresponds to a very definite stage of the
development of production. Just as a portion of agricultural labour is
materialised in products which either minister only to luxury or serve
as raw materials in industry, but by no means serve as food, let alone
as food for the masses, so on the other hand a portion of industrial
labour is materialised in products which serve as necessary means of
consumption for both agricultural and nonagricultural labourers. It is a
mistake, from a social point of view, to regard this industrial labour
as surplus-labour. It is, in part, as much necessary labour as the
necessary portion of the agricultural labour. It is also but a form
rendered independent of a part of industrial labour which was formerly
naturally connected with agricultural labour, a necessary mutual
supplement to the specifically agricultural labour now separated from
it. (From a purely material point of view, 500 mechanical weavers, e.g.,
produce surplus-fabrics to a far greater degree, that is, more than is
required for their own clothing.)

Finally, it should be borne in mind in considering the various forms of
manifestation of ground-rent, that is, the lease money paid under the
heading of ground-rent to the landlord for the use of the land for
purposes of production or consumption, that the price of things which
have in themselves no value, i.e., are not the product of labour, such
as land, or which at least cannot be reproduced by labour, such as
antiques and works of art by certain masters, etc., may be determined by
many fortuitous combinations. In order to sell a thing, nothing more is
required than its capacity to be monopolised and alienated.

There are three main errors to be avoided in studying ground-rent, and
which obscure its analysis.

1) Confusing the various forms of rent pertaining to different stages of
development of the social production process.

Whatever the specific form of rent may be, all types have this in
common: the appropriation of rent is that economic form in which landed
property is realised, and ground-rent, in turn, presupposes the
existence of landed property, the ownership of certain portions of our
planet by certain individuals. The owner may be an individual
representing the community, as in Asia, Egypt, etc.; or this landed
property may be merely incidental to the ownership of the immediate
producers themselves by some individual as under slavery or serfdom; or
it may be a purely private ownership of Nature by non-producers, a mere
title to land; or, finally, it may be a relationship to the land which,
as in the case of colonists and small peasants owning land, seems to be
directly included — in the isolated and not socially developed labour —
in the appropriation and production of the products of particular plots
of land by the direct producers.

This common element in the various forms of rent, namely that of being
the economic realisation of landed property, of legal fiction by grace
of which certain individuals have an exclusive right to certain parts of
our planet — makes it possible for the differences to escape detection.

2) All ground-rent is surplus-value, the product of surplus-labour. In
its undeveloped form as rent in kind it is still directly the
surplus-product itself. Hence, the mistaken idea that the rent
corresponding to the capitalist mode of production — which is always a
surplus over and above profit, i.e., above a value portion of
commodities which itself consists of surplus-value (surplus-labour) —
that this special and specific component of surplus-value is explained
by merely explaining the general conditions for the existence of
surplus-value and profit in general. These conditions are: the direct
producers must work beyond the time necessary for reproducing their own
labour-power, for their own reproduction. They must perform
surplus-labour in general. This is the subjective condition. The
objective condition is that they must be able to perform surplus-labour.
The natural conditions must be such that a part of their available
labour-time suffices for their reproduction and self-maintenance as
producers, that the production of their necessary means of subsistence
shall not consume their whole labour-power. The fertility of Nature
establishes a limit here, a starting-point, a basis. On the other hand,
the development of the social productive power of their labour forms the
other limit. Examined more closely, since the production of means of
subsistence is the very first condition of their existence and of all
production in general, labour used in this production, that is,
agricultural labour in the broadest economic sense, must be fruitful
enough so as not to absorb the entire available labour-time in the
production of means of subsistence for the direct producers, that is,
agricultural surplus-labour and therefore agricultural surplus-product
must be possible. Developed further, the total agricultural labour, both
necessary and surplus labour, of a segment of society must suffice to
produce the necessary subsistence for the whole of society, that is, for
non-agricultural labourers too. This means therefore that the major
division of labour between agricultural and industrial must be possible;
and similarly between tillers of the soil producing means of subsistence
and those producing raw materials. Although the labour of the direct
producers of means of subsistence breaks up into necessary and surplus
labour as far as they themselves are concerned, it represents from the
social standpoint only the necessary labour required to produce the
means of subsistence. Incidentally, the same is true for all division of
labour within society as a whole, as distinct from the division of
labour within individual workshops. It is the labour necessary for the
production of particular articles, for the satisfaction of some
particular need of society for these particular articles. If this
division is proportional, then the products of various groups are sold
at their values (at a later stage of development they are sold at their
prices of production), or at prices which are certain modifications of
these values or prices of production determined by general laws. It is
indeed the effect of the law of value, not with reference to individual
commodities or articles, but to each total product of the particular
social spheres of production made independent by the division of labour;
so that not only is no more than the necessary labour-time used up for
each specific commodity, but only the necessary proportional quantity of
the total social labour-time is used up in the various groups. For the
condition remains that the commodity represents use-value. But if the
use-value of individual commodities depends on whether they satisfy a
particular need then the use-value of the mass of the social product
depends on whether it satisfies the quantitatively definite social need
for each particular kind of product in an adequate manner, and whether
the labour is therefore proportionately distributed among the different
spheres in keeping with these social needs, which are quantitatively
circumscribed. (This point is to be noted in the distribution of capital
among the various spheres of production.) The social need, that is, the
use-value on a social scale, appears here as a determining factor for
the amount of total social labour-time which is expended in various
specific spheres of production. But it is merely the same law which is
already applied in the case of single commodities, namely, that the
use-value of a commodity is the basis of its exchange-value and thus of
its value. This point has a bearing upon the relationship between
necessary and surplus labour only in so far as a violation of this
proportion makes it impossible to realise the value of the commodity and
thus the surplus-value contained in it. For instance; let us assume that
proportionally too much cotton goods have been produced, although only
the labour-time necessary under the prevailing conditions is
incorporated in this total cloth production. But in general too much
social labour has been expended in this particular line; in other words,
a portion of this product is useless. It is therefore sold solely as if
it had been produced in the necessary proportion. This quantitative
limit to the quota of social labour-time available for the various
particular spheres of production is but a more developed expression of
the law of value in general, although the necessary labour-time assumes
a different meaning here. Only just so much of it is required for the
satisfaction of social needs. The limitation occurring here is due to
the use value. Society can use only so much of its total labour-time for
this particular kind of product under prevailing conditions of
production. But the subjective and objective conditions of surplus
labour and surplus-value in general have nothing to do with the
particular form of either the profit or the rent. These conditions apply
to surplus-value as such, no matter what special form it may assume.
Hence they do not explain ground-rent.

3) It is precisely in the economic realisation of landed property, in
the development of ground-rent, that the following characteristic
peculiarity comes to the fore, namely that its amount is by no means
determined by the actions of its recipient, but is determined rather by
the independent development of social labour in which the recipient
takes no part. It may easily happen, therefore, that something is
regarded as a peculiarity of rent (and of the products of agriculture in
general), which is really a common feature of all branches of production
and all their products where the basis is commodity-production — and, in
particular, capitalist production, which is in its entirety commodity
production.

The amount of ground-rent (and with it the value of land) grows with
social development as a result of the total social labour. On the one
hand, this leads to an expansion of the market and of the demand for
products of the soil, and, on the other, it stimulates the demand for
land itself, which is a prerequisite of competitive production in all
lines of business activity, even those which are not agricultural. More
exactly — if one considers only the actual agricultural rent — rent, and
thereby the value of the land, develops with the market for the products
of the soil, and thus with the increase in the non-agricultural
population, with its need and demand for means of subsistence and raw
materials. It is in the nature of capitalist production to continually
reduce the agricultural population as compared with the
non-agricultural, because in industry (in the strict sense) the increase
of constant capital in relation to variable capital goes hand in hand
with an absolute increase, though relative decrease, in variable
capital; on the other hand, in agriculture the variable capital required
for the exploitation of a certain plot of land decreases absolutely; it
can thus only increase to the extent that new land is taken into
cultivation, but this again requires as a prerequisite a still greater
growth of the non-agricultural population.

In fact, we are not dealing here with a characteristic peculiarity of
agriculture and its products. On the contrary, the same applies to all
other branches of production and products where the basis is
commodity-production and its absolute form, capitalist production.

These products are commodities, or use-values, which have an
exchange-value that is to be realised, to be converted into money, only
in so far as other commodities form an equivalent for them, that is,
other products confront them as commodities and values; thus, in so far
as they are not produced as immediate means of subsistence for the
producers themselves, but as commodities, as products which become
use-values only by their transformation into exchange-values (money), by
their alienation. The market for these commodities develops through the
social division of labour; the division of productive labours mutually
transforms their respective products into commodities, into equivalents
for each other, making them mutually serve as markets. This is in no way
peculiar to agricultural products.

Rent can develop as money-rent only on the basis of commodity
production, in particular capitalist production, and it develops to the
same extent that agricultural production becomes commodity production,
that is, to the same extent that non-agricultural production develops
independently of agricultural production, for to that degree the
agricultural product becomes commodity, exchange-value, and value. In so
far as commodity-production and thus the production of value develops
with capitalist production so does the production of surplus-value and
surplus product. But in the same proportion as the latter develops,
landed property acquires the capacity of capturing an ever-increasing
portion of this surplus-value by means of its land monopoly and thereby,
of raising the value of its rent and the price of the land itself. The
capitalist still performs an active function in the development of this
surplus-value and surplus-product. But the landowner need only
appropriate the growing share in the surplus-product and the
surplus-value, without having contributed anything to this growth. This
is the characteristic peculiarity of his position, and not the fact that
the value of the products of the land, and thus of the land itself,
increases to the degree that the market for them expands, the demand
grows and with it the world of commodities which confronts the products
of the land — in other words, the mass of non-agricultural commodity
producers and non-agricultural commodity-production. But since this
takes place without any action on his part, it appears to him as
something unique that the mass of value, the mass of surplus-value, and
the transformation of a portion of surplus value into ground-rent should
depend upon the social production process, on the development of
commodity-production in general. For this reason, Dove, for instance,
tries to evolve rent from this. He says that rent does not depend upon
the mass of the agricultural product, but upon its value, [P. Dove, _The
Elements of Political Science_, Edinburgh, 1854, p.279. — _Ed_.]
however, this depends upon the mass and productivity of the
non-agricultural population. But it is also true of every other product
that it can only develop as a commodity partly as the mass and partly as
the variety of other commodities which form equivalents for its
increase. This has already been demonstrated in connection with the
general presentation of value. [English edition: Vol. I, p. 88. — _Ed_.]
On the one hand, the exchangeability of a product in general depends on
the multiplicity of commodities existing in addition to it. On the other
hand, on it depends in particular the quantity in which this product can
be produced as a commodity.

No producer, whether industrial or agricultural, when considered by
himself alone, produces value or commodities. His product becomes a
value and a commodity only in the context of definite social
interrelations. In the first place, in so far as it appears as the
expression of social labour, hence in so far as the individual
producer's labour-time counts as a part of the social labour-time in
general; and, secondly, this social character of his labour appears
impressed upon his product through its pecuniary character and through
its general exchangeability determined by its price.

Therefore, if, on the one hand, surplus-value or, still more narrowly,
the surplus-product in general is explained instead of rent, the mistake
is made, on the other hand, of ascribing exclusively to agricultural
products a characteristic which belongs to all products in their
capacity as commodities and values. This is vulgarised still more by
those who pass from the general determination of value over to the
rea1isation of the value of a specific commodity. Every commodity can
realise its value only in the process of circulation, and whether it
realises its value, or to what extent it does so, depends on prevailing
market conditions.

It is not a singularity of ground-rent, then, that agricultural products
develop into, and as, values, i.e., that they confront other commodities
as commodities, and that non-agricultural products confront them as
commodities; or that they develop as specific expressions of social
labour. The singularity of ground-rent is rather that together with the
conditions in which agricultural products develop as values
(commodities), and together with the conditions in which their values
are realised, there also grows the power of landed property to
appropriate an increasing portion of these values, which were created
without its assistance; and so an increasing portion of surplus-value is
transformed into ground-rent.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

26. Nothing could he more comical than Hegel's development of private
landed property. According to this, man as an individual must endow his
will with reality as the soul of external nature, and must therefore
take possession of this nature and make it his private property. If this
were the destiny of the "_individual_", of man as an individual, it
would follow that every human being must be a landowner, in order to
become a real individual. Free private ownership of land, a very recent
product, is according to Hegel, not a definite social relation, but a
relation of man as an individual to "nature," an absolute right of man
to appropriate all things (Hegel _Philosophie des Rechts,_ Berlin 1840 p
79) This much at least is evident the individual cannot maintain himself
as a landowner by his mere "will" against the will of another
individual, who likewise wants to become a real individual by virtue of
the same strip of land. It definitely requires some thing other than
goodwill. Furthermore, it is absolutely impossible to determine where
the "individual" draws the line for realising his will —whether this
will requires for its realisation a whole country, or whether it
requires a whole group of countries by whose appropriation "the
supremacy of my will over the thing can be manifested." Here Hegel comes
to a complete impasse. "The appropriation is of a very particular kind;
I do not take possession of more than I touch with my body; but it is
clear, on the other hand, that external things are more extensive than I
can grasp. By thus having possession of such a thing, some other is
thereby connected to it. I carry out the act of appropriation by means
of my hand, but its scope can be extended" (p.90). But this other thing
is again linked with still another and so the boundary within which my
will, as the soul, can pour into the soil, disappears. "When I possess
something, my mind at once passes over to the idea that not only this
property in my immediate possession, but what is associated with it is
also mine. Here positive right must decide, for nothing more can be
deduced from the concept" (p. 91). This is an extraordinarily naive
admission "of the concept", and proves that this concept which makes the
blunder at the very outset of regarding as absolute a very definite
legal view of landed property belonging to bourgeois society —
understands "nothing" of the actual nature of this landed property. This
contains at the same time the admission that "positive right" can, and
must, alter its determinations as the requirements of social, i.e.,
economic, development change.

27. Very conservative agricultural chemists, such as Johnston, admit
that a really rational agriculture is confronted everywhere with
insurmountable barriers stemming from private property. So do writers
who are _ex professo_ advocates of the monopoly of private property in
the world, for instance, Charles Comte in his two-volume work, which has
as its special aim the defence of private property. "A nation," he says,
"cannot attain to the degree of prosperity and power compatible with its
nature, unless every portion of the soil nourishing it is assigned to
that purpose which agrees best with the general interest. In order to
give to its wealth a strong development, one sole and above all highly
enlightened will should, if possible, take it upon itself to assign each
piece of its domain its task and make every piece contribute to the
prosperity of all others. But the existence of such a will ... would be
incompatible with the division of the land into private plots — and with
the authority guaranteed each owner to dispose of his property in an
almost absolute manner. ["_Traité de la propriété_," Tome I, Paris,
1834, p. 228. — _Ed_.] Johnston, Comte, and others, only have in mind
the necessity of tilling the land of a certain country as a whole, when
they speak of a contradiction between property and a rational system of
agronomy. But the dependence of the cultivation of particular
agricultural products upon the fluctuations of market-prices, and the
continual changes in this cultivation with these price fluctuations —
the whole spirit of capitalist production, which is directed toward the
immediate gain of money are in contradiction to agriculture, which has
to minister to the entire range of permanent necessities of life
required by the chain of successive generations. A striking illustration
of this is furnished by the forests, which are only rarely managed in a
way more or less corresponding to the interests of society as a whole,
_i.e._, when they are not private property, but subject to the control
of the state.

28. _Misère de la Philosophie_, p.165. There I have made a distinction
between _terre-matière_ and _terre-capital_. "The mere application of
further outlays of capital to land already transformed into means of
production increases land as capital without adding anything to land as
matter, that is, to the extent of the land.... Land as capital is no
more eternal than any other capital... Land as capital is fixed capital;
but fixed capital gets used up just as much as circulating capital."

29. I say "can" because under certain circumstances this interest is
regulated by the law of ground-rent and, therefore, can disappear, as in
the case of competition between virgin lands of great natural fertility.

30. See James Anderson [_A Calm Investigation of the Circumstances that
have led to the Present Scarcity of Grain in Britain_, London, 1801,
pp.35-36, 38. — _Ed_.] and Carey, _The Past, the Present, and the
Future_, Philadelphia, 1848, pp. 129-31. — _Ed_.

31. See the _Anti-Corn Law Prize-Essays_. However, the Corn Laws always
kept prices at an artificially higher level. For the better placed
tenants this was favourable. They profited from the passivity in which
the protective duties kept the great mass of tenants who relied, with or
without good reason, on the exceptional average price.

32. John C. Morton, _The Forces Used in Agriculture_. Lecture in the
London Society of Arts, 1860, based upon authentic documents collected
from about 100 tenants in 12 Scottish and 35 English counties.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 38. Differential Rent: General Remarks

 

In the analysis of ground-rent we shall begin with the assumption that
products paying such a rent, products in which a portion of the
surplus-value, and therefore also a portion of the total price, resolves
itself into ground-rent, i.e., that agricultural as well as mining
products are sold at their prices of production like all other
commodities. (It suffices for our purposes to confine ourselves to
agricultural and mining products.) In other words, their selling prices
are made up of the elements of their cost (the value of consumed
constant and variable capital) plus a profit determined by the general
rate of profit and calculated on the total advanced capital, whether
consumed or not. We assume, then, that average selling prices of these
products are equal to their prices of production. The question now
arises how it is possible for ground-rent to develop under these
conditions, i.e., how it is possible for a portion of the profit to
become transformed into ground-rent, so that a portion of the
commodity-price falls to the landlord.

In order to demonstrate the general character of this form of
ground-rent, let us assume that most of the factories of a certain
country derive their power from steam-engines, while a smaller number
derive it from natural waterfalls. Let us further assume that the price
of production in the former amounts to 115 for a quantity of commodities
which have consumed a capital of 100. The 15% profit is calculated not
solely on the consumed capital of 100, but on the total capital employed
in the production of this commodity-value. We have previously shown that
this price of production is not determined by the individual cost-price
of every single industrial producer, but by the average cost-price of
the commodity under average conditions of capital in the entire sphere
of production. It is, in fact, the market-price of production, the
average market-price as distinct from its oscillations. It is in general
in the form of the market-price, and, furthermore, in the form of the
regulating market-price, or market-price of production, that the nature
of the value of commodities asserts itself, its determination not by the
labour-time necessary in the case of any individual producer for the
production of a certain quantity of commodities, or of some individual
commodity, but by the socially necessary labour-time; that is, by the
labour-time, required for the production of the socially necessary total
quantity of commodity varieties on the market under the existing average
conditions of social production

As definite figures are immaterial in this case, we shall assume
furthermore that the cost-price in factories run on water-power is only
90 instead of 100. Since the regulating market-price of production of
this quantity of commodities = 115, with a profit of 15%, the
manufacturers who operate their machines on water power will also sell
their commodities at 115, i.e., the average price regulating the
market-price. Their profit would then be 25 instead of 15; the
regulating price of production would allow them a surplus-profit of 10%
not because they sell their commodities above the price of production,
but because they sell them at the price of production, because their
commodities are produced, or their capital operates, under exceptionally
favourable conditions, i.e., under conditions which are more favourable
than the average prevailing in this sphere.

Two things become evident at once:

_First_, the surplus-profit of the producers who use a natural waterfall
as motive power is to begin with in the same class with all
surplus-profit (and we have already analysed this category when
discussing prices of production) which is not the fortuitous result of
transactions in the circulation process, of the fortuitous fluctuations
in market-prices. This surplus-profit, then, is likewise equal to the
difference between the individual price of production of these favoured
producers and the general social price of production regulating the
market in this entire production sphere. This difference is equal to the
excess of the general price of production of the commodities over their
individual price of production. The two regulating limits of this excess
are, on the one hand, the individual cost-price, and thus the individual
price of production, and, on the other hand, the general price of
production. The value of commodities produced with water-power is
smaller because a smaller total quantity of labour is required for their
production, i.e., less labour — in materialised form — enters into the
constant capital as part of the latter.

The labour employed here is more productive, its individual productive
power is greater than that employed in the majority of factories of the
same kind. Its greater productive power is shown in the fact that in
order to produce the same quantity of commodities, it requires a smaller
quantity of constant capital, a smaller quantity of materialised labour,
than the others. It also requires less living labour, because the
water-wheel need not be heated. This greater individual productiveness
of employed labour reduces the value, but also the cost-price and
thereby the price of production of the commodity. For the individual
industrial capitalist this expresses itself in a lower cost-price for
his commodities. He has to pay for less materialised labour, and also
less wages for less living labour-power employed. Since the cost-price
of his commodities is lower, his individual price of production is also
lower. His cost-price is 90 instead of 100. His individual price of
production would therefore be only 103½ instead of 115 (100:115 =
90:103½) The difference between his individual price of production and
the general price of production is limited by the difference between his
individual cost- price and the general cost-price. This is one of the
magnitudes which form the limits to his surplus-profit. The other is the
magnitude of the general price of production into which the general rate
of profit enters as one of the regulating factors. Were coal to become
cheaper, the difference between his individual cost-price and the
general cost-price would decrease, and with it his surplus-profit.
Should he be compelled to sell his commodities at their individual
value, or at the price of production determined by their individual
value, then the difference would disappear. It is, on the one hand, a
result of the fact that the commodities are sold at their general
market-price, the price brought about by the equalisation of individual
prices through competition, and, on the other, a result of the fact that
the greater individual productivity of labour set in motion by him does
not benefit the labourer, but the employer, as does all productivity of
labour, that it appears as the productiveness of capital.

Since the level of the general price of production is one of the limits
of this surplus-profit, the level of the general rate of profit being
one of its factors, this surplus-profit can only arise from the
difference between the general and the individual price of production,
and consequently from the difference between the general and the
individual rate of profit. An excess above this difference presupposes
the sale of products above, not at, the price of production regulated by
the market.

_Secondly_, thus far, the surplus-profit of the manufacturer using
natural water-power instead of steam does not differ in any way from any
other surplus-profit. All normal surplus-profit, that is, all
surplus-profit not due to fortuitous sales or market-price fluctuations
is determined by the difference between the individual price of
production of the commodities of a particular capital and the general
price of production, which regulates the market-prices of the
commodities produced by the capital in this sphere of production in
general, or, in other words, the market-prices of commodities of the
total capital invested in this sphere of production.

But now we come to the difference.

To what circumstance does the industrial capitalist in the present case
owe his surplus-profit, the surplus resulting for him personally from
the price of production regulated by the general rate of profit?

He owes it in the first instance to a natural force — the motive power
of the waterfall — which is found readily available in Nature and is not
itself a product of labour like the coal which transforms water into
steam. The coal, therefore, has value, must be paid for by an
equivalent, and has a cost. The waterfall is a natural production agent
in the production of which no labour enters.

But this is not all. The manufacturer who operates with steam also
employs natural forces which cost him nothing yet make the labour more
productive and increase the surplus-value and thereby the profit,
inasmuch as they thus cheapen the manufacture of the means of
subsistence required for the labourers. These natural forces are thus
quite as much monopolised by capital as the social natural forces of
labour arising from co-operation, division of labour, etc. The
manufacturer pays for coal, but not for the capacity of water to alter
its physical state, to turn into steam, not for the elasticity of the
steam, etc. This monopolisation of natural forces, that is, of the
increase in labour-power produced by them, is common to all capital
operating with steam-engines. It may increase that portion of the
product of labour which represents surplus-value in relation to that
portion which is transformed into wages. In so far as it does this, it
raises the general rate of profit, but it does not create any
surplus-profit, for this consists of the excess of individual profit
over average profit. The fact that the application of a natural force, a
waterfall, creates surplus-profit in this case, cannot therefore be due
solely to the circumstance that the increased productivity of labour
here results from the application of a natural force. Other modifying
circumstances are necessary.

Conversely. The mere application of natural forces in industry may
influence the level of the general rate of profit because it affects the
quantity of labour required to produce the necessary means of
subsistence. But in itself it does not create any deviation from the
general rate of profit, and this is precisely the point in which we are
interested here. Furthermore, the surplus-profit which some individual
capital otherwise realises in a particular sphere of production — for
deviations of the rates of profit in various spheres of production are
continually balanced out into an average rate — is due, aside from
fortuitous deviations, to a reduction in cost-price, in production
costs. This reduction arises either from the fact that capital is used
in greater than average quantities, so that _faux frais_ of production
are reduced, while the general causes increasing the productiveness of
labour (cooperation, division of labour, etc.) can become effective to a
higher degree, with more intensity, because their field of activity has
become larger; or it may arise from the fact that, aside from the amount
of functioning capital, better methods of labour, new inventions,
improved machinery, chemical manufacturing secrets, etc., in short, new
and improved, better than average means of production and methods of
production are used. The reduction in cost-price and the surplus-profit
arising from it are here the result of the manner in which the
functioning capital is invested. They result either from the fact that
the capital is concentrated in the hands of one person in
extraordinarily large quantities (a condition that is cancelled out as
soon as equal magnitudes of capital are used on the average), or from
the fact that a certain magnitude of capital functions in a particularly
productive manner (a condition that disappears as soon as the
exceptional method of production becomes general or is surpassed by a
still more developed one).

The cause of the surplus-profit, then, arises here from the capital
itself (which includes the labour set in motion by it) whether it be due
to the greater magnitude of capital employed or to its more efficient
application; and, as a matter of fact, there is no particular reason why
all capital in the same production sphere should not be invested in the
same manner. On the contrary, the competition between capitals tends to
cancel these differences more and more. The determination of value by
the socially necessary labour-time asserts itself through the cheapening
of commodities and the compulsion to produce commodities under the same
favourable conditions. But matters are different with the surplus-profit
of an industrial capitalist who makes use of the waterfall. The
increased productiveness of the labour used by him comes neither from
the capital and labour itself, nor from the mere application of some
natural force different from capital and labour but incorporated in the
capital. It arises from the greater natural productiveness of labour
bound up with the application of a force of Nature, but not a force of
Nature that is at the command of all capital in the same sphere of
production, as for example the elasticity of steam. In other words, its
application is not to be taken for granted whenever capital is generally
invested in this sphere of production. On the contrary, it is a
monopolisable force of Nature which, like the waterfall, is only at the
command of those who have at their disposal particular portions of the
earth and its appurtenances. It is by no means within the power of
capital to call into existence this natural premise for a greater
productivity of labour in the same manner as any capital may transform
water into steam. It is found only locally in Nature and, wherever it
does not exist, it cannot be established by a definite investment of
capital. It is not bound to goods which labour can produce, such as
machines and coal, but to specific natural conditions prevailing in
certain portions of land. Those manufacturers who own waterfalls exclude
those who do not from using this natural force, because land, and
particularly land endowed with water-power, is scarce. This does not
prevent the amount of water-power available for industrial purposes from
being increased, even though the number of natural waterfalls in a given
country is limited. The waterfall may be harnessed by man in order to
fully exploit its motive force. If such exists, the water-wheel may be
improved so as to make use of as much of the water-power as possible;
where the ordinary wheel is not suitable for the water-supply, turbines
may be used, etc. The possession of this natural force constitutes a
monopoly in the hands of its owner; it is a condition for an increase in
the productiveness of the invested capital that cannot be established by
the production process of the capital itself; ^([33]) this natural
force, which can be monopolised in this manner, is always bound to the
land. Such a natural force does not belong to the general conditions of
the sphere of production in question, nor to those conditions of the
latter which may be generally established.

Now let us assume that the waterfalls, along with the land to which they
belong, are held by individuals who are regarded as owners of these
portions of the earth, i.e., who are landowners. These owners prevent
the investment of capital in the waterfalls and their exploitation by
capital. They can permit or forbid such utilisation. But a waterfall
cannot be created by capital out of itself. Therefore, the
surplus-profit which arises from the employment of this waterfall is not
due to capital, but to the utilisation of a natural force which can be
monopolised, and has been monopolised, by capital. Under these
circumstances, the surplus-profit is transformed into ground-rent, that
is, it falls into possession of the owner of a waterfall. If the
manufacturer pays the owner of a waterfall £10 annually, then his profit
is £15, that is, 15% on the £100 which then make up his cost of
production; and he is just as well or possibly better off than all other
capitalists in his sphere of production who operate with steam. It would
not alter matters one bit if the capitalist himself should be the owner
of a waterfall. He would, in such a case, pocket as before the
surplus-profit of £10 in his capacity as waterfall owner, and not in his
capacity as capitalist; and precisely because this surplus does not stem
from his capital as such, but rather from the control of a limited
natural force distinct from his capital which can be monopolised, is it
transformed into ground-rent.

_First_, it is evident that this rent is always a differential rent, for
it does not enter as a determining factor into the general production
price of commodities, but rather is based on it. It invariably arises
from the difference between the individual production price of a
particular capital having command over the monopolised natural force, on
the one hand, and the general production price of the total capital
invested in the sphere of production concerned, on the other.

_Secondly_, this ground-rent does not arise from the absolute increase
in the productiveness of employed capital, or labour appropriated by it,
since this can only reduce the value of commodities; it is due to the
greater relative fruitfulness of specific separate capitals invested in
a certain production sphere, as compared with investments of capital
which are excluded from these exceptional and natural conditions
favouring productiveness. For instance, if the use of steam should offer
overwhelming advantages not offered by the use of water-power, despite
the fact that coal has value and the water-power has not, and if these
advantages more than compensated for the expense, then, the water-power
would not be used and could not produce any surplus-profit, and
therefore could not produce any rent.

_Thirdly_, the natural force is not the source of surplus-profit, but
only its natural basis, because this natural basis permits an
exceptional increase in the productiveness of labour. In the same way,
use-value is in general the bearer of exchange-value, but not its cause.
If the same use-value could be obtained without labour, it would have no
exchange-value, yet it would retain, as before, the same natural
usefulness as use-value. On the other hand, nothing can have
exchange-value unless it has use-value, i.e., unless it is a natural
bearer of labour. Were it not for the fact that the various values are
averaged out into prices of production, and the various individual
prices of production into a general price of production regulating the
market, the mere increase in productivity of labour through utilisation
of the waterfall would merely lower the price of commodities produced
with the aid of this waterfall, without increasing the share of profit
contained in these commodities. Similarly, on the other hand, this
increased productivity of labour itself would not be converted into
surplus-value were it not for the fact that capital appropriates the
natural and social productivity of the labour used by it as its own.

_Fourthly_, the private ownership of the waterfall in itself has nothing
to do with the creation of the surplus-value (profit) portion, and
therefore, of the price of the commodity in general, which is produced
by means of the waterfall. This surplus-profit would also exist if
landed property did not exist; for instance, if the land on which the
waterfall is situated were used by the manufacturer as unclaimed land.
Hence landed property does not create the portion of value which is
transformed into surplus-profit, but merely enables the landowner, the
owner of the waterfall, to coax this surplus-profit out of the pocket of
the manufacturer and into his own. It is not the cause of the creation
of such surplus-profit, but is the cause of its transformation into the
form of ground-rent, and therefore of the appropriation of this portion
of the profit, or commodity-price, by the owner of the land or
waterfall.

_Fifthly_, it is evident that the price of the waterfall, that is, the
price which the landowner would receive were he to sell it to a third
party or even to the manufacturer himself, does not immediately enter
into the production price of the commodities, although it does enter
into the individual cost-price of the manufacturer; because the rent
arises here from the price of production of similar commodities produced
by steam machinery, and this price is regulated independently of the
waterfall. Furthermore, this price of the waterfall on the whole is an
irrational expression, but behind it is hidden a real economic
relationship. The waterfall, like land in general, and like any natural
force, has no value because it does not represent any materialised
labour, and therefore, it has no price, which is normally no more than
the expression of value in money terms. Where there is no value, there
is also _eo ipso_ nothing to be expressed in money. This price is
nothing more than the capitalised rent. Landownership enables the
landowner to appropriate the difference between the individual profit
and average profit. The profit thus acquired, which is renewed every
year, may be capitalised, and appears then as the price of the natural
force itself. If the surplus-profit realised by the manufacturer using
the waterfall amounts to £10 per year, and the average interest is 5%,
then these £10 represent the annual interest on a capital of £200 and
the capitalisation of the annual £10 which the waterfall enables its
owner to appropriate from the manufacturer, appears then as the
capital-value of the waterfall itself. That it is not the waterfall
itself which has value, but that its price is a mere reflection of the
appropriated surplus-profit capitalistically calculated, becomes at once
evident from the fact that the price of £200 represents merely the
product obtained by multiplying a surplus-profit of £10 by 20 years,
whereas, other conditions remaining equal, the same waterfall will
enable its owner to appropriate these £10 every year for an indefinite
number of years — 30 years, 100 years, or x years; and, whereas, on the
other hand, should some new method of production not applicable with
water-power reduce the cost-price of commodities produced by steam
machinery from £100 to £90, the surplus-profit, and thereby the rent,
and thus the price of the waterfall, would disappear.

Now that we have described the general concept of differential rent, we
shall pass on to its consideration in agriculture proper. What applies
to agriculture will also apply on the whole to mining.

Notes

33. Concerning extra profit, see the Inquiry [into those Principles,
Respecting the Nature of Demand and the Necessity of Consumption, lately
advocated by Mr. Malthus, London, 1821. — _Ed._] (against Malthus).

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 39. First Form of Differential Rent (Differential Rent I)

 

Ricardo is quite right in the following observations:

"Rent is always the difference between the produce obtained by the
employment of two equal quantities of capital and labour" (_Principles_,
p. 59).

[He means differential rent, for he assumes that no other rent but
differential rent exists.] He should have added, "on equal areas of
land" in so far as it is a matter of ground-rent and not surplus-profit
in general.

In other words, surplus-profit, if normal and not due to accidental
occurrences in the circulation process, is always produced as a
difference between the products of two equal quantities of capital and
labour, and this surplus-profit is transformed into ground-rent when two
equal quantities of capital and labour are employed on equal areas of
land with unequal results. Moreover, it is by no means absolutely
necessary for this surplus-profit to arise from the unequal results of
equal quantities of invested capital. The various investments may also
employ unequal quantities of capital. Indeed, this is generally the
case. But equal proportions, for instance £100 of each, produce unequal
results; that is, their rates of profit are different. This is the
general prerequisite for the existence of surplus-profit in any sphere
of capital investment. The second prerequisite is the transformation of
this surplus-profit into the form of ground-rent (of rent in general as
a form distinct from profit); it must be investigated in each case when,
how, under what conditions this transformation takes place.

Ricardo is also right in the following observation, provided it is
limited to differential rent:

"Whatever diminishes the inequality in the produce obtained on the same
or on new land, tends to lower rent, and whatever increases that
inequality, necessarily produces an opposite effect and tends to raise
it" (p.74).

However, among these causes are not merely the general ones (fertility
and location), but also 1) the distribution of taxes, depending on
whether it operates uniformly or not; the latter is always the case
when, as in England, it is not centralised and when the tax is levied on
land, not on rent; 2) the inequalities arising from a difference in
agricultural development in different parts of the country, since this
line of production, owing to its traditional character, evens out with
more difficulty than manufacture; and 3) the inequality in distribution
of capital among capitalist tenants. Since the invasion of agriculture
by the capitalist mode of production, transformation of independently
producing peasants into wage-workers, is in fact the last conquest of
this mode of production, these inequalities are greater here than in any
other line of production.

Having made these preliminary remarks, I will first present a brief
summary of the characteristic features of my analysis in
contradistinction to that of Ricardo, etc.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

We shall first consider the unequal results of equal quantities of
capital applied to different plots of land of equal size; or, in the
case of unequal size, results calculated on the basis of equal areas.

The two general causes of these unequal results — quite independent of
capital — are: 1) _Fertility_. (With reference to this first point, it
will be necessary to discuss what is meant by natural fertility of land
and what factors are involved.) 2) The _location_ of the land. This is a
decisive factor in the case of colonies and in general determines the
sequence in which plots of land can be cultivated. Furthermore, it is
evident that these two different causes of differential rent — fertility
and location — may work in opposite directions. A certain plot of land
may be very favourably located and yet be very poor in fertility, and
vice versa. This circumstance is important, for it explains how it is
possible that bringing into cultivation the land of a certain country
may equally well proceed from the better to the worse land as vice
versa. Finally, it is clear that the progress of social production in
general has, on the one hand, the effect of evening out differences
arising from location as a cause of ground-rent, by creating local
markets and improving locations by establishing communication and
transportation facilities; on the other hand, it increases the
differences in individual locations of plots of land by separating
agriculture from manufacturing and forming large centres of production,
on the one hand, while relatively isolating agricultural districts, on
the other.

For the present, however, we shall leave this point concerning location
out of consideration and confine ourselves to natural fertility. Aside
from climatic factors, etc., the difference in natural fertility depends
on the chemical composition of the top soil, that is, on its different
plant nutrition content. However, assuming the chemical composition and
natural fertility in this respect to be the same for two plots of land,
the actual effective fertility differs depending on whether these
elements of plant nutrition are in a form which may be more or less
easily assimilated and immediately utilised for nourishing the crops.
Hence, it will depend partly upon chemical and partly upon mechanical
developments in agriculture to what extent the same natural fertility
may be made available on plots of land of similar natural fertility.
Fertility, although an objective property of the soil, always implies an
economic relation, a relation to the existing chemical and mechanical
level of development in agriculture, and, therefore, changes with this
level of development. Whether by chemical means (such as the use of
certain liquid fertilisers on stiff clay soil and calcination of heavy
clayey soils) or mechanical means (such as special ploughs for heavy
soils), the obstacles which made a soil of equal fertility actually less
fertile can be eliminated (drainage also belongs under this head). Or
even the sequence in types of soils taken under cultivation may be
changed thereby, as was the case, for instance, with light sandy soil
and heavy clayey soil at a certain period of development in English
agriculture. This shows once again that historically, in the sequence of
soils taken under cultivation, one may pass over from more fertile to
less fertile soils as well as vice versa. The same results may be
obtained by an artificially created improvement in soil composition or
by a mere change in agricultural methods. Finally, the same result may
be brought about by a change in the hierarchical arrangement of the soil
types due to different conditions of the subsoil, as soon as the latter
likewise begins to be tilled and turned over into top layers. This is in
part dependent on the employment of new agricultural methods (such as
the cultivation of fodder-grass) and in part on the employment of
mechanical means which either turn the subsoil over into top layers, mix
it with top soil, or cultivate the subsoil without turning it up.

All these influences upon the differential fertility of various plots of
land are such that from the standpoint of economic fertility, the level
of labour productivity, in this case the capacity of agriculture to make
the natural soil fertility immediately exploitable — a capacity which
differs in various periods of development — is as much a factor in
so-called natural soil fertility as its chemical composition and other
natural properties.

We assume, then, the existence of a particular stage of development in
agriculture. We assume furthermore that the hierarchical arrangement of
soil types accords with this stage of development, as is, of course,
always the case for simultaneous capital investments on different plots
of land. Differential rent may then form either an ascending or a
descending sequence, for although the sequence is given for the totality
of actually cultivated plots of land, a series of movements leading to
its formation has invariably taken place.

Let us assume the existence of four kinds of soil: A, B, C, D. Let us
furthermore assume the price of one quarter of wheat = £3, or 60
shillings. Since the rent is solely differential rent, this price of 60
shillings per quarter for the worst soil is equal to the price of
production, that is, equal to the capital plus average profit. Let A be
this worst soil, which yields 1 quarter = 60 shillings for each 50
shillings spent; hence the profit amounts to 10 shillings, or 20%.

Let B yield 2 quarters = 120 shillings for the same expenditure. This
would mean 70 shillings of profit, or a surplus-profit of 60 shillings.

Let C yield 3 quarters = 180 shillings for the same expenditure; total
profit = 130 shillings; surplus-profit = 120 shillings.

Let D yield 4 quarters = 240 shillings = 180 shillings of
surplus-profit.

We would then have the following sequence:

_TABLE I_

Type of Soil

Product

Capital Advanced

Profit

Rent

Quarters

Shillings

Quarters

Shillings

Quarters

Shillings

A
B
C
D

1
2
3
4

60
120
180
240

50
50
50
50

1/6
1 1/6
2 1/6
3 1/6

10
70
130
190

—
1
2
3

—
60
120
180

Total...

10 qrs

600sh.

 

 

 

6 qrs

360sh.

The respective rents are: D = 190sh. — 10sh., or the difference between
D and A; C = 130sh. — 10sh., or the difference between C and A; B =
70sh. — 10sh., or the difference between B and A; and the total rent for
B, C, D = 6 quarters = 360 shillings, equal to the sum of the
differences between D and A, C and A, B and A.

This sequence, which represents a given product in a given condition
may, considered abstractly (we have already offered the reasons why this
may be the case in reality), descend from D to A, from fertile to less
and less fertile soil, or rise from A to D, from relatively poor to more
and more fertile soil, or, finally, may fluctuate, i.e., now rising, now
descending — for instance from D to C, from C to A, and from A to B.

The process in the case of a descending sequence was as follows: The
price of a quarter of wheat rose gradually from, say, 15 shillings to 60
shillings. As soon as the 4 quarters produced by D (we may consider
these 4 quarters as so many million quarters) no longer sufficed, the
price of wheat rose to a point where the supply shortage could be
produced by C. That is to say, the price of wheat must have risen to 20
shillings per quarter. When it had risen to 30 shillings per quarter, B
could be taken under cultivation, and when it reached 60 shillings A
could be taken under cultivation; and the capital invested did not have
to content itself with a rate of profit lower than 20%. In this manner,
a rent was established for D, first of 5 shillings per quarter = 20
shillings for the 4 quarters produced by it; then of 15 shillings per
quarter = 60 shillings, then of 45 shillings per quarter = 180 shillings
for 4 quarters.

If the rate of profit of D originally was similarly = 20 %, then its
total profit on 4 quarters of wheat was also but 10 shillings, but this
represented more grain when the price was 15 shillings than it does when
the price is 60 shillings. But since the grain enters into the
reproduction of labour-power, and part of each quarter has to make good
some portion of wages and another constant capital, the surplus-value
under these conditions was higher, and thus other things being equal the
rate of profit too. (The matter of rate of profit will have to be
specially analysed, and in greater detail.)

On the other hand, if the sequence were in the reverse order, that is,
if the process initiated from A, then the price of wheat at first would
rise above 60 shillings per quarter when new land would have to be taken
under cultivation. But since the necessary supply would be produced by
B, a supply of 2 quarters, the price would fall to 60 shillings again,
for B produced wheat at a cost of 30 shillings per quarter, but sold it
at 60 shillings because the supply just sufficed to cover the demand.
Thus a rent was formed, first of 60 shillings for B, and in the same way
for C and D; it is assumed throughout that the market-price remained at
60 shillings, although C and D produced wheat having an actual value of
20 and 15 shillings per quarter respectively, because the supply of the
one quarter produced by A was needed as much as ever to satisfy the
total demand. In this case, the increase in demand above supply, which
was first satisfied by A, then by A and B, would not have made it
possible to cultivate B, C and D successively, but would merely have
caused a general extension of the sphere of cultivation, and the more
fertile lands might only later come under cultivation.

In the first sequence, an increase in price would raise the rent and
decrease the rate of profit. Such a decrease might be entirely or
partially checked by counteracting circumstances. This point will have
to be treated later in more detail. It should not be forgotten that the
general rate of profit is not determined uniformly in all spheres of
production by the surplus-value. It is not the agricultural profit which
determines industrial profit, but vice versa. But of this more anon.

In the second sequence the rate of profit on invested capital would
remain the same. The amount of profit would be represented by less
grain; but the relative price of grain, compared with that of other
commodities, would have risen. However, the increase in profit wherever
such an increase takes place, becomes separated from the profit in the
form of rent, instead of flowing into the pockets of the capitalist
tenant farmer and appearing as a growing profit. The price of grain,
however, could remain unchanged under the conditions assumed here.

The development and growth of differential rent would remain the same
for fixed as well as for increasing prices, and for a continuous
progression from worse to better soils as well as for a continuous
retrogression from better to worse soils.

Thus far we have assumed: 1) that the price rises in one sequence and
remains stationary in the other; 2) that there is a continuous
progression from better to worse soil, or from worse to better soil.

But now let us assume that the demand for grain rises from its original
figure of 10 to 17 quarters; furthermore, that the worst soil A is
displaced by another soil A, which produces 1 ⅓ quarters at a price of
production of 60 shillings (50sh. cost plus 10sh. for 20% profit), so
that its price of production per quarter = 45 shillings; or, perhaps,
the old soil A may have improved through continuous rational
cultivation, or be cultivated more productively at the same cost, for
instance through the introduction of clover, etc., so that its output
with the same investment of capital rises to 1 ⅓ quarters. Let us also
assume that soil types B, C and D yield the same output as previously,
but that new soil types have been introduced, for instance, A' with a
fertility lying between A and B, and also B' and B" with a fertility
between B and C. We should then observe the following phenomena:

_First:_ The price of production of a quarter of wheat, or its
regulating market-price, falls from 60 shillings to 45 shillings, or by
25%.

_Second:_ The cultivation proceeds simultaneously from more fertile to
less fertile soil, and from less fertile to more fertile soil. Soil A'
is more fertile than A, but less fertile than the hitherto cultivated
soils B, C and D. B' and B" are more fertile than A, A' and B, but less
fertile than C and D. The sequence thus proceeds in crisscross fashion.
Cultivation does not proceed to soil absolutely less fertile than A,
etc., but to relatively less fertile soil with respect to the hitherto
most fertile soil types C and on the other hand, cultivation does not
proceed to soil absolutely more fertile, but to relatively more fertile
soil with respect to the hitherto least fertile soil A, or A and B.

_Thirdly:_ The rent on B falls; likewise the rent on C and D; but the
total rental in grain rises from 6 quarters to 7 ⅔ the amount of
cultivated and rent-yielding land increases, and the amount of produce
rises from 10 quarters to 17. The profit, although it remains the same
for A, rises if expressed in grain, but the rate of profit itself might
rise, because the relative surplus-value does. In this case, the wage,
i.e., the investment of variable capital and therefore the total outlay,
is reduced because of the cheapening of means of subsistence. This total
rental expressed in money falls from 360 shillings to 345 shillings.

_TABLE II_

Type of Soil

Product

Capital Invested

Profit

Rent

Price of Production per Quarter

Quarters

Shillings

Quarters

Shillings

Quarters

Shillings

A
A'
B
B'
B"
C
D

1⅓
1⅔
2
2⅓
2⅔
3
4

60
75
90
105
120
135
180

50
50
50
50
50
50
50

2/9
5/9
8/9
1 2/9
1 5/9
1 8/9
2 8/9

10
25
40
55
70
85
130

—
⅓
⅔
1
1⅓
1⅔
2⅔

—
15
30
45
60
75
120

45 sh.
36 sh.
30 sh.
25 5/7* sh.
22½ sh.
20 sh.
15 sh.

Total...

17

 

 

 

 

7⅔

345

 

(* In the German 1894 edition this reads: 25 2/7. — _Ed_.)

Let us draw up the new sequence. [See p. 655 — _Ed_.]

Finally, if only soil types A, B, C and D were cultivated as before, but
their productiveness rose in such a way that A produced 2 quarters
instead of 1 quarter, B — 4 quarters instead of 2, C — 7 quarters
instead of 3, and D — 10 quarters instead of 4, so that the same causes
affect the various types of soil differently, the total production
increases from 10 quarters to 23. Assuming that demand absorbs these 23
quarters through an increase in population and a fall in prices, we
should obtain the following result:

_TABLE III_

Type of Soil

Product

Capital Invested

Price of Production per Quarter

Profit

Rent

Quarters

Shillings

Quarters

Shillings

Quarters

Shillings

A
B
C
D

2
4
7
10

60
120
210
300

50
50
50
50

30
15
8 4/7
6

⅓
2⅓
5⅓
8⅓

10
70
160
250

0
2
5
8

0
60
150
240

Total...

23

 

 

 

 

 

15

450

The numerical proportions in this and in other tables are chosen at
random but the assumptions are quite rational.

The first and principal assumption is that an improvement in agriculture
acts differently upon different soils, and in this case affects the best
types of soil, C and D, more than types A and B. Experience has shown
that this is generally the case, although the opposite may also take
place. If the improvement affected the poorer soils more than the better
ones, rent on the latter would have fallen instead of risen. But in our
table, we have assumed that the absolute growth in fertility of all soil
types is simultaneously accompanied by an increase in greater relative
fertility of the better soil types, C and D; this means an increase in
the difference between the product at the same capital investment, and
thus an increase in differential rent.

The second assumption is that total demand keeps pace with the increase
in the total product. _First_, one need not imagine such an increase
coming about abruptly, but rather gradually — until sequence III is
established. _Secondly_, it is not true that the consumption of
necessities of life does not increase as they become cheaper. The
abolition of the Corn Laws in England proved the reverse to be the case
(F. Newman, _Lectures on Political Economy_, London, 1851, p.158. —
_Ed_.); the opposite view stems solely from the fact that large and
sudden differences in harvests, which are mere results of weather, bring
about at one time an extraordinary fall, at another an extraordinary
rise, in grain prices. While in such a case the sudden and short-lived
reduction in price does not have time to exert its full effect upon the
extension of consumption, the opposite is true when a reduction arises
from the lowering of the regulating price of production itself, i.e., is
of a long-term nature. _Thirdly_, a part of the grain may be consumed in
the form of brandy or beer; and the increasing consumption of both of
these items is by no means confined within narrow limits. _Fourthly_,
the matter depends in part upon the increase in population and in part
on the fact that the country may be grain-exporting, as England still
was long after the middle of the 18th century, so that the demand is not
solely regulated within the confines of national consumption. _Finally_,
the increase and price reduction in wheat production may result in
making wheat, instead of rye or oats, the principal article of
consumption for the masses, so that the demand for it may grow if only
for this reason, just as the opposite may take place when production
decreases and prices rise. Thus, under these assumptions, and with the
previously selected ratios, sequence III yields the result that the
price per quarter falls from 60 to 30 shillings, that is, by 50%; that
production, compared to sequence I, increases from 10 to 23 quarters,
i.e., by 130%; that the rent remains fixed for soil B, increases by 25%
(In the German 1894 edition this reads: doubles.— _Ed_.) for C, and by
33⅓% (_Ibid._p 22.— _Ed_.) for D; and that the total rental increases
from £18 to £22½, (_Ibid._ 22. — _Ed_.), by 25%. (_Ibid._: 22 1/9% —
_Ed_.)

A comparison of these three tables (whereby sequence I is to be taken
twice, rising from A to D, and descending from D to A), which may be
considered either as given gradations under some stage of society, for
instance, as existing side by side in three different countries, or as
succeeding one another in different periods of development within the
same country, shows:

1) The sequence, when complete, whatever the course of its formative
process may have been, invariably appears as being in a descending line;
for when analysing rent the point of departure will always be land
yielding the maximum rent, and only finally do we come to land yielding
no rent.

2) The price of production on the worst soil, i.e., which yields no
rent, is always the one regulating the market-price, although the latter
in Table I, if its sequence were formed in an ascending line, only
remained fixed because better and better soil was constantly drawn into
cultivation. In such a case, the price of grain produced on the best
soil is a regulating one ill so far as it depends upon the quantity
produced on such soil to what extent soil type A remains the regulator.
If B, C and D should produce more than demand requires, A would cease to
be the regulator. Storch has this point hazily in mind when he adopts
the best soil type as the regulating one. (H. Storch, _Cours d'économie
politique, ou Exposition des principes qui determinent la prospérité des
nations_, Tome II, St.-Petersbourg, 1815, pp. 78-79. — Ed.) In this
manner, the American price of grain regulates the English price.

3) Differential rent arises from differences in the natural fertility of
the soil which is given for every given stage of agricultural
development (leaving aside for the present the question of location); in
other words, from the limited area of the best land, and from the
circumstance that equal amounts of capital must be invested on unequal
types of soil, so that an unequal product results from the same amount
of capital.

4) The existence of a differential rent and of a graduated differential
rent can develop equally well in a descending sequence, which proceeds
from better to worse soils, as in an ascending one, which progresses in
the opposite direction from worse to better soils; or it may be brought
about in checkered fashion by alternating movements. (Sequence I may be
formed by proceeding from D to A, or from A to D; sequence II comprises
both types of movement.)

5) Depending on its mode of formation, differential rent may develop
along with a stationary, rising or falling price of the products of the
land. In the case of a falling price, total production and total rental
may rise, and rent may develop on hitherto rentless land, even though
the worst soil A may have been displaced by a better one or may itself
have improved, and even though the rent may decrease on other land which
is better, or even the best (Table II); this process may also be
connected with a fall in total rent (in money). Finally, at a time when
prices fall on account of a general improvement in cultivation, so that
the product of the worst soil and its price decrease, the rent on some
of the better soils may remain the same, or may fall, while it may rise
on the best ones. Nevertheless, the differential rent of every soil,
compared with the worst soil, depends, if the difference in quantity of
products is given, upon the price, say, of a quarter of wheat. But when
the price is given, differential rent depends upon the magnitude of the
difference in quantity of products, and if with an increasing absolute
fertility of all soils that of the better ones grows relatively more
than that of the worse ones, the magnitude of this difference grows
proportionately. In this way (see Table I), when the price is 60
shillings, the rent on D is determined by its differential product as
compared with A; in other words, by the surplus of 3 quarters. The rent
is therefore = 3 × 60 = l80 shillings. But in Table III, where the price
= 30 shillings, the rent is determined by the quantity of
surplus-product of D as compared with A = 8 quarters; we therefore
obtain 8 × 30 = 240 shillings.

This takes care of the first false assumption regarding differential
rent — still found among West, Malthus, and Ricardo — namely, that it
necessarily presupposes a movement toward worse and worse soil, or an
ever-decreasing fertility of the soil. ([West] _Essay on the Application
Of Capital to Land_, London, 1815. Malthus, Principles of Political
Economy, London, 1836. Malthus, _An Inquiry into the Nature and Progress
of Rent, and the Principles by which it is regulated_, London, 1815.
Ricardo, _On the Principles of Political Economy, and Taxation_, Third
edition, London, 4824, Chap. 11. —_Ed._) It can be formed, as we have
seen, with a movement toward better and better soil; it can be formed
when a better soil takes the lowest position that was formerly occupied
by the worst soil; it can be connected with a progressive improvement in
agriculture. The precondition is merely the inequality of different
kinds of soil. So far as the increase in productivity is concerned, it
assumes that the increase in absolute fertility of the total area does
not eliminate this inequality, but either increases it, leaves it
unchanged, or merely reduces it.

From the beginning to the middle of the 18th century, England's grain
prices constantly fell in spite of the falling prices of gold and
silver, while at the same time (viewing this entire period as a whole)
there was an increase in rent, in the over-all amount of rent, in the
area of cultivated land, in agricultural production, and in population.
This corresponds to Table I taken in conjunction with Table II in an
ascending line, but in such a way that the worst land A is either
improved or eliminated from the grain-producing area; however, this does
not mean that it was not used for other agricultural or industrial
purposes.

From the early 19th century (date to be specified more precisely) until
1815 there is a constant rise in grain prices, accompanied by a steady
increase in rent, in the over-all amount of rent, in the area of
cultivated land, in agricultural production, and in population. This
corresponds to Table I in a descending line. (Cite some sources here on
the cultivation of inferior land in that period.)

In Petty's and Davenant's time, farmers and landowners complained about
improvements and the bringing into cultivation of new land; the rent on
better lands decreased, and the total amount of rent increased through
the extension of the area of land yielding rent.

(These three points should be illustrated later by quotations; likewise
for the difference in fertility of various cultivated sections of land
in a particular country.)

Regarding differential rent in general, it is to be noted that the
market-value is always above the total price of production of the total
quantity of products. As an example, let us take Table I. Ten quarters
of total product are sold for 600 shillings because the market-price is
determined by the price of production of A, which amounts to 60
shillings per quarter. But the actual price of production is:

  --- ------------------ -----------------------
  A   1 qr = 60 sh.      1 qr = 60 sh.
  B   2 qrs = 60 sh.     1 qr = 30 sh.
  C   3 qrs = 60 sh.     1 qr = 20 sh
  D   4 qrs = 60 sh.     1 qr = 15 sh.
      10 QRS = 240 SH.   AVERAGE 1 QR = 24 SH.
  --- ------------------ -----------------------

The actual price of production of these 10 quarters is 240 shillings;
but they are sold for 600 shillings, i.e., at 250% of the price of
production. The actual average price for 1 quarter is 24 shillings; the
market-price is 60 shillings, i.e., also 250% of the production price.

This is determination by market-value as it asserts itself on the basis
of capitalist production through competition; the latter creates a false
social value. This arises from the law of market-value, to which the
products of the soil are subject. The determination of the market-value
of products, including therefore agricultural products, is a social act,
albeit a socially unconscious and unintentional one. It is based
necessarily upon the exchange-value of the product, not upon the soil
and the differences in its fertility. If we suppose the capitalist form
of society to be abolished and society organised as a conscious and
planned association, then the 10 quarters would represent a quantity of
independent labour-time equal to that contained in 240 shillings.
Society would not then buy this agricultural product at two and a half
times the actual labour-time embodied in it and the basis for a class of
landowners would thus be destroyed. This would have the same effect as a
reduction in price of the product to the same amount resulting from
foreign imports. While it is, therefore, true that, by retaining the
present mode of production, but assuming that the differential rent is
paid to the state, prices of agricultural products would, everything
else being equal, remain the same, it is equally wrong to say that the
value of the products would remain the same if capitalist production
were superseded by association. The identity of the market-price for
commodities of the same kind is the manner whereby the social character
of value asserts itself on the basis of capitalist production and, in
general, any production based on the exchange of commodities between
individuals. What society overpays for agricultural products in its
capacity of consumer, what is a minus in the realisation of its
labour-time in agricultural production, is now a plus for a portion of
society, for the landlords.

A second circumstance, important for the analysis to be given under II
of the next chapter, is the following:

It is not merely a matter of rent per acre, or per hectare, nor
generally of a difference between the price of production and
market-price, nor between the individual and the general price of
production per acre, but it is also a question of how many acres of each
type of soil are under cultivation. The point of importance here relates
directly only to the magnitude of the rental, that is, the total rent of
the entire cultivated area; but it serves us at the same time as a
stepping-stone to the consideration of a rise in the _rate of rent_
although there is no rise in prices, nor increase in the differences in
relative fertility of the various types of soil if prices fall.

We had above:

_TABLE I_

  -------------- --------- --------------------- --------- --------------- ---------------
  Type of Soil   Acres     Price of Production   Product   Rent in Grain   Rent in Money

  A              1         £3                    1 qrs     0               0
  B              1         £3                    2 qrs     1 qrs           £3
  C              1         £3                    3 qrs     2 qrs           £6
  D              1         £3                    4 qrs     3qrs            £9

  Total...       4 acres                         10 qrs    6 qrs           £18
  -------------- --------- --------------------- --------- --------------- ---------------

Now let us assume that the number of cultivated acres is doubled in
every category. We then have:

_TABLE IA_

  ----------- ----------- ------------ ----------- ----------- -----------
  Type of     Acres       Price of     Product     Rent in     Rent in
  Soil                    Production               Grain       Money

  A           2           £6           2 qrs       0           0
              2           £6           4 qrs       2 qrs       £6
  B           2           £6           6 qrs       4 qrs       £12
              2           £6           8 qrs       6qrs        £18
  C                                                            
                                                               
  D                                                            

  Total...    8 acres                  20 qrs      12 qrs      £ 36
  ----------- ----------- ------------ ----------- ----------- -----------

Let us assume two more cases. Suppose in the first case production
expands on the two poorest types of soil in the following manner:

_TABLE IB_

Type of Soil

Acres

Price of Production

Product

Rent in Grain

Rent in Money

Per Acre

Total

A
B
C
D

4
4
2
2

£3
£3
£3
£3

£3
£6
£15
£16

4 qr
8 qrs
6 qrs
8 qrs

0
4 qrs
4 qrs
6 qrs

£0
£12
£12
£18

Total...

12 acres

 

£36

26 qrs

14 qrs

£42

And, finally, let us assume an unequal expansion of production and
cultivated area for the four soil categories:

_TABLE IC_

Type of Soil

Acres

Price of Production

Product

Rent in Grain

Rent in Money

Per Acre

Total

A
B
C
D

1
2
5
4

£3
£3
£3
£3

£3
£6
£15
£12

1 qr
4 qrs
15 qrs
16 qrs

0
2 qrs
10 qrs
12 qrs

£0
£6
£30
£18

Total...

12 acres

 

£ 36

36 qrs

24 qrs

£72

In the first place, the rent per acre remains the same in all these
cases — I, Ia, Ib and Ic — for, in fact, the result of the same
investment of capital per acre of the same soil type has remained
unchanged. We have only assumed what is true of any country at any given
moment; namely, that various soil types exist in definite ratios to the
total cultivated area. And we also assumed what is always true of any
two countries being compared, or of the same country at different
periods, namely, that the proportions in which the total cultivated area
is distributed among the different soil types vary.

In comparing Ia with I we see that if the cultivation of land in all
four categories increases in the same proportion a doubling of the
cultivated acreage doubles the total production, and that the same
applies to the rent in grain and money.

However, if we compare Ib and then Ic with I, we see that in both cases
a tripling of the area under cultivation occurs. It increases in both
cases from 4 acres to 12, but in Ib classes A and B contribute most to
the increase, with A yielding no rent and B yielding the smallest amount
of differential rent. Thus, out of the 8 newly cultivated acres, A and B
account for 3 each, i.e., 6 together, whereas C and D account for I
each, i.e., 2 together. In other words, three-quarters of the increase
is accounted for by A and B, and only one-quarter by C and D. With this
premise, in Ib compared with I the trebled area of cultivation does not
result in a trebled product, for the product does not increase from 10
to 30, but only to 26. On the other hand, since a considerable part of
the increase concerns A, which does not yield any rent, and since the
major part of the increase on better soils concerns B, the rent in grain
rises only from 6 to 14 quarters, and the rent in money from £18 to £42.

But if we compare Ic with I, where the land yielding no rent does not
increase in area and the land yielding a minimum rent increases but
slightly, while C and D account for the major part of the increase, we
find that when the cultivated area is trebled production increases from
10 to 36 quarters, i.e., to more than three times its original amount.
The rent in grain increases from 6 to 24 quarters or to four times its
original amount; and similarly money-rent, from £18 to £72.

In all these cases it is in the nature of things that the price of the
agricultural product remains unchanged. The total rental increases in
all cases with the extension of cultivation, unless it takes place
exclusively on the worst soil, which does not yield any rent. But this
increase varies. Should this extension involve the better soil types and
the total output, consequently, increase not merely in proportion to the
expansion of the area, but rather more rapidly, then the rent in grain
and money increases to the same extent. Should it be the worst soil, and
the types of soil close to it, that are principally involved in the
expansion (whereby it is assumed that the worst soil represents a
constant type), the total rental does not increase in proportion to the
extension of cultivation. Thus, given two countries in which soil A,
yielding no rent, is of the same quality, the rental is inversely
proportional to the aliquot part represented by the worst soil and the
inferior soil types in the total area under cultivation, and therefore
inversely proportional to the output, assuming equal capital investments
on equal total land areas. A relationship between the quantity of the
worst and the quantity of the better cultivated land in the total land
area of a given country thus has an opposite influence on the total
rental than the relationship between the quality of the worst cultivated
land and the quality of the better and best has on the rent per acre and
— other circumstances remaining the same — on the total rental.
Confusion between these two points has given rise to all kinds of
erroneous objections raised against differential rent.

The total rental, then, increases by the mere extension of cultivation,
and by the consequent greater investment of capital and labour in the
land. But the most important point is this: Although it is our
assumption that the ratio of rents per acre for the various kinds of
soil remains the same, and therefore also the rate of rent considered
with reference to capital invested in each acre, yet the following is to
be observed: If we compare Ia with I, the case in which the number of
cultivated acres and the capital invested in them have been
proportionately increased, we find that as the total production has
increased proportionately to the expanded cultivated area, i.e., as both
have been doubled, so has the rental. It has risen from £18 to £36, just
as the number of acres has risen from 4 to 8.

If we take the total area of 4 acres, we find that the total rental
amounted to £18 and thus the average rent, including the land which does
not yield any rent, is £4½. Such a calculation might be made, say, by a
landlord owning all 4 acres; and in this way the average rent is
statistically computed for a whole country. The total rental of £18 is
obtained by the investment of a capital of £10. We call the ratio of
these two figures the rate of rent; in the present case it is therefore
180%.

The same rate of rent obtains in Ia, where 8 instead of 4 acres are
cultivated, but all types of land have contributed to the increase in
the same proportion. The total rental of £36 yields for 8 acres and an
invested capital of £20 an average rent of £4½ per acre and a rate of
rent of 180%.

But if we consider Ib, where the increase has taken place mainly upon
two inferior categories of soil, we obtain a rent of £42 for 12 acres,
or an average rent of £3½ per acre. The total invested capital is £30,
and therefore the rate of' rent = 140%. The average rent per acre has
thus decreased by £1, and the rate of rent has fallen from 180 to 140%.
Here then we have a rise in the total rental from £18 to £42, but a drop
in average rent calculated per acre as well as on the basis of capital;
the drop takes place parallel to an increase in production, but not
proportionately. This occurs even though the rent for all types of soil,
calculated per acre as well as on the basis of capital outlay, remains
the same. This occurs because three-quarters of the increase is
accounted for by soil A, which does not yield any rent, and soil B,
which yields only minimum rent.

If the total expansion in Case Ib had taken place solely on soil A, we
should have 9 acres on A, I acre on B, I acre on C and I acre on D. The
total rental would be £18, the same as before; the average rent for the
12 acres therefore would be £1½ per acre; and a rent of £18 on an
invested capital of £30 would give a rate of rent of 60%. The average
rent, calculated per acre as well as on the basis of invested capital,
would have greatly decreased, while the total rental would not have
increased.

Finally, let us compare Ic with I and Ib. Compared with I, the area has
been trebled, and also the invested capital. The total rental is £72 for
12 acres, or £6 per acre — as against £4½ in Case I. The rate of rent on
the invested capital (£72:£30) is 240% instead of 180%. The total output
has risen from 10 to 36 quarters.

Compared with Ib, where the total number of cultivated acres, the
invested capital, and the differences between the cultivated soil types
are the same, but the distribution different, the output is 36 quarters
instead of 26 quarters, the average rent per acre is £6 instead of £3½,
and the rate of rent with reference to the same invested total capital
is 240% instead of 140%.

No matter whether we regard the various conditions in tables Ia, Ib and
Ic as existing simultaneously side by side in different countries, or as
existing successively in the same country, we come to the following
conclusions: So long as the price of grain remains unchanged because the
yield on the worst, rentless soil remains the same; so long as the
difference in the fertility of the various cultivated types of soil
remains the same; so long as the respective outputs remain the same,
hence, given equal capital investments on equal aliquot parts (acres) of
cultivated area in every type of soil; so long as the ratio, therefore,
between the rents per acre on each category of soil is constant, and the
rate of rent on the capital invested in each plot of the same kind of
soil is constant: _First_, the rental constantly increases with the
extension of cultivated area and with the consequent increased capital
investment, except for the case where the entire increase is accounted
for by rentless land. _Secondly_, the average rent per acre (total
rental divided by the total number of cultivated acres) as well as the
average rate of rent (total rental divided by the invested total
capital) may vary very considerably; and, indeed, both change in the
same direction, but in different proportions to each other. If we leave
out of consideration the case in which the expansion takes place only on
the rentless soil A, we find that the average rent per acre and the
average rate of rent on the capital invested in agriculture depend on
the proportions which the various classes of soil constitute in the
total cultivated area; or, what amounts to the same thing, on the
distribution of the total employed capital among the kinds of soil of
varying fertility. Whether much or little land is cultivated, and
whether the total rental is therefore larger or smaller (with the
exception of the case in which the expansion is confined to A), the
average rent per acre, or the average rate of rent on invested capital,
remains the same as long as the proportions of the various categories of
soil in the total cultivated area remain unchanged. In spite of an
increase, even a very considerable one, in the total rental with the
extension of cultivation and expansion of capital investment, the
average rent per acre and the average rate of rent on capital decrease
when the extension of rentless land, and land yielding only little
differential rent, is greater than the extension of the superior one
yielding greater rent. Conversely, the average rent per acre and the
average rate of rent on capital increase proportionately to the extent
that better land constitutes a relatively greater part of the total area
and therefore employs a relatively greater share of the invested
capital.

Hence, if we consider the average rent per acre, or hectare, of the
total cultivated land as is generally done in statistical works, in
comparing either different countries in the same period, or different
periods in the same country, we find that the average level of rent per
acre, and consequently total rental, corresponds to a certain extent
(although by no means identical, but rather a more rapidly increasing
extent) to the absolute, not to the relative, fertility of the soil in a
given country; that is, to the average amount of produce which it yields
from the same area. For the larger the share of superior soils in the
total cultivated area, the greater the output for equal capital
investments on equally large areas of land; and the higher the average
rent per acre. In the reverse case the opposite takes place. Thus, rent
does not appear to be determined by the ratio of differential fertility,
but by the absolute fertility, and the law of differential rent appears
invalid. For this reason certain phenomena are disputed, or an attempt
is made to explain them by non-existing differences in average prices of
grain and in the differential fertility of cultivated land, whereas such
phenomena are merely due to the fact that the ratio of total rental to
total area of cultivated land or to total capital invested in the land —
as long as the fertility of the rentless soil remains the same and
therefore the prices of production, and the differences between the
various kinds of soil remain unchanged — is determined not merely by the
rent per acre or the rate of rent on capital, but quite as much by the
relative number of acres of each type of soil in the total number of
cultivated acres; or, what amounts to the same thing, by the
distribution of the total invested capital among the various types of
soil. Curiously enough, this fact has been completely overlooked thus
far. At any rate, we see (and this is important for our further
analysis) that the relative level of the average rent per acre, and the
average rate of rent (or the ratio of the total rental to the total
capital invested in the land), may rise or fall by merely extensively
expanding cultivation, as long as prices remain the same, the
differential fertilities of the various soils remain unaltered, and the
rent per acre, or rate of rent for capital invested per acre in every
type of soil actually yielding rent, i.e., for all capital actually
yielding rent, remains unchanged.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

It is necessary to make the following additional points with reference
to the form of differential rent considered under heading I; they also
apply in part to differential rent II:

_First_, it was seen that the average rent per acre, or the average rate
of rent on capital, may increase with an extension of cultivation when
prices are stationary and the differential fertility of the cultivated
plots of land remains unaltered. As soon as all the land in a given
country has been appropriated, and investments of capital in land,
cultivation, and population have reached a definite level — all given
conditions as soon as the capitalist mode of production becomes the
prevailing one and also encompasses agriculture — the price of
uncultivated land of varying quality (merely assuming differential rent
to exist) is determined by the price of the cultivated plots of land of
the same quality and equivalent location. The price is the same — after
deducting the cost of bringing the new land into cultivation — even
though this land does not yield any rent. The price of the land is,
indeed, nothing but the capitalised rent. But even in the case of
cultivated land, the price pays only for future rents, as, for instance,
when the prevalent interest rate is 5% and the rent for twenty years is
paid at one time in advance. When land is sold, it is sold as land
yielding rent, and the prospective character of the rent (which is here
considered as a product of the soil, but it only seems to be that) does
not distinguish the uncultivated from the cultivated land. The price of
the uncultivated land, like its rent the price of which represents the
contracted form of the latter is quite illusory as long as the land is
not actually used. But it is thus determined a priori and is realised as
soon as a purchaser is found. Hence, while the actual average rent in a
given country is determined by its actual average annual rental and the
relation of the latter to the total cultivated area, the price of the
uncultivated land is determined by the price of the cultivated land, and
is therefore but a reflection of the capital invested in the cultivated
land and the results obtained therefrom. Since all land with the
exception of the worst yields rent (and this rent, as we shall see under
the head of differential rent II, increases with the quantity of capital
and corresponding intensity of cultivation), the nominal price of
uncultivated plots of land is thus formed, and they thus become
commodities, a source of wealth for their owners. This explains at the
same time, why the price of land increases in a whole region, even in
the uncultivated part (Opdyke). Land speculation, for instance, in the
United States, is based solely on this reflection thrown by capital and
labour on uncultivated land.

_Secondly_, progress in extending cultivated land generally takes place
either toward inferior soil or on the various given types of soil in
varying proportions, depending on the manner in which they are met.
Extension on inferior soil is naturally never made voluntarily, but can
only result from rising prices, assuming a capitalist mode of
production, and can only result from necessity under any other mode of
production. However, this is not absolutely so. Poor soil may be
preferred to a relatively better soil on account of location, which is
of decisive importance for every extension of cultivation in young
countries; furthermore, even though the soil formation in a certain
region may generally be classified as fertile, it may nevertheless
consist of a motley confusion of better and worse soils, so that the
inferior soil may have to be cultivated if only because it is found in
the immediate vicinity of the superior soil. If inferior soil is
surrounded by superior soil, then the latter gives it the advantage of
location in comparison with more fertile soil which is not yet, or is
about to become, part of the cultivated area.

Thus, the State of Michigan was one of the first Western States to
become an exporter of grain. Yet its soil on the whole is poor. But its
proximity to the State of New York and its water-ways via the Lakes and
Erie Canal initially gave it the advantage over the States endowed by
Nature with more fertile soil, but situated farther to the West. The
example of this State, as compared with the State of New York, also
demonstrates the transition from superior to inferior soil. The soil of
the State of New York, particularly its western part, is incomparably
more fertile, especially for the cultivation of wheat. This fertile soil
was transformed into infertile soil by rapacious methods of cultivation,
and now the soil of Michigan appeared as the more fertile.

In 1838, wheaten flour was shipped at Buffalo for the West; and the
wheat-region of New York, with that of Upper Canada, were the main
sources of its supply. Now, after only twelve years, an enormous supply
of wheat and flour is brought from the West, along Lake Erie, and
shipped upon the Erie Canal for the East, at Buffalo and the adjoining
port of Blackrock... The effect of these large arrivals from the Western
States — which were unnaturally stimulated during the years of European
famine ... has been to render wheat less valuable in western New York,
to make the wheat culture less remunerative, and to turn the attention
of the New York farmers more to grazing and dairy husbandry, fruit
culture, and other branches of rural economy, in which they think the
North-West will be unable so directly to compete with them." (I. W.
Johnston, _Notes on North America_, London, 1851, I, pp.220-23.)

_Thirdly_, it is a mistaken assumption that the land in colonies and, in
general, in young countries which can export grain at cheaper prices,
must of necessity be of greater natural fertility. The grain is not only
sold below its value in such cases, but below its price of production,
i.e., below the price of production determined by the average rate of
profit in the older countries.

The fact that we, as Johnston says (p.223),

"are accustomed to attach the idea of great natural productiveness and
of boundless tracts of rich land, to those new States from which come
the large supplies of wheat that are annually poured into the port of
Buffalo,"

is primarily the result of economic conditions. The entire population of
such an area as Michigan, for instance, is at first almost exclusively
engaged in farming, and particularly in producing agricultural mass
products, which alone can be exchanged for industrial products and
tropical goods. Its entire surplus production appears, therefore, in the
form of grain. This from the outset sets apart the colonial states
founded on the basis of the modern world-market from those of earlier,
particularly ancient, times. They receive through the world-market
finished products, such as clothing and tools which they would have to
produce themselves under other circumstances. Only on such a basis were
the Southern States of the Union enabled to make cotton their staple
crop. The division of labour on the world-market makes this possible.
Hence, if they _seem_ to have a large surplus production considering
their youth and relatively small population, this is not so much due to
the fertility of their soil, nor the fruitfulness of their labour, but
rather to the one-sided form of their labour, and therefore of the
surplus-produce in which such labour is incorporated.

Furthermore, a relatively inferior soil which is newly cultivated and
never before touched by civilisation provided the climatic conditions
are then not completely unfavourable, has accumulated a great deal of
plant food that is easily assimilated — at least in the upper layers of
the soil — so that it will yield crops for a long time without the
application of fertilisers and even with very superficial cultivation.
The western prairies have the additional advantage of hardly requiring
any clearing expenses since Nature has made them arable.^([33a]) In less
fertile areas of this kind, the surplus is not produced as a result of
the high fertility of the soil, i.e., the yield per acre, but as a
result of the large acreage which may be superficially cultivated, since
such land costs the cultivator nothing, or next to nothing as compared
with older countries. This is the case, for instance, where share
cropping exists, as in parts of New York, Michigan, Canada, etc. A
family superficially cultivates, say, 100 acres, and although the output
per acre is not large, the output from 100 acres yields a considerable
surplus for sale. In addition to this, cattle may be grazed on natural
pastures at almost no cost, without requiring artificial grass meadows.
It is the quantity of the land, not its quality, which is decisive here.
The possibility of such superficial cultivation is naturally more or
less rapidly exhausted, namely, in inverse proportion to the fertility
of the new soil and in direct proportion to the export of its products.

"And yet such a country will give excellent first crops, even of wheat,
and will supply to those who skim the first cream off the country, a
large surplus of this grain to send to market" (1, c., p.224).

Property relations in countries with maturer civilisations, with their
determination of the price of uncultivated soil by that of the
cultivated, etc., make such an extensive economy impossible.

That this soil, therefore, need not be exceedingly rich, as Ricardo
imagines, nor that soils of equal fertility need be cultivated, may be
seen from the following. In the State of Michigan 465,900 acres were
planted in 1848 to wheat which yielded 4,739,300 bushels, or an average
of 10 1/5 bushels per acre after deducting seed grain, this leaves less
than 9 bushels per acre. Of the 29 counties of this State, 2 produced an
average of 7 bushels, 3 an average of 8 bushels, 2—9, 7—10, 6—11, 3—12,
4—13 bushels, and only one county produced an average of 16 bushels, and
another 18 bushels per acre (l. c., p. 225).

For practical cultivation higher soil fertility coincides with greater
capability of immediate exploitation of such fertility. The latter may
be greater in a naturally poor soil than in a naturally rich one; but it
is the kind of soil which a colonist will take up first, and must take
up when capital is wanting.

_Finally_, the extension of cultivation to larger areas — aside from the
case just mentioned, in which recourse must be had to soil inferior than
that cultivated hitherto — to the various kinds of soil from A to D,
thus, for instance, the cultivation of larger tracts of B and C does not
by any means presuppose a previous rise in grain prices any more than
the preceding annual expansion of cotton spinning, for instance,
requires a constant rise in yarn prices. Although considerable rise or
fall in market-prices affects the volume of production, regardless of it
there is in agriculture (just as in all other capitalistically operated
lines of production) nevertheless a continuous relative over-production,
in itself identical with accumulation, even at those average prices
whose level has neither a retarding nor exceptionally stimulating effect
on production. Under other modes of production this relative
overproduction is effected directly by the population increase, and in
colonies by steady immigration. The demand increases constantly, and, in
anticipation of this new capital is continually invested in new land,
although this varies with the circumstances for different agricultural
products. It is the formation of new capitals which in itself brings
this about. But so far as the individual capitalist is concerned, he
measures the volume of his production by that of his available capital,
to the extent that he can still control it himself. His aim is to
capture as big a portion as possible of the market. Should there be any
over-production, he will not take the blame upon himself, but places it
upon his competitors. The individual capitalist may expand his
production by appropriating a larger aliquot share of the existing
market or by expanding the market itself.

Notes

33a. [It is precisely the rapidly growing cultivation of such prairie or
steppe regions which of late turns the renowned statement of Malthus,
that "the population is a burden upon the means of subsistence," into
ridicule, and produced in its stead the agrarian lament that
agriculture, and with it Germany, will be ruined, unless the means of
subsistence which are a burden upon the population are forcibly kept
away from them. The cultivation of these steppes, prairies, pampas,
ilanos, etc., is nevertheless only in its beginning; its revolutionising
effect on European agriculture will, therefore, make itself felt in the
future even more so than hitherto. — _F. E.]_

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 40. Second Form of Differential Rent (Differential Rent II)

 

Thus far we have considered differential rent only as the result of
varying productivity of equal amounts of capital invested in equal areas
of land of different fertility, so that differential rent was determined
by the difference between the yield from the capital invested in the
worst, rentless soil and that from the capital invested in superior
soil. We had side by side capitals invested in different plots of land,
so that every new investment of capital signified a more extensive
cultivation of the soil, an expansion of cultivated area. In the last
analysis, however, differential rent was by its nature merely the result
of the different productivity of equal capitals invested in land. But
can it make any difference if capitals of different productivity are
invested successively in the same plot of land or side by side in
different plots of land, provided the results are the same?

To begin with, there is no denying that, in so far as the formation of
surplus-profit is concerned, it is immaterial whether £3 in production
price per acre of A yield 1 qr, so that £3 is the price of production
and the regulating market-price of 1 qr, while £3 in production price
per acre of B yield 2 qrs, and thereby £3 of surplus-profit, similarly,
£3 in production price per acre of C yield 3 qrs and £6 of
surplus-profit, and, finally, £3 in production price per acre of D yield
4 qrs and £9 of surplus-profit; or whether the same result is achieved
by applying these £12 in production price, or £10 of capital, with the
same success in the same sequence upon one and the same acre. It is in
both cases a capital of £10, whose value portions of £2½ each are
successively invested — whether in four acres of varying fertility side
by side, or successively in one and the same acre of land — and because
of their varying outputs, one portion yields no surplus-profit, whereas
the other portions yield surplus-profit proportionate to their
difference in yield with respect to rentless investment.

The surplus-profit and the various rates of surplus-profit for the
different value portions of capital are formed in the same manner in
both cases. And the rent is nothing but a form of this surplus-profit,
which constitutes its substance. But at any rate, in the second method,
there are some difficulties concerning the transformation of
surplus-profit into rent, this change of form, which includes the
transfer of surplus-profit from the capitalist tenant to the landowner.
This accounts for the obstinate resistance of English tenants to
official agricultural statistics. And it accounts for their struggle
against the landlords over the determination of actual results derived
from their capital investment (Morton). For rent is fixed when land is
leased, and after that the surplus-profit arising from successive
investments of capital flows into the pockets of the tenant as long as
the lease lasts. This is why the tenants have fought for long leases,
and, on the other hand, due to the greater power of the landlords, an
increase in the number of tenancies at will has taken place, i.e.,
leases which can be cancelled annually.

It is therefore evident from the very outset that, even if immaterial
for the law of formation of surplus-profit, it makes a considerable
difference for the transformation of surplus-profit into ground-rent
whether equal capitals are invested side by side in equal areas of land
with unequal results, or whether they are invested successively in the
same land. The latter method confines this transformation, on the one
hand, within narrower limits, on the other hand, within more variable
limits. For this reason, the work of the tax-assessor, as Morton shows
in his _Resources of Estates,_ becomes a very important, complicated and
difficult profession in countries practising intensive cultivation (and,
economically speaking, we mean nothing more by intensive cultivation
than the concentration of capital upon the same plot rather than its
distribution among several adjoining pieces of land). If soil
improvements are of a more permanent nature the artificially increased
differential fertility of the soil coincides with its natural
differential fertility as soon as the lease expires, and therefore the
assessment of the rent corresponds to the determination of the rent on
plots of different fertilities in general. On the other hand, in so far
as the formation of surplus-profit is determined by the magnitude of
operating capital, the amount of rent for a certain amount of operating
capital is added to the average rent of the country and thus provision
is made for the new tenant to command sufficient capital to continue
cultivation in the same intensive manner.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

In the study of differential rent II, the following points are still to
be emphasised.

_First_, its basis and point of departure, not just historically, but
also in so far as concerns its movements at any given period of time, is
differential rent I, that is, the simultaneous cultivation side by side
of soils of unequal fertility and location; in other words, the
simultaneous application, side by side, of unequal portions of the total
agricultural capital upon plots of land of unequal quality.

Historically this is self-evident. In the colonies, colonists have but
little capital to invest; the principal production agents are labour and
land. Every individual head of family seeks for himself and his kin an
independent field of employment alongside his fellow-colonists. This
must generally be the case in agriculture proper even under
pre-capitalist modes of production. In the case of sheep-herding and
cattle-raising, in general, as independent lines of production,
exploitation of the soil is more or less common and extensive from the
very outset. The capitalist mode of production has for its point of
departure former modes of production in which the means of production
were, in fact or legally, the property of the tiller himself, in a word,
from a handicraft-like pursuit of agriculture. It is in the nature of
things that the latter gives way but gradually to the concentration of
means of production and their transformation into capital, as against
direct producers transformed into wage-labourers. In so far as the
capitalist mode of production is manifested here typically, it occurs at
first particularly in sheep-herding and cattle-raising. But it is thus
not manifested in a concentration of capital upon a relatively small
area of land, but in production on a larger scale, economising in the
expense of keeping horses, and in other production costs; but, in fact,
not by investing more capital in the same land. Furthermore, in
accordance with the natural laws of field husbandry, capital — used
here, at the same time, in the sense of means of production already
produced — becomes the decisive element in soil cultivation when
cultivation has reached a certain level of development and the soil has
been correspondingly exhausted. So long as the tilled area is small in
comparison with the untilled, and so long as the soil strength has not
been exhausted (and this is the case when cattle-raising and meat
consumption prevail in the period before agriculture proper and plant
nutrition have become dominant), the new developing mode of production
is opposed to peasant production mainly in the extensiveness of the land
being tilled for a capitalist, in other words, again in the extensive
application of capital to larger areas of land. It should therefore be
remembered from the outset that differential rent I is the historical
basis which serves as a point of departure. On the other hand, the
movement of differential rent II at any given moment occurs only within
a sphere which is itself but the variegated basis of differential rent
I.

_Secondly_, in the differential rent in form II, the differences in
distribution of capital (and ability to obtain credit) among tenants are
added to the differences in fertility. In manufacturing proper, each
line of business rapidly develops its own minimum volume of business and
a corresponding minimum of capital, below which no individual business
can be conducted successfully. In the same way, each line of business
develops a normal average amount of capital above this minimum, which
the bulk of producers should, and do, command. A larger volume of
capital can produce extra profit; a smaller volume does not so much as
yield the average profit. The capitalist mode of production spreads in
agriculture but slowly and unevenly, as may be observed in England, the
classic land of the capitalist mode of production in agriculture. In so
far as the free importation of grain does not exist, or its effect is
but limited because the volume is small, producers working inferior
soil, and thus under worse than average conditions of production,
determine the market-price. A large portion of the total mass of capital
invested in husbandry, and in general available to it, is in their
hands.

It is true that the peasant, for example, expends much labour on his
small plot of land. But it is labour isolated from objective social and
material conditions of productivity, labour robbed and stripped of these
conditions.

This circumstance enables the actual capitalist tenants to appropriate a
portion of surplus-profit — a fact which would not obtain, at least so
far as this point is concerned, if the capitalist mode of production
were as evenly developed in agriculture as in manufacture.

Let us first consider just the formation of surplus-profit with
differential rent II, without for the present bothering about the
conditions under which the transformation of this surplus-profit into
ground-rent may take place.

It is then evident that differential rent II is merely differently
expressed differential rent I, but identical to it in substance. The
variation in fertility of various soil types exerts its influence in the
case of differential rent I only in so far as unequal results are
attained by capitals invested in the soil, i.e., the amount of products
obtained either with respect to equal magnitudes of capital, or
proportionate amounts. Whether this inequality takes place for various
capitals invested successively in the same land or for capitals invested
in several plots of differing soil type — this can change nothing in the
difference in fertility nor in its product and can therefore change
nothing in the formation of differential rent for the more productively
invested portions of capital. It is still the soil which, now as before,
shows different fertility with the same investment of capital, save that
here the same soil performs for a capital successively invested in
different portions what various kinds of soil do in the case of
differential rent I for different equal portions of social capital
invested in them.

If the same capital of £10, which is shown in Table I to be invested in
the form of independent capitals of £2½ each by various tenants in each
acre of the four soil types A, B, C and D, were instead successively
invested in one and the same acre D, so that the first investment
yielded 4 qrs, the second 3, the third 2, and the fourth 1 qr (or in the
reverse order), then the price of the quarter furnished by the least
productive capital, namely = £3, would not yield any differential rent,
but would determine the price of production, so long as the supply of
wheat whose price of production is £3 were needed. And since our
assumption is that the capitalist mode of production prevails, so that
the price of £3 includes the average profit made by a capital of £2½
generally, the other three portions of £2½ each will yield
surplus-profit in accordance with the difference in output, since this
output is not sold at its own price of production, but at the price of
production of the least productive investment of £2½; the latter
investment does not yield any rent and the price of its products is
determined by the general law of prices of production. The formation of
surplus-profit would be the same as in Table I.

Once again it is seen here that differential rent II presupposes
differential rent I. The minimum output obtained from a capital of £2½,
i.e., from the worst soil, is here assumed to be 4 qr. Assumed, also, is
that aside from the £2½ which yield 4 qrs and for which he pays a
differential rent of 3 qrs, the tenant operating with soil type D
invests in this same soil £2½ which yield only 1 qr, like the same
capital upon the worst soil A. This would be an investment of capital
which does not yield rent, since it returns to him only average profit.
There would be no surplus-profit which could be transformed into rent.
On the other hand, this decreasing yield of the second investment of
capital in D would have no influence on the rate of profit. It would be
the same as though £2½ had been invested anew in an additional acre of
soil type A, a circumstance which would in no way affect the
surplus-profit and, therefore, the differential rent of soils A, B, C
and D. But for the tenant, this additional investment of £2½ in D would
have been quite as profitable as, in accordance with our assumption, the
investment of the original £2½ per acre of D, although the latter yields
4 qrs. Furthermore, if two other investments of £2½ each should yield an
additional output of 3 qrs and 2 qrs respectively, a decrease would have
taken place again compared with the output from the first investment of
£2½ in D, which yielded 4 qrs, i.e., a surplus-profit of 3 qrs. But it
would be merely a decrease in the amount of surplus-profit, and would
not affect either the average profit or the regulating price of
production. The latter would be the case only if the additional
production yielding this decreasing surplus-profit made the production
upon A superfluous, and threw acre A out of cultivation. In such case,
the decreasing productiveness of the additional investment of capital in
acre D would be accompanied by a fall in the price of production, for
instance, from £3 to £1½, if acre B would become the rentless soil and
regulator of the market-price.

The output from D would now be = 4 + 1 + 3 + 2 = 10 qrs whereas formerly
it was = 4 qrs. But the price per quarter as regulated by B would have
fallen to £1½. The difference between D and B would be = 10 - 2 = 8 qrs,
at £1½ per quarter = £12, whereas the money-rent from D was previously =
£9. This should be noted. Calculated per acre, the magnitude of rent
would have risen by 33⅓% in spite of the decreasing rate of
surplus-profit on the two additional capitals of £2½ each.

We see from this to what highly complicated combinations differential
rent in general, and in form II coupled with form I, in particular, may
give rise, whereas Ricardo, for instance, treats it very one-sidedly and
as though it were a simple matter. As in the above case, a fall in the
regulating market-price and at the same time rise in rent from fertile
soils may take place so that both the absolute product and the absolute
surplus-product increase. (In differential rent I, in descending order,
the relative surplus-product and thus the rent per acre may increase,
although the absolute surplus-product per acre remains constant or even
decreases.) But at the same time, productiveness of the investments of
capital made successively in the same soil decreases, although a large
portion of them falls to the more fertile soils. From a certain point of
view — as concerns both output and prices of production — the
productivity of labour has risen. But from another point of view, it has
decreased because the rate of surplus-profit and the surplus-product per
acre decrease for the various investments of capital in the same land.

Differential rent II, with decreasing productiveness of successive
investments of capital, would necessarily be accompanied by a rise in
price of production and an absolute decrease in productivity only if
investments of capital could be made in none but the worst soil A. If an
acre of A, which with an investment of capital of £2½ yielded 1 qr at a
price of production of £3, should only yield a total of 1½ qrs with an
additional outlay of £2½, i.e., a total investment of £5, then the price
of production of this 1½ qrs = £6 or that of 1 qr = £4. Every decrease
in productivity with a growing investment of capital would here mean a
relative decrease in output per acre, whereas upon superior soils it
would only signify a decrease in the superfluous surplus-product.

But by the nature of things, with the development of intensive
cultivation, i.e., with successive investments of capital in the same
soil, this will take place more advantageously, or to a greater extent
on better soils. (We are not referring to permanent improvements by
which a hitherto useless soil is converted into useful soil.) The
decreasing productiveness of successive investments of capital must,
therefore, have principally the effect indicated above. The better soil
is selected because it affords the best promise that capital invested in
it will be profitable, since it contains the most natural elements of
fertility, which need but be utilised.

When, after the abolition of the Corn Laws, cultivation in England
became still more intensive, a great deal of former wheat land was
devoted to other purposes, particularly cattle pastures, while the
fertile land best suited for wheat was drained and otherwise improved.
The capital for wheat cultivation was thus concentrated in a more
limited area.

In this case — and all possible surplus rates between the greatest
surplus-product of the best soil and the output of rentless soil A
coincide here with an absolute, rather than a relative, increase in
surplus-product per acre — the newly formed surplus-profit (potential
rent) does not represent a portion of a former average profit
transformed into rent (a portion of the output in which the average
profit formerly was expressed) but an additional surplus-profit, which
is transformed out of this form into rent.

On the other hand, only in such case where the demand for grain
increased to such an extent that the market-price rose above the price
of production of A, so that the surplus-product of A, B, or any other
kind of soil could be supplied only at a price higher than £3 would the
decrease in yield from an additional investment of capital in any of the
soil types A, B, C and D be accompanied by a rise in price of production
and the regulating market-price. In so far as this lasted for a lengthy
period of time without resulting in the cultivation of additional soil A
(of at least the quality of A), or without a cheaper supply resulting
from other circumstances, wages would rise in consequence of the
increase in the price of bread, everything else being equal, and the
rate of profit would fall accordingly. In this case, it would be
immaterial, whether the increased demand were satisfied by bringing
under cultivation soil of inferior quality than A, or by additional
investments of capital, in any of the four types of soil. Differential
rent would then increase together with a falling rate of profit.

This one case, in which the decreasing productiveness of subsequent
additional capitals invested in already cultivated soils may lead to an
increase in price of production, a fall in rate of profit, and the
formation of higher differential rent — for the latter would increase
under the given circumstances upon all kinds of soil just as though soil
of inferior quality than A were regulating the market-price — has been
labelled by Ricardo as the only case, the normal case — to which he
reduces the entire formation of differential rent II.

This would also be the case if only type A soil were cultivated and
successive investments of capital in it were not accompanied by a
proportional increase in produce.

Here then, in the case of differential rent II, one completely loses
sight of differential rent I.

Except for this case, in which the supply from the cultivated soils is
either insufficient and the market-price thus continually higher than
the price of production until new additional soil of inferior quality is
taken under cultivation, or until the total product from the additional
capital invested in various kinds of soil can be supplied only at a
higher price of production than that hitherto prevailing — save for this
case, the proportional drop in productivity of the additional capitals
leaves the regulating price of production and the rate of profit
unchanged. For the rest, three additional cases are possible:

a) If the additional capital invested in any one of the types of soil A,
B, C or D yields only the rate of profit determined by the price of
production of A, then no surplus-profit, and therefore no potential
rent, is formed, any more than there would be if additional type A soil
had been cultivated.

b) If the additional capital yields a larger product, new surplus-profit
(potential rent) is, of course, formed provided the regulating price
remains the same. This is not necessarily the case; it is not the case,
in particular, when this additional production throws soil A out of
cultivation and thus out of the sequence of competing soils. In this
case, the regulating price of production falls. If this were accompanied
by a fall in wages, or if the cheaper product were to enter into the
constant capital as one of its elements, the rate of profit would rise.
If the increased productivity of the additional capital had taken place
upon the best soils C and D, it would depend entirely upon the degree of
increased productivity and the amount of additional new capital to what
extent the formation of increased surplus-profit (and thus increased
rent) would be associated with the fall in prices and the rise in the
rate of profit. The latter may also rise without a fall in wages,
through a cheapening of the elements of constant capital.

c) If the additional investment of capital takes place with decreasing
surplus-profit, but in such manner that the yield from the additional
outlay still leaves a surplus above the yield from the same capital
invested in A, a new formation of surplus-profit takes place under all
circumstances, unless the increased supply excludes soil A from
cultivation. This may take place simultaneously upon D, C, B and A. But,
on the other hand, if the worst soil A is squeezed out of cultivation,
then the regulating price of production falls and it will depend upon
the relation between the reduced price of 1 qr and the increased number
of quarters forming surplus-profit whether the surplus-profit expressed
in money, and consequently the differential rent, rises or falls. But at
any rate, it is noteworthy here that with decreasing surplus-profit from
successive investments of capital the price of production may fall,
instead of rising, which it seemingly should do at first sight.

These additional investments of capital with decreasing surplus yields
correspond entirely to the case in which, e.g., four new independent
capitals of £2½ each would be invested in soils with fertility between A
and B, B and C, C and D, and yielding 1½, 2⅓, 2⅔, and 3 qrs
respectively. Surplus-profit (potential rent) would take shape on all
these soils for all four additional capitals, although the rate of
surplus-profit, compared with that for the same investment of capital on
the correspondingly better soil, would have decreased. And it would be
immaterial whether these four capitals were invested in D, etc., or
distributed between D and A.

We now come to an essential difference between the two forms of
differential rent.

Under differential rent I, with constant price of production and
constant differences, the average rent per acre, or the average rate of
rent on capital, may increase together with the rental. But the average
is a mere abstraction. The actual amount of rent, calculated per acre or
with respect to capital, remains the same here.

On the other hand, under the same conditions, the amount of rent
calculated per acre may increase although the rate of rent, measured
relative to invested capital, remains the same.

Let us assume that production is doubled by the investment of £5 instead
of £2½ in each of the soils A, B, C and D, i.e., a total of £20 instead
of £10, and that the relative fertility remains unchanged. This would be
tantamount to cultivating 2 instead of 1 acre of each of these kinds of
soil at the same cost. The rate of profit would remain the same; also
its relation to surplus-profit or rent. But if A were now to yield 2
qrs, B — 4, C — 6, and D — 8, the price of production would nevertheless
remain £3 per quarter because this increase is not due to doubled
fertility with the same capital, but to the same proportional fertility
with a doubled capital. The two quarters of A would now cost £6 just as
1 qr cost £3 before. The profit would have doubled on all four soils,
but only because the invested capital was doubled. In the same
proportion, however, the rent would also have been doubled; it would be
2 qrs for B instead of 1, 4 qrs for C instead of 2, and 6 for D instead
of 3; and correspondingly, the money-rent for B, C and D would now be
£6, £12, and £18 respectively. Like the yield per acre, the rent in
money per acre would be doubled, and, consequently, also the price of
the land whereby this money-rent is capitalised. Calculated in this
manner, the amount of rent in grain and money increases, and thus the
price of land, because the standard used in its computation, i.e., the
acre, is an area of constant magnitude. On the other hand, calculated as
rate of rent on invested capital, there is no change in the proportional
amount of rent. The total rental of 36 is to the invested capital of 20
as the rental of 18 is to the invested capital of 10. The same holds
true for the ratio of money-rent from each type of soil to the capital
invested in it; for instance, in C, £12 rent is to £5 capital as £6 rent
was formerly to £2½ capital. No new differences arise here between the
invested capitals, but new surplus-profits do, merely because the
additional capital is invested in one of the rent-bearing soils, or in
all of them, with the same proportional yield as previously. If this
double investment took place, for example, only in C, the differential
rent between C, B and D, calculated with respect to capital, would
remain the same: for when the amount of rent obtained from C is doubled,
so is the invested capital.

This shows that the amount of rent in produce and money per acre, and
therefore the price of land, may rise, while the price of production,
the rate of profit, and the differences remain unchanged (and therefore
the rate of surplus-profit or of rent, calculated with respect to
capital, remains unchanged).

The same may take place with decreasing rates of surplus-profit, and
therefore of rent, that is, with decreasing productivity of the
additional outlays of capital that still yield rent. If the second
investments of capital of £2½ had not doubled the output, but B had
yielded only 3½ qrs, C — 5 qrs, and D — 7 qrs, [In the German 1894
edition this reads: 6 qrs. — _Ed_.] then the differential rent for the
second £2½ of capital in B would be only ½ qr instead of 1, on C — 1 qr
instead of 2 and on D — 2 qrs instead of 3. The proportions between rent
and capital for the two successive investments would then be as follows:

 

_First Investment_ 

_Second Investment_ 

_B:_  

Rent £3,  

Capital £2½ 

Rent £1½, 

Capital £2½

_C:_  

"     £6, 

"     £2½ 

"     £3, 

"     £2½

_D:_  

"     £9, 

"     £2½ 

"     £6, 

"     £2½

In spite of this decreased rate of relative productivity of capital, and
thus of the surplus-profit calculated on capital, the rent in grain and
money would have increased on B from 1 to 1½ qrs (from £3 to £4½), on C
— from 2 to 3 qrs (from £6 to £9), and on D — from 3 to 5 qrs (from £9
to £15). In this case, the differences for the additional capitals,
compared with the capital invested in A, would have decreased, the price
of production would have remained the same, but the rent per acre, and
consequently the price of land per acre, would have risen. The
combinations of differential rent II, which presupposes differential
rent I as its basis, will now be taken up.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 41. Differential Rent II. First Case: Constant Price of Production

 

The assumption here implies that the market-price is regulated as before
by the capital invested in the worst soil A.

I. If the additional capital invested in any one of the rent-bearing
soils — B, C, D — produces only as much as the same capital upon soil A,
i.e., if it yields only the average profit at the regulating price of
production, but no surplus-profit, then the effect upon the rent is nil.
Everything remains as before. It is the same as though an arbitrary
number of acres of A quality, i.e., of the worst soil, has been added to
the cultivated area.

II. The additional capitals yield additional produce proportional to
their magnitude on every one of the various soils; in other words, the
volume of production grows according to the specific fertility of each
soil type — in proportion to the magnitude of the additional capital. In
Chapter XXXIX, we started with the following Table I:

TABLE I

Type of soil

Acres

Capital £

Profit £

Price of Prod. £

Output Qrs

Selling price £

Proceeds £

Rent

Rate of Surplus profit

Qrs

£

A

1

2½

½

3

1

3

3

0

0

0

B

1

2½

½

3

2

3

6

1

3

120%

C

1

2½

½

3

3

3

9

2

6

240%

D

1

2½

½

3

4

3

12

3

9

360%

Total

4

10

 

12

10

 

30

6

18

 

This is now transformed into:

TABLE II

Type of soil

Acres

Capital £

Profit £

Price of Prod.

Output Qrs

Selling price £

Proceeds £

Rent

Surplus profit

Qrs

£

A

1

2½ + 2½=5

1

6

2

3

6

0

0

0

B

1

2½ + 2½=5

1

6

4

3

2

2

6

120%

C

1

2½ + 2½=5

1

6

6

3

18

4

12

240%

D

1

2½ + 2½=5

1

6

8

3

24

6

18

360%

Total

4

20

 

 

20

 

60

12

36

 

It is not necessary in this case that the investment of capital be
doubled in all soils, as in the table. The law is the same so long as
additional capital is invested in one, or several, of the rent-bearing
soils, no matter in what proportion. It is only necessary that
production should increase upon every soil in the same ratio as the
capital. The rent increases here merely in consequence of an increased
investment of capital in the soil, and in proportion to this increase.
This increase in produce and rent in consequence of, and proportionately
to, the increased outlay of capital is just the same as regards the
quantity of produce and rent, as when the cultivated area of the
rent-bearing plots of land of the same quality had been increased and
taken under cultivation with the same outlay of capital as that
previously invested in the same types of soils. In the case of Table II,
for instance, the result would remain the same, if the additional
capital of £2½ per acre were invested in an additional acre of B, C and
D.

Furthermore, this assumption does not imply a more productive investment
of capital, but only an outlay of more capital upon the same area with
the same success as before.

All relative proportions remain the same here. Of course, if we do not
consider the proportional differences, but consider the purely
arithmetic ones, then the differential rent may change upon the various
soils. Let us assume, for instance, that additional capital has been
invested only in B and D. The difference between D and A is then = 7 qrs
whereas previously it was = 3, the difference between B and A = 3 qrs,
whereas previously it was = 1; that between C and B = -1, whereas
previously it was = +1, etc. But this arithmetic difference, which is
decisive in differential rent I in so far as it expresses the difference
in productivity with equal outlays of capital, is here quite immaterial,
because it is merely a consequence of different additional investments
of capital, or of no additional investment, while the difference for
each equal portion of capital upon the various plots of land remains
unchanged.

III. The additional capitals yield surplus-produce and thus form
surplus-profit, but at a decreasing rate, not in proportion to their
increase.

TABLE III

Soil

Acres

Capital £

Profit £

Price of Prod. £

Output Qrs

Selling price £

Proceeds £

Rent

Rate of Surplus profit

Qrs

£

A

1

2½

½

3

1

3

3

0

0

0

B

1

2½ + 2½ = 5

1

6

2 + 1½ = 3½

3

10½

1½

4½

90%

C

1

2½ + 2½ = 5

1

6

3+2=5

3

15

3

9

180%

D

1

2½ + 2½ = 5

1

6

4 + 3½ = 7½

3

22½

5½

16½

330%

 

 

17½

3½

21

17

 

51

10

30

 

In the case of this third assumption, it is again immaterial whether the
additional second investments of capital are uniformly distributed among
the various soils or not; whether the decreasing production of
surplus-profit takes place proportionately or not; whether the
additional investments of capital are all in the same rent-bearing type
of soil, or whether they are distributed equally or unequally among
rent-bearing plots of land of varying quality. All these circumstances
are immaterial for the law that is to be developed. The only assumption
is that additional investments of capital yield surplus-profit upon any
one of the rent-bearing soils, but in decreasing proportion to the
amount of the increase in capital. The limits of this decrease, in the
table before us, are between 4 quarters = £12, the output from the first
outlay of capital on the best soil D, and 1 quarter = £3, the output
from the same outlay of capital in the worst soil A. The output from the
best soil in case of the investment of capital I constitutes the top
limit, and the output from the same outlay of capital in the worst soil
A, which yields neither rent nor surplus-profit, is the bottom limit of
output, which successive investments of capital yield upon any of the
soil types producing surplus-profit with decreasing productivity of
successive investments of capital. Just as assumption II corresponds to
the case in which new plots of the same quality are added from the
better soils to the cultivated area, in which the quantity of any one of
the cultivated soils is increased, so assumption III corresponds to the
case in which additional plots are cultivated whose various degrees of
fertility are distributed among soils ranging from D to A, i.e., from
the best to the worst soils. If the successive outlays of capital are
made exclusively in soil D, they may include the existing differences
between D and A, then differences between D and C, and likewise between
D and B. If they are all made in soil C, then only differences between C
and A, and C and B; if exclusively in B, then only differences between B
and A.

But this is the law: The rent increases absolutely upon all these soils,
even if not in proportion to the additional capital invested.

The rate of surplus-profit, considering both the additional capital and
the total capital invested in the soil, decreases; but the absolute
magnitude of the surplus-profit increases; just as the decreasing rate
of profit on capital in general is, in the main, accompanied by an
increase in the absolute amount of profit. Thus the average
surplus-profit of a capital invested in B = 90% on the capital, whereas
it was = 120% for the first outlay of capital. But the total
surplus-profit increases from 1 qr to 1½ qrs, or from £3 to £4½. The
total rent — considered by itself rather than in relation to the doubled
magnitude of the advanced capital — has risen absolutely. The
differences in rents from various soils and their relative proportions
may vary here; but this variation in differences is a consequence, not
cause, of the increase in rents in relation to one another.

IV. The case in which additional investments of capital in the better
soils yield more produce than the original ones requires no further
analysis. It goes without saying that under this assumption the rent per
acre will increase, and proportionately more than the additional
capital, no matter in which kind of soil the outlay has been made. In
this case, the additional investment of capital is accompanied by
improvements. This includes the cases in which an additional outlay of
less capital produces the same or a greater effect than an additional
outlay of more capital did formerly. This case is not quite identical
with the former one, and the distinction is important in all investments
of capital. For instance, if 400 yields a profit of 40, and 200 employed
in a certain form yields a profit of 40, then the profit has risen from
10% to 20%, and to that extent it is the same as though 50 employed in a
more effective form yields a profit of 10 instead of 5. We assume here
that the profit is associated with a proportional increase in output.
But the difference is that I must double the capital in the one case,
whereas in the other, the effect I produce is doubled with the capital
employed hitherto. It is by no means the same whether I produce: 1) the
same output as before with half as much living and materialised labour,
or 2) twice the output as before with the same labour, or 3) four times
the former output with twice the labour. In the first case, labour — in
a living or materialised form — is released, and may be employed
otherwise; the power to dispose of capital and labour increases. The
release of capital (and labour) is in itself an augmentation of wealth;
it has exactly the same effect as though this additional capital has
been obtained by accumulation, but it saves the labour of accumulation.

Assume that a capital of 100 has produced an output of ten metres. The
100 includes constant capital, living labour and profit. Thus a metre
costs 10. Now, if I can produce 20 metres with the same capital of 100,
then a metre costs 5. If, on the other hand, I can produce 10 metres
with a capital of 50, then a metre likewise costs 5, and should the
former supply of commodities suffice a capital of 50 is released. If I
have to invest a capital of 200 in order to produce 40 metres, then a
metre also costs 5. The determination of value, and also the price, does
not permit any difference to be discerned here; no more than the amount
of output proportional to the outlay of capital. But in the first case,
additional capital is saved [In the German 1894 edition this reads:
capital is released. — _Ed_.] to be used perhaps to double production if
necessary; in the second case, capital is released, [_Ibid.:_ additional
capital is saved. — _Ed_.] in the third case, the increased output can
only be obtained by augmenting the invested capital, although not in the
same proportion as when the increased output was to have been supplied
by the old productive power. (This belongs in Part I.)

From the viewpoint of capitalist production, the employment of constant
capital is always cheaper than that of variable capital, not as regards
increasing the surplus-value, but rather as regards reducing the
cost-price — and saving of costs even in the element creating
surplus-value, in labour, performs this service for the capitalist and
makes profit for him so long as the regulating price of production
remains the same. This presupposes, in fact, the development of credit
and an abundance of loan capital corresponding to the capitalist mode of
production. On the one hand, I employ £100 additional constant capital,
if £100 is the output of five labourers during the year; on the other
hand, £100 in variable capital. If the rate of surplus-value = 100%,
then the value created by the five labourers = £200; on the other hand,
the value of £100 constant capital = £100 and as capital it is perhaps =
£105, if the interest rate = 5%. The same sums of money express very
different values, from the viewpoint of the output they produce,
depending on whether they are advanced to production as magnitudes of
value of constant or of variable capital. Furthermore, as regards the
cost of the commodities from the viewpoint of the capitalist, there is
also this difference, that of the £100 constant capital only the wear
and tear enters into the value of the commodity in so far as this money
is invested in fixed capital, whereas the £100 invested in wages must be
completely reproduced in the commodity.

In the case of colonists, and independent small producers in general,
who have no access to capital at all or only at high interest rates,
that part of the output which represents wages is their revenue, whereas
for the capitalist it constitutes an advance of capital. The former,
therefore, regards this expenditure of labour as the indispensable
prerequisite for the labour-product, which is the thing that interests
him above all. But, as regards his surplus-labour, after deducting the
necessary labour, it is evidently realised in the surplus-product; and
as soon as he can sell the latter, or use it for himself, he looks upon
it as something that cost him nothing, because it cost him no
materialised labour. It is only the expenditure of the latter which
appears to him as alienation of wealth. Of course, he tries to sell as
high as possible; but even a sale below value and below the capitalist
price of production still appears to him as profit, unless this profit
is anticipated by debts, mortgages, etc. For the capitalist, on the
other hand, the investment of both variable and constant capital
represents an advance of capital. The relatively larger advance of the
latter reduces the cost-price, and in fact the value of the commodities,
everything else being equal. Hence, although profit arises only from
surplus-labour, consequently only from the employment of variable
capital, it may still seem to the individual capitalist that living
labour is the most expensive element in his price of production which
should be reduced to a minimum before all else. This is but a
capitalistically distorted form of the fact that the relatively greater
use of congealed labour, as compared with living labour, signifies an
increase in the productivity of social labour and a greater social
wealth. From the viewpoint of competition, everything appears thus
distorted and turned topsy-turvy.

Assuming prices of production to remain unchanged, the additional
investments of capital in the better soils, that is, in all soils from B
upward may be made with unaltered, increasing, or decreasing
productivity. For soil A this would only be possible under the
conditions assumed by us, if productivity remains the same — whereby the
land continues to yield no rent — and also if productivity increases; a
portion of the capital invested in A would then yield rent, while the
remainder would not. But it would be impossible if productivity on A
were to decrease, for then the price of production would not remain
unchanged, but would rise. Yet in all these cases, i.e., whether the
surplus-product yielded by the additional investments is proportional to
the latter or is greater or smaller than this proportion — whether,
therefore, the rate of surplus-profit on the capital remains constant,
rises or falls, when this capital increases, the surplus-product and the
corresponding surplus-profit per acre increases, and hence also the
potential rent in grain and money. The growth in the mere quantity of
surplus-profit or rent, calculated per acre, that is, an increasing
quantity calculated on the basis of some constant unit — in the present
case on a definite quantity of land such as an acre or a hectare —
expresses itself as an increasing ratio. Hence the magnitude of the
rent, calculated per acre, increases under such circumstances simply in
consequence of the increase in the capital invested in the land. This
takes place, to be sure, assuming the prices of production remain the
same, and, on the other hand, regardless of whether the productivity of
the additional capital remains unaltered, or whether it decreases or
increases. The latter circumstances modify the range in which the
magnitude of rent per acre increases but not the existence of this
increase itself. This is a phenomenon peculiar to differential rent II,
and distinguishing it from differential rent I. If the additional
investments of capital were made successively in space, side by side in
new additional soil of corresponding quality, rather than successively
in time in the same soil, the quantity of the rental would have
increased, and, as previously shown, so would the average rent from the
total cultivated area, but not the magnitude of the rent per acre. Given
the same result so far as quantity and value of total production and
surplus-product are concerned, the concentration of capital upon a
smaller area of land increases the amount of rent per acre, whereas
under the same conditions, its dispersion over a larger area, all other
conditions being equal, does not produce this effect. But the more the
capitalist mode of production develops, the more does the concentration
of capital upon the same area of land develop, and, therefore, the more
does the rent, calculated per acre, increase. Consequently, given two
countries in which the prices of production are identical, the
differences in soil type are identical, and the same amount of capital
is invested — but in the one country more in the form of successive
outlays upon a limited area of land, whereas in the other more in the
form of co-ordinated outlays upon a larger area — then the rent per
acre, and thereby the price of land, would be higher in the first
country and lower in the second, although the total rent would be the
same for both countries. The difference in magnitude of rent could thus
not be explained here to be a result of a difference in the natural
fertility of the various soils, nor a result of a difference in the
quantity of employed labour, but solely a result of different ways in
which the capital is invested.

When we refer to surplus-product here, this should always be understood
to mean that aliquot part of the output which represents surplus-profit.
Ordinarily, we mean by excess product or surplus-product that portion of
the output which represents the total surplus-value, or in some cases
that portion which represents the average profit. The specific meaning
which this term assumes in the case of rent-bearing capital gives rise
to misunderstanding, as previously pointed out.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 42. Differential Rent II. Second Case: Falling Price of Production

 

The price of production may fall when additional investments of capital
take place with an unaltered, falling, or rising rate of productivity.

I. Productivity of the additional investment of capital remains the same.

In this case, the assumption, therefore, is that the output increases
proportionally to the capital invested in the various soils and in
accordance with their respective qualities. This means for constant
differences in soils that the surplus-product increases in proportion to
the increased investment of capital. This case, then, excludes any
additional investment of capital in soil A which might affect the
differential rent. For this soil, the rate of surplus-profit = 0; thus,
it remains = 0 since we have assumed that the productiveness of the
additional capital, and therefore the rate of surplus-profit, remain the
same.

But under these conditions the regulating price of production can only
fall, because it is the price of production of the next best soil, of B,
or any better soil than A, rather than that of A, which becomes the
regulator; so that the capital is withdrawn from A, or perhaps from A
and B if the price of production of C should become the regulating one,
and thus all soils inferior to C would be eliminated from the
competition among grain-producing soils. The prerequisite for this is,
under the assumed conditions, that the additional yield from the
additional investments of capital satisfy the demand, so that the output
from the inferior soil A, etc., become superfluous for the
re-establishment of a full supply.

Thus, let us take, for instance, Table II, but in such a way that 18 qrs
instead of 20 satisfy the demand. Soil A would drop out; B * and its
price of production of 30 shillings per quarter would become regulating.
The differential rent then assumes the following form:

TABLE IV

Type of soil

Acres

Capital £

Profit £

Price of Prod.

Output Qrs

Selling price per qr £

Proceeds £

Rent

Rate of Surplus Profit

In Grain Qrs

In Money £

B

1

5

1

6

4

1½

6

0

0

0%

C

1

5

1

6

6

1½

9

2

3

60%

D

1

5

1

6

8

1½

12

4

6

120%

Total

3

15

3

18

18

 

27

6

9

 

[* In the German 1894 edition this reads: D. — _Ed_.]

Compared with Table II, the ground-rent would hence have fallen from £36
to £9, and in grain from 12 qrs to 6 qrs; total output would have fallen
only by 2 qrs, from 20 to 18. The rate of surplus-profit calculated on
the capital would have fallen to one-third, i.e., from 180% to 60%.
[_Ibid.:_ one-half, from 180% to 90%. — _Ed._] Thus, the fall in the
price of production is accompanied here by a decrease of the rent in
grain and money.

Compared with Table I, there is merely a decrease in money-rent; the
rent in grain is in both cases 6 qrs; but in the one case it = £18, and
in the other £9. For soil C, [_Ibid.:_ for soil C and D. — _Ed_.] the
rent in grain, compared with Table I, has remained the same. In fact, it
is owing to the additional production resulting from the uniformly
acting additional capital that the yield from A has been excluded from
the market, and thereby soil A has been eliminated as a competing
producing agent, and it is owing to this fact that a new differential
rent I has been formed in which the better soil B plays the same role as
did formerly the inferior soil A.

Consequently, on the one hand, the rent from B has disappeared; on the
other hand, nothing has been altered in the differences between B, C and
D by the investment of additional capital — in accordance with our
assumption. For this reason, that part of the output which is
transformed into rent is reduced.

If the above result — the satisfaction of the demand with A excluded —
had been accomplished, perchance, by the investment of more than double
the capital in C or D, or in both, then the matter would assume a
different aspect. For example, if the third investment of capital were
made in C:

TABLE IVa

Type of soil

Acres

Capital £

Profit £

Price of Prod. £

Output Qrs

Selling price £

Proceeds £

Rent

Rate of Surplus Profit

In Grain Qrs

In Money £

B

1

5

1

6

4

1½

6

0

0

0%

C

1

7½

1½

9

9

1½

13½

3

4½

60%

D

1

5

1

6

8

1½

12

4

6

120%*

Total

3

17½

3½

21

21

 

31½

7

10½

 

In this case, compared with Table IV, the output from C has risen from 6
to 9 qrs, the surplus-product from 2 to 3 qrs, and the money-rent from
£3 to £4½. Compared with Table II, where the latter was £12, and Table
I, where it was £6, the money-rent has, on the other hand, decreased.
The total rental in grain = 7 qrs and has fallen compared with Table II
(12 qrs) and risen compared with Table I (6 qrs); in money (£10½) it has
fallen compared with both (£18 and £36).

If the third investment of capital of £2½ had been employed on soil B,
it would indeed have altered the quantity of production, but would not
have affected the rent, since, according to our assumption, the
successive investments do not produce any differences upon the same soil
and soil B does not yield any rent.

If we assume, on the other hand, that the third investment of capital
takes place upon D instead of C, we have the following, Table IVb:

Type of soil

Acres

Capital £

Profit £

Price of Prod. £

Output Qrs

Selling price £

Proceeds £

Rent

Rate of Surplus Profit

In Grain Qr

In Money £

B

1

5

1

6

4

1½

6

0

0

0%

C

1

5

1

6

6

1½

9

2

3

60%

D

1

7½

1½

9

12

1½

18

6

9

120%

Total

3

17½

3½

21

22

 

33

8

12

 

Here the total product is 22 qrs, more than double that of Table I,
although the invested capital is only £17½ as against £10, that is, not
twice the amount. The total product is also larger by 2 qrs than that of
Table II, although the invested capital in the latter is larger —
namely, £20.

Compared with Table I, the rent in grain from soil D has increased from
3 [In the German 1894 edition this reads: 2. — _Ed._] to 6 qrs, whereas
the money-rent, £9, has remained the same. Compared with Table II, the
grain-rent from D is the same, namely, 6 qrs, but the money-rent has
fallen from £18 to £9.

Comparing the total rents, the grain-rent from Table IVb = 8 qrs is
larger than that from Table I = 6 qrs and than that from Table IVa = 7
qrs; but it is smaller than that from Table II = 12 qrs. The money-rent
from Table IVb = £12 is larger than that from Table IVa = £10½ and
smaller than that from Table 1 = £18 and that from Table II = £36.

In order that the total rental may, under the conditions of Table IVb
(with the elimination of rent from B), be equal to that of Table I, we
need £6 more of surplus-product, that is, 4 qrs at £1½, which is the new
price of production. We then have a total rental of £18 again as in
Table I. The magnitude of the required additional capital will vary
according to whether we invest it in C or D, or divide it between the
two.

On C, £5 capital yields 2 qrs of surplus-product; consequently, £10
additional capital yields 4 qrs of additional surplus-product. On D, £5
additional capital would suffice to produce 4 qrs of additional
grain-rent under the conditions assumed here, namely that the
productivity of the additional investments of capital remains the same.
We should then obtain the following results:

TABLE IVc

Type of soil

Acres

Capital £

Proft £

Price of Prod. £

Output Qrs

Selling price £

Proceeds £

Rent

Rate of Surplus Profit

Qrs

£

B

1

5

1

6

4

1½

6

0

0

0%

C

1

15

3

18

18

1½

27

6

9

60%

D

1

7½

1½

9

12

1½

18

6

9

120%

Total

3

27½

5½

33

34

 

51

12

18

 

TABLE IVd

Type of soil

Acres

Capital £

Proft £

Price of Prod. £

Output Qrs

Selling price £

Proceeds £

Rent

Rate of Surplus Profit

Qrs

£

B

1

5

1

6

4

1½

6

0

0

0%

C

1

5

1

6

6

1½

9

2

3

60%

D

1

12½

2½

15

20

1½

30

10

15

120%

Total

3

22½

4½

27

30

 

45

12

18

 

The total money rental would be exactly one-half of what it was in Table
II, where the additional capitals were invested at constant prices of
production.

The most important thing is to compare the above tables with Table I.

We find that while the price of production has fallen by one-half, i.e.,
from 60 shillings to 30 shillings per quarter, the total money rental
has remained the same, namely = £18, and the grain-rent has
correspondingly doubled from 6 to 12 qrs. Upon B the rent has
disappeared; upon C the money-rent has risen by one-half in IVc, but has
fallen by one-half in IVd; upon D in IVc, it has remained the same, =
£9, and has risen from £9 to £15 in IVd. The production has risen from
10 to 34 qrs in IVc, and to 30 qrs in IVd; the profit from £2 to £5½ in
IVc and to £4 in IVd. The total investment of capital has risen in the
one case from £10 to £27½, and in the other from £10 to £22½; i.e., in
both cases it has more than doubled. The rate of rent, that is, the rent
calculated on the invested capital, is in all tables from IV to IVd
everywhere the same for each kind of soil — which was already implied in
the assumption that the rate of productivity for the two successive
investments of capital remains the same for each soil type. But compared
with Table I this rate has fallen, both for the average of all kinds of
soil and for each one of them individually. In Table I it was = 180% on
an average, whereas in IVc it = (18/27½) × 100 = 65 5/11% and in IVd it
= (18/22½) × 100 = 80%. The average money-rent per acre has risen.
Formerly, in Table I, its average was £4½ per acre from all four acres,
whereas in IVc and IVd it is £6 per acre upon the three acres. Its
average upon the rent-bearing land was formerly £6, whereas now it is £9
per acre. Hence the money-value of the rent per acre has risen and now
represents twice as much grain as it did formerly; but the 12 qrs of
grain-rent are now less than one-half of the total output of 34 and 30
[In the German 1894 edition this reads: 33 and 27. — _Ed._] qrs
respectively, whereas in Table I the 6 qrs represent 3/5 of the total
output of 10 qrs. Consequently, although the rent as an aliquot part of
the total output has fallen, and has also fallen when calculated on the
invested capital, its money-value calculated per acre has risen, and
still more its value as a product. If we take soil D in Table IVd, we
find that the price of production corresponding to the capital outlay
here = £15, of which £12½ is invested capital. The money-rent = £15. In
Table I, for the same soil D, the price of production was = £3, the
invested capital = £2½, and the money-rent = £9; that is, the latter was
three times the price of production and almost four times the capital.
In Table IVd, the money-rent for D, £15, is exactly equal to the price
of production and larger than the capital by only 1/5. Nevertheless, the
money-rent per acre is ⅔ larger, namely, £15 instead of £9. In Table I,
the grain-rent of 3 qrs = ¾ of the total product of 4 qrs; in Table IVd
it is 10 qrs, or one-half the total product (20 qrs) per acre of D. This
shows that the money-value and grain value of the rent per acre may
rise, although it constitutes a smaller aliquot part of the total yield
and has fallen in proportion to the invested capital.

The value of the total product in Table I = £30; the rent = £18, or more
than one-half of it. The value of the total product in IVd = £45, of
which the rent = £18, or less than one-half.

Now, the reason why in spite of the fall in price by £1½ per quarter,
i.e., a fall of 50%, and in spite of the reduction in competing soil
from 4 to 3 acres, the total money-rent remains the same and the total
grain-rent is doubled, while, calculated per acre, both the grain-rent
and money-rent rise, is that more quarters of surplus-product are
produced. The price of grain falls by 50%, and the surplus-product
increases by 100%. But in order to obtain this result, the total
production under the conditions assumed by us must be trebled, and the
investment of capital in the superior soils must be more than doubled.
At what rate the latter must increase depends in the first place upon
the distribution of additional capital investments among the better and
best soils, always assuming that the productivity of the capital
invested in each soil type increases proportionately to its magnitude.

If the fall in price of production were smaller, less additional capital
would be required to produce the same money-rent. If the supply required
to throw soil A out of cultivation — and this depends not merely upon
the output per acre of A, but also upon the share held by A in the
entire cultivated area — thus, if the supply required for this purpose
were larger, and thereby also the amount of additional invested capital
required in soils better than A, then, other circumstances remaining the
same, the money and grain rents would have increased still more,
although soil B would have ceased yielding money and grain rents. If the
capital eliminated from A had been = £5, the tables to be compared for
this case would be tables II and IVd. The total product would have
increased from 20 to 30 qrs. The money-rent would be only half as large,
or £48 instead of £36; the grain-rent would be the same, namely = 12
qrs.

If a total product of 44 qrs = £66 could be produced upon D with a
capital = £27½ — corresponding to the old rate for D, 4 qrs per £2½
capital — then the total rental would once more reach the level attained
in Table II, and the table would appear as follows:

  -------------- ----------- ------------ ---------------- --------------
  Type of Soil   Capital £   Output Qrs   Grain-Rent Qrs   Money-Rent £
  B              5           4            0                0
  C              5           6            2                3
  D              27½         44           22               33
  Total          37½         54           24               36
  -------------- ----------- ------------ ---------------- --------------

The total production would be 54 qrs as against 20 qrs in Table II, and
the money-rent would be the same, = £36. But the total capital would be
£37½, whereas in Table II it was = 20. The total invested capital would
be double almost, while production would be nearly treble; the
grain-rent would be double and the money-rent would remain the same.
Hence, if the price falls — while productivity remains the same — as a
result of the investment of additional money-capital in the better soils
which yield rent, that is, all soils better than A, then the total
capital has a tendency not to increase at the same rate as production
and grain-rent; thus the increase in grain-rent may compensate for the
loss in money-rent due to the falling price. The same law also manifests
itself in that the invested capital must be proportionately larger as
more is invested in C than D, i.e., in soils yielding less rent rather
than in soils yielding more rent. The point is simply this: in order
that the money-rent may remain the same or rise, a definite additional
quantity of surplus-product must be produced, and the greater the
fertility of the soils yielding surplus-product, the less capital this
requires. If the difference between B and C, and C and D, were still
greater, still less additional capital would be required. The specific
proportion is determined by 1) the ratio of fall in price, in other
words, by the difference between soil B, which does not yield rent now,
and soil A, which formerly was the soil not yielding rent; 2) the ratio
of the differences between the soils better than B upwards; 3) the
amount of newly invested additional capital, and 4) its distribution
among the soils of varying quality.

In fact, we see that this law merely expresses what was already
ascertained in the first case: When the price of production is given, no
matter what its magnitude, the rent may increase as a result of
additional capital investment. For owing to the elimination of A, we now
have a new differential rent I with B as the worst soil and £1½ per
quarter as the new price of production. This applies to Table IV as well
as to Table II. It is the same law, except that our point of departure
is soil B instead of A, and our price of production is taken as £1½
instead of £3.

The important thing here is this: To the extent that so much and so much
additional capital was necessary in order to withdraw the capital from
soil A and create the supply without it, we find that this may be
accompanied by an unaltered, rising, or falling rent per acre, if not
from all plots of land then at least from some, and so far as the
average of the cultivated plots is concerned. We have seen that
grain-rent and money-rent do not maintain a uniform relation to one
another. It is merely due to tradition that grain-rent is still of any
importance in economics. One might demonstrate equally well that, e.g.,
a manufacturer can buy much more of his yarn with his profit of £5 than
he could formerly with a profit of £10. It shows at any rate, that
messieurs landlords, when they are simultaneously owners or shareholders
in manufacturing establishments, sugar-refineries, distilleries, etc.,
may in their capacity as producers of their own raw materials still make
a considerable profit when the money-rent is falling.^([1])

II. Decreasing rate of productivity of the additional capital.

This introduces nothing new into the problem, in so far as the price of
production may also fall in this case, as in the case just considered,
only when additional investments of capital in better soils than A
render the output from A superfluous and the capital is therefore
withdrawn from A, or A is employed for the production of other products.
This case has been exhaustively discussed above. It was shown that the
rent in grain and money per acre may increase, decrease, or remain
unchanged.

For convenience in making comparisons we reproduce the following table:

_TABLE IV_

  -------------- ------- ----------- ---------- ---------------------------- ------------ ---------------- ---------------- ------------------------
  Type of Soil   Acres   Capital £   Profit £   Price of Production.per Qr   Output Qrs   Grain-Rent Qrs   Money-Rent Qrs   Rate of Surplus Profit
  A              1       2½          ½          3                            1            0                0                0
  B              1       2½          ½          1½                           2            1                3                120%
  C              1       2½          ½          1                            3            2                6                240%
  D              1       2½          ½          ¾                            4            3                9                360%
  Total          4       10                                                  10           6                18               180% average
  -------------- ------- ----------- ---------- ---------------------------- ------------ ---------------- ---------------- ------------------------

Now let us assume that a quantity of 16 qrs supplied by B, C, and D at a
decreasing rate of productivity suffices to exclude A from cultivation.
In such case, Table III is transformed into the following:

_TABLE V_

  -------------- ------- ------------------------- ---------- ------------- ----------------- ------------ ---------------- -------------- ------------------------
  Type of Soil   Acres   Investment of Capital £   Profit £   Output Qrs    Selling price £   Proceeds £   Grain-Rent Qrs   Money-Rent £   Rate of Surplus Profit
  B              1       2½ + 2½                   1          2 + 1½ = 3½   1 5/7             6            0                0              0
  C              1       2½ + 2½                   1          3+2=5         1 5/7             8 4/7        1½               2 4/7          51 3/7%
  D              1       2½ + 2½                   1          4 + 3½ = 7½   1 5/7             12 6/7       4                6 6/7          137 1/7%**
  Total          3***    15                                   16                              27 3/7       5½               9 3/7          94 2/7% average****
  -------------- ------- ------------------------- ---------- ------------- ----------------- ------------ ---------------- -------------- ------------------------

[* In the German 1894 edition this reads 51 2/5. — _Ed._]
[** _Ibid._ 137 1/5 — _Ed._]
[*** _Ibid._: 4. — _Ed._]
[**** Here, as well as in tables VI, VII, VII I, IX and X the land which
yields no rent is left out of consideration. — _Ed._]

Here, at a decreasing rate of productivity of the additional capital,
and a varying decrease for the various soil types, the regulating price
of production has fallen from £3 to £1 5/7. The investment of capital
has risen by one-half-from £10 to £15. The money-rent has fallen by
almost one-half-from £18 to £9 3/7, but the grain-rent has fallen by
only 1/12 — from 6 qrs to 5½ qrs. The total output has risen from 10 to
16, or by 60%. The grain-rent constitutes a little more than one-third
of the total product. The advanced capital is to the money-rent as 15:9
3/7, whereas formerly this ratio was 10:18.

III. Rising rate of productivity of the additional capital.

This differs from Variant I at the beginning of this chapter, where the
price of production falls while the rate of productivity remains the
same, merely in that when a given amount of additional produce is
required to exclude soil A this occurs here more quickly.

The effect may vary in accordance with the distribution of investments
among the various soils for a falling, as well as an increasing,
productivity of the additional capital investments. In so far as this
varying effect balances out the differences, or accentuates them, the
differential rent of the better soils, and thereby the total rental too,
will fall or rise, as was already the case in differential rent I. In
other respects, everything depends upon the magnitude of the land area
and capital excluded together with A, and upon the relative magnitude of
advanced capital required with a rising productivity in order to produce
the additional output to meet the demand.

The only point worthwhile analysing here, and which really takes us back
to the investigation of the way in which this differential profit is
transformed into differential rent, is the following:

In the first case, where the price of production remains the same the
additional capital which may be invested in soil A does not affect the
differential rent as such, since soil A, as before, does not yield any
rent, the price of its produce remains the same, and it continues to
regulate the market.

In the second case, Variant I, where the price of production falls while
the rate of productivity remains the same, soil A will necessarily be
excluded, and still more so in Variant II (falling price of production
with falling rate of productivity), since otherwise the additional
capital invested in soil A would have had to raise the price of
production. But here, in Variant III of the second case, where the price
of production falls because the productivity of the additional capital
rises, this additional capital may under certain circumstances be
invested in soil A as well as in the better soils.

Let us assume that when invested in soil A an additional capital of £2½
produces 1 1/5 qrs instead of 1 qr.

_TABLE VI_

Type of Soil

Acres

Capital £

Profit £

Price of Production £

Output Qrs

Selling price £

Proceeds £

Rent

Rate of Surplus Profit

Qrs

£

A

1

2½ + 2½ = 5

1

6

1 + 1 1/5 =2 1/5

2 8/11

6

0

0

0%

B

1

2½ + 2½ = 5

1

6

2 + 2 2/5 = 4 2/5

2 8/11

12

2 1/5

6

120%

C

1

2½ + 2½ = 5

1

6

3 + 3 3/5 = 6 3/5

2 8/11

18

4 2/5

12

240%

D

1

2½ + 2½ = 5

1

6

4 + 4 4/5 = 8 4/5

2 8/11

24

6 3/5

18

360%

 

4

20

4

24

22

 

60

13 1/5

36

240%

Aside from being compared with the basic Table I, this table should be
compared with Table II, where a two-fold investment of capital is
associated with a constant productivity, proportional to the investment
of capital.

In accordance with our assumption, the regulating price of production
falls. If it were to remain constant, = £3, then the worst soil A, which
used to yield no rent with an investment of only £2½, would now yield
rent without worse soil being brought under cultivation. This would have
occurred due to an increase in the productivity of this soil, but only
for a part of the capital, not for the original capital invested. The
first £3 of production price yield 1 qr; the second yield 1 1/5; qrs;
but the entire output of 2 1/5; qrs is now sold at its average price.
Since the rate f productivity increases with the additional investment
of capital, this presupposes an improvement. The latter may consist of a
general increase in capital invested per acre (more fertiliser, more
mechanised labour, etc.), or it may be that only through this additional
capital it is at all possible to bring about a qualitatively different
more productive investment of the capital. In both cases, the investment
of £5 of capital per acre yields an output of 2 1/5 qrs, whereas the
investment of one-half of this capital, i.e., £2 1/5, yields only 1 qr
of produce. The produce from soil A could, regardless of transient
market conditions, only continue to be sold at a higher price of
production instead of at the new average price, as long as a
considerable area of type A soil continued to be cultivated with a
capital of only £2½ per acre. But as soon as the new relation of £5 of
capital per acre, and thereby the improved management, becomes
universal, the regulating price of production would have to fall to £2
8/11. The difference between the two portions of capital would
disappear, and then, in fact, the cultivation of an acre of soil A with
a capital of only £2½ would be abnormal, i.e., would not correspond to
the new conditions of production. It would then no longer be a
difference between the yields from different portions of capital
invested in the same acre, but between a sufficient and an insufficient
total investment of capital per acre. This shows, _first of all,_ that
insufficient capital in the hands of a large number of tenant farmers
(it must be a large number, for a small number would simply be compelled
to sell below their price of production) produces the same effect as a
differentiation of the soils themselves in a descending line. The
inferior cultivation of inferior soil increases the rent from superior
soils; it may even lead to rent being yielded from better cultivated
soil of equally poor quality, which would otherwise not be yielded. It
shows, _secondly,_ that differential rent, in so far as it arises from
successive investments of capital in the same total area, resolves
itself in reality into an average, in which the effects of the various
investments of capital are no longer recognisable and distinguishable,
and therefore do not result in rent being yielded from the worst soil,
but rather: 1) make the average price of the total yield for, say, an
acre of A, the new regulating price and 2) appear as alteration in the
total quantity of capital per acre required under the new conditions for
the adequate cultivation of the soil; and in which the individual
successive investments of capital, as well as their respective effects,
will appear indistinguishably blended together. It is exactly the same
with the individual differential rents from the superior soils. In each
case, they are determined by the difference between the average output
from the soil in question and the output from the worst soil at the
increased capital investment — which has now become normal.

No soil yields any produce without an investment of capital. This is the
case even for simple differential rent, differential rent I; when it is
said that one acre of soil A, which regulates the price of production,
yields so much and so much produce at such and such a price, and that
superior soils B, C and D yield so much differential produce, and
therefore so much and so much money-rent at the regulating price of
production, it is always assumed that a definite amount of capital is
invested which, under the prevailing conditions of production, is
considered normal. In the same way, a certain minimum capital is
required for every individual branch of industry in order that the
commodities may be produced at their price of production.

If this minimum is altered as a result of successive investments of
capital associated with improvements on the same soil, it occurs
gradually. So long as a certain number of acres, say, of A, do not
receive this additional working capital, a rent is produced upon the
better cultivated acres of A due to the unaltered price of production,
and the rent from all superior soils, B, C and D, is increased. But as
soon as the new method of cultivation has become general enough to be
the normal one, the price of production falls; the rent from the
superior plots declines again, and that portion of soil A that does not
possess the working capital, which has now become the average, must sell
its produce below its individual price of production, i.e., below the
average profit.

In the case of a falling price of production, this also occurs even with
decreasing productivity of the additional capital — as soon as the
required total product is supplied, in consequence of increased
investment of capital, by the superior soils, and thus, e.g., the
working capital is withdrawn from A, i.e., A no longer competes in the
production of this particular product, e.g., wheat. The quantity of
capital which is now required, on an average, to be invested in the
better soil B, the new regulator, now becomes normal: and when one
speaks of the varying fertility of plots of land, it is assumed that
this new normal quantity of capital per acre is employed.

On the other hand, it is evident that this average investment of
capital, say, in England, of £8 per acre prior to 1848, and £12
subsequent to that year, will constitute the standard in concluding
leases. For the farmer expending more than this, the surplus-profit is
not transformed into rent for the duration of the contract. Whether this
takes place after expiration of the contract or not will depend upon the
competition among the farmers who are in a position to make the same
extra capital advance. We are not referring here to such permanent soil
improvements that continue to provide the increased output with the same
or even with a decreasing outlay of capital. Such improvements, although
products of capital, have the same effect as natural differences in the
quality of the land.

We see, then, that a factor comes into consideration in the case of
differential rent II which does not appear in the case of differential
rent I as such, since the latter can continue to exist independently of
any change in the normal investment of capital per acre. It is, on the
one hand, the blurring of results from various investments, of capital
in regulating soil A, whose output flow simply appears as a normal
average output per acre. It is, on the other hand, the change in the
normal minimum, or in the average magnitude of invested capital per
acre, so that this change appears as a property of the soil. It is,
finally, the difference in the manner of transforming surplus-profit
into the form of rent.

Table VI shows, furthermore, compared with tables I and II, that the
grain-rent has more than doubled in relation to I, and has increased by
1 1/5 qrs in relation to II; while the money-rent has doubled in
relation to I, but has not changed in relation to II. It would have
increased considerably if (other conditions remaining the same) more of
the additional capital had been allocated to the superior soils, or if
on the other hand the effect of the additional capital on A had been
less appreciable, and thus the regulating average price per quarter from
A had been higher.

If the increase in productiveness by means of additional capital should
produce varying results for the various soils, this would produce a
change in their differential rents.

In any case, it has been shown that the rent per acre, for instance with
a doubled investment of capital, may not only double, but may more than
double — while the price of production falls in consequence of an
increased rate of productivity of the additional capital invested, i.e.,
when this productivity grows at a higher rate than the advanced capital.
But it may also fall if the price of production should fall much lower
as a result of a more rapid increase in productiveness of soil A.

Let us assume that the additional investments of capital, for instance
in B and C, do not increase the productivity at the same rate as they do
for A, so that the proportional differences decrease for B and C and the
increase in output does not make up for the fall in price. Then,
compared with Table II, the [money] rent from D would remain unchanged,
and that from B and C would fall.

_TABLE VIa_

  -------------- ------- ------------- ---------- --------------------- --------------- ------------ ---------------- --------------
  Type of Soil   Acres   Capital £     Profit £   Output Per Acre Qrs   Selling price   Proceeds £   Grain-Rent Qrs   Money-Rent £
  A              1       2½+2½         1          1+3=4                 1½              6            0                0
  B              1       2½ + 2½ = 5   1          2 + 2½ = 4½           1½              6¾           ½                ¾
  C              1       2½ + 2½ = 5   1          3 + 5 = 8             1½              12           4                6
  D              1       2½ + 2½ = 5   1          4 + 12 = 16           1½              24           12               18
  Total          4       20                       32½                                                16½              24¾
  -------------- ------- ------------- ---------- --------------------- --------------- ------------ ---------------- --------------

Finally, the money-rent would rise if more additional capital were
invested in the superior soils with the same proportional increase in
productiveness than in A, or if the additional investments of capital in
the superior soils were effective at an increasing rate of productivity.
In both cases the differences would increase.

The money-rent falls when the improvement due to additional investment
of capital reduces the differences completely, or in part, and affects A
more than B and C. The smaller the increase in productivity of the
superior soils, the more it falls. It depends upon the extent of
inequality produced, whether the grain-rent shall rise, fall or remain
stationary.

The money-rent rises, and similarly the grain-rent, either when — the
proportional difference in additional fertility of the various soils
remaining unaltered — more capital is invested in the rent-bearing soils
than in rentless soil A, and more in soils yielding higher rent than in
those yielding lower rents; or when the fertility — the additional
capital remaining equal — increases more on the better and best soils
than on A, i.e., the money and grain rents rise in proportion to this
increase in fertility of the better soils above that of the poorer ones.

But under all circumstances, there is a relative rise in rent when
increased productive power is the result of an addition of capital, and
not merely the result of increased fertility with unaltered investment
of capital. This is the absolute point of view, which shows that here,
as in all former cases, the rent and increased rent per acre (as in the
case of differential rent I on the entire cultivated area — the
magnitude of the average rental) are the result of an increased
investment of capital in land, no matter whether this capital functions
with a constant rate of productivity at constant or decreasing prices or
with a decreasing rate of productivity at constant or falling prices, or
with an increasing rate of productivity at falling prices. For our
assumption: constant prices with a constant, falling, or rising rate of
productivity of the additional capital, and falling prices with a
constant, falling, or rising rate of productivity, resolves itself into:
a constant rate of productivity of the additional capital at constant or
falling prices, a falling rate of productivity at constant or falling
prices, and a rising rate of productivity at constant and falling
prices. Although the rent may remain stationary, or may fall, in all
these cases, it would fall more if the additional investment of capital,
other circumstances remaining the same, were not a prerequisite for the
increased productiveness. The additional capital, then, is always the
cause for the relatively high rent, although absolutely it may have
decreased.

Notes

1. The above tables IVa to IVd had to be recalculated due to an error in
computation which ran through all of them. While this did not affect the
theoretical conclusions drawn from these tables, it introduced, in part,
quite monstrous numerical values for production per acre. Even these are
not objectionable in principle. For all relief and topographical maps it
is customary to choose a much larger scale for the vertical than for the
horizontal. Nevertheless, should anyone feel that his agrarian feelings
have been injured thereby, he is at liberty to multiply the number of
acres by any numerical value that will satisfy him. One might also
choose 10, 12, 14, 16 bushels (8 bushels = 1 quarter) per acre in Table
1 instead of 1, 2, 3, 4 quarters, and the derived numerical values in
the other tables would remain within the limits of probability; it will
be found that the result, i.e., the ratio of rent increase to capital
increase, is exactly the same. This has been done in the tables included
by the editor in the next chapter. — _F. E_.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 43. Differential Rent II. Third Case: Rising Price of Production

 

[A rising price of production presupposes that the productivity of the
poorest quality land yielding no rent decreases. The assumed regulating
price of production cannot rise above £3 per quarter unless the £2½
invested in soil A produce less than 1 qr, or the £5 — less than 2 qrs,
or unless an even poorer soil than A has to be taken under cultivation.

For constant, or even increasing, productivity of the second investment
of capital this would only be possible if the productivity of the first
investment of capital of ½ had decreased. This case occurs often enough.
For instance, when with superficial ploughing the exhausted top soil
yields ever smaller crops, under the old method of cultivation, and then
the subsoil, turned up through deeper ploughing, produces better crops
than before with more rational cultivation. But, strictly speaking, this
special case does not apply here. The decrease in productivity of the
first £2½ of invested capital signifies for the superior soils, even
when the conditions are assumed to be analogous there, a decrease in
differential rent I; yet here we are considering only differential rent
II. But since this special case cannot occur without presupposing the
existence of differential rent II, and represents in fact the reaction
of a modification of differential rent I upon II, we shall give an
illustration of it [see Table VII — _Ed_.].

The money-rent and proceeds are the same as in Table II. The increased
regulating price of production makes good what has been lost in quantity
of produce; since this price and the quantity of produce are inversely
proportional, it is evident that their mathematical product will remain
the same.

TABLE VII

Type
of Soil

Acres

Invested Capital
£

Profit £

Price
of
Prod.
£

Output
Qrs

Sell-
ing
Price
£

Pro-
ceeds
£

Grain-
Rent
Qrs

Money
-Rent
£

Rate
of
Rent

A

1

2½ + 2½

1

6

½ + 1¼ = 1¾

3 3/7

6

0

0

0%

B

1

2½ + 2½

1

6

1 + 2½ = 3½

3 3/7

12

1¾

6

120%

C

1

2½ + 2½

1

6

1½ + 3¾ = 5¼

3 3/7

18

3½

12

240%

D

1

2½ + 2½

1

6

2 + 5 = 7

3 3/7

24

5¼

18

360%

 

 

20

 

 

17½

 

60

10½

36

240%

In the above case, it was assumed that the productiveness of the second
investment of capital was greater than the original productivity of the
first investment. Nothing changes if we assume the second investment to
have only the same productivity as the first, as shown in the following
table:

TABLE VIII

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

Rent

 

Type
of Soil

Acres

Invested Capital
£

Profit
£

Price
of
Prod.
£

Output
Qrs

Sell-
ing
Price
£

Pro-
ceeds
£

In
Grain
Qrs

In
Money
£

Rate of
Surplus-
Profit

A

1

2½ + 2½ = 5

1

6

½ + 1½ = 2½

4

6

0

0

0%

B

1

2½ + 2½ = 5

1

6

1 + 2 = 3

4

12

1½

6

120%

C

1

2½ + 2½ = 5

1

6

1½ + 3 = 4½

4

18

3

12

240%

D

1

2½ + 2½ = 5

1

6

2 + 4 = 6

4

24

4½

18

360%

 

 

20

 

 

15

 

60

9

36

240%

Here, too, the price of production rising at the same rate compensates
in full for the decrease in productivity in the case of yield as well as
money-rent.

The third case appears in its pure form only when the productivity of
the second investment of capital declines, while that of the first
remains constant — which was always assumed in the first and second
cases. Here differential rent I is not affected, i.e., the change
affects only that part which arises from differential rent II. We shall
give two illustrations: in the first we assume that the productivity of
the second investment of capital has been reduced to ½, in the second to
¾.

TABLE IX

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

Rent

 

Type
of
Soil

Acres

Invested
Capital
£

Profit
£

Price
of
Prod.

Output
Qrs

Sell-
ing
Price
£

Pro-
ceeds
£

In
Grain
Qrs

In
Money
£

Rate of
Rent

A

1

2½ + 2½ = 5

1

6

1 + ½ = 1½

4

6

0

0

0

B

1

2½ + 2½ = 5

1

6

2 + 1 = 3

4

12

1½

6

120%

C

1

2½ + 2½ = 5

1

6

3 + 1½ = 4½

4

18

3

12

240%

D

1

2½ + 2½ = 5

1

6

4 + 2 = 6

4

24

4½

18

360%

 

 

20

 

 

15

 

60

9

36

240%

Table IX is the same as Table VIII, except for the fact that the
decrease in productivity in VIII occurs for the first, and in IX for the
second investment of capital.

TABLE X

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

Rent

 

Type
of
Soil

Acres

Invested
Capital
£

Profit
£

Price
of
Prod.

Output
Qrs

Sell-
ing
Price
£

Pro-
ceeds
£

In
Grain
Qrs

In
Money
£

Rate of
Rent

A

1

2½ + 2½ = 5

1

6

1 + ¼ = 1¼

4 4/5

6

0

0

0%

B

1

2½ + 2½ = 5

1

6

2 + ½ = 2½

4 4/5

12

1¼

6

120%

C

1

2½ + 2½ = 5

1

6

3 + ¾ = 3¾

4 4/5

18

2½

12

240%

D

1

2½ + 2½ = 5

1

6

4 + 1 = 5

4 4/5

24

3¾

18

360%

 

 

20

 

24

12½

 

60

7½

36

240%

In this table, too, the total proceeds, the money-rent and rate of rent
remain the same as in tables II, VII and VIII, because produce and
selling price are again inversely proportional, while the invested
capital remains the same.

But how do matters stand in the other possible case when the price of
production rises, namely, in the case of a poor quality soil not worth
cultivating until then that is taken under cultivation?

Let us suppose that a soil of this sort, which we shall designate by a,
enters into competition. Then the hitherto rentless soil A would yield
rent, and the foregoing tables VII, VIII and X would assume the
following forms:

TABLE VIIa

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

Rent

 

Type
of
Soil

Acres

Invested
Capital
£

Profit
£

Price
of
Prod.

Output
Qrs

Sell-
ing
Price
£

Pro-
ceeds
£

In
Grain
Qrs

In
Money
£

Increase

a

1

5

1

6

1½

4

6

0

0

0

A

1

2½ + 2½

1

6

½ + 1¼ = 1¾

4

7

¼

1

1

B

1

2½ + 2½

1

6

1 + 2½ = 3½

4

14

2

8

1 + 7

C

1

2½ + 2½

1

6

1½ + 3¾ = 5¼

4

21

3¾

15

1 + 2 × 7

D

1

2½ + 2½

1

6

2 + 5 = 7

4

28

5½

22

1 + 3 × 7

 

 

 

 

30

19

 

76

11½

46

 

 

TABLE VIIIa

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

Rent

 

Type
of
Soil

Acres

Invested
Capital
£

Profit
£

Price
of
Prod.

Output
Qrs

Sell-
ing
Price
£

Pro-
ceeds
£

In
Grain
Qrs

In
Money
£

Increase

a

1

5

1

6

1¼

4 4/5

6

0

0

0

A

1

2½ + 2½

1

6

½ + 1 = 1½

4 4/5

7 1/5

¼

1 1/5

1 1/5

B

1

2½ + 2½

1

6

1 + 2 = 3

4 4/5

14 2/5 >

1¾

8 2/5

1 1/5 + 7 1/5

C

1

2½ + 2½

1

6

1½ + 3 = 4½

4 4/5

21 3/5

3¼*

15 3/5

1 1/5 + 2 × 7 1/5

D

1

2½ + 2½

1

6

2 + 4 = 6

4 4/5

28 4/5

4¾

22 4/5

1 1/5 + 3 × 7 1/5

 

5

 

 

30

16¼

 

78

10**

48

 

[* In the German 1894 edition this reads: 2¼. — _Ed_.]
[** _Ibid_.: 9 — _Ed_.]

TABLE Xa

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

Rent

 

Type
of
Soil

Acres

Invested
Capital
£

Profit
£

Price
of
Prod.

Output
Qrs

Sell-
ing
Price
£

Pro-
ceeds
£

In
Grain
Qrs

In
Money
£

Increase

a

1

5

1

6

1 1/8

5⅓

6

0

0

0

A

1

2½ + 2½

1

6

1 + ¼ = 1¼

5⅓

6⅔

⅔

⅔

B

1

2½ + 2½

1

6

2 + ½ = 2½

5⅓

13⅓

1 3/8

7⅓

⅔ + 6⅔

C

1

2½ + 2½

1

6

3 + ¾ = 3¾

5⅓

20

2 5/8

14

⅔ + 2 × 6⅔

D

1

2½ + 2½

1

6

4 + 1 = 5

5⅓

26⅔

3 7/8

20⅔

⅔ + 3 × 6⅔

 

 

 

 

30

13 5/8

 

72⅔

8

42⅔

By interpolating soil a there arises a new differential rent I; upon
this new basis, differential rent II likewise develops in an altered
form. Soil a has different fertility in each of the above three tables;
the sequence of proportionally increasing fertilities begins only with
soil A. The sequence of rising rents also behaves similarly. The rent of
the worst rent-bearing soil, previously rentless, is a constant which is
simply added to all higher rents. Only after deducting this constant
does the sequence of differences clearly become evident for the higher
rents, and similarly its parallel in the fertility sequence of the
different soils. In all the tables, the fertilities from A to D are
related as 1 : 2 : 3 : 4, and correspondingly the rents:

in VIIa, as 1 : (1 + 7) : (1 + 2 × 7) : (1 + 3 × 7),

in VIIIa, as 1 1/5 : (1 1/5 + 7 1/5) : (1 1/5 + 2 × 7 1/5) : (1 1/5 + 3
× 7 1/5),

and in Xa, as ⅔ : (⅔ + 6⅔) : (⅔ + 2 × 6⅔) : ⅔ + 3 × 6⅔).

In brief, if the rent from A = n, and the rent from the soil of next
higher fertility = n + m, then the sequence is as follows: n : (n + m) :
(n + 2m) : (n + 3m), etc. — _F. E._]

------------------------------------------------------------------------

[Since the foregoing third case had not been elaborated in the
manuscript — only the title is there — it was the task of the editor to
fill in the gap, as above, to the best of his ability. However, in
addition, it still remains for him to draw the general conclusions from
the entire foregoing analysis of differential rent II, consisting of
three principal cases and nine subcases. The illustrations presented in
the manuscript, however, do not suit this purpose very well. In the
first place, they compare plots of land whose yields for equal areas are
related as 1 : 2 : 3 : 4; i.e., differences, which exaggerate greatly
from the very first, and which lead to utterly monstrous numerical
values in the further development of the assumptions and calculations
made upon this basis. Secondly, they create a completely erroneous
impression. If for degrees of fertility related as 1 : 2 : 3 : 4, etc.,
rents are obtained in the sequence 0 : 1 : 2 : 3, etc., one feels
tempted to derive the second sequence from the first, and to explain the
doubling, tripling, etc., of rents by the doubling, tripling, etc., of
the total yields. But this would be wholly incorrect. The rents are
related as 0 : 1 : 2 : 3 : 4 even when the degrees of fertility are
related as n : (n + 1) : (n + 2) : (n + 3) : (n + 4). The rents are not
related as the _degrees_ of fertility, but as the _differences_ of
fertility — beginning with the rentless soil as the zero point.

The original tables had to be offered to illustrate the text. But in
order to obtain a perceptual basis for the following results of the
investigation, I present below a new series of tables in which the
yields are indicated in bushels (1/8 quarter, or 36.35 litres) and
shillings ( = marks).

The first of these, Table XI, corresponds to the former Table I. It
shows the yields and rents for soils of five different qualities, A to
E, with a first capital investment of 50 shillings, which added to 10
shillings profit = 60 shillings total price of production per acre. The
yields in grain are made low: 10, 12, 14, 16, 18 bushels per acre. The
resulting regulating price of production is 6 shillings per bushel.

The following 13 tables correspond to the three cases of differential
rent II treated in this and the two preceding chapters with an
additional invested capital of 50 shillings per acre in the same soil
with constant, falling and rising prices of production. Each of these
cases, in turn, is presented as it takes shape for:

1) constant, 2) falling, and 3) rising productivity of the second
investment of capital in relation to the first. This yields a few other
variants, which are especially useful for illustration purposes.

For case I: Constant price of production — we have:

  ------------ ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
  Variant 1:   Productivity of the second investment of capital
               remains the same (Table XII).

  Variant 2:   Productivity declines. This can take place only when
               no second investment of capital is made in soil A, i.e., in
               such a way that a) soil B likewise yields no rent (Table XIII)
               or b) soil B does not become completely rentless (Table XIV).

  Variant 3:   Productivity increases (Table XV). This case likewise excludes a second investment of capital in soil A.
  ------------ ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

For case II: Falling price of production — we have:

  ------------- --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
  Variant 1:    Productivity of the second investment of capital remains the same (Table XVI).

     — " — 2:   Productivity declines (Table XVII). These two variants require that soil
                A be eliminated from competition, and that soil B become rentless and
                regulate the price of production.

     — " — 3:   Productivity increases (Table XVIII). Here Soil A remains the regulator.
  ------------- --------------------------------------------------------------------------------

For case III: Rising price of production — two eventualities are
possible: soil A may remain rentless and continue to regulate the price,
or poorer soil than A enters into competition and regulates the price,
in which case A yields rent.

First eventuality: Soil A remains the regulator.

  ------------- --------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
  Variant 1:    Productivity of the second investment remains the same (Table XIX).
                This is admissible under the conditions assumed by us, provided the productivity of the first investment decreases.

     — " — 2:   Productivity of the second investment decreases (Table XX).
                This does not exclude the possibility that the first investment may retain the same productivity.

     — " — 3:   Productivity of the second investment increases (Table XXI
                [In the German 1894 edition this reads: XIX. — _Ed_.]). This, again, presupposes falling productivity of the first investment.
  ------------- --------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Second eventuality: An inferior quality soil (designated as a) enters
into competition; soil A yields rent.

  ------------ ----------------------------------------------------------------------
  Variant 1:   Productivity of the second investment remains the same (Table XXII).
  Variant 2:   Productivity declines (Table XXIII).
  — " — 3:     Productivity increases (Table XXIV).
  ------------ ----------------------------------------------------------------------

These three variants conform to the general conditions of the problem
and require no further comment.

The tables now follow:

TABLE XI

Type of
Soil

Price of
Production
Sh.

Output
Bushels

Selling
Price
Sh.

Proceeds
Sh.

Rent
Sh.

Rent
Increase

A

60

10

6

60

0

0

B

60

12

6

72

12

12

C

60

14

6

84

24

2 × 12

D

60

16

6

96

36

3 × 12

E

60

18

6

108

48

4 × 12

 

 

 

 

 

120

10 × 12

For second capital invested in the same soil:

First Case: Price of production remains unaltered.

Variant 1: Productivity of the second investment of capital remains the
same.

TABLE XII

Type
of
Soil

Price of
Production
Sh.

Output
Bushels

Selling
Price
Sh.

Proceeds
Sh.

Rent
Sh.

Rent
Increase

A

60 + 60 = 120

10 + 10 = 20

6

120

0

0

B

60 + 60 = 120

12 + 12 = 24

6

144

24

24

C

60 + 60 = 120

14 + 14 = 28

6

168

48

2 × 24

D

60 + 60 = 120

16 + 16 = 32

6

192

72

3 × 24

E

60 + 60 = 120

18 + 18 = 36

6

216

96

4 × 24

 

 

 

 

 

240

10 × 24

Variant 2: Productivity of the second investment of capital declines; no
second investment in soil A.

1) Soil B ceases to yield rent.

TABLE XIII

Type
of
Soil

Price of
Production
Sh.

Output
Bushels

Selling
Price
Sh.

Pro-
ceeds
Sh.

Rent
Sh.

Rent
Increase

A

60

10

6

60

0

0

B

60 + 60 = 120

12 + 8 = 20

6

120

0

0

C

60 + 60 = 120

14 + 9⅓ = 23⅓

6

140

20

20

D

60 + 60 = 120

16 + 10⅔ = 26⅔

6

160

40

2 × 20

E

60 + 60 = 120

18 + 12 = 30

6

180

60

3 × 20

 

 

 

 

 

120

6 × 20

[* In the German 1894 edition this reads: 20. — _Ed_.]

2) Soil B does not become completely rentless.

TABLE XIV

Type
of
Soil

Price of
Production
Sh.

Output
Bushels

Selling
Price
Sh.

Proceeds
Sh.

Rent
Sh.

Rent
Increase

A

60

10

6

60

0

0

B

60 + 60 = 120

12 + 9 = 21

6

126

6

6

C

60 + 60 = 120

14 + 10½ = 24½

6

147

27

6 + 21

D

60 + 60 = 120

16 + 12 = 28

6

168

48

6 + 2 × 21

E

60 + 60 = 120

18 + 13½ = 31½

6

189

69

6 + 3 × 21

 

 

 

 

 

150

4 × 6 + 6 × 21

Variant 3: Productivity of the second investment of capital increases;
here, too, no second investment in Soil A.

TABLE XV

Type
of
Soil

Price of
Production
Sh.

Output
Bushels

Selling
Price
Sh.

Proceeds
Sh.

Rent
Sh.

Rent
Increase

A

60

10

6

60

0

0

B

60 + 60 = 120

12 + 15 = 27

6

162

42

42

C

60 + 60 = 120

14 + 17½ = 31½

6

189

69

42 + 27

D

60 + 60 = 120

16 + 20 = 36

6

216

96

42 + 2 × 27

E

60 + 60 = 120

18 + 22½ = 40½

6

243

123

42 + 3 × 27

 

 

 

 

 

330

4 × 42 + 6 × 27

Second Case: Price of production declines.

Variant 1: Productivity of the second investment of capital remains the
same. Soil A is excluded from competition and soil B becomes rentless.

TABLE XVI

Type
of
Soil

Price of
Production
Sh.

Output
Bushels

Selling
Price
Sh.

Proceeds
Sh.

Rent
Sh.

Rent
Increase

B

60 + 60 = 120

12 + 12 = 24

5

120

0

0

C

60 + 60 = 120

14 + 14 = 28

5

140

20

20

D

60 + 60 = 120

16 + 16 = 32

5

160

40

2 × 20

E

60 + 60 = 120

18 + 18 = 36

5

180

60

3 × 20

 

 

 

 

 

120

6 × 20

Variant 2: Productivity of the second investment of capital declines;
soil A is excluded from competition and soil B becomes rentless.

TABLE XVII

Type
of
Soil

Price of
Production
Sh.

Output
Bushels

Selling
Price
Sh.

Proceeds
Sh.

Rent
Sh.

Rent
Increase

B

60 + 60 = 120

12 + 9 = 21

5 5/7

120

0

0

C

60 + 60 = 120

14 + 10½ = 24½

5 5/7

140

20

20

D

60 + 60 = 120

16 + 12 = 28

5 5/7

160

40

2 × 20

E

60 + 60 = 120

18 + 13½ = 31½

5 5/7

180

60

3 × 20

 

 

 

 

 

120

6 × 20

Variant 3: Productivity of the second investment of capital increases;
soil A remains in competition; soil B yields rent.

TABLE XVIII

Type
of
Soil

Price of
Production
Sh.

Output
Bushels

Selling
Price
Sh.

Proceeds
Sh.

Rent
Sh.

Rent
Increase

A

60 + 60 = 120

10 + 15 = 25

4 4/5

120

0

0

B

60 + 60 = 120

12 + 18 = 30

4 4/5

144

24

24

C

60 + 60 = 120

14 + 21 = 35

4 4/5

168

48

2 × 24

D

60 + 60 = 120

16 + 24 = 46

4 4/5

192

72

3 × 24

E

60 + 60 = 120

18 + 27 = 45

4 4/5

216

96

4 × 24

 

 

 

 

 

240

10 × 24

Case: Price of production rises.

A) Soil A remains rentless and continues to regulate the price.

Variant 1: Productivity of the second investment of capital remains the
same: this requires decreasing productivity of the first investment of
capital.

TABLE XIX

Type
of
Soil

Price of
Production
Sh.

Output
Bushels

Selling
Price
Sh.

Proceeds
Sh.

Rent
Sh.

Rent
Increase

A

60 + 60 = 120

7½ + 10 = 17½

6 6/7

120

0

0

B

60 + 60 = 120

9 + 12 = 21

6 6/7

144

24

24

C

60 + 60 = 120

10½ + 14 = 24½

6 6/7

168

48

2 × 24

D

60 + 60 = 120

12 + 16 = 28

6 6/7

192

72

3 × 24

E

60 + 60 = 120

13½ + 18 = 31½

6 6/7

216

96

4 × 24

 

 

 

 

 

240

10 × 24

Variant 2: Productivity of the second investment of capital decreases;
which does not exclude constant productivity of the first investment.

TABLE XXI

Type
of
Soil

Price of
Production
Sh.

Output
Bushels

Selling
Price
Sh.

Proceeds
Sh.

Rent
Sh.

Rent
Increase

A

60 + 60 = 120

5 + 12½ = 17½

6 6/7

120

0

0

B

60 + 60 = 120

6 + 15 = 21

6 6/7

144

24

24

C

60 + 60 = 120

7 + 17½ = 24½

6 6/7

168

48

2 × 24

D

60 + 60 = 120

8 + 20 = 28

6 6/7

192

72

3 × 24

E

60 + 60 = 120

9 + 22½ = 31½

6 6/7

216

96

4 × 24

 

 

 

 

 

240

10 × 24

B) An inferior soil (designated as a) becomes the price regulator and
soil A thus yields rent. This makes admissible for all variants constant
productivity of the second investment.

Variant 1: Productivity of the second investment of capital remains the
same.

TABLE XXII

Type
of
Soil

Price of
Production
Sh.

Output
Bushels

Selling
Price
Sh.

Proceeds
Sh.

Rent
Sh.

Rent
Increase

a

120

16

7½

120

0

0

A

60 + 60 = 120

10 + 10 = 20

7½

150

30

30

B

60 + 60 = 120

12 + 12 = 24

7½

180

60

2 × 30

C

60 + 60 = 120

14 + 14 = 28

7½

210

90

3 × 30

D

60 + 60 = 120

16 + 16 = 32

7½

240

120

4 × 30

E

60 + 60 = 120

18 + 18 = 36

7½

270

150

5 × 30

 

 

 

 

 

450

15 × 30

Variant 2: Productivity of the second investment of capital declines.

TABLE XXIII

Type
of
Soil

Price of
Production
Sh.

Output
Bushels

Selling
Price
Sh.

Proceeds
Sh.

Rent
Sh.

Rent
Increase

A

120

15

8

120

0

0

A

60 + 60 = 120

10 + 7½ = 17½

8

140

20

20

B

60 + 60 = 120

12 + 9 = 21

8

168

48

20 + 28

C

60 + 60 = 120

14 + 10½ = 24½

8

196

76

20 + 2 × 28

D

60 + 60 = 120

16 + 12 = 28

8

224

104

20 + 3 × 28

E

60 + 60 = 120

18 + 13½ = 31½

8

252

132

20 + 4 × 28

 

 

 

 

 

380

5 × 20 + 10 × 28

Variant 3: Productivity of the second investment increases.

TABLE XXIV

Type
of
Soil

Price of
Production
Sh.

Output
Bushels

Selling
Price
Sh.

Proceeds
Sh.

Rent
Sh.

Rent
Increase

A

120

16

7½

120

0

0

A

60 + 60 = 120

10 + 12½ = 21½

7½

168¾

48¾

15 + 33¾

B

60 + 60 = 120

12 + 15 = 27

7½

202½

82½

15 + 2 × 33¾

C

60 + 60 = 120

14 + 17½ = 31½

7½

236¼

116¼

15 + 3 × 33¾

D

60 + 60 = 120

16 + 20 = 36

7½

270

150

15 + 4 × 33¾

E

60 + 60 = 120

18 + 22½ = 40½

7½

303¾

183¾

15 + 5 × 33¾

 

 

 

 

 

581¼

5 × 15 + 15 × 33¾

These tables lead to the following conclusions:

In the first place, the sequence of rents behaves exactly as the
sequence of fertility differences — taking the rentless regulating soil
as the zero point. It is not the absolute yield, but only the
differences in yield which are the factors determining rent. Whether the
various soils yield 1, 2, 3, 4, 5 bushels, or whether they yield 11, 12,
13, 14, 15 bushels per acre, the rents in both cases form the sequence
0, 1, 2, 3, 4 bushels, or their equivalent in money.

But far more important is the result with respect to the total rent
yields for repeated investment of capital in the same land.

In five out of the thirteen analysed cases, the total rent doubles when
the investment of capital is doubled; instead of l0x12 shillings it
becomes 10 × 24 shillings = 240 shillings. These cases are:

Case I, constant price, variant 1: constant production rise (Table XII).

Case II, falling price, variant 3: increasing production rise (Table
XVIII).

Case III, increasing price, first eventuality (where soil A remains the
regulator), in all three variants (tables XIX, XX and XXI).

In four cases the rent more than doubles, namely:

Case I, variant 3, constant price, but increasing production rise (Table
XV) The total rent climbs to 330 shillings.

Case III, second eventuality (where soil A yields rent), in all three
variants (Table XXII, rent = 15 × 30 = 450 shillings; Table XXIII, rent
= 5 × 20 + 10 × 28 = 380 shillings; Table XXIV, rent = 5 × 15 + 15 × 33¾
= 581¼ shillings).

In one case the rent rises, but not to twice the amount yielded by the
first investment of capital:

Case I, constant price, variant 2: falling productivity of the second
investment, under conditions whereby B does not become completely
rentless (Table XIV, rent = 4 × 6 + 6 × 21 = 150 shillings).

Finally, only in three cases does the total rent remain at the same
level with a second investment — for all soils taken together — as with
the first investment (Table XI); these are the cases in which soil A is
excluded from competition and B becomes the regulator and thereby
rentless soil. Thus, the rent for B not only vanishes but is also
deducted from every succeeding term of the rent sequence; the result is
thus determined. These cases are:

Case I, variant 2, when the conditions are such that soil A is excluded
(Table XIII). The total rent is 6 × 20, or 10 × 12 = 120, as in Table
XI.

Case II, variants I and 2. Here soil A is necessarily excluded in
accordance with the assumptions (tables XVI and XVII) and the total rent
is again 6 × 20 = 10 × 12 = 120 shillings.

Thus, this means: In the great majority of all possible cases the rent
rises — per acre of rent-bearing land as well as particularly in its
total amount — as a result of an increased investment of capital in the
land. Only in three out of the thirteen analysed cases does its total
remain unaltered. These are the cases in which the lowest quality soil —
hitherto the regulator and rentless — is eliminated from competition and
the next quality soil takes its place, i.e., becomes rentless. But even
in these cases, the rents upon the superior soils rise in comparison
with the rents due to the first capital investment; when the rent for C
falls from 24 to 20, then those for D and E rise from 36 and 48 to 40
and 60 shillings respectively.

A fall in the total rents below the level for the first investment of
capital (Table XI) would be possible only if soil B as well as soil A
were to be excluded from competition and soil C were to become
regulating and rentless.

Thus, the more capital is invested in the land, and the higher the
development of agriculture and civilisation in general in a given
country, the more rents rise per acre as well as in total amount, and
the more immense becomes the tribute paid by society to the big
landowners in the form of surplus-profits — so long as the various
soils, once taken under cultivation, are all able to continue competing.

This law accounts for the amazing vitality of the class of big
landlords. No social class lives so sumptuously, no other class claims
the right it does to traditional luxury in keeping with its "estate,"
regardless of where the money for this purpose may be derived, and no
other class piles debt upon debt so lightheartedly. And yet it always
lands again on its feet — thanks to the capital invested by other people
in the land, which yields it a rent, completely out of proportion to the
profits reaped therefrom by the capitalist.

However, the same law also explains why the vitality of the big landlord
is gradually being exhausted.

When the English corn duties were abolished in 1846, the English
manufacturers believed that they had thereby turned the land-owning
aristocracy into paupers. Instead, they became richer than ever. How did
this occur? Very simply. In the first place, the farmers were now
compelled by contract to invest £12 per acre annually instead of £8. And
secondly, the landlords, being strongly represented in the Lower House
too, granted themselves a large government subsidy for drainage projects
and other permanent improvements on their land. Since no total
displacement of the poorest soil took place, but rather, at worst, it
became employed for other purposes — and mostly only temporarily — rents
rose in proportion to the increased investment of capital, and the
landed aristocracy consequently was better off than ever before.

But everything is transitory. Transoceanic steamships and the railways
of North and South America and India enabled some very singular tracts
of land to compete in European grain markets. These were, on the one
hand, the North American prairies and the Argentine pampas — plains
cleared for the plough by Nature itself, and virgin soil which offered
rich harvests for years to come even with primitive cultivation and
without fertilisers. And, on the other hand, there were the land
holdings of Russian and Indian communist communities which had to sell a
portion of their produce, and a constantly increasing one at that, for
the purpose of obtaining money for taxes wrung from them — frequently by
means of torture — by a ruthless and despotic state. These products were
sold without regard to price of production, they were sold at the price
which the dealer offered, because the peasant perforce needed money
without fail when taxes became due. And in face of this competition —
coming from virgin plains as well as from Russian and Indian peasants
ground down by taxation — the European tenant farmer and peasant could
not prevail at the old rents. A portion of the land in Europe fell
decisively out of competition as regards grain cultivation, and rents
fell everywhere; our second case, variant 2 — falling prices and falling
productivity of the additional investment of capital — became the rule
for Europe; and therefore the lament of landlords from Scotland to Italy
and from southern France to East Prussia. Fortunately, the plains are
far from being entirely brought under cultivation; there are enough left
to ruin all the big landlords of Europe and the small ones into the
bargain — _F.E._]

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The headings under which rent should be analysed are:

A. Differential rent.
1) Conception of differential rent. Water-power as an illustration.
Transition to agricultural rent proper.
2) Differential rent I, arising from the varying fertility of various
plots of land.
3) Differential rent II, arising from successive investments of capital
in the same land. Differential rent II should be analysed:
a) with a stationary,
b) falling,
c) and rising price of production.
And also
d) transformation of surplus-profit into rent.
4) Influence of this rent upon the rate of profit.
B. Absolute rent.
C. The price of land.
D. Final remarks concerning ground-rent.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Over-all conclusions to be drawn from the consideration of differential
rent in general are the following:

_First_, the formation of surplus-profit may take place in various ways.
On the one hand, based on differential rent I, that is, on the
investment of the entire agricultural capital in land consisting of
soils of varying fertility. Or, in the form of differential rent II,
based on the varying differential productivity of successive investments
of capital in the same land, i.e., a greater productivity — expressed,
e.g., in quarters of wheat — than is secured with the same investment of
capital in the worst land — rentless, but which regulates the price of
production. But no matter how this surplus-profit may arise, its
transformation into rent, i.e., its transfer from farmer to landlord,
always presupposes that the various actual individual production prices
of the partial outputs of the individual successive investments of
capital (i.e., independent of the general price of production by which
the market is regulated) have previously been reduced to an individual
average price of production. The excess of the general regulating
production price of the output per acre over this individual average
production price constitutes and is a measure of the rent per acre. In
the case of differential rent I, the differential results are in
themselves distinguishable because they take place upon different
portions of land — distinct from one another and existing side by side —
given an investment of capital per acre and a degree of cultivation
considered normal. In the case of differential rent II, they must first
be made distinguishable; they must in fact be transformed back into
differential rent I, and this can only take place in the indicated way.
For example, let us take Table III, S. 226.

Soil B yields for the first invested capital of £2½ — 2 quarters per
acre, and for the second investment of equal magnitude — 1½ quarters;
together — 3½ quarters from the same acre. It is not possible to
distinguish which part of these 3½ quarters is a product of invested
capital I and which part a product of invested capital II, for it is all
grown upon the same soil. In fact, the 3½ quarters is the yield from the
total capital of £5; and the actual fact of the matter is simply this: a
capital of £2½ yielded 2 quarters, and a capital of £5 yielded 3½
quarters rather than 4 quarters. The situation would be just the same if
the £5 yielded 4 quarters, i.e., if the yield from both investments of
capital were equal; similarly, if the yield were even 5 quarters, i.e.,
if the second investment of capital were to yield a surplus of 1
quarter. The price of production of the first 2 quarters is £1½ per
quarter, and that of the second 1½ quarters is £2 per quarter.
Consequently the 3½ quarters together cost £6. This is the individual
price of production of the total product, and, on the average, amounts
to £1 14 2/7 sh. per quarter, i.e., approximately £1¾. With the general
price of production determined by soil A, namely £3, this results in a
surplus-profit of £1¼ per quarter, and thus for the 3½ quarters, a total
of £4 3/8. At the average price of production of B this corresponds to
about 1½ quarters. In other words, the surplus-profit from B is
represented by an aliquot portion of the output from B, i.e., by the 1½
quarters, which express the rent in terms of grain, and which sell — in
accordance with the general price of production — for £4½. But on the
other hand, the excess product from an acre of B over that from an acre
of A does not automatically represent surplus-profit, and thereby
surplus-product. According to our assumption, an acre of B yields 3½
quarters, whereas an acre of A yields only 1 quarter. Excess product
from B is, therefore, 2½ quarters but the surplus-product is only 1½
quarters; for the capital invested in B is twice that invested in A, and
thus its price of production is double. If an investment of £5 were also
to take place in A, and the rate of productivity were to remain the
same, then the output would be 2 quarters instead of 1 quarter, and it
would then be seen that the actual surplus-product is determined by
comparing 3½ with 2, not 3½ with 1; i.e., it is only 1½ quarters, not 2½
quarters. Furthermore, if a third investment of capital, amounting to
£2½, were made in B, and this were to yield only 1 quarter — this
quarter would then cost £3 as in A — its selling price of £3 would only
cover the price of production, would provide only the average profit,
but no surplus-profit, and would thus yield nothing that could be
transformed into rent. The comparison of the output per acre from any
given soil type with the output per acre from soil A does not show
whether it is the output from an equal or from a larger investment of
capital, nor whether the additional output only covers the price of
production or is due to greater productivity of the additional capital.

_Secondly_, assuming a decreasing rate of productivity for the
additional investments of capital whose limit, so far as the new
formation of surplus-profit is concerned, is that investment of capital
which just covers the price of production, i.e., which produces a
quarter as dearly as the same investment of capital in an acre of soil
A, namely, at £3, according to our assumption — it follows from what has
just been said: that the limit, where the total investment of capital in
an acre of B would no longer yield any rent, is reached when the
individual average production price of output per acre of B would rise
to the price of production per acre of A.

If only investments of capital are made in B that yield the price of
production, i.e., yield no surplus-profit nor new rent, then this indeed
raises the individual average price of production per quarter, but does
not affect the surplus-profit, and eventually the rent, formed by
previous investments of capital. For the average price of production
always remains below that of A, and when the price excess per quarter
decreases, the number of quarters increases proportionately, so that the
total excess in price remains unaltered.

In the case assumed, the first two investments of capital in B amounting
to £5 yield 3½ quarters, thus according to our assumption 1½ quarters of
rent = £4½. Now, if a third investment of £2½ is made, but one which
yields only an additional quarter, then the total price of production
(including 20% profit) of the 4½ quarters = £9; thus the average price
per quarter = £2. The average price of production per quarter upon B has
thus risen from £1 5/7 to £2, and the surplus-profit per quarter,
compared with the regulating price of A, has fallen from £1 2/7 to £1.
But 1 × 4½ = £4½ just as formerly 1 2/7 × 3½ = £4½.

Let us assume that a fourth and fifth additional investment of capital,
amounting to £2½ each, are made in B, which do no more than produce a
quarter at its general price of production. The total product per acre
would then be 6½ quarters and their price of production £15. The average
price of production per quarter for B would have risen again — from £2
[In the German 1894 edition this reads: 1. — _Ed_.] to £2 4/13 — and the
surplus-profit per quarter, compared with the regulating price of
production of A, would have dropped again — from £1 to £ 9/13. But these
£9/13 would now have to be calculated upon the basis of 6½ quarters
instead of 4½ quarters. And 9/13 × 6½ = 1 × 4½ = 4½.

It follows from this, firstly, that no increase in the regulating price
of production is necessary under these circumstances, in order to make
possible additional investments of capital in the rent-bearing soil —
even to the point where the additional capital completely ceases to
produce surplus-profit and continues to yield only the average profit.
It follows furthermore that the total surplus-profit per acre remains
the same here, no matter how much surplus-profit per quarter may
decrease; this decrease is always balanced by a corresponding increase
in the number of quarters produced per acre. In order that the average
price of production might reach the level of the general price of
production (hence £3 for soil B), it is necessary that supplementary
investments be made whose output has a higher price of production than
the regulating one of £3. But we shall see that this alone does not
suffice without further ado to raise the average price of production per
quarter of B to the general price of production of £3.

Let us assume that soil B produced:

1) 3½ quarters whose price of production is, as before, £6, i.e., two
investments of capital amounting to £2½ each both yielding
surplus-profit, but of decreasing amount.

2) 1 quarter at £3, an investment of capital in which the individual
price of production is equal to the regulating price of production.

3) 1 quarter at £4, an investment of capital in which the individual
price of production is higher by 33% than the regulating price.

We should then have 5½ quarters per acre for £13 with an investment of a
capital of £10 7/10; this is four times the original invested capital,
but not quite three times the output of the first investment of capital.

5½ quarters at £13 gives an average price of production of £2 4/11 per
quarter, i.e., an excess of £7/11 per quarter, assuming the regulating
price of production of £3. This excess may be transformed into rent. 5½
quarters sold at the regulating price of production of £3 yield £16½.
After deducting the production price of £13, a surplus-profit, or rent,
of £3½ remains, which, calculated at the present average price of
production per quarter of B, that is, at £24/11 per quarter, represents
1 25/52 quarters. The money-rent would be lower by £1 and the grain-rent
by about ½ quarter, but in spite of the fact that the fourth additional
investment of capital in B not only fails to yield surplus-profit, but
yields less than the average profit, surplus-profit, and rent still
continue to exist. Let us assume that, in addition to investment 3),
investment 2) also produces at a price exceeding the regulating price of
production. Then the total production is: 3½ quarters for £6 + 2
quarters for £8; total 5½ quarters for £14 production price. The average
price of production per quarter would be £2 6/11 and would leave an
excess of £5/11. The 5½ quarters, sold at £3, give a total of £16½;
deducting the £14 production price leaves £2½ for rent. At the present
average price of production upon B, this would be equivalent to 55/56 of
a quarter. In other words, rent is still yielded although less than
before.

This shows, at any rate, that with additional investments of capital in
the better soils whose output costs more than the regulating price of
production the rent does not disappear — at least not within the bounds
of admissible practice — although it must decrease. It will decrease in
proportion, on the one hand, to the aliquot part formed by this less
productive capital in the total investment of capital, and on the other
hand, in proportion to the decrease in its productiveness. The average
price of its produce would still lie below the regulating price and
would thus still permit surplus-profit to be formed that could be
transformed into rent.

Let us now assume that, as a result of four successive investments of
capital (£2½, £2½, £5 and £5) with decreasing productivity, the average
price per quarter of B coincides with the general price of production.

 

 

 

Price of Production

 

 

Surplus for Rent

Capital
£

Profit
£

Out-
put
Qrs

Per Qr
£

Total
£

Selling
Price
£

Pro-
ceeds
£

Qrs

£

1)

2½

½

2

1½

3

3

6

1

3

2)

2½

½

1½

2

3

3

4½

½

1½

3)

5

1

1½

4

6

3

4½

-½

-1½

4)

5

1

1

6

6

3

3

-1

-3

 

15

3

6

 

18

 

18

0

0

The farmer, in this case, sells every quarter at its individual price of
production, and consequently the total number of quarters at their
average price of production per quarter, which coincides with the
regulating price of £3. Hence he still makes a profit of 20% = £3 upon
his capital of £15. But the rent is gone. What has become of the excess
in this equalisation of the individual prices of production per quarter
with the general price of production?

The surplus-profit from the first £2½ was £3, from the second £2½ it was
£1½; total surplus-profit from ⅓ of the invested capital, that is, from
£5 = £4½ = 90%.

In the case of investment 3), the £5 not only fails to yield
surplus-profit, but its output of 1½ quarters, sold at the general price
of production, gives a deficit of £1½. Finally, in the case of
investment 4), which likewise amounts to £5 its output of I quarter,
sold at the general price of production, gives a deficit of £3. Both
investments of capital together thus give a deficit of £4½, which is
equal to the surplus-profit of £4½, realised from investments 4) and 2).

The surplus-profit and deficit balance out. Therefore the rent
disappears. In fact, this is possible only because the elements of
surplus-value, which formed surplus-profit or rent, now enter into the
formation of the average profit. The farmers makes this average profit
of £3 on £15, or 20%, at the expense of the rent.

The equalisation of the individual average price of production of B to
the general price of production of A, which regulates the market-price,
presupposes that the difference of the individual price of the produce
from the first investments of capital below the regulating price is more
and more compensated and finally balanced out by the difference of the
price of the produce from the subsequent investments of capital above
the regulating price. What appears as surplus-profit, so long as the
produce from the first investments of capital is sold by itself, thus
gradually becomes part of its average price of production, and thereby
enters into the formation of the average profit, until it is finally
completely absorbed by it.

If only £5 are invested in B instead of £15 and the additional 2½
quarters of the last table are produced by taking 2½ new acres of A
under cultivation with an investment of £2½ per acre, then the
additional invested capital would amount to only £6¼, i.e., the total
investment in A and B for the production of these 6 quarters would be
only £11¼, instead of £15, and their total price of production,
including profit, £13½. The 6 quarters would still be sold for £18, but
the investment of capital would have decreased by £3¾, and the rent from
B would be £4½ per acre, as before. It would be different if the
production of the additional 2½ quarters required that a soil inferior
to A, for instance, A₋₁ and A₋₂, be taken under cultivation; so that the
price of production per quarter would be: for 1½ quarters on soil A₋₁ =
£4, and for the last quarter on soil A₋₂ = £6. In this case, £6 would be
the regulating price of production per quarter. The 3½ quarters from B
would then be sold for £21 instead of £10½, which would mean a rent of
£15 instead of £4½, or, a rent in grain of 2½ quarters instead of 1½
quarters. Similarly, a quarter on A would now yield a rent of £3 = ½
quarter.

Before discussing this point further, another observation:

The average price of a quarter from B is equalised, i.e., coincides with
the general production price of £3 per quarter, regulated by A, as soon
as that portion of the total capital which produces the excess of 1½
quarters is balanced by that portion of the total capital which produces
the deficit of 1½ quarters. How soon this equalisation is effected, or
how much capital with under-productiveness must be invested in B for
this purpose, will depend, assuming the surplus-productivity of the
first investments of capital to be given, upon the relative
under-productiveness of the later investments compared with an
investment of the same amount in the worst, regulating soil A, or upon
the individual price of production of their produce, compared with the
regulating price.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The following conclusions can now be drawn from the foregoing:

_First_: So long as the additional capitals are invested in the same
land with surplus-productivity, even if the surplus-productivity is
decreasing, the absolute rent per acre in grain and money increases,
although it decreases relatively, in proportion to the advanced capital
(in other words, the rate of surplus-profit or rent). The limit is
established here by that additional capital which yields only the
average profit, or for whose produce the individual price of production
coincides with the general price of production. The price of production
remains the same under these circumstances, unless the production from
the poorer soils becomes superfluous as a result of increased supply.
Even when the price is falling, these additional capitals may within
certain limits still produce surplus-profit, though less of it.

_Secondly_: The investment of additional capital yielding only the
average profit, whose surplus-productivity therefore = 0, does not alter
in any way the amount of the existing surplus-profit, and consequently
of rent. The individual average price per quarter increases thereby upon
the superior soils; the excess per quarter decreases, but the number of
quarters which contain this decreased excess increases, so that the
mathematical product remains the same.

_Thirdly_: Additional investments of capital, the produce of which has
an individual price of production exceeding the regulating price — the
surplus-productivity is therefore not merely = 0, but less than zero, or
a negative quantity, that is, less than the productivity of an equal
investment of capital in the regulating soil A — bring the individual
average price of production of the total output from the superior soil
closer and closer to the general price of production, i.e., reduce more
and more the difference between them which constitutes the
surplus-profit, or rent. An increasingly greater part of what
constituted surplus-profit or rent enters into the formation of the
average profit. But nevertheless, the total capital invested in an acre
of B continues to yield surplus-profit, although the latter decreases as
the amount of capital with under-productiveness increases and to the
extent of this under-productiveness. The rent, with increasing capital
and increasing production, in this case decreases absolutely per acre,
not merely relatively with reference to the increasing magnitude of the
invested capital, as in the second case.

The rent can be eliminated only when the individual average price of
production of the total output from the better soil B coincides with the
regulating price, so that the entire surplus-profit from the first more
productive investments of capital is consumed in the formation of
average profit.

The minimum limit of the drop in rent per acre is that point at which it
disappears. But this point does not occur as soon as the additional
investments of capital are under-productive, but rather as soon as the
additional investment of under-productive capital becomes so large in
magnitude that its effect is to cancel the over-productiveness of the
first investments of capital, so that the productiveness of the total
invested capital becomes the same as that of the capital invested in A,
and the individual average price per quarter of B becomes therefore the
same as that per quarter of A.

In this case too, the regulating price of production, £3 per quarter,
would remain the same, although the rent had disappeared. Only beyond
this point would the price of production have to rise in consequence of
an increase either in the extent of under-productiveness of the
additional capital or in the magnitude of the additional capital of
equal under-productiveness. For instance, if, in the above table 2½
quarters were produced instead of 1½ quarters upon the same soil at £4
per quarter, we would have had a total of 7 quarters for £22 price of
production; a quarter would have cost £3 1/7 it would thus be £1/7 above
the general price of production, and the latter would therefore have to
rise.

For a long time, then, additional capital with under-productiveness, or
even increasing under- productiveness, might be invested until the
individual average price per quarter from the best soils became equal to
the general price of production, until the excess of the latter over the
former — and thereby the surplus-profit and the rent — entirely
disappeared.

And even then, the disappearance of rent from the better soils would
only signify that the individual average price of their produce
coincides with the general price of production, so that an increase in
the latter would not yet be required.

In the above illustration, upon better soil B — which is however the
lowest in the sequence of better or rent-bearing soils — 3½ quarters
were produced by a capital of £5 with surplus-productiveness and 2½
quarters by a capital of £10 with under-productiveness, i.e., a total of
6 quarters; 5½ of this total is thus produced by the latter portions of
capital with under-productiveness. And it is only at this point that the
individual average price of production of the 6 quarters rises to £3 per
quarter and thus coincides with the general price of production.

Under the law of landed property, however, the latter 2½ quarters could
not have been produced in this way at £3 per quarter, except when they
could be produced upon 2½ new acres of soil A. The case in which the
additional capital produces only at the general price of production,
would have constituted the limit. Beyond this point, the additional
investment of capital in the same land would have had to cease.

Indeed, if, the farmer once pays £4½ rent for the first two investments
of capital, he must continue to pay it, and every investment of capital
which produced a quarter for more than £3 [In the German 1894 edition
this reads: for less than £3. — _Ed_.] would result in a deduction from
his profit. The equalisation of the individual average price, in the
case of under-productiveness, is thereby prevented.

Let us take this case in the previous illustration, where the price of
production for soil A, £3 per quarter, regulates the price for B.

 

 

 

 

 

Selling Price

 

 

Capital
£

Profit
£

Price of
Production
£

Output
Qrs

Price of
Production
per Qr £

Per Qr
£

Total
£

Surplus-
Profit
£

Loss
£

2½

½

3

2

1½

3

6

3

—

2½

½

3

1½

2

3

4½

1½

—

5

1

6

1½

4*

3

4½

—

1½

5

1

6

1

6

3

3

—

3

15

3

18

 

 

 

18

4½

4½

[* In the German 1894 edition this reads: 3. — _Ed_.]

The price of production for the 3½ quarters in the first two investments
of capital is likewise £3 per quarter for the farmer, since he has to
pay a rent of £4½; thus the difference between his individual price of
production and the general price of production is not pocketed by him.
For him, then, the excess in produce price for the first two investments
of capital cannot serve to balance out the deficit incurred by the
produce in the third and fourth investments of capital.

The 1½ quarters from investment 3 cost the farmer £6, profit included:
but at the regulating price of £3 per quarter, he can sell them for only
£4½. In other words, he would not only lose his whole profit, but
&#163½, or 10% of his invested capital of £5, over and above it. The
loss of profit and capital in the case of investment 3 would amount to
£4½, and in the case of investment 4 to £3, i.e., a total of £4½, or
just as much as the rent from the better investments of capital; the
individual price of production for the latter, however, cannot take part
in equalising the individual average price of production of the total
product from B, because the excess is paid out as rent to a third party.

If it were necessary, to meet the demand, to produce the additional 1½
quarters by the third investment of capital the regulating market-price
would have to rise to £4 per quarter. In consequence of this rise in the
regulating market-price, the rent from B would rise for the first and
second investments, and rent would he formed upon A.

Thus although differential rent is but a formal transformation of
surplus-profit into rent, and property in land merely enables the owner
in this case to transfer the surplus-profit of the farmer to himself, we
find nevertheless that successive investment of capital in the same
land, or, what amounts to the same thing, the increase in capital
invested in the same land, reaches its limit far more rapidly when the
rate of productiveness of the capital decreases and the regulating price
remains the same; in fact a more or less artificial barrier is reached
as a consequence of the mere formal transformation of surplus-profit
into ground-rent, which is the result of landed property. The rise in
the general price of production, which becomes necessary here within
more narrow limits than otherwise, is in this case not merely the cause
of the increase in differential rent, but the existence of differential
rent as rent is at the same time the reason for the earlier and more
rapid rise in the general price of production — in order to ensure
thereby the increased supply of produce that has become necessary.

The following should furthermore be noted:

By an additional investment of capital in soil B, the regulating price
could not, as above, rise to £4 if soil A were to supply the additional
produce below £4 by a second investment of capital, or if new and worse
soil than A, whose price of production were indeed higher than £3 but
lower than £4, were to enter into competition. We see, then, that
differential rent I and differential rent II, while the first is the
basis of the second, serve simultaneously as limits for one another,
whereby now a successive investment of capital in the same land, now an
investment of capital side by side in new additional land, is made. In
like manner they limit each other in other cases; for instance, when
better soil is taken up.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 44. Differential Rent Also on the Worst Cultivated Soil

 

Let us assume the demand for grain is rising, and the supply can only
result from successive investments of capital under conditions of
under-productiveness in the rent-bearing soils, or by additional
investment of capital, also with decreasing productivity, in soil A, or
by the investment of capital in new lands of inferior quality than A.

Let us take soil B as representative of the rent-bearing soils.

The additional investment of capital demands an increase in the
market-price above the hitherto prevailing price of production of £3 per
quarter, in order to make possible the increased production upon B of
one quarter (which may here stand for one million quarters, just as
every acre may stand for one million acres). Increased output may also
be yielded by soils C and D, etc., the soils bearing the highest rent,
but only with decreasing surplus-productiveness; but it is assumed that
the quarter from B is necessary in order to meet the demand. If this
quarter is more cheaply produced by investing more capital in B than
with the same addition of capital to A, or by descending to soil A - 1,
which may, e.g., require £4 to produce a quarter, whereas the addition
to capital A might do so for £3¾, then the additional capital on B will
regulate the market-price.

A produces a quarter for £3, as heretofore. Similarly B, as before,
produces a total of 3½ quarters at an individual price of production of
£6 for its total output. Now, if an additional £4 of production price
(including profit) becomes necessary on B in order to produce an
additional quarter, whereas it could have been produced on A for £3¾,
then it would naturally be produced on A, rather than on B. Let us
assume, then, that it can be produced on B with the additional price of
production of £3½. In this case, £3½ would become the regulating price
for the entire output. B would now sell its present output of 4½
quarters for £l5¾. Of this £6 is the price of production for the first
3½ quarters and the £3½ for the last quarter, i.e., a total of £9½. This
leaves a surplus-profit for rent = £6¼ as against the former £4½. In
this case, an acre of A would also yield a rent of £1½; but it would not
be the worst soil A, but rather the better soil B that would regulate
the price of production of £3½. Of course, we assume here that new soil
of quality A and equally favourable location as that hitherto cultivated
is not available, but that either a second investment of capital in the
already cultivated plot A at a higher price of production, or the
cultivation of an even poorer soil A-1, is required. As soon as
differential rent II comes into force through successive investments of
capital, the limits of the rising price of production may be regulated
by better soil; and the worst soil, the basis of differential rent I,
may also yield rent. This, even with a single differential rent, all
cultivated land would yield rent. We would then have the following two
tables, where by price of production we mean the sum of the invested
capital plus 20% profit; in other words, on every £2½ of capital £½ of
profit or a total of £3.

  ------- ------- ---------- -------- --------- ------- -------- --------
  Type    Acres   Price of   Output   Selling   Pro-    Grain-   Money-
  of              Produc-    Qrs      Price     ceeds   Rent     Rent
  Soil            tion                £         £       Qrs      £
                  £                                              

  A       1       3          1        3         3       0        0

  B       1       6          3½       3         10½     1½       4½

  C       1       6          5½       3         16½     3½       10½

  D       1       6          7½       3         22½     5½       16½

  Total   4       21         17½                52½     10½      31½
  ------- ------- ---------- -------- --------- ------- -------- --------

This is the state of affairs before the new capital of £3½, which yields
only one quarter, is invested in B. After this investment, the situation
looks as follows:

  ------- ------- ---------- -------- --------- ------- --------- --------
  Type    Acres   Price Of   Output   Selling   Pro-    Grain-    Money-
  of              Produc-    Qrs      Price     ceeds   Rent      Rent
  Soil            tion                £         £       Qrs       £
                  £                                               

  A       1       3          1        3½        3½      1/7       ½

  B       1       9½         4½       3½        15¾     1 11/14   6¼

  C       1       6          5½       3½        19¼     3 11/14   13¼

  D       1       6          7½       3½        26¼     5 11/14   20¼

  Total   4       24½        18½                64¾     11½       40¼
  ------- ------- ---------- -------- --------- ------- --------- --------

[This, again, is not quite correctly calculated. First of all, the cost
of the 4½ qrs for farmer B is, in the first place, £9½: in price of
production and, secondly, £4½ in rent, i.e., a total of £14; average per
quarter = £3½. This average price of his total production thus becomes
the regulating market-price. Thus, the rent on A would amount to £1/9
instead of £½, and that on B would remain £4½ as heretofore; 4½ qrs at
£3½ = £14 and, if we deduct £9½ in price of production, £4½ remain for
surplus-profit. We see, then, that in spite of the required change in
numerical values this illustration shows how, by means of differential
rent II, better soil, already yielding rent, may regulate the price and
thus transform _all_ soil, even hitherto rentless, into rent-bearing
soil. — _F. E._]

The grain-rent must rise as soon as the regulating price of production
of the grain rises, i.e., as soon as the price of production of a
quarter of grain from the regulating soil, or the regulating invested
capital in one of the various soil types, rises. It is the same as
though all soils had become less productive and produced, e.g., only 5/7
quarter instead of 1 quarter with every new investment of £2½. Whatever
else they produce in grain with the same investment of capital is
transformed into surplus-product, which represents the surplus-profit
and therefore the rent. Assuming the rate of profit remains the same,
the farmer can buy less grain with his profit. The rate of profit may
remain the same if wages do not rise — either because they are depressed
to the physical minimum, i.e., below the normal value of labour-power;
or because the other articles of consumption needed by the labourer and
supplied by manufacture have become relatively cheaper; or because the
working day has become longer or more intensive, so that the rate of
profit in non-agricultural lines of production, which, however,
regulates the agricultural profit, has remained the same or has risen;
or, finally, because more constant and less variable capital is employed
in agriculture, even though the amount of capital invested is the same.

We have thus considered the first method by which rent may arise on the
hitherto worst soil A without taking still worse soil under cultivation;
that is, rent may arise from the difference between its individual,
hitherto regulating, price of production and the new, higher price of
production, whereby the last additional capital employed under
conditions of under-productiveness upon the better soil supplies the
necessary additional produce.

If the additional produce had to be supplied by soil A-1, which cannot
produce a quarter for less than £4, then the rent per acre of A would
have risen to £1. But, in this case, soil A-1 would have taken the place
of A as the worst cultivated soil, and the latter would have moved into
the lowest position in the sequence of rent-bearing soils. Differential
rent I would have changed. This case, then, is not included in the
consideration of differential rent II, which arises from the varying
productiveness of successive investments of capital in the same piece of
land.

But aside from this, differential rent may arise on soil A in two other
ways.

With the price unchanged — any given price, even a lower one compared to
former ones — when the additional investment of capital results in
surplus-productiveness, which _prima facie_, and up to a certain point
must always be the case precisely on the worst soil.

Secondly, however, when the productiveness of successive investments of
capital in soil A decreases.

It is assumed in both cases that the increased production is required to
meet demand.

But from the point of view of differential rent, a peculiar difficulty
arises here owing to the previously developed law — according to which
it is always the individual average price of production per quarter for
the total production (or the total outlay of capital) which acts as the
determining factor. In the case of soil A, however, there is not, as in
the cases of the better soils, another price of production which limits
for new investments of capital the equalisation of the individual with
the general price of production. For the individual price of production
of A is precisely the general price of production regulating the
market-price.

Let us assume:

1) _When the productiveness of successive investments of capital is
increasing_, 1 acre of A will produce 3 qrs instead of 2 qrs given an
investment of £5 — corresponding to a price of production of £6. The
first investment of £2½ yielded 1 qr, the second — 2 qrs. In this case,
a price of production of £6 will yield 3 qrs, so that the average cost
of a quarter will be £2; i.e., if the 3 qrs are sold at £2 per quarter,
then A, as heretofore, does not yield any rent, but only the basis of
differential rent II has been altered; the regulating price of
production is now £2 instead of £3; a capital of £2½ now produces an
average of 1½ qrs on the worst soil, instead of 1 qr, and now this is
the official productivity for all better soils given an investment of
£2½. From now on, a portion of their former surplus-product enters into
the formation of their necessary output, just as a portion of their
surplus-profit enters into forming the average profit.

On the other hand, if the calculation is made upon the basis of better
soils, where the average calculation does not alter the absolute surplus
at all, because for them the general price of production is the limit
for the investment of capital, then a quarter from the first investment
of capital costs £3 and the 2 qrs from the second investment cost only
£1½ each. This would thereby give rise to a grain-rent of 1 qr and a
money-rent of £3 on A, but the 3 qrs would be sold for the old price of
£9. If a third investment of £2½ were made under conditions of the same
productiveness as the second investment, then the total would be 5 qrs
for a price of production of £9. If the individual average price of
production of A should remain the regulating price, then a quarter would
now be sold at £1 4/5. The average price would have fallen once more —
not through a new rise in productiveness of the third investment of
capital, but merely through the addition of a new investment of capital
having the same additional productiveness as the second. Instead of
raising the rent as on the rent-bearing soils, the successive
investments of capital in soil A of higher, but constant productiveness
would proportionally lower the price of production and thereby,
everything else being equal, the differential rent on all other soils.
On the other hand, if the first investment of capital which produces 1
qr at a price of production of £3 should in itself remain regulating,
then 5 qrs would be sold for £15, and the differential rent of the later
investments of capital in soil A would amount to £6. The additional
capital per acre of soil A, however it is applied, would be an
improvement in this case, and would make the original portion of capital
more productive. It would be ridiculous to say that ⅓ of the capital had
produced 4 qr and the other ⅔ — 4 qrs. For £9 per acre would always
produce 5 qrs, while £3 would produce only 1 qr. Whether or not a rent
would arise here, whether or not a surplus-profit would be derived,
would depend wholly upon the circumstances. Normally the regulating
price of production would have to fall. This would be the case, if this
improved but more expensive cultivation of soil A should occur only
because it also takes place on the better soils, in other words, if a
general revolution in agriculture should occur; so that when we now
refer to the natural fertility of soil A, it is assumed that it is
worked with £6 or £9 instead of £3. This would particularly apply if the
bulk of cultivated acres of soil A, which furnish the main supply of a
given country, should employ this new method. But if the improvement
should at first extend only to a small area of A, then this better
cultivated portion would yield a surplus-profit, which the landlord
would be quick to transform wholly or in part into rent, and to fix in
the form of rent. In this way — if the demand kept pace with the
increasing supply — as more and more of soil A began to employ the new
method of cultivation, rent might be gradually formed on all soil of
quality A, and the surplus-productivity might be eliminated wholly or in
part, depending on market conditions. The equalisation of the price of
production of A to the average price of its produce obtained under
conditions of increased outlay of capital might thus be prevented by
fixing the surplus-profit of this increased investment of capital in the
form of rent. Thus, as was previously seen to be the case for the better
soils when the productiveness of the additional capital decreased, it
would again be the transformation of surplus-profit into ground-rent,
i.e., the intervention of property in land, which would raise the price
of production, instead of the differential rent merely being the result
of the difference between the individual and the general price of
production. It would prevent, in the case of soil A, the coincidence of
both prices because it would interfere with the regulation of the price
of production by the average price of production on A; it would thus
maintain a higher price of production than necessary and thereby create
rent. Even if grain were freely imported from abroad, the same result
could be brought about or perpetuated by compelling farmers to use soil
capable of competing in grain cultivation without yielding rent, at the
price of production regulated from abroad, for other purposes, e.g.,
pasturage, so that only rent-bearing soils would be used for grain
cultivation, i.e., only soils whose individual average price of
production per quarter were below that determined from abroad. On the
whole, it is to be assumed that in the given case, the price of
production will fall, but not to the level of its average; it will be
higher than the average, but below the price of production of the worst
cultivated soil A, so that the competition from new soil A is limited.

2) _When the productiveness of additional capitals is decreasing_. Let
us assume that soil A-1 requires £4 to produce the additional quarter,
whereas soil A produces it for £3¾, i.e., more cheaply, but still £¾
more dearly than the quarter produced by its first investment of
capital. In this case, the total price of the two quarters produced upon
A would = £6¾; thus the average price per quarter = £3 3/8. The price of
production would rise, but only by £3/8, whereas it would rise by
another 3/8 or to £3¾, if the additional capital were invested in new
land which produced at £3¾, and it would thus bring about a proportional
increase in all other differential rents.

The price of production of £3 3/8 per quarter for A would thus be
equalised to its average price of production with an increased
investment of capital, and would be the regulating price; thus, it would
not yield any rent, since it would not produce any surplus-profit.

However, if this quarter, produced by the second investment of capital,
were sold for £3¾, soil A would now yield a rent of £¾, and indeed, on
all acres of A in which no additional investment of capital had taken
place and which thus would still produce at £3 per quarter. So long as
any uncultivated fields of A remain, the price could rise only
temporarily to £3¾. Competition from new fields of A would hold the
price of production at £3 until all land of type A, whose favourable
location enables it to produce a quarter at less than £3¾, would be
exhausted. This is then what we would assume, although the landlord, so
long as an acre of land yields rent, will not let a tenant farmer have
another acre rent-free.

It would again depend to what extent a second investment of capital in
the available soil A had become general, whether the price of production
is equalised at the average price or whether the individual price of
production of the second investment of capital becomes regulating at
£3¾. The latter occurs only when the landowner has sufficient time until
demand is satisfied to fix as rent the surplus-profit derived at the
price of £3¾ per qr.

Concerning decreasing productiveness of the soil with successive
investments of capital, see Liebig. [Liebig, _Die Chemie in ihrer
Anwendung auf Agricultur und Physiologie_, Braunschweig, 1862. — _Ed._]
We have observed that the successive decrease in surplus-productiveness
of invested capital invariably increases the rent per acre, so long as
the price of production remains constant, and that this may occur even
with a falling price of production.

But, in general, the following is to be noted.

From the standpoint of the capitalist mode of production, a relative
increase in the price of products always takes place when these products
cannot be secured unless an expenditure or payment not previously made
is incurred. For by the replacement of capital consumed in production we
mean only the replacement of values represented by certain means of
production. Natural elements entering as agents into production, and
which cost nothing, no matter what role they play in production, do not
enter as components of capital, but as a free gift of Nature to capital,
that is, as a free gift of Nature's productive power to labour, which,
however, appears as the productiveness of capital, as all other
productivity under the capitalist mode of production. Therefore, if such
a natural power, which originally costs nothing, takes part in
production, it does not enter into the determination of price, so long
as the product which it helped to produce suffices to meet the demand.
But if in the course of development, a larger output is demanded than
that which can be supplied with the help of this natural power, i.e., if
this additional output must be created without the help of this natural
power, or by assisting it with human labour-power, then a new additional
element enters into capital. A relatively larger investment of capital
is thus required in order to secure the same output. All other
circumstances remaining the same, a rise in the price of production
takes place.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

(From a note-book "begun in mid-February 1876." [_F.E._])

_Differential rent and rent as mere interest on capital incorporated in
the soil_.

The so-called permanent improvements — which change the physical, and,
in part, also the chemical conditions of the soil by means of operations
requiring an expenditure of capital, and which may be regarded as an
incorporation of capital in the soil — nearly all amount to giving a
particular piece of land in a certain limited locality such properties
as are naturally possessed by some other piece of land elsewhere,
sometimes quite near by. One piece of land is naturally level, another
has to be levelled; one possesses natural drainage, another requires
artificial drainage; one is endowed by Nature with a deep layer of top
soil, another needs artificial deepening; one clay soil is naturally
mixed with the proper amount of sand, another has to be treated to
obtain this proportion; one meadow is naturally irrigated or covered
with layers of silt, another requires labour to obtain this condition,
or, in the language of bourgeois economics, it requires capital.

It is indeed a truly amusing theory, whereby here, in the case of one
piece of land whose comparative advantages have been acquired, rent is
interest, whereas in the case of another piece of land which possesses
these advantages naturally, it is not interest. (In fact, this is so
distorted in practice that since rent really coincides in the one case
with interest, it is falsely also called interest in the other cases,
where this is positively not the case.) However, land yields rent after
capital is invested not because capital is invested, but because the
invested capital makes this land more productive than it formerly was.
Assuming that all the land of a given country requires this investment
of capital, every piece of land which has not received it must first
pass through this stage, and the rent (interest yielded in the given
case) borne by land already provided with investment of capital
constitutes differential rent just as though it naturally possessed this
advantage and the other land had first to acquire it artificially.

This rent too, which may be resolved into interest, becomes pure
differential rent as soon as the invested capital is amortised.
Otherwise, one and the same capital would have to exist twice as
capital.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

A most amusing phenomenon is that all opponents of Ricardo who oppose
the idea that value determination is based exclusively on labour rather
than regarding differential rent as arising from differences in soil,
point out that here Nature rather than labour determines value; but at
the same time they credit this determination to the location of the
land, or — and to an even greater extent — the interest on capital put
into the land during its cultivation. The same labour produces the same
value in a product created during a given period of time; but the
magnitude or quantum of this product, and consequently also the portion
of value associated with some aliquot part of this product, depends for
a given quantity of labour solely upon the quantum of product, and the
latter, in turn, depends upon the productivity of the given quantum of
labour rather than the absolute magnitude of this quantum. It is
immaterial whether this productivity is due to Nature or to society.
Only in the case when the productivity itself costs labour, and
consequently capital, does it increase the price of production by a new
element — which Nature by itself does not do.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 45. Absolute Ground-Rent

 

In the analysis of differential rent we proceeded from the assumption
that the worst soil does not pay any ground-rent; or, to put it more
generally, only such land pays ground-rent whose product has an
individual price of production below the price of production regulating
the market, so that in this manner a surplus-profit arises which is
transformed into rent. It is to be noted, to begin with, that the law of
differential rent as such is entirely independent of the correctness or
incorrectness of this assumption.

Let us call the general price of production, by which the market is
regulated, P. Then, P coincides with the individual price of production
of the output of the worst soil A; i.e., its price pays for the constant
and variable capital consumed in production plus the average profit ( =
profit of enterprise plus interest).

The rent in this case is equal to zero. The individual price of
production of the next better soil B is = P´, and P > P´; that is, P
pays for more than the actual price of production of the product of soil
B. Let us now assume that P - P´ = d; d, the excess of P over P´, is
therefore the surplus-profit which the farmer of soil type B realises.
This d is transformed into rent, which must be paid to the landlord. Let
P´´ be the actual price of production of the third type of soil C, and P
- P´´ = 2d; then this 2d is converted into rent; similarly, let P´´´ be
the individual price of production of the fourth type of soil D, and P -
P´´´ = 3d, which is transformed into ground-rent, etc. Now let us assume
the premise for soil A, that rent = 0 and therefore the price of its
product = P + 0, is erroneous. Assume rather that it, too, yields rent =
r. In that case, two different conclusions follow.

_First_: The price of the product of soil A would not be regulated by
the price of production on the latter, but would include an excess above
this price, i.e., would be = P + r. Because assuming the capitalist mode
of production to be functioning normally, that is, assuming that the
excess r which the farmer pays to the landlord represents neither a
deduction from wages nor from the average profit of capital, the farmer
can only pay it by selling the product above its price of production,
thus, yielding him surplus-profit if he did not have to turn over this
excess to the landlord in the form of rent. The regulating market-price
of the total output on the market derived from all soils would then not
be the price of production which capital generally yields in all spheres
of production, i.e., a price equal to costs plus average profit, but
rather the price of production plus the rent, P + r, and not P. For the
price of the product of soil A represents generally the limit of the
regulating general market-price, i.e., the price at which the total
product can be supplied, and to that extent it regulates the price of
this total product.

But _secondly_: Although the general price of agricultural products
would in this case be significantly modified, the law of differential
rent would nevertheless in no way lose its force. For if the price of
the product of soil A, and thereby the general market-price = P + r, the
price for soils B, C, D, etc., would likewise = P + r. But since P - P´
= d for soil B, then (P + r) - (P´ + r) would likewise = d, and P - P´´
= (P + r) - (P´´ + r) = 2d for soil C; and finally P - P´´´ = (P + r) -
(P´´´ + r) = 3d for soil D, etc. Thus the differential rent would be the
same as before and would be regulated by the same law, although the rent
would include an element independent of this law and would show a
general increase together with the price of the agricultural product. It
follows, then, that no matter what the case may be as regards the rent
of the least fertile soils, the law of differential rent is not only
independent of it, but that the only manner of grasping differential
rent in keeping with its character is to let the rent on soil A = 0.
Whether this actually = 0 or > 0 is immaterial so far as the
differential rent is concerned, and, in fact, does not come into
consideration.

The law of differential rent, then, is independent of the results of the
following study.

If we were now to inquire more deeply into the basis of the assumption
that the product of the worst soil A does not yield any rent, the answer
would of necessity be as follows: If the market-price of the
agricultural product, say grain, attains that level where an additional
investment of capital in soil A results in the usual price of
production, i.e., the usual average profit on the capital is yielded,
then this condition suffices for investing the additional capital in
soil A. In other words, this condition is sufficient for the capitalist
to invest new capital yielding the usual profit and to employ it in the
normal manner.

It should be noted here that in this case, too, the market-price must be
higher than the price of production of A. For as soon as the additional
supply is created, it is evident that the relation between supply and
demand becomes altered. Formerly the supply was insufficient. Now it is
sufficient. Hence the price must fall. In order to fall, it must have
been higher than the price of production of A. But due to the fact that
soil A newly taken under cultivation is less fertile, the price does not
fall again as low as when the price of production of soil B regulated
the market. The price of production of A constitutes the limit, not for
the temporary but for the relatively permanent rise of the market-price.
On the other hand, if the new soil taken under cultivation is more
fertile than the hitherto regulating soil A, and yet only suffices to
meet the increased demand, then the market-price remains unchanged. The
investigation of the question whether the poorest type of soil yields
rent, however, coincides in this case too with our present inquiry, for
here too the assumption that soil A does not yield any rent would be
explained by the fact that the market-price is sufficient for the
capitalist farmer to exactly cover, with this price, the invested
capital plus the average profit; in brief, it would be explained by the
fact that the market-price yields him the price of production of his
commodities.

At any rate, the capitalist farmer can cultivate soil A under these
conditions, inasmuch as he, as capitalist, has such power of decision.
The prerequisite for the normal expansion of capital in soil A is now
present. But from the premise that the capitalist farmer can now invest
capital in soil A under average conditions for the expansion of capital,
even if he did not have to pay any rent, it nowise follows that this
land, belonging to category A, is now at the disposal of the farmer
without further ado. The fact that the tenant farmer could realise the
usual profit on his capital did he not have to pay any rent, is by no
means a basis for the landlord to lend his land gratis to the farmer and
to become so philanthropic as to grant _crédit gratuit_ for the sake of
a business friendship. Such an assumption would mean the abstraction of
landed property, the elimination of land-ownership, and it is precisely
the existence of the latter that constitutes a limitation to the
investment of capital and the free expansion of capital in the land.
This limitation does not at all disappear before the simple reflection
of the farmer that the level of grain prices would enable him to realise
the usual profit from the investment of his capital in the exploitation
of soil A did he not have to pay any rent; in other words, if he could
proceed in effect as though landed property did not exist. But
differential rent presupposes the existence of a monopoly in land
ownership, landed property as a limitation to capital, for without it
surplus-profit would not be transformed into ground-rent nor fall to the
share of the landlord instead of the farmer. And landed property as a
limitation continues to exist even when rent in the form of differential
rent disappears, i.e., on soil A. If we consider the cases in a country
with capitalist production, where the investment of capital in the land
can take place without payment of rent, we shall find that they are all
based on a _de facto_ abolition of landed property, if not also the
legal abolition; this, however, can only take place under very specific
circumstances which are by their very nature accidental.

_First_: When the landlord is himself a capitalist, or the capitalist is
himself a landlord. In this case he may _himself_ manage his land as
soon as market-price has risen sufficiently to enable him to get, from
what is now soil A, the price of production, that is, replacement of
capital plus average profit. But why? Because for him landed property
does not constitute an obstacle to the investment of capital. He can
treat his land simply as an element of Nature and therefore be guided
solely by considerations of expansion of his capital, by capitalist
considerations. Such cases occur in practice, but only as exceptions.
Just as capitalist cultivation of the soil presupposes the separation of
functioning capital from landed property, so does it as a rule exclude
self-management of landed property. It is immediately evident that this
case is a purely accidental one. If the increased demand for grain
requires the cultivation of a larger area of soil type A than is in the
hands of self-managing proprietors, in other words, if a part of it must
be rented to be at all cultivated, then this hypothetical lifting of the
limitation created by landed property to the investment of capital at
once collapses. It is an absurd contradiction to start out with the
differentiation under the capitalist mode of production between capital
and land, farmers and landlords, and then to turn round and assume that
landlords, as a rule, manage their own land wherever and whenever
capital would not draw rent from the cultivation of the soil if landed
property were not separate and distinct from it. (See the passage by
Adam Smith concerning mining rent, quoted below.) This abolition of
landed property is fortuitous. It may or may not occur.

_Secondly_: In the total area of a leasehold there may be certain
portions which do not yield any rent at the existing level of
market-prices, so that they are in fact loaned gratis; but the landlord
does not look upon it in that light, because he sees the total rental of
the leased land, not the specific rent of the individual component
plots. In this case, as regards the rentless component plots of the
leasehold, landed property as a limitation to the investment of capital
is eliminated for the capitalist farmer; and this, indeed, by contract
with the landlord himself. But he does not pay rent for these plots
merely because he pays rent for the land associated with them. A
combination is here presupposed whereby poorer soil A does not have to
be resorted to as a distinctly new field of production in order to
produce the deficit supply, but rather whereby it merely constitutes an
inseparable part of the better land. But the case to be investigated is
precisely that in which certain pieces of land of soil type A must be
independently managed, i.e., for the conditions generally prevailing
under the capitalist mode of production, they must be independently
leased.

_Thirdly_: A farmer may invest additional capital in the same leasehold
even if the additional product secured in this manner yields him only
the price of production at the prevailing market-prices, i.e., provides
him with the usual profit but does not enable him to pay any additional
rent. He thus pays ground-rent with one portion of the capital invested
in the land, but not with the other. How little this assumption helps to
solve the problem, however, is seen from the following: If the
market-price (and the fertility of the soil) enables him to obtain an
additional yield with his additional capital, which, as in the case of
the old capital, yields a surplus-profit in addition to the price of
production, he is able to pocket this surplus-profit so long as his
lease does not expire. But why? Because the limitation placed by landed
property on the investment of his capital in land has been eliminated
for the duration of the lease. But the simple fact that additional soil
of poorer quality must be independently cleared and independently leased
in order for him to secure this surplus-profit proves irrefutably that
the investment of additional capital in the old soil no longer suffices
to produce the required increased supply. One assumption excludes the
other. It is true that now one might say: The rent on the worst soil A
is itself differential rent — whether the comparison is made with
respect to the land cultivated by the owner himself (this occurs,
however, as a purely chance exception) or with respect to the additional
investment of capital in the old leaseholds which do not yield any rent.
However, this would be 1) a differential rent which does not arise from
the difference in fertility of the various categories of soil, and which
therefore would _not_ presuppose that soil A does not yield any rent and
its produce sells at the price of production; and 2) the circumstance
whether additional investments of capital in the same leasehold yield
rent or not is just as irrelevant to the question as to whether the new
soil of class A to be taken under cultivation pays rent or not, as it is
irrelevant to, say, the establishment of a new and independent
manufacturing business whether another manufacturer in the same line
invests a portion of his capital in interest-bearing paper because he
cannot use all of it in his business, or whether he makes certain
improvements which do not yield him the full profit, but nevertheless do
yield more than interest. This is of secondary importance to him. The
additional new establishments, on the other hand, must yield the average
profit and are organised in the hope of obtaining this average profit.
It is true, to be sure, that the additional investments of capital in
the old leaseholds and the additional cultivation of new land of soil
type A mutually restrict one another. The limit, up to which additional
capital may be invested in the same leasehold under less favourable
conditions of production, is determined by the competing new investments
in soil A; on the other hand, the rent which this category of soil can
yield is limited by the competing additional investments of capital in
the old leaseholds.

But all this dubious subterfuge does not solve the problem, which,
simply stated, is this: Assume the market-price of grain (which in this
inquiry stands for products of the soil in general) to be sufficient to
permit taking portions of soil A under cultivation and that the capital
invested in these new fields could return the price of production, i.e.,
replace capital plus average profit. Thus assume that conditions exist
for the normal expansion of capital on soil A. Is this sufficient? Can
this capital then really be invested? Or must the market-price rise to
the point where even the worst soil A yields rent? In other words, does
the landowner’s monopoly hinder the investment of capital which would
not be the case from the purely capitalist standpoint in the absence of
this monopoly? It follows from the way in which the question itself is
posed that if, e.g., additional capitals are invested in the old
leaseholds, yielding the average profit at the given market-price, but
no rent, this circumstance in no way answers the question whether
capital may now really be invested in soil A, which also yields the
average profits but no rent. But this is precisely the question before
us. The fact that additional investments of capital not yielding any
rent do not satisfy the demand is proved by the necessity of taking new
land of soil type A under cultivation. Just two alternatives are
possible if the additional cultivation of soil A takes place only in so
far as it yields rent, that is, yields more than the price of
production. Either the market-price must be such that even the last
additional investments of capital in the old leaseholds yield
surplus-profit, whether pocketed by the farmer or by the landlord. This
rise in price and this surplus-profit from the last additional
investments of capital would then result from the fact that soil A
cannot be cultivated without yielding rent. For if the price of
production were sufficient for cultivation to take place, merely
yielding average profit, the price would not have risen so high, and
competition from new plots would have been felt as soon as they just
yielded this price of production. Competing with the additional
investments in old leaseholds not yielding any rent would then be
investments in soil A, which likewise do not yield any rent. — Or, the
last investments in the old leaseholds do not yield any rent, but
nevertheless the market-price has risen sufficiently to make it possible
for soil A to be taken under cultivation and to yield rent. In this
case, the additional investment of capital not yielding any rent was
only possible because soil A cannot be cultivated until the market-price
permits it to pay rent. Without this condition, its cultivation would
have already begun at a lower price level; and those later investments
of capital in the old leaseholds, which require the high market-price in
order to yield the usual profit without rent, could not have taken
place. At the high market-price, it is true, they yield only the average
profit. At a lower market-price, which would have become the regulating
price of production from the time soil A came under cultivation, they
would thus not have yielded this average profit, i.e., the investments
would thus not have taken place at all under such conditions. In this
way, the rent from soil A would indeed constitute differential rent
compared with the investments in the old leaseholds not yielding any
rent. But that such differential rent is formed on the land areas of A
is but a consequence of the fact that the latter are not at all
available to cultivation, unless they yield rent; i.e., that the
necessity for this rent exists, which, in itself, is not determined by
any differences in soil types, and which constitutes the barrier to
possible investment of additional capitals in the old leaseholds. In
either case, the rent from soil A would not be simply a consequence of
the rise in grain prices, but, conversely, the fact that the worst soil
must yield rent in order to make its cultivation at all possible, would
be the cause for the rise in the grain price to the point where this
condition may be fulfilled.

Differential rent has the peculiarity that landed property here merely
intercepts the surplus-profit which would otherwise flow into the pocket
of the farmer, and which the latter may actually pocket under certain
circumstances during the period of his lease. Landed property is here
merely the cause for transferring a portion of the commodity-price which
arises without the property having anything to do with it (indeed, in
consequence of the fact that the price of production which regulates the
market-price is determined by competition) and which resolves itself
into surplus-profit — the cause for transferring this portion of the
price from one person to another, from the capitalist to the landlord.
But landed property is not the cause which _creates_ this portion of the
price, or the rise in price upon which this portion of the price is
premised. On the other hand, if the worst soil A cannot be cultivated —
although its cultivation would yield the price of production — until it
produces something in excess of the price of production, rent, then
landed property is the creative cause of _this_ rise in price. _Landed
property itself has created rent_. This fact is not altered, if, as in
the second case mentioned, the rent now paid on soil A constitutes
differential rent compared with the last additional investment of
capital in old leaseholds, which pay only the price of production. For
the circumstance that soil A cannot be cultivated until the regulating
market-price has risen high enough to permit rent to be yielded from
soil A — only this circumstance is the basis here for the fact that the
market-price rises to a point which enables the last investments in the
old leaseholds to yield, indeed, only their price of production, but a
price of production which, at the same time, yields rent on soil A. The
fact that the latter has to pay rent at all is, in this case, the cause
for the differential rent between soil A and the last investments in the
old leaseholds.

When stating, in general, that soil A does not pay any rent — assuming
the price of grain is regulated by the price of production — we mean
rent in the categorical sense of the word. If the farmer pays "lease
money" which constitutes a deduction from the normal wages of his
labourers, or from his own normal average profit, he does not pay rent,
i.e., an independent component of the price of his commodities distinct
from wages and profit. We have already indicated that this continually
takes place in practice. In so far as the wages of the agricultural
labourers in a given country are, in general, depressed below the normal
average level of wages, so that a deduction from wages, a part of the
wages, as a general rule enters into rent, this does not constitute an
exceptional case for the farmer cultivating the worst soil. In the same
price of production which makes cultivation of the worst soil possible
these low wages already form a constituent element, and the sale of the
product at the price of production does not therefore enable the farmer
cultivating this soil to pay any rent. The landlord can also lease his
land to some labourer, who may be satisfied to pay to the former in the
form of rent, all or the largest part of that which he realises in the
selling price over and above the wages. In all these cases, however, no
real rent is paid in spite of the fact that lease money is paid. But
wherever conditions correspond to those under the capitalist mode of
production, rent and lease money must coincide. Yet it is precisely this
normal condition which must be analysed here.

Since even the cases considered above — where, under the capitalist mode
of production, investments of capital in the land may actually take
place without yielding rent — do not contribute to the solution of our
problem, so much less does reference to colonial conditions. The
criterion establishing a colony as a colony — we are referring here only
to true agricultural colonies — is not merely the prevailing vast area
of fertile land in a natural state. It is rather the circumstance that
this land has not been appropriated, has not been subjected to private
ownership. Herein lies the enormous difference, as regards the land,
between old countries and colonies: the legal or actual non-existence of
landed property, as Wakefield ^([35]) correctly remarks, and as Mirabeau
_père_, the physiocrat, and other elder economists, had discovered long
before him. It is quite immaterial here whether the colonists simply
appropriate the land, or whether they actually pay to the state, in the
form of a nominal land price, a fee for a valid legal title to the land.
It is also immaterial that the colonists already settled there may be
the legal owners of the land. In fact, landed property constitutes no
limitation here to the investment of capital — and also of labour
without capital; the appropriation of some of the land by the colonists
already established there does not prevent the newcomers from employing
their capital or their labour upon new land. Therefore, when it is
necessary to investigate the influence of landed property upon the
prices of products of the land and upon rent — in those cases where
landed property restricts land as an investment sphere of capital — it
is highly absurd to speak of free bourgeois colonies where, in
agriculture, neither the capitalist mode of production exists, nor the
form of landed property corresponding to it — which, in fact, does not
exist at all. Ricardo, e.g., does so in his chapter on ground-rent. In
the preface he states that he intends to investigate the effect of the
appropriation of land upon the value of the products of the soil, and
directly thereafter he takes the colonies as an illustration, whereby he
assumes that the land exists in a relatively elementary form and that
its exploitation is not limited by the monopoly of landed property.

The mere legal ownership of land does not create any ground-rent for the
owner. But it does, indeed, give him the power to withdraw his land from
exploitation until economic conditions permit him to utilise it in such
a manner as to yield him a surplus, be it used for actual agricultural
or other production purposes, such as buildings, etc. He cannot increase
or decrease the absolute magnitude of this sphere, but he can change the
quantity of land placed on the market. Hence, as Fourier already
observed, it is a characteristic fact that in all civilised countries a
comparatively appreciable portion of land always remains uncultivated.

Thus, assuming the demand requires that new land be taken under
cultivation, whose soil, let us say, is less fertile than that hitherto
cultivated — will the landlord lease it for nothing, just because the
market-price of the product of the land has risen sufficiently to return
to the farmer the price of production, and thereby the usual profit, on
his investment in this land? By no means. The investment of capital must
yield him rent. He does not lease his land until he can be paid lease
money for it. Therefore, the market-price must rise to a point above the
price of production, i.e., to P + r, so that rent can be paid to the
landlord. Since according to our assumption, landed property does not
yield anything until it is leased, is economically valueless until then,
a small rise in the market-price above the price of production suffices
to bring the new land of poorest quality on the market.

The following question now arises: Does it follow from the fact that the
worst soil yields ground-rent which cannot be derived from any
difference in fertility that the price of the product of the land is
necessarily a monopoly price in the usual sense, or a price into which
the rent enters like a tax, with the sole distinction that the landlord
levies the tax instead of the state? It goes without saying that this
tax has its specific economic limits. It is limited by additional
investments of capital in the old leaseholds, by competition from
products of the land coming from abroad — assuming their import is
unrestricted — by competition among the landlords themselves, and
finally by the needs of the consumers and their ability to pay. But this
is not the question here. The point is whether the rent paid on the
worst soil enters into the price of the products of this soil — which
price regulates the general market-price according to our assumption —
in the same way as a tax placed on a commodity enters into its price,
i.e., as an element that is independent of the value of the commodity.

This, by no means, necessarily follows, and the contention that it does
has been made only because the distinction between the value of
commodities and their price of production has heretofore not been
understood. We have seen that the price of production of a commodity is
not at all identical with its value, although the prices of production
of commodities, considered in their totality, are regulated only by
their total value, and although the movement of production prices of
various kinds of commodities, all other circumstances being equal, is
determined exclusively by the movement of their values. It has been
shown that the price of production of a commodity may lie above or below
its value, and coincides with its value only by way of exception. Hence,
the fact that products of the land are sold above their price of
production does not at all prove that they are sold above their value;
just as the fact that products of industry, on the average, are sold at
their price of production does not prove that they are sold at their
value. It is possible for agricultural products to be sold above their
price of production and below their value, while, on the other hand,
many industrial products yield the price of production only because they
are sold above their value.

The relation of the price of production of a commodity to its value is
determined solely by the ratio of the variable part of the capital with
which the commodity is produced to its constant part, or by the organic
composition of the capital producing it. If the composition of the
capital in a given sphere of production is lower than that of the
average social capital, i.e., if its variable portion, which is used for
wages, is larger in its relation to the constant portion, used for the
material conditions of labour, than is the case in the average social
capital, then the value of its product must lie above the price of
production. In other words, because such capital employs more living
labour, it produces more surplus-value, and therefore more profit,
assuming equal exploitation of labour, than an equally large aliquot
portion of the social average capital. The value of its product,
therefore, is above the price of production, since this price of
production is equal to capital replacement plus average profit, and the
average profit is lower than the profit produced in this commodity. The
surplus-value produced by the average social capital is less than the
surplus-value produced by a capital of this lower composition. The
opposite is the case when the capital invested in a certain sphere of
production is of a bigger composition than the social average capital.
The value of commodities produced by it lies below their price of
production, which is generally the case with products of the most
developed industries.

If the capital in a certain sphere of production is of a lower
composition than the average social capital, then this is, in the first
place, merely another way of saying that the productivity of the social
labour in this particular sphere of production is below the average; for
the level of productivity attained is manifested in the relative
preponderance of constant over variable capital, or in the continual
decrease — for the given capital — of the portion used for wages. On the
other hand, if the capital in a certain sphere of production is of a
higher composition, then this reflects a development of productiveness
that is above the average.

Leaving aside actual works of art, whose consideration by their very
nature is excluded from our discussion, it is self-evident, moreover,
that different spheres of production require different proportions of
constant and variable capital in accordance with their specific
technical features, and that living labour must play a bigger role in
some, and smaller in others. For instance, in the extractive industries,
which must be clearly distinguished from agriculture, raw material as an
element of constant capital is wholly absent, and even auxiliary
material rarely plays an important role. In the mining industry,
however, the other part of constant capital, i.e., fixed capital, plays
an important role. Nevertheless, here too, progress may be measured by
the relative increase of constant capital in relation to variable
capital.

If the composition of capital in agriculture proper is lower than that
of the average social capital, then, _prima facie_, this expresses the
fact that in countries with developed production agriculture has not
progressed to the same extent as the processing industries. Such a fact
could be explained — aside from all other circumstances, including in
part decisive economic ones — by the earlier and more rapid development
of the mechanical sciences, and in particular their application compared
with the later and in part quite recent development of chemistry,
geology and physiology, and again, in particular, their application to
agriculture. Incidentally, it is an indubitable and long-known fact
^([36]) that the progress of agriculture itself is constantly expressed
by a relative growth of constant capital as compared with variable
capital. Whether the composition of agricultural capital is lower than
that of the average social capital in a specific country where
capitalist production prevails, for instance England, is a question
which can only be decided statistically, and for our purposes it is
superfluous to go into it in detail. In any case, it is theoretically
established that the value of agricultural products can be higher than
their price of production only on this assumption. In other words, a
capital of a certain size in agriculture produces more surplus-value, or
what amounts to the same, sets in motion and commands more
surplus-labour (and with it employs more living labour generally) than a
capital of the same size of average social composition.

This assumption, then, suffices for that form of rent which we are
analysing here, and which can obtain only so long as this assumption
holds good. Wherever this assumption no longer holds, the corresponding
form of rent likewise no longer holds.

However, the mere existence of an excess in the value of agricultural
products over their price of production would not in itself suffice to
explain the existence of a ground-rent which is independent of
differences in fertility of various soil types and in successive
investments of capital on the same land — a rent, in short, which is to
be clearly distinguished in concept from differential rent and which we
may therefore call _absolute rent_. Quite a number of manufactured
products are characterised by the fact that their value is higher than
their price of production, without thereby yielding any excess above the
average profit, or a surplus-profit, which could be converted into rent.
Conversely, the existence and concept of price of production and general
rate of profit, which it implies, rest upon the fact that individual
commodities are not sold at their value. Prices of production arise from
an equalisation of the values of commodities. After replacing the
respective capital-values used up in the various spheres of production,
this distributes the entire surplus-value, not in proportion to the
amount produced in the individual spheres of production and thus
incorporated in their commodities, but in proportion to the magnitude of
advanced capitals. Only in this manner do average profit and price of
production arise, whose characteristic element the former is. It is the
perpetual tendency of capitals to bring about through competition this
equalisation in the distribution of surplus-value produced by the total
capital, and to overcome all obstacles to this equalisation. Hence it is
their tendency to tolerate only such surplus-profits as arise, under all
circumstances, not from the difference between the values and prices of
production of commodities but rather from the difference between the
general price of production governing the market and the individual
prices of production differing from it; surplus-profits which obtain
within a certain sphere of production, therefore, and not between two
different spheres, and thus do not affect the general prices of
production of the various spheres, i.e., the general rate of profit, but
rather presuppose the transformation of values into prices of production
and a general rate of profit. This supposition rests, however, as
previously discussed, upon the constantly changing proportional
distribution of the total social capital among the various spheres of
production, upon the perpetual inflow and outflow of capitals, upon
their transferability from one sphere to another, in short, upon their
free movement between the various spheres of production, which represent
so many available fields of investment for the independent components of
the total social capital. The premise in this case is that no barrier,
or just an accidental and temporary barrier, interferes with the
competition of capitals — for instance, in a sphere of production, in
which the commodity-values are higher than the prices of production, or
where the surplus-value produced exceeds the average profit — to reduce
the value to the price of production and thereby proportionally
distribute the excess surplus-value of this sphere of production among
all spheres exploited by capital. But if the reverse occurs, if capital
meets an alien force which it can but partially, or not at all,
overcome, and which limits its investment in certain spheres, admitting
it only under conditions which wholly or partly exclude that general
equalisation of surplus-value to an average profit, then it is evident
that the excess of the value of commodities in such spheres of
production over their price of production would give rise to a
surplus-profit, which could be converted into rent and such made
independent with respect to profit. Such an alien force and barrier are
presented by landed property, when confronting capital in its endeavour
to invest in land; such a force is the landlord vis-à-vis the
capitalist.

Landed property is here the barrier which does not permit any new
investment of capital in hitherto uncultivated or unrented land without
levying a tax, or in other words, without demanding a rent, although the
land to be newly brought under cultivation may belong to a category
which does not yield any differential rent and which, were it not for
landed property, could have been cultivated even at a small increase in
market-price, so that the regulating market-price would have netted to
the cultivator of this worst soil solely his price of production. But
owing to the barrier raised by landed property, the market-price must
rise to a level at which the land can yield a surplus over the price of
production, i.e., yield a rent. However, since the value of the
commodities produced by agricultural capital is higher than their price
of production, according to our assumption, this rent (save for one case
which we shall discuss forthwith) forms the excess of value over the
price of production, or a part of it. Whether the rent equals the entire
difference between the value and price of production, or only a greater
or lesser part of it, will depend wholly on the relation between supply
and demand and on the area of land newly taken under cultivation. So
long as the rent does not equal the excess of the value of agricultural
products over their price of production, a portion of this excess will
always enter into the general equalisation and proportional distribution
of all surplus-value among the various individual capitals. As soon as
the rent does equal the excess of the value over the price of
production, this entire portion of surplus-value over and above the
average profit will be withdrawn from this equalisation. But whether
this absolute rent equals the whole excess of value over the price of
production, or just a part of it, the agricultural products will always
be sold at a monopoly price, not because their price exceeds their
value, but because it equals their value, or because their price is
lower than their value but higher than their price of production. Their
monopoly would consist in the fact that, unlike other products of
industry whose value is higher than the general price of production,
they are not levelled out to the price of production. Since one portion
of the value, as well as of price of production, is an actually given
constant, namely the cost-price, representing the capital = k used up in
production, their difference consists in the other, the variable
portion, the surplus-value, which equals p, the profit, in the price of
production, i.e., equals the total surplus-value calculated on the
social capital and on every individual capital as an aliquot part of the
social capital; but which in the value of commodities equals the actual
surplus-value created by this particular capital, and forms an integral
part of the commodity-values produced by this capital. If the value of
commodities is higher than their price of production, then the price of
production = k + p, and the value = k + p + d, so that p + d = the
surplus-value contained therein. The difference between the value and
the price of production, therefore, = d, the excess of surplus-value
created by this capital over the surplus-value allocated to it through
the general rate of profit. It follows from this that the price of
agricultural products may lie higher than their price of production,
without reaching their value. It follows, furthermore, that a permanent
increase in the price of agricultural products may take place up to a
certain point, before their price reaches their value. It follows
likewise that the excess in the value of agricultural products over
their price of production can become a determining element of their
general market-price solely as a consequence of the monopoly in landed
property. It follows, finally, that in this case the increase in the
price of the product is not the cause of rent, but rather that rent is
the cause of the increase in the price of the product. If the price of
the product from a unit area of the worst soil = P + r, then all
differential rents will rise by corresponding multiples of r, since the
assumption is that P + r becomes the regulating market-price.

If the average composition of the non-agricultural social capital were =
85_(c) + 15_(v), and the rate of surplus-value = 100%, then the price of
production would = 115. If the composition of the agricultural capital
were = 75_(c) + 25_(v) and the rate of surplus-value were the same, then
the value of the agricultural product and the regulating market-price
would = 125. If the agricultural and the non-agricultural product should
be equalised to the same average price (we assume for the sake of
brevity the total capital in both lines of production to be equal), then
the total surplus-value would = 40, or 20%, on the 200 of capital. The
product of the one as well as the other would be sold at 120. In an
equalisation into prices of production, the average market-prices of the
non-agricultural product would thus lie above, and those of the
agricultural product below, their value. If the agricultural products
were sold at their full value, they would be higher by 5, and the
industrial products lower by 5, than they are in the equalisation. If
market conditions do not permit the sale of the agricultural products at
their full value, to the full surplus above the price of production,
then the effect lies between the two extremes; the industrial products
are sold somewhat above their value, and the agricultural products
somewhat above their price of production.

Although landed property may drive the price of agricultural produce
above its price of production, it does not depend on this, but rather on
the general state of the market, to what degree market-price exceeds the
price of production and approaches the value, and to what extent
therefore the surplus-value created in agriculture over and above the
given average profit shall either be transformed into rent or enter into
the general equalisation of the surplus-value to average profit. At any
rate this absolute rent arising out of the excess of value over the
price of production is but a portion of the agricultural surplus-value,
a conversion of this surplus-value into rent, its being filched by the
landlord; just as the differential rent arises out of the conversion of
surplus-profit into rent, its being filched by the landlord under a
generally regulating price of production. These two forms of rent are
the only normal ones. Apart from them the rent can be based only upon an
actual monopoly price, which is determined neither by price of
production nor by value of commodities, but by the buyers’ needs and
ability to pay. Its analysis belongs under the theory of competition,
where the actual movement of market-prices is considered.

If all the land suitable for agriculture in a certain country were
leased — assuming the capitalist mode of production and normal
conditions to be general — there would not be any land not paying rent;
but there might be some capitals, certain parts of capitals invested in
land, that might not yield any rent. For as soon as the land has been
rented, landed property ceases to act as an absolute barrier against the
investment of necessary capital. Still, it continues to act as a
relative barrier even after that, in so far as the reversion to the
landlord of the capital incorporated in the land circumscribes the
activity of the tenant within very definite limits. Only in this case
all rent would be transformed into differential rent, although this
would not be a differential rent determined by any difference in soil
fertility, but rather by the difference between the surplus-profits
arising from the last investments of capital in a particular soil type
and the rent paid for the lease of the worst quality land. Landed
property acts as an absolute barrier only to the extent that the
landlord exacts a tribute for making land at all accessible to the
investment of capital. When such access has been gained, he can no
longer set any absolute limits to the size of any investment of capital
in a given plot of land. In general, housing construction meets a
barrier in the ownership by a third party of the land upon which the
houses are to be built. But, once this land has been leased for the
purpose of housing construction, it depends upon the tenant whether he
will build a large or a small house.

If the average composition of agricultural capital were equal to, or
higher than, that of the average social capital, then absolute rent —
again in the sense just described — would disappear; i.e., rent which
differs equally from differential rent as well as that based upon an
actual monopoly price. The value of agricultural produce, then, would
not lie above its price of production, and the agricultural capital
would not set any more labour in motion, and therefore would also not
realise any more surplus-labour than the non-agricultural capital. The
same would take place, were the composition of agricultural capital to
become equal to that of the average social capital with the progress of
civilisation.

It seems to be a contradiction, at first glance, to assume that, on the
one hand, the composition of agricultural capital rises, in other words,
that its constant component increases with respect to its variable, and,
on the other hand, that the price of the agricultural product should
rise high enough to permit rent to be yielded by new and worse soil than
that previously cultivated, a rent which in this case could originate
only from an excess of market-price over the value and price of
production, in short, a rent derived solely from a monopoly price of the
product.

It is necessary to make a distinction here.

In the first place, it was noted in considering the manner in which rate
of profit is formed, that capitals, which have the same composition
technologically speaking, i.e., which set equivalent amounts of labour
in motion relative to machinery and raw materials, may nonetheless have
different compositions owing to different values of the constant
portions of these capitals. The raw materials or machinery may be dearer
in one case than in another. For the same quantity of labour to be set
in motion (and this would be required, according to our assumption, to
work up the same mass of raw materials), a larger capital would have to
be advanced in the one case than in the other, since the same amount of
labour cannot be set in motion with, say, a capital of 100 if the cost
of raw material, which must be covered out of the 100, is 40 in one case
and 20 in another. But it would become immediately evident that these
two capitals are of the same technical composition, as soon as the price
of the dearer raw material fell to the level of the cheaper one. The
value ratio between constant and variable capital would have become the
same in that case, although no change had taken place in the technical
proportions between the living labour and the mass and nature of the
conditions of labour employed by this capital. On the other band, a
capital of lower organic composition could assume the appearance of
being in the same class with one of a higher organic composition, merely
from a rise in the value of its constant portions, solely from the
viewpoint of its value-composition. Suppose one capital = 60_(c) +
40_(v), because it employs much machinery and raw material compared to
living labour-power, and another capital = 40_(c) + 60_(v), because it
employs much living labour (60%), little machinery (e.g., 10%) and
compared to labour-power less and cheaper raw material (e.g., 30%). Then
a simple rise in the value of raw and auxiliary materials from 30 to 80
could equalise the composition, so that now the second capital would
consist of 80 raw material and 60 labour-power for 10 in machines, or
90_(c) + 60_(v), which, in percentages, would also = 60_(c) + 40_(v),
with no change having taken place in the technical composition. In other
words, capitals of equal organic composition may be of different
value-composition, and capitals with identical percentages of
value-composition may show varying degrees of organic composition and
thus express different stages in the development of the social
productivity of labour. The mere circumstance, then, that agricultural
capital might be on the general level of value-composition, would not
prove that the social productivity of labour is equally high-developed
in it. It would merely show that its own product, which again forms a
part of its conditions of production, is dearer, or that auxiliary
materials, such as fertiliser, which used to be close by, must now be
brought from afar, etc.

But aside from this, the peculiar nature of agriculture must be taken
into account.

Suppose labour-saving machinery, chemical aids, etc., are more
extensively used in agriculture, and that therefore constant capital
increases technically, not merely in value, but also in mass, as
compared with the mass of employed labour-power, then in agriculture (as
in mining) it is not only a matter of the social, but also of the
natural, productivity of labour which depends on the natural conditions
of labour. It is possible for the increase of social productivity in
agriculture to barely compensate, or not even compensate, for the
decrease in natural power — this compensation will nevertheless be
effective only for a short time — so that despite technical development
there, no cheapening of the product occurs, but only a still greater
increase in price is averted. It is also possible that the absolute mass
of products decreases with rising grain prices, while the relative
surplus-product increases; namely, in the case of a relative increase in
constant capital which consists chiefly of machinery or animals
requiring only replacement of wear and tear, and with a corresponding
decrease in variable capital which is expended in wages requiring
constant replacement in full out of the product.

Moreover, it is also possible that with progress in agriculture only a
moderate rise in market-price above the average is necessary, in order
to cultivate and draw a rent from poorer soil, which would have required
a greater rise in market-price if technical aids were less developed.

The fact that in larger-scale cattle-raising, for example, the mass of
employed labour-power is very small compared with constant capital as
represented in cattle itself, could be taken to refute the assertion
that more labour-power, on a percentage basis, is set in motion by
agricultural capital than by the average social capital outside of
agriculture. But it should be noted here that we have taken as
determining for rent analysis that portion of agricultural capital which
produces the principal plant foodstuffs providing the chief means of
subsistence among civilised nations. Adam Smith — and this is one of his
merits — has already demonstrated that a quite different determination
of prices is to be observed in cattle-raising, and, for that matter,
generally for capitals invested in land which are not engaged in raising
the principal means of subsistence, e.g., grain. Namely in that case the
price is determined in such a way that the price of the product of the
land — which is used for cattle-raising, say as an artificial pasture,
but which could just as easily have been transformed into cornfields of
a certain quality — must rise high enough to produce the same rent as on
arable land of the same quality. In other words, the rent of cornfields
becomes a determining element in the price of cattle, and for this
reason Ramsay has justly remarked that the price of cattle is in this
manner artificially raised by the rent, by the economic expression of
landed property, in short, through landed property. [G. Ramsay, _An
Essay on the Distribution of Wealth_, Edinburgh, 1836, pp. 278-79. —
_Ed._]

"By the extension of cultivation the unimproved wilds become
insufficient to supply the demand for butcher’s meat. A great part of
the cultivated lands must be employed in rearing and fattening cattle,
of which the price, therefore, must be sufficient to pay, not only the
labour necessary for tending them, but the rent which the landlord and
the profit which the farmer could have drawn from such land, employed in
tillage. The cattle bred upon the most uncultivated moors, when brought
to the same market, are, in proportion to their weight or goodness, sold
at the same price as those which are reared upon the most improved land.
The proprietors of those moors profit by it, and raise the rent of their
land in proportion to the price of their cattle." (Adam Smith, Book I,
Ch. XI, Part 1.)

In this case, likewise, as distinct from grain-rent, the differential
rent is in favour of the worst soil.

Absolute rent explains some phenomena, which, at first sight, seem to
make merely a monopoly price responsible for the rent. To go on with
Adam Smith’s example, take the owner of some Norwegian forest, for
instance, which exists independent of human activity, i.e., it is not a
product of silviculture. If the proprietor of this forest receives a
rent from a capitalist who has the timber felled, perhaps in consequence
of a demand from England, or if this owner has the timber felled himself
acting in the capacity of capitalist, then a greater or smaller amount
of rent will accrue to him in timber, apart from the profit on invested
capital. This appears to be a pure monopoly charge derived from a pure
product of Nature. But, as a matter of fact, the capital here consists
almost exclusively of a variable component expended in labour, and thus
sets more surplus-labour in motion than another capital of the same
size. The value of the timber, then, contains a greater surplus of
unpaid labour, or of surplus-value, than that of a product of a capital
of a higher organic composition. For this reason the average profit can
be derived from this timber, and a considerable surplus in the form of
rent can fall to the share of the owner of the forest. Conversely, it
may be assumed that, owing to the ease with which timber-felling may be
extended, in other words, its production rapidly increased, the demand
must rise very considerably for the price of timber to equal its value,
and thereby for the entire surplus of unpaid labour (over and above that
portion which falls to the capitalist as average profit) to accrue to
the owner in the form of rent.

We have assumed that the land newly brought under cultivation is of
still inferior quality to the worst previously cultivated. If it is
better, it yields a differential rent. But here we are analysing
precisely the case wherein rent does not appear as a differential rent.
There are only two cases possible. The newly cultivated soil is either
inferior to, or just as good as the previously cultivated soil. If
inferior, then the matter has already been analysed. It remains only to
analyse the case in which it is just as good.

As already developed in our analysis of differential rent, the progress
of cultivation may just as well bring equally good, or even better soils
under the plough as worse soil.

_First_. Because in differential rent (or any rent in general, since
even in the case of non-differential rent the question always arises
whether, on the one hand, the soil fertility in general, and, on the
other hand, its location, admit of its cultivation at the regulating
market-price so as to yield a profit and rent) two conditions work in
opposing directions, now cancelling one another, now alternately
exerting the determining influence. The rise in market-price — provided
the cost-price of cultivation has not fallen, i.e., no technical
progress has given a new impetus to further cultivation — may bring
under cultivation more fertile soil formerly excluded from competition
by virtue of its location. Or it may so enhance the advantage of the
location of the inferior soil that its lesser fertility is
counterbalanced by it. Or, without any rise in market-price the location
may bring better soils into competition through improvement in means of
communication, as can be observed on a large scale in the prairie States
of North America. In countries of older civilisation the same also takes
place constantly if not to the same extent as in the colonies, where, as
Wakefield correctly observes, location is decisive. [[E. Wakefield]
_England and America. A Comparison of the Social and Political State of
both Nations_, Vol. I, London, 1833, pp. 214-15. — _Ed_.] To sum up,
then, the contradictory influences of location and fertility, and the
variableness of the location factor, which is continually
counterbalanced and perpetually passes through progressive changes
tending towards equalisation, alternately carry equally good, better or
worse land areas into new competition with the older ones under
cultivation.

_Secondly_. With the development of natural science and agronomy the
soil fertility is also changed by changing the means through which the
soil constituents may be rendered immediately serviceable. In this way,
light soil types in France and in the eastern counties of England, which
were regarded as inferior at one time, have recently risen to first
place. (See Passy. [H. Passy, _Rente du sol_. In: Dictionnaire de
l’économie politique, Tome II. Paris. 1854, p. 515. — _Ed_.]) On the
other hand, soil considered inferior not for bad chemical composition
but for certain mechanical and physical obstacles that hindered its
cultivation, is converted into good land as soon as means to overcome
these obstacles have been discovered.

_Thirdly_. In all ancient civilisations, old historical and traditional
relations, for instance, in the form of state-owned lands, communal
lands, etc., have purely arbitrarily withheld from cultivation large
tracts of land, which only return to it little by little. The succession
in which they are brought under cultivation depends neither upon their
good quality nor siting, but upon wholly external circumstances. In
tracing the history of English communal lands turned successively into
private property through the Enclosure Bills and brought under the
plough, nothing would be more ridiculous than the fantastic idea that a
modern agricultural chemist, such as Liebig, had indicated the selection
of land in this succession, designating certain fields for cultivation
owing to chemical properties and excluding others. What was more
decisive in this case was the opportunity which makes the thief; the
more or less plausible legalistic subterfuges of the big landlords to
justify their appropriation.

_Fourthly_. Apart from the fact that the stage of development reached at
any time by the population and capital increase sets certain limits,
even though elastic, to the extension of cultivation, and apart from
chance effects which temporarily influence the market-price — such as a
series of good or bad seasons — the extension of agriculture over a
larger area depends on the overall state of the capital market and
business conditions in a country. In periods of stringency it will not
suffice for uncultivated soil to yield the tenant an average profit — no
matter whether he pays any rent or not — in order that additional
capital be invested in agriculture. In other periods when there is a
plethora of capital, it will pour into agriculture even without a rise
in market-price if only other normal conditions are present. Better soil
than hitherto cultivated would in fact be excluded from competition
solely on the basis of unfavourable location, or if hitherto
insurmountable obstacles to its employment existed, or through chance.
For this reason we should only concern ourselves with soils which are
just as good as those last cultivated. However, there still exists the
difference in cost of clearing for cultivation between the new soil and
the one last cultivated. And it depends upon the level of market-prices
and credit conditions whether this will be undertaken or not. As soon as
this soil then actually enters into competition, the market-price will
fall once more to its former level, assuming other conditions to be
equal, and the new soil will then yield the same rent as the
corresponding old soil. The assumption that it does not yield any rent
is proved by its advocates by assuming precisely what they are called
upon to prove, namely that the last soil did not yield any rent. One
might prove in the same manner that houses which were the last built do
not yield any rent for the building outside of house-rent proper, even
though they are leased. In fact, however, they do yield rent even before
yielding any house-rent, when they frequently remain vacant for a long
period. Just as successive investments of capital in a certain piece of
land may bring a proportional surplus and thereby the same rent as the
first investment, so fields of the same quality as those last cultivated
may bring the same proceeds for the same cost. Otherwise it would be
altogether inexplicable how fields of the same quality are ever brought
successively under cultivation; it seems that either it would be
necessary to take all together, or rather not a single one of them, in
order not to bring all the remaining ones into competition. The landlord
is always ready to draw a rent, i.e., to receive something for nothing.
But capital requires certain conditions to fulfil his wish. Competition
between pieces of land does not, therefore, depend upon the landlord
desiring them to compete, but upon the capital existing which seeks to
compete with other capitals in the new fields.

To the extent that the agricultural rent proper is purely a monopoly
price, the latter can only be small, just as the absolute rent can only
be small here under normal conditions whatever the excess of the
product’s value over its price of production. The essence of absolute
rent, therefore, consists in this: Given the same rate of surplus-value,
or degree of labour exploitation, equally large capitals in various
spheres of production produce different amounts of surplus-value, in
accordance with their varying average composition. In industry these
various masses of surplus-value are equalised into an average profit and
distributed uniformly among the individual capitals as aliquot parts of
the social capital. Landed property hinders such an equalisation among
capitals, invested in land, whenever production requires land for either
agriculture or extraction of raw materials, and takes hold of a portion
of the surplus-value, which would otherwise take part in equalising to
the general rate of profit. The rent, then, forms a portion of the
value, or, more specifically, surplus-value, of commodities, and instead
of falling into the lap of the capitalists, who have extracted it from
their labourers, it falls to the share of the landlords, who extract it
from the capitalists. It is hereby assumed that the agricultural capital
sets more labour in motion than an equally large portion of
non-agricultural capital. How far the discrepancy goes, or whether it
exists at all, depends upon the relative development of agriculture as
compared with industry. It is in the nature of the case that this
difference must decrease with the progress of agriculture, unless the
proportionate decrease of variable as compared with constant capital is
still greater in the case of industrial than in the case of agricultural
capital.

This absolute rent plays an even more important role in the extractive
industry proper, where one element of constant capital, raw material, is
wholly lacking and where, excluding those lines in which capital
consisting of machinery and other fixed capital is very considerable, by
far the lowest composition of capital prevails. Precisely here, where
the rent appears entirely attributable to a monopoly price, unusually
favourable market conditions are necessary for commodities to be sold at
their value, or for rent to equal the entire excess of a commodity’s
surplus-value over its price of production. This applies, for instance,
to rent from fisheries, stone quarries, natural forests, etc. ^([37])

Notes

35. Wakefield, _England and America_, London, 1833. Compare also _Das
Kapital_, Buch I, Kap. XXV [English edition: Ch. XXXIII. — _Ed._].

36. See Dombasle [_Annales agricoles de Roville, ou Mélanges
d’agriculture, d’économie rurale et de législation agricole_, Paris,
1824-37. — Ed.] and R. Jones [_An Essay on the Distribution of Wealth,
and on the Sources of Taxation_, Part I, _Rent_, London, 1831, p. 227. —
_Ed._]. XLV-1018

37. Ricardo deals with this very superficially. See the passage directed
against Adam Smith concerning forest rent in Norway, at the very
beginning of Chapter 11, in _Principles_.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 46. Building Site Rent. Rent in Mining. Price of Land

 

Wherever rent exists at all, differential rent appears at all times and
is governed by the same laws, as agricultural differential rent.
Wherever natural forces can be monopolised and guarantee a
surplus-profit to the industrial capitalist using them, be it
waterfalls, rich mines, waters teeming with fish, or a favourably
located building site, there the person who by virtue of title to a
portion of the globe has become the proprietor of these natural objects
will wrest this surplus-profit from functioning capital in the form of
rent. Adam Smith has set forth, as concerns land for building purposes,
that the basis of its rent, like that of all non-agricultural land, is
regulated by agricultural rent proper (Book I, Ch. XI, 2 and 3). This
rent is distinguished, in the first place, by the preponderant influence
exerted here by location upon differential rent (very significant, e.g.,
in vineyards and building sites in large cities); secondly, by the
palpable and complete passiveness of the owner, whose sole activity
consists (especially in mines) in exploiting the progress of social
development, toward which he contributes nothing and for which he risks
nothing, unlike the industrial capitalist; and finally by the prevalence
of monopoly prices in many cases, particularly through the most
shameless exploitation of poverty (for poverty is more lucrative for
house-rent than the mines of Potosi ever were for Spain ^([38])), and
the monstrous power wielded by landed property, when united hand in hand
with industrial capital, enables it to be used against labourers engaged
in their wage struggle as a means of practically expelling them from the
earth as a dwelling-place.^([39]) One part of society thus exacts
tribute from another for the permission to inhabit the earth, as landed
property in general assigns the landlord the privilege of exploiting the
terrestrial body, the bowels of the earth, the air, and thereby the
maintenance and development of life. Not only the population increase
and with it the growing demand for shelter, but also the development of
fixed capital, which is either incorporated in land, or takes root in it
and is based upon it, such as all industrial buildings, railways,
warehouses, factory buildings, docks, etc., necessarily increase the
building rent. A confusion of house-rent, in so far as it constitutes
interest and amortisation on capital invested in a house, and rent for
the mere land, is not possible in this case, even with all the goodwill
of a person like Carey, particularly when landlord and building
speculator are different persons, as is true in England. Two elements
should be considered here: on the one hand, the exploitation of the
earth for the purpose of reproduction or extraction; on the other hand,
the space required as an element of all production and all human
activity. And property in land demands its tribute in both senses. The
demand for building sites raises the value of land as space and
foundation, while thereby the demand for elements of the terrestrial
body serving as building material grows simultaneously. ^([40])

That it is the ground-rent, and not the house, which forms the actual
object of building speculation in rapidly growing cities, especially
where construction is carried on as an industry, e.g., in London, has
already been illustrated in Book II, Chapter XII, in the testimony of a
big building speculator in London, Edward Capps, given before the Select
Committee on Bank Acts of 1857. He stated there, No.5435:

"I think a man who wishes to rise in the world can hardly expect to rise
by following out a fair trade ...it is necessary for him to add
speculative building to it, and that must be done not on a small scale;
...for the builder makes very little profit out of the buildings
themselves; he makes the principal part of the profit out of the
improved ground-rents. Perhaps he takes a piece of ground, and agrees to
give £300 a year for it; by laying it out with care, and putting certain
descriptions of buildings upon it, he may succeed in making £400 or £450
a year out of it, and his profit would be the increased ground-rent of
£100 or £150 a year, rather than the profit of the buildings at which
...in many instances, he scarcely looks at all."

And parenthetically it should not be forgotten that after the lapse of
the lease, generally at the end of 99 years, the land with all its
buildings and its ground-rent — usually increased in the interim twice
or three times, reverts from the building speculator or his legal
successor to the original last landlord.

Mining rent proper is determined in the same way as agricultural rent.

"There are some mines, of which the produce is barely sufficient to pay
the labour and replace, together with its ordinary profits, the stock
employed in working them. They afford some profit to the undertaker of
the work, but no rent to the landlord. They can be wrought
advantageously by nobody but the landlord, who, being himself the
undertaker of the work, gets the ordinary profit of the capital which he
employs in it. Many coal mines in Scotland are wrought in this manner,
and can be wrought in no other. The landlord will allow nobody else to
work them without paying some rent, and nobody can afford to pay any."
(Adam Smith, Book I, Ch. XI, 2.)

It must be distinguished, whether the rent springs from a monopoly
price, because a monopoly price of the product or the land exists
independently of it, or whether the products are sold at a monopoly
price, because a rent exists. When we refer to a monopoly price, we mean
in general a price determined only by the purchasers' eagerness to buy
and ability to pay, independent of the price determined by the general
price of production, as well as by the value of the products. A vineyard
producing wine of very extraordinary quality which can be produced only
in relatively small quantities yields a monopoly price. The wine-grower
would realise a considerable surplus-profit from this monopoly price,
whose excess over the value of the product would be wholly determined by
the means and fondness of the discriminating wine-drinker. This
surplus-profit, which accrues from a monopoly price, is converted into
rent and in this form falls into the lap of the landlord, thanks to his
title to this piece of the globe endowed with singular properties. Here,
then, the monopoly price creates the rent. On the other hand, the rent
would create a monopoly price if grain were sold not merely above its
price of production, but also above its value, owing to the limits set
by landed property to the investment of capital in uncultivated land
without payment of rent. That it is only the title of a number of
persons to the possession of the globe enabling them to appropriate to
themselves as tribute a portion of the surplus-labour of society and
furthermore to a constantly increasing extent with the development of
production, is concealed by the fact that the capitalised rent, i.e.,
precisely this capitalised tribute, appears as the price of land, which
may therefore be sold like any other article of commerce. The buyer,
therefore, does not feel that his title to the rent is obtained gratis,
and without the labour, risk, and spirit of enterprise of the
capitalist, but rather that he has paid for it with an equivalent. To
the buyer, as previously indicated, the rent appears merely as interest
on the capital with which he has purchased the land and consequently his
title to the rent. In the same way, the slave-holder considers a Negro,
whom he has purchased, as his property, not because the institution of
slavery as such entitles him to that Negro, but because he has acquired
him like any other commodity, through sale and purchase. But the title
itself is simply transferred, and not created by the sale. The title
must exist before it can be sold, and a series of sales can no more
create this title through continued repetition than a single sale can.
What created it in the first place were the production relations. As
soon as these have reached a point where they must shed their skin, the
material source of the title, justified economically and historically
and arising from the process which creates social life, falls by the
wayside, along with all transactions based upon it. From the standpoint
of a higher economic form of society, private ownership of the globe by
single individuals will appear quite as absurd as private ownership of
one man by another. Even a whole society, a nation, or even all
simultaneously existing societies taken together, are not the owners of
the globe. They are only its possessors, its usufructuaries, and, like
_boni patres familias,_ they must hand it down to succeeding generations
in an improved condition.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

In the following analysis of the price of land we leave out of
consideration all fluctuations of competition, all land speculation, and
also small landed property, in which land forms the principal instrument
of producers and must, therefore, be bought by them at any price.

I. The price of land may rise without the rent rising, namely:

1) by a mere fall in interest rate, which causes the rent to be sold
more dearly, and thereby the capitalised rent, or price of land, rises;

2) because the interest on capital incorporated in the land rises.

II. The price of land may rise, because the rent increases.

The rent may increase, because the price of the product of the land
rises, in which case the rate of differential rent always rises, whether
the rent on the worst cultivated soil be large, small or non-existent.
By rate we mean the ratio of that portion of surplus-value converted
into rent to the invested capital which produces the agricultural
product. This differs from the ratio of surplus-product to total
product, for the total product does not comprise the entire invested
capital, namely, the fixed capital, which continues to exist alongside
the product. On the other hand, it covers the fact that on soils
yielding differential rent an increasing portion of the product is
transformed into an excess of surplus-product. The increase in price of
agricultural product of the worst soil first creates rent and thereby
the price of land.

The rent, however, may also increase without a rise in price of the
agricultural product. This price may remain constant, or even decrease.

If the price remains constant, the rent can grow only (apart from
monopoly prices) because, on the one hand, given the same amount of
capital invested in the old lands, new lands of better quality are
cultivated, which merely suffice, however, to cover the increased
demand, so that the regulating market-price remains unchanged. In this
case, the price of the old lands does not rise, but the price of the
newly cultivated lands rises above that of the old ones.

Or, on the other hand, the rent rises because the mass of capital
exploiting the land increases, assuming that the relative productivity
and market-price remain the same. Although the rent thus remains the
same compared with the invested capital, still its mass, for instance,
may be doubled, because the capital itself has doubled. Since no fall in
price has occurred, the second investment of capital yields a
surplus-profit just as well as the first, and it likewise is transformed
into rent after the expiration of the lease. The mass of rent rises
here, because the mass of capital producing a rent increases. The
contention that various successive investments of capital in the same
piece of land can produce rent only in so far as their yield is unequal,
so that a differential rent thus arises, is reduced to the contention
that when two capitals of £1,000 each are invested in two fields of
equal productivity, only one of them can produce a rent, although both
fields belong to a better soil type, which produces differential rent.
(The mass of rental, the total rent of a country, grows therefore with
the mass of capital invested, without the price of the individual pieces
of land, or the rate of rent, or even the mass of rent on individual
pieces of land, necessarily increasing; the amount of rental grows in
this case with the extension of cultivation over a wider area. This may
even be combined with a decrease in rent on individual holdings.)
Otherwise, this contention would lead to the other, namely, that the
investment of capital in two different pieces of land existing side by
side follows different laws than the successive investment of capital in
the same plot, whereas differential rent is derived precisely from the
identity of the law in both cases, from the increased productiveness of
capital invested either in the same field or in different fields. The
only modification which exists here and is overlooked is that successive
investments of capital, when applied to different pieces of land, meet
the barrier of landed property, which is not the case with successive
investments of capital in the same piece of land. This accounts for the
opposing tendencies by which these two different forms of investment
curb each other in practice. No difference in capital ever appears here.
If the composition of the capital remains the same, and similarly the
rate of surplus-value, the rate of profit remains unaltered, so that the
mass of profit is doubled when the capital is doubled. In like manner
the rate of rent remains the same under the assumed conditions. If a
capital of £1,000 produces a rent of x, then a capital of £2,000, under
the assumed conditions, produces a rent of 2x. But calculated with
reference to the area of land, which has remained unaltered, since,
according to our assumption, the doubled capital operates in the same
field, the level of rent has also risen as a consequence of its increase
in mass. The same acre which yielded a rent of £2, now yields £4.
^([41])

The relation of a portion of the surplus-value, of money-rent — for
money is the independent expression of value — to the land is in itself
absurd and irrational; for the magnitudes which are here measured by one
another are incommensurable — a particular use-value, a piece of land of
so many and so many square feet, on the one hand, and value, especially
surplus-value, on the other. This expresses in fact nothing more than
that, under the given conditions, the ownership of so many square feet
of land enables the landowner to wrest a certain quantity of unpaid
labour, which the capital wallowing in these square feet like a hog in
potatoes has realised. [Written in the manuscript here in brackets, but
crossed out, is the name "Liebig".] But _prima facie_ the expression is
the same as if one desired to speak of the relation of a five-pound note
to the diameter of the earth. However, the reconciliation of irrational
forms in which certain economic relations appear and assert themselves
in practice does not concern the active agents of these relations in
their everyday life. And since they are accustomed to move about in such
relations, they find nothing strange therein. A complete contradiction
offers not the least mystery to them. They feel as much at home as a
fish in water among manifestations which are separated from their
internal connections and absurd when isolated by themselves. What Hegel
says with reference to certain mathematical formulas applies here: that
which seems irrational to ordinary common sense is rational, and that
which seems rational to it is itself irrational. [Hegel, _Encyclopädie
der philosophischen Wissenschaften in Grundrisse,_ 1. Teil, _Die Logik._
In: _Werke,_ Band 6, Berlin, 1840, S. 404. — _Ed._] When considered in
connection with the land area itself, a rise in the mass of rent is thus
expressed in the same way as a rise in the rate of rent, and hence the
embarrassment experienced when the conditions which would explain the
one case are lacking in the other.

The price of land, however, may also rise even when the price of the
agricultural product decreases.

In this case, the differential rent, and with it the price of the better
lands, may have risen, owing to further differentiations. Or, if this is
not the case, the price of the agricultural product may have fallen by
virtue of greater labour productivity but in such a manner that the
increased production more than counterbalances this. Let us assume that
one quarter cost 60 shillings. Now, if the same acre, with the same
capital, should produce two quarters instead of one, and the price of
one quarter should fall to 40 shillings, then two quarters would cost 80
shillings, so that the value of the product of the same capital invested
in the same acre would have risen by one-third, despite the fall in
price per quarter by one-third. How this is possible without selling the
product above its price of production or above its value, has been
developed in the analysis of differential rent. As a matter of fact it
is possible only in two ways. Either bad soil is excluded from
competition, but the price of the better soil increases with the
increase in differential rent, i.e., the general improvement affects the
various soil types differently. Or, the same price of production (and
the same value, if absolute rent is paid) expresses itself on the worst
soil through a larger mass of products, when labour productivity has
become greater. The product represents the same value as before, but the
price of its aliquot parts has fallen, while their number has increased.
This is impossible when the same capital has been employed; for in this
case the same value always expresses itself through any portion of the
product. It is possible, however, when additional capital has been
expended for gypsum, guano, etc., in short, for improvements the effects
of which extend over several years. The stipulation is that the price of
an individual quarter falls, but not to the same extent as the number of
quarters increases.

III. These different conditions under which rent may rise, and with it
the price of land in general, or of particular kinds of land, may partly
compete, or partly exclude one another, and can only act alternately.
But it follows from the foregoing that the consequence of a rise in the
price of land does not necessarily signify also a rise in rent, or that
a rise in rent, which always brings with it a rise in the price of land,
is not necessarily contingent upon an increase in the agricultural
product.^([42])

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Rather than tracing to their origin the real natural causes leading to
an exhaustion of the soil, which, incidentally, were unknown to all
economists writing on differential rent owing to the level of
agricultural chemistry in their day, the shallow conception was seized
upon that any amount of capital cannot be invested in a limited area of
land; as the _Edinburgh Review_, [Tome LIV, August-December 1831, pp.
94-95. — _Ed_.] for instance, argued against Richard Jones that all of
England cannot be fed through the cultivation of Soho Square. If this be
considered a special disadvantage of agriculture, precisely the opposite
is true. It is possible to invest capital here successively with
fruitful results, because the soil itself serves as an instrument of
production, which is not the case with a factory, or holds only to a
limited extent, since it serves only as a foundation, as a place and a
space providing a basis of operations. It is true that, compared with
scattered handicrafts, large-scale industry may concentrate much
production in a small area. Nevertheless a definite amount of space is
always required at any given level of productivity, and the construction
of tall buildings also has its practical limitations. Beyond this any
expansion of production also demands an extension of land area. The
fixed capital invested in machinery, etc., does not improve through use,
but on the contrary, wears out. New inventions may indeed permit some
improvement in this respect, but with any given development in
productive power, machines will always deteriorate. If productivity is
rapidly developed, all of the old machinery must be replaced by the more
advantageous; in other words, it is lost. The soil, however, if properly
treated, improves all the time. The advantage of the soil, permitting
successive investments of capital to bring gains without loss of
previous investments, implies the possibility of differences in yield
from these successive investments of capital.

Notes

38. Laing [_National Distress; its Causes and Remedies,_ London, 1844.
_— Ed._], Newman [_Lectures on Political Economy,_ London, 1857_. —
Ed._].

39. Crowlington Strike. Engels, _Lage der arbeitenden Klasse in
England,_ S. 307.

40. "The paving of the streets of London has enabled the owners of some
barren rocks on the coast of Scotland to draw a rent from what never
afforded any before." Adam Smith [An _Inquiry into the Nature and Causes
of the Wealth of Nations,_] Book 1, Chapter XI, 2.

41. It is one of the merits of Rodbertus whose important work on rent
[_Sociale Briefe an von Kirchmann_, Dritter Brief: Widerlegung der
Ricardo'schen Lehre von der Grundrente und Begründung einer neuen
Rententheorie, Berlin, 1851. — _Ed._] we shall discuss in Book IV [i.e.,
_Theorien über den Mehrwert._ K. Marx. Engels, _Werke,_ Band 26, 2.
Teil, S. 7-102, _139-51. — Ed._] to have developed this point. He
commits the one error, however, of assuming, in the first place, that as
regards capital an increase in profit is always expressed by an increase
in capital, so that the ratio remains the same when the mass of profit
increases. But this is erroneous, since the rate of profit may increase,
given a changed composition of capital, even if the exploitation of
labour remains the same, precisely because the proportional value of the
constant portion of capital compared with its variable portion falls.
Secondly, he commits the mistake of dealing with the ratio of money-rent
to a quantitatively definite piece of land, e.g., an acre, as though it
had been the general premise of classical economics in its analysis of
the rise or fall of rent. This, again, is erroneous. Classical economics
always treats the rate of rent, in so far as it considers rent in its
natural form, with reference to the product, and in so far as it
considers rent as money-rent, with reference to the advanced capital,
because these are in fact the rational expressions.

42. Concerning the actual fall in the price of land when rent rises, see
Passy. [H. Passy, Rente du sol. In: Dictionnaire de l’économie
politique, Tome II.]

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 47. Genesis of Capitalist Ground-Rent

 

I. Introductory Remarks

We must clarify in our minds wherein lies the real difficulty in
analysing ground-rent from the viewpoint of modern economics, as the
theoretical expression of the capitalist mode of production. Even many
of the more modern writers have not as yet grasped this, as evidenced by
each renewed attempt to "newly" explain ground-rent. The novelty almost
invariably consists in a relapse into long out-of-date views. The
difficulty is not to explain the surplus-product produced by
agricultural capital and its corresponding surplus-value in general.
This question is solved in the analysis of the surplus-value produced by
all productive capital, in whatever sphere it may be invested. The
difficulty consists rather in showing the source of the excess of
surplus-value paid the landlord by capital invested in land in the form
of rent, after equalisation of the surplus-value to the average profit
among the various capitals, after the various capitals have shared in
the total surplus-value produced by the social capital in all spheres of
production in proportion to their relative size; in other words, the
source subsequent to this equalisation and the apparently already
completed distribution of all surplus-value which, in general, is to be
distributed. Quite apart from the practical motives, which prodded
modern economists as spokesmen of industrial capital against landed
property to investigate this question — motives which we shall point out
more clearly in the chapter on history of ground-rent — the question was
of paramount interest to them as theorists. To admit that the appearance
of rent for capital invested in agriculture is due to some particular
effect produced by the sphere of investment itself, due to singular
qualities of the earth’s crust itself, is tantamount to giving up the
conception of value as such, thus tantamount to abandoning all attempts
at a scientific understanding of this field. Even the simple observation
that rent is paid out of the price of agricultural produce — which takes
place even where rent is paid in kind if the farmer is to recover his
price of production — showed the absurdity of attempting to explain the
excess of this price over the ordinary price of production; in other
words, to explain the relative dearness of agricultural products on the
basis of the excess of natural productivity of agricultural production
over the productivity of other lines of production. For the reverse is
true: the more productive labour is, the cheaper is every aliquot part
of its product, because so much greater is the mass of use-values
incorporating the same quantity of labour, i.e., the same value.

The whole difficulty in analysing rent, therefore, consists in
explaining the excess of agricultural profit over the average profit,
not the surplus-value, but the excess of surplus-value characteristic of
this sphere of production; in other words, not the "net product", but
the excess of this net product over the net product of other branches of
industry. The average profit itself is a product formed under very
definite historical production relations by the movement of social
processes, a product which, as we have seen, requires very complex
adjustment. To be able to speak at all of a surplus over the average
profit, this average profit itself must already be established as a
standard and as a regulator of production in general as is the case
under capitalist production. For this reason there can be no talk of
rent in the modern sense, a rent consisting of a surplus over the
average profit, i.e., over and above the proportional share of each
individual capital in the surplus-value produced by the total social
capital, in social formations where it is not capital which performs the
function of enforcing all surplus-labour and appropriating directly all
surplus-value. And where therefore capital has not yet completely, or
only sporadically, brought social labour under its control. It reflects
naïveté, e.g., of a person like Passy (see below), when he speaks of
rent in primitive society as a surplus over profit [Passy, _Rente du
sol._ In: Dictionnaire de l’économie politique, Tome II. Paris, 1854, p.
511. — _Ed_.] — a historically defined social form of surplus-value, but
which, according to Passy, might almost as well exist without any
society.

For the older economists, who in general merely begin analysing the
capitalist mode of production, still undeveloped in their day, the
analysis of rent offers either no difficulty at all, or only a
difficulty of a completely different kind. Petty, Cantillon, and in
general those writers who are closer to feudal times, assume ground-rent
to be the normal form of surplus-value in general, [ [Petty] _A Treatise
on Taxes and Contributions,_ London, 1667, pp. 23-24; [Richard
Cantillon] _Essai sur la nature du commerce en géneral,_ Amsterdam,
1756. — _Ed_.] whereas profit to them is still amorphously combined with
wages, or at best appears to be a portion of surplus-value extorted by
the capitalist from the landlord. These writers thus take as their point
of departure a situation where, in the first place, the agricultural
population still constitutes the overwhelming majority of the nation,
and, secondly, the landlord still appears as the person appropriating at
first hand the surplus-labour of the direct producers by virtue of his
monopoly of landed property, where landed property, therefore, still
appears as the main condition of production. For these writers the
question could not yet be posed, which, inversely, seeks to investigate
from the viewpoint of capitalist production how landed property manages
to wrest back again from capital a portion of the surplus-value produced
by it (that is, filched by it from the direct producers) and already
appropriated directly.

The _physiocrats_ are troubled by difficulties of another nature. As the
actually first systematic spokesmen of capital, they attempt to analyse
the nature of surplus-value in general. For them, this analysis
coincides with the analysis of rent, the only form of surplus-value
which they recognise. Therefore, they consider rent-yielding, or
agricultural, capital to be the only capital producing surplus-value,
and the agricultural labour set in motion by it, the only labour
producing surplus-value, which from a capitalist viewpoint is quite
properly considered the only productive labour. They are quite right in
considering the creation of surplus-value as decisive. Apart from other
merits to be set forth in Book IV, they deserve credit primarily for
going back from merchant’s capital, which functions solely in the sphere
of circulation, to productive capital, in opposition to the mercantile
system, which, with its crude realism, constitutes the actual vulgar
economy of that period, pushing into the background in favour of its own
practical interests the beginnings of scientific analysis made by Petty
and his successors. In this critique of the mercantile system,
incidentally, only its conceptions of capital and surplus-value are
dealt with. It has already been indicated previously that the monetary
system correctly proclaims production for the world-market and the
transformation of the output into commodities, and thus into money, as
the prerequisite and condition of capitalist production. In this
system’s further development into the mercantile system, it is no longer
the transformation of commodity-value into money, but the creation of
surplus-value which is decisive — but from the meaningless viewpoint of
the circulation sphere and, at the same time, in such manner that this
surplus value is represented as surplus money, as the balance of trade
surplus. At the same time, however, the characteristic feature of the
interested merchants and manufacturers of that period, which is in
keeping with the stage of capitalist development represented by them, is
that the transformation of feudal agricultural societies into industrial
ones and the corresponding industrial struggle of nations on the
world-market depends on an accelerated development of capital, which is
not to be arrived at along the so-called natural path, but rather by
means of coercive measures. It makes a tremendous difference whether
national capital is gradually and slowly transformed into industrial
capital, or whether this development is accelerated by means of a tax
which they impose through protective duties mainly upon landowners,
middle and small peasants, and handicraftsmen, by way of accelerated
expropriation of the independent direct producers, and through the
violently accelerated accumulation and concentration of capital, in
short by means of the accelerated establishment of conditions of
capitalist production. It simultaneously makes an enormous difference in
the capitalist and industrial exploitation of the natural national
productive power. Hence the national character of the mercantile system
is not merely a phrase on the lips of its spokesmen. Under the pretext
of concern solely for the wealth of the nation and the resources of the
state, they, in fact, pronounce the interests of the capitalist class
and the amassing of riches in general to be the ultimate aim of the
state, and thus proclaim bourgeois society in place of the old divine
state. But at the same time they are consciously aware that the
development of the interests of capital and of the capitalist class, of
capitalist production, forms the foundation of national power and
national ascendancy in modern society.

The physiocrats, furthermore, are correct in stating that in fact all
production of surplus-value, and thus all development of capital, has
for its natural basis the productiveness of agricultural labour. If man
were not capable of producing in one working-day more means of
subsistence, which signifies in the strictest sense more agricultural
products than every labourer needs for his own reproduction, if the
daily expenditure of his entire labour power sufficed merely to produce
the means of subsistence indispensable for his own individual
requirements, then one could not speak at all either of surplus-product
or surplus-value. An agricultural labour productivity exceeding the
individual requirements of the labourer is the basis of all societies,
and is above all the basis of capitalist production, which disengages a
constantly increasing portion of society from the production of basic
foodstuffs and transforms them into "free heads," as Steuart [Steuart,
_An Inquiry Into the Principles of Political Economy,_ Vol. I, Dublin,
1770, p. 396. — _Ed._] has it, making them available for exploitation in
other spheres.

But what can be said of more recent writers on economics, such as Daire,
Passy, etc., who parrot the most primitive conceptions concerning the
natural conditions of surplus-labour and thereby surplus-value in
general, in the twilight of classical economy, indeed on its very
death-bed, and who imagine that they are thus propounding something new
and striking on ground-rent [Daire, _Introduction. In: Physiocrats, 1._
Teil, Paris, 1846; Passy, _Rente du sol._ In: Dictionnaire de l’économie
politique, Tome II, Paris, 1854, p. 511. — _Ed._] long after this
ground-rent has been investigated as a special form and become a
specific portion of surplus-value? It is particularly characteristic of
vulgar economy that it echoes what was new, original, profound and
justified during a specific outgrown stage of development, in a period
when it has turned platitudinous, stale, and false. It thus confesses
its complete ignorance of the problems which concerned classical
economy. It confounds them with questions that could only have been
posed on a lower level of development of bourgeois society. The same
holds true of its incessant and self-complacent rumination of the
physiocratic phrases concerning free trade. These phrases have long
since lost all theoretical interest, no matter how much they may engage
the practical attention of this or that state.

In natural economy proper, when no part of the agricultural product, or
but a very insignificant portion, enters into the process of
circulation, and then only a relatively small portion of that part of
the product which represents the landlord’s revenue, as, e.g., in many
Roman latifundia, or upon the villas of Charlemagne, or more or less
during the entire Middle Ages (see Vinçard, _Histoire du travail_), the
product and surplus-product of the large estates consists by no means
purely of products of agricultural labour. It encompasses equally well
the products of industrial labour. Domestic handicrafts and
manufacturing labour as secondary occupations of agriculture, which
forms the basis, are the prerequisite of that mode of production upon
which natural economy rests — in European antiquity and the Middle Ages
as well as in the present-day Indian community, in which the traditional
organisation has not yet been destroyed. The capitalist mode of
production completely abolishes this relationship; a process which may
be studied on a large scale particularly in England during the last
third of the 18th century. Thinkers like Herrenschwand, who had grown up
in more or less semi-feudal societies, still consider, e.g., as late as
the close of the 18th century, this separation of manufacture from
agriculture as a foolhardy social adventure, as an unthinkably risky
mode of existence. And even in the agricultural economies of antiquity
showing the greatest analogy to capitalist agriculture, namely Carthage
and Rome, the similarity to a plantation economy is greater than to a
form corresponding to the really capitalist mode of
exploitation.^([42a]) A formal analogy, which, simultaneously, however,
turns out to be completely illusory in all essential points to a person
familiar with the capitalist mode of production, who does not, like Herr
Mommsen,^([43]) discover a capitalist mode of production in every
monetary economy, is not to be found at all in continental Italy during
antiquity, but at best only in Sicily, since this island served Rome as
an agricultural tributary so that its agriculture was aimed chiefly at
export. Farmers in the modern sense existed there.

An erroneous conception of the nature of rent is based upon the fact
that rent in kind, partly as tithes to the church and partly as a
curiosity perpetuated by long-established contracts, has been dragged
over into modern times from the natural economy of the Middle Ages,
completely in contradiction to the conditions of the capitalist mode of
production. It thereby creates the impression that rent does not arise
from the price of the agricultural product, but from its mass, thus not
from social conditions, but from the earth. We have previously shown
that although surplus-value is manifested in a surplus-product the
converse does not hold that a surplus-product, representing a mere
increase in the mass of product, constitutes surplus-value. It may
represent a minus quantity in value. Otherwise the cotton industry of
1860, compared with that of 1840, would show an enormous surplus-value,
whereas on the contrary the price of the yarn has fallen. Rent may
increase enormously as a result of a succession of crop failures,
because the price of grain rises, although this surplus-value appears as
an absolutely decreasing mass of dearer wheat. Conversely, the rent may
fall in consequence of a succession of bountiful years, because the
price falls, although the reduced rent appears as a greater mass of
cheaper wheat. As regards rent in kind, it should be noted now that, in
the first place, it is a mere tradition carried over from an obsolete
mode of production and managing to prolong its existence as a survival.
Its contradiction to the capitalist mode of production is shown by its
disappearance of itself from private contracts, and its being forcibly
shaken off as an anachronism, wherever legislation was able to intervene
as in the case of church tithes in England. Secondly, however, where
rent in kind persisted on the basis of capitalist production, it was no
more, and could be no more, than an expression of money-rent in medieval
garb. Wheat, for instance, is quoted at 40 shillings per quarter. One
portion of this wheat must replace the wages contained therein, and must
be sold to become available for renewed expenditure. Another portion
must be sold to pay its proportionate share of taxes. Seed and even a
portion of fertiliser enter as commodities into the process of
reproduction, wherever the capitalist mode of production and with it
division of social labour are developed, i.e., they must be purchased
for replacement purposes; and therefore another portion of this quarter
must be sold to obtain money for this. In so far as they need not be
bought as actual commodities, but are taken out of the product itself in
kind, in order to enter into its reproduction anew as conditions of
production — as occurs not only in agriculture, but in many other lines
of production producing constant capital — they figure in the books as
money of account and are deducted as elements of the cost-price. The
wear and tear of machinery, and of fixed capital in general, must be
made good in money. And finally comes profit, which is calculated on
this sum, expressed as costs either in actual money or in money of
account. This profit is represented by a definite portion of the gross
product, which is determined by its price. And the excess portion which
then remains forms rent. If the rent in kind stipulated by contract is
greater than this remainder determined by the price, then it does not
constitute rent, but a deduction from profit. Owing to this possibility
alone, rent in kind is an obsolete form, in so far as it does not
reflect the price of the product, but may be greater or smaller than the
real rent, and thus may comprise not only a deduction from profit, but
also from those elements required for capital replacement. In fact, this
rent in kind, so far as it is rent not merely in name but also in
essence, is exclusively determined by the excess of the price of the
product over its price of production. Only it presupposes that this
variable is a constant magnitude. But it is such a comforting reflection
that the product in kind should suffice, first, to maintain the
labourer, secondly, to leave the capitalist tenant farmer more food than
he needs, and finally, that the remainder should constitute the natural
rent. Quite like a manufacturer producing 200,000 yards of cotton goods.
These yards of goods not only suffice to clothe his labourers; to clothe
his wife, all his offspring and himself abundantly; but also leave over
enough cotton for sale, in addition to paying an enormous rent in terms
of cotton goods. It is all so simple! Deduct the price of production
from 200,000 yards of cotton goods, and a surplus of cotton goods must
remain for rent. But it is indeed a naive conception to deduct the price
of production of, say, £10,000 from 200,000 yards of cotton goods,
without knowing the selling price, to deduct money from cotton goods, to
deduct an exchange-value from a use-value as such, and thus to determine
the surplus of yards of cotton goods over pounds sterling. It is worse
than squaring the circle, which is at least based upon the conception
that there is a limit at which straight lines and curves imperceptibly
flow together. But such is the prescription of M. Passy. Deduct money
from cotton goods, before the cotton goods have been converted into
money, either in one’s mind or in reality! What remains is the rent,
which, however, is to be grasped _naturaliter_ (see, for instance, Karl
Arnd [K. Arnd, _Die naturgemässe Volkswirtschaft, gegenüber dem
Monopoliengeiste und dem Communismus_, Hanau, 1845, S. 461-62. — _Ed_.])
and not by deviltries of sophistry. The entire restoration of rent in
kind is finally reduced to this foolishness, the deduction of the price
of production from so many and so many bushels of wheat, and the
subtraction of a sum of money from a cubic measure.

II. Labour rent

If we consider ground-rent in its simplest form, that of _labour rent,_
where the direct producer, using instruments of labour (plough, cattle,
etc.) which actually or legally belong to him, cultivates soil actually
owned by him during part of the week, and works during the remaining
days upon the estate of the feudal lord without any compensation from
the feudal lord, the situation here is still quite clear, for in this
case rent and surplus-value are identical. Rent, not profit, is the form
here through which unpaid surplus-labour expresses itself. To what
extent the labourer (a self-sustaining serf) can secure in this case a
surplus above his indispensable necessities of life, i.e., a surplus
above that which we would call wages under the capitalist mode of
production, depends, other circumstances remaining unchanged, upon the
proportion in which his labour-time is divided into labour-time for
himself and enforced labour-time for his feudal lord. This surplus above
the indispensable requirements of life, the germ of what appears as
profit under the capitalist mode of production, is therefore wholly
determined by the amount of ground-rent, which in this case is not only
directly unpaid surplus-labour, but also appears as such. It is unpaid
surplus-labour for the "owner" of the means of production, which here
coincide with the land, and so far as they differ from it, are mere
accessories to it. That the product of the serf must here suffice to
reproduce his conditions of labour, in addition to his subsistence, is a
circumstance which remains the same under all modes of production. For
it is not the result of their specific form, but a natural requisite of
all continuous and reproductive labour in general, of any continuing
production, which is always simultaneously reproduction, i.e., including
reproduction of its own operating conditions. It is furthermore evident
that in all forms in which the direct labourer remains the "possessor"
of the means of production and labour conditions necessary for the
production of his own means of subsistence, the property relationship
must simultaneously appear as a direct relation of lordship and
servitude, so that the direct producer is not free; a lack of freedom
which may be reduced from serfdom with enforced labour to a mere
tributary relationship. The direct producer, according to our
assumption, is to be found here in possession of his own means of
production, the necessary material labour conditions required for the
realisation of his labour and the production of his means of
subsistence. He conducts his agricultural activity and the rural home
industries connected with it independently. This independence is not
undermined by the circumstance that the small peasants may form among
themselves a more or less natural production community, as they do in
India, since it is here merely a question of independence from the
nominal lord of the manor. Under such conditions the surplus-labour for
the nominal owner of the land can only be extorted from them by other
than economic pressure, whatever the form assumed may be.^([44]) This
differs from slave or plantation economy in that the slave works under
alien conditions of production and not independently. Thus, conditions
of personal dependence are requisite, a lack of personal freedom, no
matter to what extent, and being tied to the soil as its accessory,
bondage in the true sense of the word. Should the direct producers not
be confronted by a private landowner, but rather, as in Asia, under
direct subordination to a state which stands over them as their landlord
and simultaneously as sovereign, then rent and taxes coincide, or
rather, there exists no tax which differs from this form of ground-rent.
Under such circumstances, there need exist no stronger political or
economic pressure than that common to all subjection to that state. The
state is then the supreme lord. Sovereignty here consists in the
ownership of land concentrated on a national scale. But, on the other
hand, no private ownership of land exists, although there is both
private and common possession and use of land.

The specific economic form, in which unpaid surplus-labour is pumped out
of direct producers, determines the relationship of rulers and ruled, as
it grows directly out of production itself and, in turn, reacts upon it
as a determining element. Upon this, however, is founded the entire
formation of the economic community which grows up out of the production
relations themselves, thereby simultaneously its specific political
form. It is always the direct relationship of the owners of the
conditions of production to the direct producers — a relation always
naturally corresponding to a definite stage in the development of the
methods of labour and thereby its social productivity — which reveals
the innermost secret, the hidden basis of the entire social structure
and with it the political form of the relation of sovereignty and
dependence, in short, the corresponding specific form of the state. This
does not prevent the same economic basis — the same from the standpoint
of its main conditions — due to innumerable different empirical
circumstances, natural environment, racial relations, external
historical influences, etc. from showing infinite variations and
gradations in appearance, which can be ascertained only by analysis of
the empirically given circumstances.

So much is evident with respect to labour rent, the simplest and most
primitive form of rent: Rent is here the primeval form of surplus-labour
and coincides with it. But this identity of surplus-value with unpaid
labour of others need not be analysed here because it still exists in
its visible, palpable form, since the labour of the direct producer for
himself is still separated in space and time from his labour for the
landlord and the latter appears directly in the brutal form of enforced
labour for a third person. In the same way the "attribute" possessed by
the soil to produce rent is here reduced to a tangibly open secret, for
the disposition to furnish rent here also includes human labour-power
bound to the soil, and the property relation which compels the owner of
labour-power to drive it on and activate it beyond such measure as is
required to satisfy his own indispensable needs. Rent consists directly
in the appropriation of this surplus expenditure of labour-power by the
landlord; for the direct producer pays him no additional rent. Here,
where surplus-value and rent are not only identical but where
surplus-value has the tangible form of surplus-labour, the natural
conditions or limits of rent, being those of surplus-value in general,
are plainly clear. The direct producer must 1) possess enough
labour-power, and 2) the natural conditions of his labour, above all the
soil cultivated by him, must be productive enough, in a word, the
natural productivity of his labour must be big enough to give him the
possibility of retaining some surplus-labour over and above that
required for the satisfaction of his own indispensable needs. It is not
this possibility which creates the rent, but rather compulsion which
turns this possibility into reality. But the possibility itself is
conditioned by subjective and objective natural circumstances. And here
too lies nothing at all mysterious. Should labour-power be minute, and
the natural conditions of labour scanty, then the surplus-labour is
small, but in such a case so are the wants of the producers on the one
hand and the relative number of exploiters of surplus-labour on the
other, and finally so is the surplus-product, whereby this barely
productive surplus-labour is realised for those few exploiting
landowners.

Finally, labour rent in itself implies that, all other circumstances
remaining equal, it will depend wholly upon the relative amount of
surplus-labour, or enforced labour, to what extent the direct producer
shall be enabled to improve his own condition, to acquire wealth, to
produce an excess over and above his indispensable means of subsistence,
or, if we wish to anticipate the capitalist mode of expression, whether
he shall be able to produce a profit for himself, and how much of a
profit, i.e., an excess over his wages which have been produced by
himself. Rent here is the normal, all-absorbing, so to say legitimate
form of surplus-labour, and far from being excess over profit, which
means in this case being above any other excess over wages, it is rather
that the amount of such profit, and even its very existence, depends,
other circumstances being equal, upon the amount of rent, i.e., the
enforced surplus-labour to be surrendered to the landowners.

Since the direct producer is not the owner, but only a possessor, and
since all his surplus-labour _de jure_ actually belongs to the landlord,
some historians have expressed astonishment that it should be at all
possible for those subject to enforced labour, or serfs, to acquire any
independent property, or relatively speaking, wealth, under such
circumstances. However, it is evident that tradition must play a
dominant role in the primitive and undeveloped circumstances on which
these social production relations and the corresponding mode of
production are based. It is furthermore clear that here as always it is
in the interest of the ruling section of society to sanction the
existing order as law and to legally establish its limits given through
usage and tradition. Apart from all else, this, by the way, comes about
of itself as soon as the constant reproduction of the basis of the
existing order and its fundamental relations assumes a regulated and
orderly form in the course of time. And such regulation and order are
themselves indispensable elements of any mode of production, if it is to
assume social stability and independence from mere chance and
arbitrariness. These are precisely the form of its social stability and
therefore its relative freedom from mere arbitrariness and mere chance.
Under backward conditions of the production process as well as the
corresponding social relations, it achieves this form by mere repetition
of their very reproduction. If this has continued on for some time, it
entrenches itself as custom and tradition and is finally sanctioned as
an explicit law. However, since the form of this surplus-labour,
enforced labour, is based upon the imperfect development of all social
productive powers and the crudeness of the methods of labour itself, it
will naturally absorb a relatively much smaller portion of the direct
producer’s total labour than under developed modes of production,
particularly the capitalist mode of production. Take it, for instance,
that the enforced labour for the landlord originally amounted to two
days per week. These two days of enforced labour per week are thereby
fixed, are a constant magnitude, legally regulated by prescriptive or
written law. But the productivity of the remaining days of the week,
which are at the disposal of the direct producer himself, is a variable
magnitude, which must develop in the course of his experience, just as
the new wants he acquires, and just as the expansion of the market for
his product and the increasing assurance with which he disposes of this
portion of his labour-power will spur him on to a greater exertion of
his labour-power, whereby it should not be forgotten that the employment
of his labour-power is by no means confined to agriculture, but includes
rural home industry. The possibility is here presented for definite
economic development taking place, depending, of course, upon favourable
circumstances, inborn racial characteristics, etc.

III. Rent In Kind

The transformation of labour rent into rent in kind changes nothing from
the economic standpoint in the nature of ground-rent. The latter
consists, in the forms considered here, in that rent is the sole
prevailing and normal form of surplus-value, or surplus-labour. This is
further expressed in the fact that it is the only surplus-labour, or the
only surplus-product, which the direct producer, who is in _possession_
of the labour conditions needed for his own reproduction, must give up
to the _owner_ of the land, which in this situation is the all-embracing
condition of labour. And, furthermore, that land is the only condition
of labour which confronts the direct producer as alien property,
independent of him, and personified by the landlord. To whatever extent
rent in kind is the prevailing and dominant form of ground-rent, it is
further-more always more or less accompanied by survivals of the earlier
form, i.e., of rent paid directly in labour, corvée-labour, no matter
whether the landlord be a private person or the state. Rent in kind
presupposes a higher stage of civilisation for the direct producer,
i.e., a higher level of development of his labour and of society in
general. And it is distinct from the preceding form in that
surplus-labour needs no longer be performed in its natural form, thus no
longer under the direct supervision and compulsion of the landlord or
his representatives: the direct producer is driven rather by force of
circumstances than by direct coercion, through legal enactment rather
than the whip, to perform it on his own responsibility.
Surplus-production, in the sense of production beyond the indispensable
needs of the direct producer, and within the field of production
actually belonging to him, upon the land exploited by himself instead
of, as earlier, upon the nearby lord’s estate beyond his own land, has
already become a self-understood rule here. In this relation the direct
producer more or less disposes of his entire labour-time, although, as
previously, a part of this labour-time, at first practically the entire
surplus portion of it, belongs to the landlord without compensation;
except that the landlord no longer directly receives this surplus-labour
in its natural form, but rather in the products’ natural form in which
it is realised. The burdensome, and according to the way in which
enforced labour is regulated, more or less disturbing interruption by
work for the landlord (see Buch I, Kap. VIII, 2) [English edition Ch X,
2 — _Ed_] ("Manufacturer and Boyard") stops wherever rent in kind
appears in pure form, or at least it is reduced to a few short intervals
during the year, when a continuation of some corvée-labour side by side
with rent in kind takes place. The labour of the producer for himself
and his labour for the landlord are no longer palpably separated by time
and space. This rent in kind, in its pure form, while it may drag
fragments along into more highly developed modes of production and
production relations, still presupposes for its existence a natural
economy, i.e., that the conditions of the economy are either wholly or
for the overwhelming part produced by the economy itself, directly
replaced and reproduced out of its gross product. It furthermore
presupposes the combination of rural home industry with agriculture. The
surplus-product, which forms the rent, is the product of this combined
agricultural and industrial family labour, no matter whether rent in
kind contains more or less of the industrial product, as is often the
case in the Middle Ages, or whether it is paid only in the form of
actual products of the land. In this form of rent it is by no means
necessary for rent in kind, which represents the surplus-labour, to
fully exhaust the entire surplus-labour of the rural family. Compared
with labour rent, the producer rather has more room for action to gain
time for surplus-labour whose product shall belong to himself, as well
as the product of his labour which satisfies his indispensable needs.
Similarly, this form will give rise to greater differences in the
economic position of the individual direct producers. At least the
possibility for such a differentiation exists, and the possibility for
the direct producer to have in turn acquired the means to exploit other
labourers directly. This, however, does not concern us here, since we
are dealing with rent in kind in its pure form; just as in general we
cannot enter into the endless variety of combinations wherein the
various forms of rent may be united, adulterated and amalgamated. The
form of rent in kind, by being bound to a definite type of product and
production itself and through its indispensable combination of
agriculture and domestic industry, through its almost complete
self-sufficiency whereby the peasant family supports itself through its
independence from the market and the movement of production and history
of that section of society lying outside of its sphere, in short owing
to the character of natural economy in general, this form is quite
adapted to furnishing the basis for stationary social conditions as we
see, e.g., in Asia. Here, as in the earlier form of labour rent,
ground-rent is the normal form of surplus-value, and thus of
surplus-labour, i.e., of the entire excess labour which the direct
producer must perform gratis, hence actually under compulsion although
this compulsion no longer confronts him in the old brutal form — for the
benefit of the owner of his essential condition of labour, the land. The
profit, if by erroneously anticipating we may thus call that portion of
the direct producer’s labour excess over his necessary labour, which he
retains for himself, has so little to do with determining rent in kind,
that this profit, on the contrary, grows up behind the back of rent and
finds its natural limit in the size of rent in kind. The latter may
assume dimensions which seriously imperil reproduction of the conditions
of labour, the means of production themselves, rendering the expansion
of production more or less impossible and reducing the direct producers
to the physical minimum of means of subsistence. This is particularly
the case, when this form is met with and exploited by a conquering
commercial nation, e.g., the English in India.

IV. Money-Rent

By money-rent — as distinct from industrial and commercial ground-rent
based upon the capitalist mode of production, which is but an excess
over average profit — we here mean the ground-rent which arises from a
mere change in form of rent in kind, just as the latter in turn is but a
modification of labour rent. The direct producer here turns over instead
of the product, its price to the landlord (who may be either the state
or a private individual). An excess of products in their natural form no
longer suffices; it must be converted from its natural form into
money-form. Although the direct producer still continues to produce at
least the greater part of his means of subsistence himself, a certain
portion of this product must now be converted into commodities, must be
produced as commodities. The character of the entire mode of production
is thus more or less changed. It loses its independence, its detachment
from social connection. The ratio of cost of production, which now
comprises greater or lesser expenditures of money, becomes decisive; at
any rate, the excess of that portion of gross product to be converted
into money over that portion which must serve, on the one hand, as means
of reproduction again, and, on the other, as means of direct
subsistence, assumes a determining role. However, the basis of this type
of rent, although approaching its dissolution, remains the same as that
of rent in kind, which constitutes its point of departure. The direct
producer as before is still possessor of the land either through
inheritance or some other traditional right, and must perform for his
lord, as owner of his most essential condition of production, excess
corvée-labour, that is, unpaid labour for which no equivalent is
returned, in the form of a surplus-product transformed into money.
Ownership of the conditions of labour as distinct from land, such as
agricultural implements and other goods and chattels, is transformed
into the property of the direct producer even under the earlier forms of
rent, first in fact, and then also legally, and even more so is this the
precondition for the form of money-rent. The transformation of rent in
kind into money-rent, taking place first sporadically and then on a more
or less national scale, presupposes a considerable development of
commerce, of urban industry, of commodity-production in general, and
thereby of money circulation. It furthermore assumes a market-price for
products, and that they be sold at prices roughly approximating their
values, which need not at all be the case under earlier forms. In
Eastern Europe we may still partly observe this transformation taking
place under our very eyes. How unfeasible it can be without a certain
development of social labour productivity is proved by various
unsuccessful attempts to carry it through under the Roman Empire, and by
relapses into rent in kind after seeking to convert at least the state
tax portion of this rent into money-rent. The same transitional
difficulties are evidenced, e.g., in pre-revolutionary France, when
money-rent was combined with and adulterated by, survivals of its
earlier forms.

Money-rent, as a transmuted form of rent in kind, and in antithesis to
it, is, nevertheless, the final form, and simultaneously the form of
dissolution of the type of ground-rent which we have heretofore
considered, namely ground-rent as the normal form of surplus-value and
of the unpaid surplus-labour to be performed for the owner of the
conditions of production. In its pure form, this rent, like labour rent
and rent in kind, represents no excess over profit. It absorbs the
profit, as it is understood. In so far as profit arises beside it
practically as a separate portion of excess labour, money-rent like rent
in its earlier forms still constitutes the normal limit of such
embryonic profit, which can only develop in relation to the
possibilities of exploitation, be it of one’s own excess labour or that
of another, which remains after the performance of the surplus-labour
represented by money-rent. Should any profit actually arise along with
this rent, then this profit does not constitute the limit of rent, but
rather conversely, the rent is the limit of the profit. However, as
already indicated, money-rent is simultaneously the form of dissolution
of the ground-rent considered thus far, coinciding _prima facie_ with
surplus-value and surplus-labour, i.e., ground-rent as the normal and
dominant form of surplus-value.

In its further development money-rent must lead — aside from all
intermediate forms, e.g., the small peasant tenant farmer — either to
the transformation of land into peasants’ freehold, or to the form
corresponding to the capitalist mode of production, that is, to rent
paid by the capitalist tenant farmer.

With money-rent prevailing, the traditional and customary legal
relationship between landlord and subjects who possess and cultivate a
part of the land, is necessarily turned into a pure money relationship
fixed contractually in accordance with the rules of positive law. The
possessor engaged in cultivation thus becomes virtually a mere tenant.
This transformation serves on the one hand, provided other general
production relations permit, to expropriate more and more the old
peasant possessors and to substitute capitalist tenants in their stead.
On the other hand, it leads to the former possessor buying himself free
from his rent obligation and to his transformation into an independent
peasant with complete ownership of the land he tills. The transformation
of rent in kind into money-rent is furthermore not only inevitably
accompanied, but even anticipated, by the formation of a class of
propertyless day-labourers, who hire themselves out for money. During
their genesis, when this new class appears but sporadically, the custom
necessarily develops among the more prosperous peasants subject to rent
payments of exploiting agricultural wage-labourers for their own
account, much as in feudal times, when the more well-to-do peasant serfs
themselves also held serfs. In this way, they gradually acquire the
possibility of accumulating a certain amount of wealth and themselves
becoming transformed into future capitalists. The old self-employed
possessors of land themselves thus give rise to a nursery school for
capitalist tenants, whose development is conditioned by the general
development of capitalist production beyond the bounds of the
country-side. This class shoots up very rapidly when particularly
favourable circumstances come to its aid, as in England in the 16th
century, where the then progressive depreciation of money enriched them
under the customary long leases at the expense of the landlords.

Furthermore: as soon as rent assumes the form of money-rent, and thereby
the relationship between rent-paying peasant and landlord becomes a
relationship fixed by contract — a development which is only possible
generally when the world-market, commerce and manufacture have reached a
certain relatively high level — the leasing of land to capitalists
inevitably also makes its appearance. The latter hitherto stood beyond
the rural limits and now carry over to the countryside and agriculture
the capital acquired in the cities and with it the capitalist mode of
operation developed — i.e., creating a product as a mere commodity and
solely as a means of appropriating surplus-value. This form can become
the general rule only in those countries which dominate the world-market
in the period of transition from the feudal to the capitalist mode of
production. When the capitalist tenant farmer steps in between landlord
and actual tiller of the soil, all relations which arose out of the old
rural mode of production are torn asunder. The farmer becomes the actual
commander of these agricultural labourers and the actual exploiter of
their surplus-labour, whereas the landlord maintains a direct
relationship, and indeed simply a money and contractual relationship,
solely with this capitalist tenant. Thus, the nature of rent is also
transformed, not merely in fact and by chance, as occurred in part even
under earlier forms, but normally, in its recognised and prevailing
form. From the normal form of surplus-value and surplus-labour, it
descends to a mere excess of this surplus-labour over that portion of it
appropriated by the exploiting capitalist in the form of profit; just as
the total surplus-labour, profit and excess over profit, is extracted
directly by him, collected in the form of the total surplus-product, and
turned into cash. It is only the excess portion of this surplus-value
which is extracted by him from the agricultural labourer by direct
exploitation, by means of his capital, which he turns over to the
landlord as rent. How much or how little he turns over to the latter
depends, on the average, upon the limits set by the average profit which
is realised by capital in the non-agricultural spheres of production,
and by the prices of non-agricultural production regulated by this
average profit. From a normal form of surplus-value and surplus-labour,
rent has now become transformed into an excess over that portion of the
surplus-labour claimed in advance by capital as its legitimate and
normal share, and characteristic of this particular sphere of
production, the agricultural sphere of production. Profit, instead of
rent, has now become the normal form of surplus-value and rent still
exists solely as a form, not of surplus-value in general, but of one of
its offshoots, surplus-profit, which assumes an independent form under
particular circumstances. It is not necessary to elaborate the manner in
which a gradual transformation in the mode of production itself
corresponds to this transformation. This already follows from the fact
that it is normal for the capitalist tenant farmer to produce
agricultural products as commodities, and that, while formerly only the
excess over his means of subsistence was converted into commodities, now
but a relatively insignificant part of these commodities is directly
used by him as means of subsistence. It is no longer the land, but
rather capital, which has now brought even agricultural labour under its
direct sway and productiveness.

The average profit and the price of production regulated thereby are
formed outside of relations in the country-side and within the sphere of
urban trade and manufacture. The profit of the rent-paying peasant does
not enter into it as an equalising factor, for his relation to the
landlord is not a capitalist one. In so far as he makes profit, i.e.,
realises an excess above his necessary means of subsistence, either by
his own labour or through exploiting other people’s labour, it is done
behind the back of the normal relationship, and other circumstances
being equal, the size of this profit does not determine rent, but on the
contrary, it is determined by the rent as its limit. The high rate of
profit in the Middle Ages is not entirely due to the low composition of
capital, in which the variable component invested in wages predominates.
It is due to swindling on the land, the appropriation of a portion of
the landlord’s rent and of the income of his vassals. If the
country-side exploits the town politically in the Middle Ages, wherever
feudalism has not been broken down by exceptional urban development — as
in Italy, the town, on the other hand, exploits the land economically
everywhere and without exception, through its monopoly prices, its
system of taxation, its guild organisation, its direct commercial
fraudulence and its usury.

One might imagine that the mere appearance of the capitalist farmer in
agricultural production would prove that the price of agricultural
products, which from time immemorial have paid rent in one form or
another, must be higher, at least at the time of this appearance, than
the prices of production of manufacture whether it be because the price
of such agricultural products has reached a monopoly price level, or has
risen as high as the value of the agricultural products, and their value
actually is above the price of production regulated by the average
profit. For were this not so, the capitalist farmer could not at all
realise, at the existing prices of agricultural produce, first the
average profit out of the price of these products, and then pay out of
the same price an excess above this profit in the form of rent. One
might conclude from this that the general rate of profit, which guides
the capitalist farmer in his contract with the landlord, has been formed
without including rent, and, therefore, as soon as it assumes a
regulating role in agricultural production, it finds this excess at hand
and pays it to the landlord. It is in this traditional manner that, for
instance, Herr Rodbertus explains the matter. [J. Rodbertus, _Sociale
Briefe an von Kirchmann, Dritter Brief: Widerlegung der Ricardo’schen
Lehre von der Grundrente und Begründung einer neuen Rententheorie._ See
also K. Marx, _Theorien über den Mehrwert._ 2. Teil, _1957, pp._ 3-106,
142-54. — _Ed._] But:

_First_. This appearance of capital as an independent and leading force
in agriculture does not take place all at once and generally, but
gradually and in particular lines of production. It encompasses at
first, not agriculture proper, but such branches of production as
cattle-breeding, especially sheep-raising, whose principal product,
wool, offers at the early stages a constant excess of market-price over
price of production during the rise of industry, and this does not level
out until later. Thus in England during the 16th century.

_Secondly_. Since this capitalist production appears at first but
sporadically, the assumption cannot be disputed that it first extends
only to such land categories as are able, through their particular
fertility, or their exceptionally favourable location, to generally pay
a differential rent.

_Thirdly_. Let us even assume that at the time this mode of production
appeared — and this indeed presupposes an increasing preponderance of
urban demand — the prices of agricultural products were higher than the
price of production, as was doubtless the case in England during the
last third of the 17th century. Nevertheless, as soon as this mode of
production has somewhat extricated itself from the mere subordination of
agriculture to capital, and as soon as agricultural improvement and the
reduction of production costs, which necessarily accompany its
development, have taken place, the balance will be restored by a
reaction, a fall in the price of agricultural produce, as happened in
England in the first half of the 18th century.

Rent, thus, as an excess over the average profit cannot be explained in
this traditional way. Whatever may be the existing historical
circumstances at the time rent first appears, once it has struck root it
cannot exist except under the modern conditions earlier described.

Finally, it should be noted in the transformation of rent in kind into
money-rent that along with it capitalised rent, or the price of land,
and thus its alienability and alienation become essential factors, and
that thereby not only can the former peasant subject to payment of rent
be transformed into an independent peasant proprietor, but also urban
and other moneyed people can buy real estate in order to lease it either
to peasants or capitalists and thus enjoy rent as a form of interest on
their capital so invested; that, therefore, this circumstance likewise
facilitates the transformation of the former mode of exploitation, the
relation between owner and actual cultivator of the land, and of rent
itself.

V. Métayage And Peasant Proprietorship Of Land Parcels

We have now arrived at the end of our elaboration of ground-rent.

In all these forms of ground-rent, whether labour rent, rent in kind, or
money-rent (as merely a changed form of rent in kind), the one paying
rent is always supposed to be the actual cultivator and possessor of the
land, whose unpaid surplus-labour passes directly into the hands of the
landlord. Even in the last form, money-rent in so far as it is "pure,"
i.e., merely a changed form of rent in kind — this is not only possible,
but actually takes place.

As a transitory form from the original form of rent to capitalist rent,
we may consider the metayer system, or share-cropping, under which the
manager (farmer) furnishes labour (his own or another’s), and also a
portion of working capital, and the landlord furnishes, aside from land,
another portion of working capital (e.g., cattle), and the product is
divided between tenant and landlord in definite proportions which vary
from country to country. On the one hand, the farmer here lacks
sufficient capital required for complete capitalist management. On the
other hand, the share here appropriated by the landlord does not bear
the pure form of rent. It may actually include interest on the capital
advanced by him and an excess rent. It may also absorb practically the
entire surplus-labour of the farmer, or leave him a greater or smaller
portion of this surplus-labour. But, essentially, rent no longer appears
here as the normal form of surplus-value in general. On the one hand,
the sharecropper, whether he employs his own or another’s labour, is to
lay claim to a portion of the product not in his capacity as labourer,
but as possessor of part of the instruments of labour, as his own
capitalist. On the other hand, the landlord claims his share not
exclusively on the basis of his land-ownership, but also as lender of
capital.^([44a])

A survival of the old communal ownership of land, which had endured
after the transition to independent peasant farming, e.g., in Poland and
Rumania, served there as a subterfuge for effecting a transition to the
lower forms of ground-rent. A portion of the land belongs to the
individual peasant and is tilled independently by him. Another portion
is tilled in common and creates a surplus-product, which serves partly
to cover community expenses, partly as a reserve in cases of crop
failure, etc. These last two parts of the surplus-product, and
ultimately the entire surplus-product including the land upon which it
has been grown, are more and more usurped by state officials and private
individuals, and thus the originally free peasant proprietors, whose
obligation to till this land in common is maintained, are transformed
into vassals subject either to corvée-labour or rent in kind; while the
usurpers of common land are transformed into owners, not only of the
usurped common lands, but even the very lands of the peasants
themselves.

We need not further investigate slave economy proper (which likewise
passes through a metamorphosis from the patriarchal system mainly for
home use to the plantation system for the world-market) nor the
management of estates under which the landlords themselves are
independent cultivators, possessing all instruments of production, and
exploiting the labour of free or unfree bondsmen, who are paid either in
kind or money. Landlord and owner of the instruments of production, and
thus the direct exploiter of labourers included among these elements of
production, are in this case one and the same person. Rent and profit
likewise coincide then, there occurring no separation of the different
forms of surplus-value. The entire surplus-labour of the labourers,
which is manifested here in the surplus-product, is extracted from them
directly by the owner of all instruments of production, to which belong
the land and, under the original form of slavery, the immediate
producers themselves. Where the capitalist outlook prevails, as on
American plantations, this entire surplus-value is regarded as profit;
where neither the capitalist mode of production itself exists, nor the
corresponding outlook has been transferred from capitalist countries, it
appears as rent. At any rate, this form presents no difficulties. The
income of the landlord, whatever it may be called, the available
surplus-product appropriated by him, is here the normal and prevailing
form, whereby the entire unpaid surplus-labour is directly appropriated,
and landed property forms the basis of such appropriation.

Further, _proprietorship of land parcels._ The peasant here is
simultaneously the free owner of his land, which appears as his
principal instrument of production, the indispensable field of
employment for his labour and his capital. No lease money is paid under
this form. Rent, therefore, does not appear as a separate form of
surplus-value, although in countries in which otherwise the capitalist
mode of production is developed, it appears as a surplus-profit compared
with other lines of production; but as surplus-profit which, like all
proceeds of his labour in general, accrues to the peasant.

This form of landed property presupposes, as in the earlier older forms,
that the rural population greatly predominates numerically over the town
population, so that, even if the capitalist mode of production otherwise
prevails, it is but relatively little developed, and thus also in the
other lines of production the concentration of capital is restricted to
narrow limits and a fragmentation of capital predominates. In the nature
of things, the greater portion of agricultural produce must be consumed
as direct means of subsistence by the producers themselves, the
peasants, and only the excess above that will find its way as
commodities into urban commerce. No matter how the average market-price
of agricultural products may here be regulated, differential rent, an
excess portion of commodity-prices from superior or more favourably
located land, must evidently exist here much as under the capitalist
mode of production. This differential rent exists, even where this form
appears under social conditions, under which no general market-price has
as yet been developed; it appears then in the excess surplus-product.
Only then it flows into the pockets of the peasant whose labour is
realised under more favourable natural conditions. The assumption here
is generally to be made that no absolute rent exists, i.e., that the
worst soil does not pay any rent — precisely under this form where the
price of land enters as a factor in the peasant’s actual cost of
production whether because in the course of this form’s further
development either the price of land has been computed at a certain
money-value, in dividing up an inheritance, or, during the constant
change in ownership of an entire estate, or of its component parts, the
land has been bought by the cultivator himself, largely by raising money
on mortgage; and, therefore, where the price of land, representing
nothing more than capitalised rent, is a factor assumed in advance, and
where rent thus seems to exist independently of any differentiation in
fertility and location of the land. For, absolute rent presupposes
either realised excess in product value above its price of production,
or a monopoly price exceeding the value of the product. But since
agriculture here is carried on largely as cultivation for direct
subsistence, and the land exists as an indispensable field of employment
for the labour and capital of the majority of the population, the
regulating market-price of the product will reach its value only under
extraordinary circumstances. But this value will, generally, be higher
than its price of production owing to the preponderant element of living
labour, although this excess of value over price of production will in
turn be limited by the low composition even of non-agricultural capital
in countries with an economy composed predominantly of land parcels. For
the peasant owning a parcel, the limit of exploitation is not set by the
average profit of capital, in so far as he is a small capitalist; nor,
on the other hand, by the necessity of rent, in so far as he is a
landowner. The absolute limit for him as a small capitalist is no more
than the wages he pays to himself, after deducting his actual costs. So
long as the price of the product covers these wages, he will cultivate
his land, and often at wages down to a physical minimum. As for his
capacity as land proprietor, the barrier of ownership is eliminated for
him, since it can make itself felt only _vis-à-vis_ a capital (including
labour) separated from land-ownership, by erecting an obstacle to the
investment of capital. It is true, to be sure, that interest on the
price of land — which generally has to be paid to still another
individual, the mortgage creditor — is a barrier. But this interest can
be paid precisely out of that portion of surplus-labour which would
constitute profit under capitalist conditions. The rent anticipated in
the price of land and in the interest paid for it can therefore be
nothing but a portion of the peasant’s capitalised surplus-labour over
and above the labour indispensable for his subsistence, without this
surplus-labour being realised in a part of the commodity-value equal to
the entire average profit, and still less in an excess above the
surplus-labour realised in the average profit, i.e., in a
surplus-profit. The rent may be a deduction from the average profit, or
even the only portion of it which is realised. For the peasant parcel
holder to cultivate his land, or to buy land for cultivation, it is
therefore not necessary, as under the normal capitalist mode of
production, that the market-price of the agricultural products rise high
enough to afford him the average profit, and still less a fixed excess
above this average profit in the form of rent. It is not necessary,
therefore, that the market-price rise, either up to the value or the
price of production of his product. This is one of the reasons why grain
prices are lower in countries with predominant small peasant land
proprietorship than in countries with a capitalist mode of production.
One portion of the surplus-labour of the peasants, who work under the
least favourable conditions, is bestowed gratis upon society and does
not at all enter into the regulation of price of production or into the
creation of value in general. This lower price is consequently a result
of the producers’ poverty and by no means of their labour productivity.

This form of free self-managing peasant proprietorship of land parcels
as the prevailing, normal form constitutes, on the one hand, the
economic foundation of society during the best periods of classical
antiquity, and on the other hand, it is found among modern nations as
one of the forms arising from the dissolution of feudal land ownership.
Thus, the yeomanry in England, the peasantry in Sweden, the French and
West German peasants. We do not include colonies here, since the
independent peasant there develops under different conditions.

The free ownership of the self-managing peasant is evidently the most
normal form of landed property for small-scale operation, i.e., for a
mode of production, in which possession of the land is a prerequisite
for the labourer’s ownership of the product of his own labour, and in
which the cultivator, be he free owner or vassal, always must produce
his own means of subsistence independently, as an isolated labourer with
his family. Ownership of the land is as necessary for full development
of this mode of production as ownership of tools is for free development
of handicraft production. Here is the basis for the development of
personal independence. It is a necessary transitional stage for the
development of agriculture itself. The causes which bring about its
downfall show its limitations. These are: Destruction of rural domestic
industry, which forms its normal supplement as a result of the
development of large-scale industry; a gradual impoverishment and
exhaustion of the soil subjected to this cultivation; usurpation by big
landowners of the common lands, which constitute the second supplement
of the management of land parcels everywhere and which alone enable it
to raise cattle; competition, either of the plantation system or
large-scale capitalist agriculture. Improvements in agriculture, which
on the one hand cause a fall in agricultural prices and, on the other,
require greater outlays and more extensive material conditions of
production, also contribute towards this, as in England during the first
half of the 18th century.

Proprietorship of land parcels by its very nature excludes the
development of social productive forces of labour, social forms of
labour, social concentration of capital, large-scale cattle-raising, and
the progressive application of science.

Usury and a taxation system must impoverish it everywhere. The
expenditure of capital in the price of the land withdraws this capital
from cultivation. An infinite fragmentation of means of production, and
isolation of the producers themselves. Monstrous waste of human energy.
Progressive deterioration of conditions of production and increased
prices of means of production — an inevitable law of proprietorship of
parcels. Calamity of seasonal abundance for this mode of
production.^([45])

One of the specific evils of small-scale agriculture where it is
combined with free land-ownership arises from the cultivator’s investing
capital in the purchase of land. (The same applies also to the
transitory form, in which the big landowner invests capital, first, to
buy land, and second, to manage it as his own tenant farmer.) Owing to
the changeable nature which the land here assumes as a mere commodity,
the changes of ownership increase,^([46]) so that the land, from the
peasant’s viewpoint, enters anew as an investment of capital with each
successive generation and division of estates, i.e., it becomes land
purchased by him. The price of land here forms a weighty element of the
individual unproductive costs of production or cost-price of the product
for the individual producer.

The price of land is nothing but capitalised and therefore anticipated
rent. If capitalist methods are employed by agriculture, so that the
landlord receives only rent, and the farmer pays nothing for land except
this annual rent, then it is evident that the capital invested by the
landowner himself in purchasing the land constitutes indeed an
interest-bearing investment of capital for him, but has absolutely
nothing to do with capital invested in agriculture itself. It forms
neither a part of the fixed, nor of the circulating, capital employed
here;^([47]) it merely secures for the buyer a claim to receive annual
rent, but has absolutely nothing to do with the production of the rent
itself. The buyer of land just pays his capital out to the one who sells
the land, and the seller in return relinquishes his ownership of the
land. Thus this capital no longer exists as the capital of the
purchaser; he no longer has it; therefore it does not belong to the
capital which he can invest in any way in the land itself. Whether he
bought the land dear or cheap, or whether he received it for nothing,
alters nothing in the capital invested by the farmer in his
establishment, and changes nothing in the rent, but merely alters the
question whether it appears to him as interest or not, or as higher or
lower interest respectively.

Take, for instance, the slave economy. The price paid for a slave is
nothing but the anticipated and capitalised surplus-value or profit to
be wrung out of the slave. But the capital paid for the purchase of a
slave does not belong to the capital by means of which profit,
surplus-labour, is extracted from him. On the contrary. It is capital
which the slave-holder has parted with, it is a deduction from the
capital which be has available for actual production. It has ceased to
exist for him, just as capital invested in purchasing land has ceased to
exist for agriculture. The best proof of this is that it does not
reappear for the slave-holder or the landowner except when he, in turn,
sells his slaves or land. But then the same situation prevails for the
buyer. The fact that he has bought the slave does not enable him to
exploit the slave without further ado. He is only able to do so when he
invests some additional capital in the slave economy itself.

The same capital does not exist twice, once in the hands of the seller,
and a second time in the hands of the buyer of the land. It passes from
the hands of the buyer to those of the seller, and there the matter
ends. The buyer now no longer has capital, but in its stead a piece of
land. The circumstance that the rent produced by a real investment of
capital in this land is calculated by the new landowner as interest on
capital which he has not invested in the land, but given away to acquire
the land, does not in the least alter the economic nature of the land
factor, any more than the circumstance that someone has paid £1,000 for
3% consols has anything to do with the capital out of whose revenue the
interest on the national debt is paid.

In fact, the money expended in purchasing land, like that in purchasing
government bonds, is merely capital _in itself,_ just as any value sum
is capital in itself, potential capital, on the basis of the capitalist
mode of production. What is paid for land, like that for government
bonds or any other purchased commodity, is a sum of money. This is
capital in itself, because it can be converted into capital. It depends
upon the use put to it by the seller whether the money obtained by him
is really transformed into capital or not. For the buyer, it can never
again function as such, no more than any other money which he has
definitely paid out. It figures in his accounts as interest-bearing
capital, because he considers the income, received as rent from the land
or as interest on state indebtedness, as interest on the money which the
purchase of the claim to this revenue has cost him. He can only realise
it as capital through resale. But then another, the new buyer, enters
the same relationship maintained by the former, and the money thus
expended cannot be transformed into actual capital for the expender
through any change of hands.

In the case of small landed property the illusion is fostered still more
that land itself possesses value and thus enters as capital into the
price of production of the product, much as machines or raw materials.
But we have seen that rent, and therefore capitalised rent, the price of
land, can enter as a determining factor into the price of agricultural
products in only two cases. First, when as a consequence of the
composition of agricultural capital — a capital which has nothing to do
with the capital invested in purchasing land — the value of the products
of the soil is higher than their price of production, and market
conditions enable the landlord to realise this difference. Second, when
there is a monopoly price. And both are least of all the case under the
management of land parcels and small land-ownership because precisely
here production to a large extent satisfies the producers’ own wants and
is carried on independently of regulation by the average rate of profit.
Even where cultivation of land parcels is conducted upon leased land,
the lease money comprises, far more so than under any other conditions,
a portion of the profit and even a deduction from wages; this money is
then only a nominal rent, not rent as an independent category as opposed
to wages and profit.

The expenditure of money-capital for the purchase of land, then, is not
an investment of agricultural capital. It is a decrease _pro tanto_ in
the capital which small peasants can employ in their own sphere of
production. It reduces _pro tanto_ the size of their means of production
and thereby narrows the economic basis of reproduction. It subjects the
small peasant to the money-lender, since credit proper occurs but rarely
in this sphere in general. It is a hindrance to agriculture, even where
such purchase takes place in the case of large estates. It contradicts
in fact the capitalist mode of production, which is on the whole
indifferent to whether the landowner is in debt, no matter whether he
has inherited or purchased his estate. The nature of management of the
leased estate itself is not altered whether the landowner pockets the
rent himself or whether he must pay it out to the holder of his
mortgage.

We have seen that, in the case of a given ground-rent, the price of land
is regulated by the interest rate. If the rate is low, then the price of
land is high, and vice versa. Normally, then, a high price of land and a
low interest rate should go hand in hand, so that if the peasant paid a
high price for the land in consequence of a low interest rate, the same
low rate of interest should also secure his working capital for him on
easy credit terms. But in reality, things turn out differently when
peasant proprietorship of land parcels is the prevailing form. In the
first place, the general laws of credit are not adapted to the farmer,
since these laws presuppose a capitalist as the producer. Secondly,
where proprietorship of land parcels predominates — we are not referring
to colonies here — and the small peasant constitutes the backbone of the
nation, the formation of capital, i.e., social reproduction, is
relatively weak, and still weaker is the formation of loanable
money-capital, in the sense previously elaborated. This presupposes the
concentration and existence of a class of idle rich capitalists
(Massie). [ [Massie] _An Essay on the Governing Causes of the Natural
Rate of Interest,_ London, 1750, pp 23-24. — _Ed_] Thirdly, here where
the ownership of the land is a necessary condition for the existence of
most producers, and an indispensable field of investment for their
capital, the price of land is raised independently of the interest rate,
and often in inverse ratio to it, through the preponderance of the
demand for landed property over its supply. Land sold in parcels brings
a far higher price in such a case than when sold in large tracts,
because here the number of small buyers is large and that of large
buyers is small (Bandes Noires, [Associations of profiteers. — _Ed_.]
Rubichon; Newman [Newman, _Lectures on Political Economy,_ London, 1851,
pp. 180-81. — _Ed._]). For all these reasons, the price of land rises
here with a relatively high rate of interest. The relatively low
interest, which the peasant derives here from the outlay of capital for
the purchase of land (Mounier), corresponds here, on the other side, to
the high usurious interest rate which he himself has to pay to his
mortgage creditors. The Irish system bears out the same thing, only in
another form.

The price of land, this element foreign to production in itself, may
therefore rise here to such a point that it makes production impossible
(Dombasle).

The fact that the price of land plays such a role, that purchase and
sale, the circulation of land as a commodity, develops to this degree,
is practically a result of the development of the capitalist mode of
production in so far as a commodity is here the general form of all
products and all instruments of production. On the other hand, this
development takes place only where the capitalist mode of production has
a limited development and does not unfold all of its peculiarities,
because this rests precisely upon the fact that agriculture is no
longer, or not yet, subject to the capitalist mode of production, but
rather to one handed down from extinct forms of society. The
disadvantages of the capitalist mode of production, with its dependence
of the producer upon the money-price of his product, coincide here
therefore with the disadvantages occasioned by the imperfect development
of the capitalist mode of production. The peasant turns merchant and
industrialist without the conditions enabling him to produce his
products as commodities.

The conflict between the price of land as an element in the producers’
cost-price and no element in the price of production (even though the
rent enters as a determining factor into the price of the agricultural
product, the capitalised rent, which is advanced for 20 years or more,
by no means enters as a determinant) is but one of the forms manifesting
the general contradiction between private land-ownership and a rational
agriculture, the normal social utilisation of the soil. But on the other
hand, private land ownership, and thereby expropriation of the direct
producers from the land — private land-ownership by the one, which
implies lack of ownership by others — is the basis of the capitalist
mode of production.

Here, in small-scale agriculture, the price of land, a form and result
of private land-ownership, appears as a barrier to production itself. In
large-scale agriculture, and large estates operating on a capitalist
basis, ownership likewise acts as a barrier, because it limits the
tenant farmer in his productive investment of capital, which in the
final analysis benefits not him, but the landlord. In both forms,
exploitation and squandering of the vitality of the soil (apart from
making exploitation dependent upon the accidental and unequal
circumstances of individual producers rather than the attained level of
social development) takes the place of conscious rational cultivation of
the soil as eternal communal property, an inalienable condition for the
existence and reproduction of a chain of successive generations of the
human race. In the case of small property, this results from the lack of
means and knowledge of applying the social labour productivity. In the
case of large property, it results from the exploitation of such means
for the most rapid enrichment of farmer and proprietor. In the case of
both through dependence on the market-price.

All critique of small landed property resolves itself in the final
analysis into a criticism of private ownership as a barrier and
hindrance to agriculture. And similarly all counter-criticism of large
landed property. In either case, of course, we leave aside all secondary
political considerations. This barrier and hindrance, which are erected
by all private landed property vis-à-vis agricultural production and the
rational cultivation, maintenance and improvement of the soil itself,
develop on both sides merely in different forms, and in wrangling over
the specific forms of this evil its ultimate cause is forgotten.

Small landed property presupposes that the overwhelming majority of the
population is rural, and that not social, but isolated labour
predominates; and that, therefore, under such conditions wealth and
development of reproduction, both of its material and spiritual
prerequisites, are out of the question, and thereby also the
prerequisites for rational cultivation. On the other hand, large landed
property reduces the agricultural population to a constantly falling
minimum, and confronts it with a constantly growing industrial
population crowded together in large cities. It thereby creates
conditions which cause an irreparable break in the coherence of social
interchange prescribed by the natural laws of life. As a result, the
vitality of the soil is squandered, and this prodigality is carried by
commerce far beyond the borders of a particular state (Liebig). [
Liebig, _Die Chemie in ihrer Anwendung auf Agricultur und Physiologie,_
Braunschweig, 1862. — _Ed_.]

While small landed property creates a class of barbarians standing
halfway outside of society, a class combining all the crudeness of
primitive forms of society with the anguish and misery of civilised
countries, large landed property undermines labour-power in the last
region, where its prime energy seeks refuge and stores up its strength
as a reserve fund for the regeneration of the vital force of nations —
on the land itself. Large-scale industry and large-scale mechanised
agriculture work together. If originally distinguished by the fact that
the former lays waste and destroys principally labour-power, hence the
natural force of human beings, whereas the latter more directly exhausts
the natural vitality of the soil, they join hands in the further course
of development in that the industrial system in the countryside also
enervates the labourers, and industry and commerce on their part supply
agriculture with the means for exhausting the soil.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

42a. Adam Smith emphasises how, in his time (and this applies also to
the plantations in tropical and subtropical countries in our own day),
rent and profit were not yet divorced from one another [Smith, _An
Inquiry into the Nature and Causes of the Wealth of Nations,_ Aberdeen,
London, 1848, p. 44. — _Ed._], for the landlord was simultaneously a
capitalist, just as Cato, for instance, was on his estates. But this
separation is precisely the prerequisite for the capitalist mode of
production, to whose conception the basis of slavery moreover stands in
direct contradiction.

43. Herr Mommsen, in his "Roman History," by no means uses the term
capitalist in the sense employed by modern economics and modern society,
but rather in the manner of popular conception, such as still continues
to thrive, though not in England or America, but nevertheless on the
European continent, as an ancient tradition reflecting bygone
conditions.

44. Following the conquest of a country, the immediate aim of a
conqueror was also to convert its people to his own use. Cf. Linguet
[_Théorie des loi civiles, ou Principes fondamentaux de la société,_
Tomes I-II, Londres, 1767. — _Ed._]. See also Möser [_Osnabrükische
Geschichte,_ 1. Theil, Berlin und Stettin, S. 178. — _Ed._].

44a. Cf Buvet [_Cours d’économie politique,_ Bruxelles, 1842. — _Ed._]
Tocqueville [_L’ancien régime et la révolution,_ Paris, 1856. — _Ed._],
Sismondi [_Nouveaux principes d’économie politique. — Seconde édition,_
Tome I, Paris, 1827. — _Ed._]

45. See the speech from the throne of the King of France in Tooke.
[New-march, _A History of Prices, and of the State of the Circulation,
during the nine years 1848-56,_ Vol. VI, London. 1857, pp. 29-30. —
_Ed._]

46. See Mounier [_De l’agriculture en France,_ Paris, 1846. — _Ed._] and
Rubichon [_Du méchanisme de la société en France et en Angleterre,_
Paris. 1837. — _Ed_.].

47. Dr. H. Maron _(Extensiv oder Intensiv?_) [no further information
given about this pamphlet] starts from the false assumption of the
adversaries he opposes. He assumes that capital invested in the purchase
of land is "investment capital," and then engages in a controversy about
the respective definitions of investment capital and working capital,
that is, fixed and circulating capital. His wholly amateurish
conceptions of capital in general, which may be excused incidentally in
one who is not an economist in view of the state of German political
economy, conceal from him that this capital is neither investment nor
working capital, any more than the capital which someone invests at the
Stock Exchange in purchasing stocks or government securities, and which,
for him, represents a personal investment of capital, is "invested" in
any branch of production.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III



PART VII. REVENUES AND THEIR SOURCES


Chapter 48. The Trinity Formula

 

I ^([48])

Capital — profit (profit of enterprise plus interest), land —
ground-rent, labour — wages, this is the trinity formula which comprises
all the secrets of the social production process.

Furthermore, since as previously [Present edition: Ch. XXIII. — _Ed._]
demonstrated interest appears as the specific characteristic product of
capital and profit of enterprise on the contrary appears as wages
independent of capital, the above trinity formula reduces itself more
specifically to the following:

Capital — interest, land — ground-rent, labour — wages, where profit,
the specific characteristic form of surplus-value belonging to the
capitalist mode of production, is fortunately eliminated.

On closer examination of this economic trinity, we find the following:

First, the alleged sources of the annually available wealth belong to
widely dissimilar spheres and are not at all analogous with one another.
They have about the same relation to each other as lawyer’s fees, red
beets and music.

Capital, land, labour! However, capital is not a thing, but rather a
definite social production relation, belonging to a definite historical
formation of society, which is manifested in a thing and lends this
thing a specific social character. Capital is not the sum of the
material and produced means of production. Capital is rather the means
of production transformed into capital, which in themselves are no more
capital than gold or silver in itself is money. It is the means of
production monopolised by a certain section of society, confronting
living labour-power as products and working conditions rendered
independent of this very labour-power, which are personified through
this antithesis in capital. It is not merely the products of labourers
turned into independent powers, products as rulers and buyers of their
producers, but rather also the social forces and the future [?
illegible] [A later collation with the manuscript showed that the text
reads as follows: "die Gesellschaftlichen Kräfte und Zusammenhängende
Form dieser Arbeit" (the social forces of their labour and socialised
form of this labour). — _Ed._] form of this labour, which confront the
labourers as properties of their products. Here, then, we have a
definite and, at first glance, very mystical, social form, of one of the
factors in a historically produced social production process.

And now alongside of this we have the land, inorganic nature as such,
_rudis indigestaque moles,_ ["A rude and undigested mass", Ovid,
_Metamorphoses,_ Book I, 7. — _Ed_] in all its primeval wildness. Value
is labour. Therefore surplus-value cannot be earth. Absolute fertility
of the soil effects nothing more than the following: a certain quantity
of labour produces a certain product — in accordance with the natural
fertility of the soil. The difference in soil fertility causes the same
quantities of labour and capital, hence the same value, to be manifested
in different quantities of agricultural products; that is, causes these
products to have different individual values. The equalisation of these
individual values into market-values is responsible for the fact that
the

"advantages of fertile over inferior soil ... are transferred from the
cultivator or consumer to the landlord". (Ricardo, _Principles,_ London,
1821, p.62.)

And finally, as third party in this union, a mere ghost — "the" Labour,
which is no more than an abstraction and taken by itself does not exist
at all, or, if we take... [illegible] [As has been established by later
reading of the manuscript, it reads here: "wenn wir das Gemeinte nehmen"
(if we take that which is behind it). — _Ed_.], the productive activity
of human beings in general, by which they promote the interchange with
Nature, divested not only of every social form and well-defined
character, but even in its bare natural existence, independent of
society, removed from all societies, and as an expression and
confirmation of life which the still non-social man in general has in
common with the one who is in any way social.

II

Capital — interest; landed property, private ownership of the Earth,
and, to be sure, modern and corresponding to the capitalist mode of
production — rent; wage-labour — wages. The connection between the
sources of revenue is supposed to be represented in this form.
Wage-labour and landed property, like capital, are historically
determined social forms; one of labour, the other of monopolised
terrestrial globe, and indeed both forms corresponding to capital and
belonging to the same economic formation of society.

The first striking thing about this formula is that side by side with
capital, with this form of an element of production belonging to a
definite mode of production, to a definite historical form of social
process of production, side by side with an element of production
amalgamated with and represented by a definite social form are
indiscriminately placed: the land on the one hand and labour on the
other, two elements of the real labour process, which in this material
form are common to all modes of production, which are the material
elements of every process of production and have nothing to do with its
social form.

Secondly. In the formula: capital — interest, land — ground-rent, labour
— wages, capital, land and labour appear respectively as sources of
interest (instead of profit), ground-rent and wages, as their products,
or fruits; the former are the basis, the latter the consequence, the
former are the cause, the latter the effect; and indeed, in such a
manner that each individual source is related to its product as to that
which is ejected and produced by it. All the proceeds, interest (instead
of profit), rent, and wages, are three components of the value of the
products, i.e., generally speaking, components of value or expressed in
money, certain money components, price components. The formula: capital
— interest is now indeed the most meaningless formula of capital, but
still one of its formulas. But how should land create value, i.e., a
socially defined quantity of labour, and moreover that particular
portion of the value of its own products which forms the rent? Land,
e.g., takes part as an agent of production in creating a use-value, a
material product, wheat. But it has nothing to do with the production of
the _value of wheat._ In so far as value is represented by wheat, the
latter is merely considered as a definite quantity of materialised
social labour, regardless of the particular substance in which this
labour is manifested or of the particular use-value of this substance.
This nowise contradicts that 1) other circumstances being equal, the
cheapness or dearness of wheat depends upon the productivity of the
soil. The productivity of agricultural labour is dependent on natural
conditions, and the same quantity of labour is represented by more or
fewer products, use-values, in accordance with such productivity. How
large the quantity of labour represented in one bushel of wheat depends
upon the number of bushels yielded by the same quantity of labour. It
depends, in this case, upon the soil productivity in what quantities of
product the value shall be manifested. But this value is given,
independent of this distribution. Value is represented in use-value; and
use-value is a prerequisite for the creation of value; but it is folly
to create an antithesis by placing a use-value, like land, on one side
and on the other side value, and a particular portion of value at that.
2)... [here the manuscript breaks off].

III

Vulgar economy actually does no more than interpret, systematise and
defend in doctrinaire fashion the conceptions of the agents of bourgeois
production who are entrapped in bourgeois production relations. It
should not astonish us, then, that vulgar economy feels particularly at
home in the estranged outward appearances of economic relations in which
these _prima facie_ absurd and perfect contradictions appear and that
these relations seem the more self-evident the more their internal
relationships are concealed from it, although they are understandable to
the popular mind. But all science would be superfluous if the outward
appearance and the essence of things directly coincided. Thus, vulgar
economy has not the slightest suspicion that the trinity which it takes
as its point of departure, namely, land — rent, capital — interest,
labour — wages or the price of labour, are _prima facie_ three
impossible combinations. First we have the use-value _land,_ which has
no value, and the exchange-value _rent:_ so that a social relation
conceived as a thing is made proportional to Nature, i.e., two
incommensurable magnitudes are supposed to stand in a given ratio to one
another. Then _capital — interest._ If capital is conceived as a certain
sum of values represented independently by money, then it is _prima
facie_ nonsense to say that a certain value should be worth more than it
is worth. It is precisely in the form: capital — interest that all
intermediate links are eliminated, and capital is reduced to its most
general formula, which therefore in itself is also inexplicable and
absurd. The vulgar economist prefers the formula capital — interest,
with its occult quality of making a value unequal to itself, to the
formula capital — profit, precisely for the reason that this already
more nearly approaches actual capitalist relations. Then again, driven
by the disturbing thought that 4 is not 5 and that 100 taler cannot
possibly be 110 taler, he flees from capital as value to the material
substance of capital; to its use-value as a condition of production of
labour, to machinery, raw materials, etc. Thus, he is able once more to
substitute in place of the first incomprehensible relation, whereby 4 =
5, a wholly incommensurable one between a use-value, a thing on one
side, and a definite social production relation, surplus-value, on the
other, as in the case of landed property. As soon as the vulgar
economist arrives at this incommensurable relation, everything becomes
clear to him, and he no longer feels the need for further thought. For
he has arrived precisely at the "rational" in bourgeois conception.
Finally, _labour — wages,_ or price of labour, is an expression, as
shown in Book I, which _prima facie_ contradicts the conception of value
as well as of price — the latter generally being but a definite
expression of value. And "price of labour" is just as irrational as a
yellow logarithm. But here the vulgar economist is all the more
satisfied, because he has gained the profound insight of the bourgeois,
namely, that he pays money for labour, and since precisely the
contradiction between the formula and the conception of value relieves
him from all obligation to understand the latter.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

We ^([49]) have seen that the capitalist process of production is a
historically determined form of the social process of production in
general. The latter is as much a production process of material
conditions of human life as a process taking place under specific
historical and economic production relations, producing and reproducing
these production relations themselves, and thereby also the bearers of
this process, their material conditions of existence and their mutual
relations, i.e., their particular socio-economic form. For the aggregate
of these relations, in which the agents of this production stand with
respect to Nature and to one another, and in which they produce, is
precisely society, considered from the standpoint of its economic
structure. Like all its predecessors, the capitalist process of
production proceeds under definite material conditions, which are,
however, simultaneously the bearers of definite social relations entered
into by individuals in the process of reproducing their life. Those
conditions, like these relations, are on the one hand prerequisites, on
the other hand results and creations of the capitalist process of
production; they are produced and reproduced by it. We saw also that
capital — and the capitalist is merely capital personified and functions
in the process of production solely as the agent of capital — in its
corresponding social process of production, pumps a definite quantity of
surplus-labour out of the direct producers, or labourers; capital
obtains this surplus-labour without an equivalent, and in essence it
always remains forced labour — no matter how much it may seem to result
from free contractual agreement. This surplus-labour appears as
surplus-value, and this surplus-value exists as a surplus-product.
Surplus-labour in general, as labour performed over and above the given
requirements, must always remain. In the capitalist as well as in the
slave system, etc., it merely assumes an antagonistic form and is
supplemented by complete idleness of a stratum of society. A definite
quantity of surplus-labour is required as insurance against accidents,
and by the necessary and progressive expansion of the process of
reproduction in keeping with the development of the needs and the growth
of population, which is called accumulation from the viewpoint of the
capitalist. It is one of the civilising aspects of capital that it
enforces this surplus-labour in a manner and under conditions which are
more advantageous to the development of the productive forces, social
relations, and the creation of the elements for a new and higher form
than under the preceding forms of slavery, serfdom, etc. Thus it gives
rise to a stage, on the one hand, in which coercion and monopolisation
of social development (including its material and intellectual
advantages) by one portion of society at the expense of the other are
eliminated; on the other hand, it creates the material means and
embryonic conditions, making it possible in a higher form of society to
combine this surplus-labour with a greater reduction of time devoted to
material labour in general. For, depending on the development of labour
productivity, surplus-labour may be large in a small total working-day,
and relatively small in a large total working-day. If the necessary
labour-time = 3 and the surplus-labour = 3, then the total working-day =
6 and the rate of surplus-labour = 100%. If the necessary labour = 9 and
the surplus-labour = 3, then the total working-day = 12 and the rate of
surplus-labour only = 33⅓%. In that case, it depends upon the labour
productivity how much use-value shall be produced in a definite time,
hence also in a definite surplus labour-time. The actual wealth of
society, and the possibility of constantly expanding its reproduction
process, therefore, do not depend upon the duration of surplus-labour,
but upon its productivity and the more or less copious conditions of
production under which it is performed. In fact, the realm of freedom
actually begins only where labour which is determined by necessity and
mundane considerations ceases; thus in the very nature of things it lies
beyond the sphere of actual material production. Just as the savage must
wrestle with Nature to satisfy his wants, to maintain and reproduce
life, so must civilised man, and he must do so in all social formations
and under all possible modes of production. With his development this
realm of physical necessity expands as a result of his wants; but, at
the same time, the forces of production which satisfy these wants also
increase. Freedom in this field can only consist in socialised man, the
associated producers, rationally regulating their interchange with
Nature, bringing it under their common control, instead of being ruled
by it as by the blind forces of Nature; and achieving this with the
least expenditure of energy and under conditions most favourable to, and
worthy of, their human nature. But it nonetheless still remains a realm
of necessity. Beyond it begins that development of human energy which is
an end in itself, the true realm of freedom, which, however, can blossom
forth only with this realm of necessity as its basis. The shortening of
the working-day is its basic prerequisite.

In a capitalist society, this surplus-value, or this surplus-product
(leaving aside chance fluctuations in its distribution and considering
only its regulating law, its standardising limits), is divided among
capitalists as dividends proportionate to the share of the social
capital each holds. In this form surplus-value appears as average profit
which falls to the share of capital, an average profit which in turn
divides into profit of enterprise and interest, and which under these
two categories may fall into the laps of different kinds of capitalists.
This appropriation and distribution of surplus-value, or
surplus-product, on the part of capital, however, has its barrier in
landed property. Just as the operating capitalist pumps surplus-labour,
and thereby surplus value and surplus-product in the form of profit, out
of the labourer, so the landlord in turn pumps a portion of this
surplus-value, or surplus-product, out of the capitalist in the form of
rent in accordance with the laws already elaborated.

Hence, when speaking here of profit as that portion of surplus-value
falling to the share of capital, we mean average profit (equal to profit
of enterprise plus interest) which is already limited by the deduction
of rent from the aggregate profit (identical in mass with aggregate
surplus-value); the deduction of rent is assumed. Profit of capital
(profit of enterprise plus interest) and ground-rent are thus no more
than particular components of surplus-value, categories by which
surplus-value is differentiated depending on whether it falls to the
share of capital or landed property, headings which in no whit however
alter its nature. Added together, these form the sum of social
surplus-value. Capital pumps the surplus-labour, which is represented by
surplus-value and surplus-product, directly out of the labourers. Thus,
in this sense, it may be regarded as the producer of surplus-value.
Landed property has nothing to do with the actual process of production.
Its role is confined to transferring a portion of the produced
surplus-value from the pockets of capital to its own. However, the
landlord plays a role in the capitalist process of production not merely
through the pressure he exerts upon capital, nor merely because large
landed property is a prerequisite and condition of capitalist production
since it is a prerequisite and condition of the expropriation of the
labourer from the means of production, but particularly because he
appears as the personification of one of the most essential conditions
of production.

Finally, the labourer in the capacity of owner and seller of his
individual labour-power receives a portion of the product under the
label of wages, in which that portion of his labour appears which we
call necessary labour, i.e., that required for the maintenance and
reproduction of this labour-power, be the conditions of this maintenance
and reproduction scanty or bountiful, favourable or unfavourable.

Whatever may be the disparity of these relations in other respects, they
all have this in common: Capital yields a profit year after year to the
capitalist, land a ground-rent to the landlord, and labour-power, under
normal conditions and so long as it remains useful labour-power, a wage
to the labourer. These three portions of total value annually produced,
and the corresponding portions of the annually created total product
(leaving aside for the present any consideration of accumulation), may
be annually consumed by their respective owners, without exhausting the
source of their reproduction. They are like the annually consumable
fruits of a perennial tree, or rather three trees; they form the annual
incomes of three classes, capitalist, landowner and labourer, revenues
distributed by the functioning capitalist in his capacity as direct
extorter of surplus-labour and employer of labour in general. Thus,
capital appears to the capitalist, land to the landlord, and
labour-power, or rather labour itself, to the labourer (since he
actually sells labour-power only as it is manifested, and since the
price of labour-power, as previously shown, inevitably appears as the
price of labour under the capitalist mode of production), as three
different sources of their specific revenues, namely, profit,
ground-rent and wages. They are really so in the sense that capital is a
perennial pumping-machine of surplus-labour for the capitalist, land a
perennial magnet for the landlord, attracting a portion of the
surplus-value pumped out by capital, and finally, labour the constantly
self-renewing condition and ever self-renewing means of acquiring under
the title of wages a portion of the value created by the labourer and
thus a part of the social product measured by this portion of value,
i.e., the necessities of life. They are so, furthermore, in the sense
that capital fixes a portion of the value and thereby of the product of
the annual labour in the form of profit; landed property fixes another
portion in the form of rent; and wage-labour fixes a third portion in
the form of wages, and precisely by this transformation converts them
into revenues of the capitalist, landowner, and labourer, without,
however, creating the substance itself which is transformed into these
various categories. The distribution rather presupposes the existence of
this substance, namely, the total value of the annual product, which is
nothing but materialised social labour. Nevertheless, it is not in this
form that the matter appears to the agents of production, the bearers of
the various functions in the production process, but rather in a
distorted form. Why this takes place will be developed in the further
course of our analysis. Capital landed property and labour appear to
those agents of production as three different, independent sources, from
which as such there arise three different components of the annually
produced value — and thereby the product in which it exists; thus, from
which there arise not merely the different forms of this value as
revenues falling to the share of particular factors in the social
process of production, but from which this value itself arises, and
thereby the substance of these forms of revenue.

[Here one folio sheet of the manuscript is missing.]

... Differential rent is bound up with the relative soil fertility, in
other words, with properties arising from the soil as such. But, in the
first place, in so far as it is based upon the different individual
values of the products of different soil types, it is but the
determination just mentioned; secondly, in so far as it is based upon
the regulating general market-value, which differs from these individual
values, it is a social law carried through by means of competition,
which has to do neither with the soil nor the different degrees of its
fertility.

It might seem as if a rational relation were expressed at least in
"labour — wages." But this is no more the case than with "land —
ground-rent." In so far as labour is value-creating, and is manifested
in the value of commodities, it has nothing to do with the distribution
of this value among various categories. In so far as it has the
specifically social character of wage-labour, it is not value-creating.
It has already been shown in general that wages of labour, or price of
labour, is but an irrational expression for the value, or price of
labour-power; and the specific social conditions, under which this
labour-power is sold, have nothing to do with labour as a general agent
in production. Labour is also materialised in that value component of a
commodity which as wages forms the price of labour-power; it creates
this portion just as much as the other portions of the product; but it
is materialised in this portion no more and no differently than in the
portions forming rent or profit. And, in general, when we establish
labour as value-creating, we do not consider it in its concrete form as
a condition of production, but in its social delimitation which differs
from that of wage-labour.

Even the expression "capital — profit" is incorrect here. If capital is
viewed in the only relation in which it produces surplus-value, namely,
its relation to the labourer whereby it extorts surplus-labour by
compulsion exerted upon labour-power, i.e., the wage-labourer, then this
surplus-value comprises, outside of profit (profit of enterprise plus
interest), also rent, in short the entire undivided surplus-value. Here,
on the other hand, as a source of revenue, it is placed only in relation
to that portion falling to the share of the capitalist. This is not the
surplus-value which it extracts generally but only that portion which it
extracts for the capitalist. Still more does all connection vanish no
sooner the formula is transformed into "capital — interest."

If we at first considered the disparity of the above three sources, we
now note that their products, their offshoots, or revenues, on the other
band, all belong to the same sphere, that of value. However, this is
compensated for (this relation not only between incommensurable
magnitudes, but also between wholly unlike, mutually unrelated, and
non-comparable things) in that capital, like land and labour, is simply
considered as a material substance, that is, simply as a produced means
of production, and thus is abstracted both as a relation to the labourer
and as value.

Thirdly, if understood in this way, the formula, capital — interest
(profit), land — rent, labour — wages, presents a uniform and
symmetrical incongruity. In fact, since wage-labour does not appear as a
socially determined form of labour, but rather all labour appears by its
nature as wage-labour (thus appearing to those in the grip of capitalist
production relations), the definite specific social forms assumed by the
material conditions of labour — the produced means of production and the
land — with respect to wage-labour (just as they, in turn, conversely
presuppose wage-labour), directly coincide with the material existence
of these conditions of labour or with the form possessed by them
generally in the actual labour-process, independent of its concrete
historically determined social form, or indeed independent of _any_
social form. The changed form of the conditions of labour, i. e.,
alienated from labour and confronting it independently, whereby the
produced means of production are thus transformed into capital, and the
land into monopolised land, or landed property — this form belonging to
a definite historical period thereby coincides with the existence and
function of the produced means of production and of the land in the
process of production in general. These means of production are in
themselves capital by nature; capital is merely an "economic
appellation" for these means of production; and so, in itself land is by
nature the earth monopolised by a certain number of landowners. Just as
products confront the producer as an independent force in capital and
capitalists — who actually are but the personification of capital — so
land becomes personified in the landlord and likewise gets on its hind
legs to demand, as an independent force, its share of the product
created with its help. Thus, not the land receives its due portion of
the product for the restoration and improvement of its productivity, but
instead the landlord takes a share of this product to chaffer away or
squander. It is clear that capital presupposes labour as wage-labour.
But it is just as clear that if labour as wage-labour is taken as the
point of departure, so that the identity of labour in general with
wage-labour appears to be self-evident, then capital and monopolised
land must also appear as the natural form of the conditions of labour in
relation to labour in general. To be capital, then, appears as the
natural form of the means of labour and thereby as the purely real
character arising from their function in the labour-process in general.
Capital and produced means of production thus become identical terms.
Similarly, land and land monopolised through private ownership become
identical. The means of labour as such, which are by nature capital,
thus become the source of profit, much as the land as such becomes the
source of rent.

Labour as such, in its simple capacity as purposive productive activity,
relates to the means of production, not in their social determinate
form, but rather in their concrete substance, as material and means of
labour; the latter likewise are distinguished from one another merely
materially, as use-values, i.e., the land as unproduced, the others as
produced, means of labour. If, then, labour coincides with wage-labour,
so does the particular social form in which the conditions of labour
confront labour coincide with their material existence. The means of
labour as such are then capital, and the land as such is landed
property. The formal independence of these conditions of labour in
relation to labour, the unique form of this independence with respect to
wage-labour, is then a property inseparable from them as things, as
material conditions of production, an inherent, immanent, intrinsic
character of them as elements of production. Their definite social
character in the process of capitalist production bearing the stamp of a
definite historical epoch is a natural, and intrinsic substantive
character belonging to them, as it were, from time immemorial, as
elements of the production process. Therefore, the respective part
played by the earth as the original field of activity of labour, as the
realm of forces of Nature, as the pre-existing arsenal of all objects of
labour, and the other respective part played by the produced means of
production (instruments, raw materials, etc.) in the general process of
production, must seem to be expressed in the respective shares claimed
by them as capital and landed property, i.e., which fall to the share of
their social representatives in the form of profit (interest) and rent,
like to the labourer — the part his labour plays in the process of
production is expressed in wages. Rent, profit and wages thus seem to
grow out of the role played by the land, produced means of production,
and labour in the simple labour-process, even when we consider this
labour-process as one carried on merely between man and Nature, leaving
aside any historical determination. It is merely the same thing again,
in another form, when it is argued: the product in which a
wage-labourer’s labour for himself is manifested, his proceeds or
revenue, is simply wages, the portion of value (and thereby the social
product measured by this value) which his wages represent. Thus, if
wage-labour coincides with labour generally, then so do wages with the
produce of labour, and the value portion representing wages with the
value created by labour generally. But in this way the other portions of
value, profit and rent also appear independent with respect to wages,
and must arise from sources of their own, which are specifically
different and independent of labour; they must arise from the
participating elements of production, to the share of whose owners they
fall; i.e., profit arises from the means of production, the material
elements of capital, and rent arises from the land, or Nature, as
represented by the landlord (Roscher). [Roscher, _System der
Volkswirtschaft,_ Band I, _Die Grundlagen der Nationalökonomie,_
Stuttgart und Augsburg, 1858_. — Ed._]

Landed property, capital and wage-labour are thus transformed from
sources of revenue — in the sense that capital attracts to the
capitalist, in the form of profit, a portion of the surplus-value
extracted by him from labour, that monopoly in land attracts for the
landlord another portion in the form of rent; and that labour grants the
labourer the remaining portion of value in the form of wages — from
sources by means of which one portion of value is transformed into the
form of profit, another into the form of rent, and a third into the form
of wages — into actual sources from which these value portions and
respective portions of the product in which they exist, or for which
they are exchangeable, arise themselves, and from which, therefore, in
the final analysis, the value of the product itself arises.^([50])

In the case of the simplest categories of the capitalist mode of
production, and even of commodity-production, in the case of commodities
and money, we have already pointed out the mystifying character that
transforms the social relations, for which the material elements of
wealth serve as bearers in production, into properties of these things
themselves (commodities) and still more pronouncedly transforms the
production relation itself into a thing (money). All forms of society,
in so far as they reach the stage of commodity-production and money
circulation, take part in this perversion. But under the capitalist mode
of production and in the case of capital, which forms its dominant
category, its determining production relation, this enchanted and
perverted world develops still more. If one considers capital, to begin
with, in the actual process of production as a means of extracting
surplus-labour, then this relationship is still very simple, and the
actual connection impresses itself upon the bearers of this process, the
capitalists themselves, and remains in their consciousness. The violent
struggle over the limits of the working-day demonstrates this
strikingly. But even within this non-mediated sphere, the sphere of
direct action between labour and capital, matters do not rest in this
simplicity. With the development of relative surplus-value in the actual
specifically capitalist mode of production, whereby the productive
powers of social labour are developed, these productive powers and the
social interrelations of labour in the direct labour-process seem
transferred from labour to capital. Capital thus becomes a very mystic
being since all of labour’s social productive forces appear to be due to
capital, rather than labour as such, and seem to issue from the womb of
capital itself. Then the process of circulation intervenes, with its
changes of substance and form, on which all parts of capital, even
agricultural capital, devolve to the same degree that the specifically
capitalist mode of production develops. This is a sphere where the
relations under which value is originally produced are pushed completely
into the background. In the direct process of production the capitalist
already acts simultaneously as producer of commodities and manager of
commodity-production. Hence this process of production appears to him by
no means simply as a process of producing surplus-value. But whatever
may be the surplus-value extorted by capital in the actual production
process and appearing in commodities, the value and surplus-value
contained in the commodities must first be realised in the circulation
process. And both the restitution of the values advanced in production
and, particularly, the surplus-value contained in the commodities seem
not merely to be realised in the circulation, but actually to arise from
it; an appearance which is especially reinforced by two circumstances:
first, the profit made in selling depends on cheating, deceit, inside
knowledge, skill and a thousand favourable market opportunities; and
then by the circumstance that added here to labour-time is a second
determining element — time of circulation. This acts, in fact, only as a
negative barrier against the formation of value and surplus-value, but
it has the appearance of being as definite a basis as labour itself and
of introducing a determining element that is independent of labour and
resulting from the nature of capital. In Book II we naturally had to
present this sphere of circulation merely with reference to the form
determinations which it created and to demonstrate the further
development of the structure of capital taking place in this sphere. But
in reality this sphere is the sphere of competition, which, considered
in each individual case, is dominated by chance; where, then, the inner
law, which prevails in these accidents and regulates them, is only
visible when these accidents are grouped together in large numbers,
where it remains, therefore, invisible and unintelligible to the
individual agents in production. But furthermore: the actual process of
production, as a unity of the direct production process and the
circulation process, gives rise to new formations, in which the vein of
internal connections is increasingly lost, the production relations are
rendered independent of one another, and the component values become
ossified into forms independent of one another.

The conversion of surplus-value into profit, as we have seen, is
determined as much by the process of circulation as by the process of
production. Surplus-value, in the form of profit, is no longer related
back to that portion of capital invested in labour from which it arises,
but to the total capital. The rate of profit is regulated by laws of its
own, which permit, or even require, it to change while the rate of
surplus-value remains unaltered. All this obscures more and more the
true nature of surplus-value and thus the actual mechanism of capital.
Still more is this achieved through the transformation of profit into
average profit and of values into prices of production, into the
regulating averages of market-prices. A complicated social process
intervenes here, the equalisation process of capitals, which divorces
the relative average prices of the commodities from their values, as
well as the average profits in the various spheres of production (quite
aside from the individual investments of capital in each particular
sphere of production) from the actual exploitation of labour by the
particular capitals. Not only does it appear so, but it is true in fact
that the average price of commodities differs from their value, thus
from the labour realised in them, and the average profit of a particular
capital differs from the surplus-value which this capital has extracted
from the labourers employed by it. The value of commodities appears,
directly, solely in the influence of fluctuating productivity of labour
upon the rise and fall of the prices of production, upon their movement
and not upon their ultimate limits. Profit seems to be determined only
secondarily by direct exploitation of labour, in so far as the latter
permits the capitalist to realise a profit deviating from the average
profit at the regulating market-prices, which apparently prevail
independent of such exploitation. Normal average profits themselves seem
immanent in capital and independent of exploitation; abnormal
exploitation, or even average exploitation under favourable, exceptional
conditions, seems to determine only the deviations from average profit,
not this profit itself. The division of profit into profit of enterprise
and interest (not to mention the intervention of commercial profit and
profit from money-dealing, which are founded upon circulation and appear
to arise completely from it, and not from the process of production
itself) consummates the individualisation of the form of surplus-value,
the ossification of its form as opposed to its substance, its essence.
One portion of profit, as opposed to the other, separates itself
entirely from the relationship of capital as such and appears as arising
not out of the function of exploiting wage-labour, but out of the
wage-labour of the capitalist himself. In contrast thereto, interest
then seems to be independent both of the labourer’s wage-labour and the
capitalist’s own labour, and to arise from capital as its own
independent source. If capital originally appeared on the surface of
circulation as a fetishism of capital, as a value-creating value, so it
now appears again in the form of interest-bearing capital, as in its
most estranged and characteristic form. Wherefore also the formula
capital — interest, as the third to land — rent and labour — wages, is
much more consistent than capital — profit, since in profit there still
remains a recollection of its origin, which is not only extinguished in
interest, but is also placed in a form thoroughly antithetical to this
origin.

Finally, capital as an independent source of surplus-value is joined by
landed property, which acts as a barrier to average profit and transfers
a portion of surplus-value to a class that neither works itself, nor
directly exploits labour, nor can find morally edifying
rationalisations, as in the case of interest-bearing capital, e.g., risk
and sacrifice of lending capital to others. Since here a part of the
surplus-value seems to be bound up directly with a natural element, the
land, rather than with social relations, the form of mutual estrangement
and ossification of the various parts of surplus-value is completed, the
inner connection completely disrupted, and its source entirely buried,
precisely because the relations of production, which are bound to the
various material elements of the production process, have been rendered
mutually independent.

In capital — profit, or still better capital — interest, land — rent,
labour — wages, in this economic trinity represented as the connection
between the component parts of value and wealth in general and its
sources, we have the complete mystification of the capitalist mode of
production, the conversion of social relations into things, the direct
coalescence of the material production relations with their historical
and social determination. It is an enchanted, perverted, topsy-turvy
world, in which Monsieur le Capital and Madame la Terre do their
ghost-walking as social characters and at the same time directly as mere
things. It is the great merit of classical economy to have destroyed
this false appearance and illusion, this mutual independence and
ossification of the various social elements of wealth, this
personification of things and conversion of production relations into
entities, this religion of everyday life. It did so by reducing interest
to a portion of profit, and rent to the surplus above average profit, so
that both of them converge in surplus-value; and by representing the
process of circulation as a mere metamorphosis of forms, and finally
reducing value and surplus-value of commodities to labour in the direct
production process. Nevertheless even the best spokesmen of classical
economy remain more or less in the grip of the world of illusion which
their criticism had dissolved, as cannot be otherwise from a bourgeois
standpoint, and thus they all fall more or less into inconsistencies,
half-truths and unsolved contradictions. On the other hand, it is just
as natural for the actual agents of production to feel completely at
home in these estranged and irrational forms of capital — interest, land
— rent, labour — wages, since these are precisely the forms of illusion
in which they move about and find their daily occupation. It is
therefore just as natural that vulgar economy, which is no more than a
didactic, more or less dogmatic, translation of everyday conceptions of
the actual agents of production, and which arranges them in a certain
rational order, should see precisely in this trinity, which is devoid of
all inner connection, the natural and indubitable lofty basis for its
shallow pompousness. This formula simultaneously corresponds to the
interests of the ruling classes by proclaiming the physical necessity
and eternal justification of their sources of revenue and elevating them
to a dogma.

In our description of how production relations are converted into
entities and rendered independent in relation to the agents of
production, we leave aside the manner in which the interrelations, due
to the world-market, its conjunctures, movements of market-prices,
periods of credit, industrial and commercial cycles, alternations of
prosperity and crisis, appear to them as overwhelming natural laws that
irresistibly enforce their will over them, and confront them as blind
necessity. We leave this aside because the actual movement of
competition belongs beyond our scope, and we need present only the inner
organisation of the capitalist mode of production, in its ideal average,
as it were.

In preceding forms of society this economic mystification arose
principally with respect to money and interest-bearing capital. In the
nature of things it is excluded, in the first place, where production
for the use-value, for immediate personal requirements, predominates;
and, secondly, where slavery or serfdom form the broad foundation of
social production, as in antiquity and during the Middle Ages. Here, the
domination of the producers by the conditions of production is concealed
by the relations of dominion and servitude, which appear and are evident
as the direct motive power of the process of production. In early
communal societies in which primitive communism prevailed, and even in
the ancient communal towns, it was this communal society itself with its
conditions which appeared as the basis of production, and its
reproduction appeared as its ultimate purpose. Even in the medieval
guild system neither capital nor labour appear untrammelled, but their
relations are rather defined by the corporate rules, and by the same
associated relations, and corresponding conceptions of professional
duty, craftsmanship, etc. Only when the capitalist mode of production —
[The manuscript breaks off here — _Ed._]

Notes

48. The following three fragments were found in different parts of the
manuscript for Part VI. — _F. E._

49. Beginning of Chapter XLVIII according to the manuscript. — _F. E._

50. Wages, profit, and rent are the three original sources of all
revenue, as well as of all exchangeable value (A. Smith) [_An Inquiry
into the Nature and Causes of the Wealth of Nations,_ Aberdeen, London,
1848, S. 43. — _Ed._] — It is thus that the causes of material
production are at the same time the sources of the original revenues
which exist. (Storch [_Cours d’économie politique,_ St.-Pétersbourg,
1815. — _Ed._], I, p. 259. — _Ed._)

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 49. Concerning the Analysis of the Process of Production

 

For the purposes of the following analysis we may leave out of
consideration the distinction between price of production and value,
since this distinction disappears altogether when, as here, the value of
the total annual product of labour is considered, i.e., the product of
the total social capital.

Profit (profit of enterprise plus interest) and rent are nothing but
peculiar forms assumed by particular parts of the surplus-value of
commodities. The magnitude of surplus-value is the limit of the total
size of the parts into which it may be divided. Average profit plus rent
are, therefore, equal to the surplus-value. It is possible for part of
the surplus-labour, and thus surplus-value, contained in the
commodities, not to take part directly in the equalisation of an average
profit, so that part of the commodity-value is not expressed at all in
its price. But first, this is balanced either by the fact that the rate
of profit increases, when the commodities sold below their value form an
element of the constant capital, or by profit and rent being represented
by a larger product, when commodities sold below their value enter into
the portion of value consumed as revenue in the form of articles for
individual consumption. Secondly, this is eliminated in the average
movement. At any rate, even if a portion of surplus-value not expressed
in the price of the commodity is lost for the price formation, the sum
of average profit plus rent in its normal form can never be larger than
the total surplus-value, although it may be smaller. Its normal form
presupposes wages corresponding to the value of labour-power. Even
monopoly rent, in so far as it is not a deduction from wages, i.e., does
not constitute a special category, must always indirectly be a part of
the surplus-value. If it is not part of the price excess above the price
of production of the commodity itself, of which it is a constituent part
(as in differential rent), or an excess portion of the surplus-value of
the commodity itself, of which it is a constituent part, above that
portion of its own surplus-value measured by the average profit (as in
absolute rent), it is at least part of the surplus-value of other
commodities, i.e., of commodities which are exchanged for this commodity
having a monopoly price. The sum of average profit plus ground-rent can
never be greater than the magnitude of which they are components and
which exists before this division. It is therefore immaterial for our
discussion whether the entire surplus-value of the commodities, i.e.,
all the surplus-labour contained in the commodities, is realised in
their price or not. The surplus-labour is not entirely realised if only
for the reason that due to a continual change in the amount of labour
socially necessary to produce a certain commodity, resulting from the
constant change in the productiveness of labour, some commodities are
always produced under abnormal conditions and must, therefore, be sold
below their individual value. At any rate, profit plus rent equal the
total realised surplus-value (surplus-labour), and for purposes of this
discussion the realised surplus-value may be equated to all
surplus-value; for profit and rent are realised surplus-value, or,
generally speaking, the surplus-value which passes into the prices of
commodities, thus in practice all the surplus-value forming a
constituent part of this price.

On the other hand, wages, which form the third specific form of revenue,
are always equal to the variable component part of capital, i.e., the
component part which is laid out in purchasing living labour-power,
paying labourers rather than in means of labour. (The labour which is
paid in the expenditure of revenue is itself paid in wages, profit, or
rent, and therefore does not form any value portion of commodities by
which it is paid. Hence it is not considered in the analysis of
commodity-value and of the component parts into which it is divided.) It
is the materialisation of that portion of the total working-day of the
labourer in which the value of variable capital and thus the price of
labour is reproduced; that portion of commodity-value in which the
labourer reproduces the value of his own labour-power, or the price of
his labour. The total working-day of the labourer is divided into two
parts. One portion in which he performs the amount of labour necessary
to reproduce the value of his own means of subsistence; the paid portion
of his total labour, the portion necessary for his own maintenance and
reproduction. The entire remaining portion of the working-day, the
entire excess quantity of labour performed above the value of the labour
realised in his wages, is surplus-labour, unpaid labour, represented in
the surplus-value of his total commodity-production (and thus in an
excess quantity of commodities), surplus-value which in turn is divided
into differently named parts, into profit (profit of enterprise plus
interest) and rent.

The entire value portion of commodities, then, in which the total labour
of the labourers added during one day, or one year, is realised, the
total value of the annual product, created by this labour, is divided
into the value of wages, into profit and into rent. For this total
labour is divided into necessary labour, by which the labourer creates
that value portion of the product with which he is himself paid, that
is, his wages, and into unpaid surplus-labour, by which he creates that
value portion of the product which represents surplus-value and which is
later divided into profit and rent. Aside from this labour, the labourer
performs no labour, and aside from the total value of the product, which
assumes the forms of wages, profit and rent, he creates no value. The
value of the annual product, in which the new labour added by the
labourer during the year is incorporated, is equal to the wage, or the
value of the variable capital plus the surplus-value, which in turn is
divided into profit and rent.

The entire value portion of the annual product, then, which the labourer
creates in the course of the year, is expressed in the annual value sum
of the three revenues, the value of wages, profit, and rent. Evidently,
therefore, the value of the constant portion of capital is not
reproduced in the annually created value of product, for the wages are
only equal to the value of the variable portion of capital advanced in
production, and rent and profit are only equal to the surplus-value, the
excess of value produced above the total value of advanced capital,
which equals the value of the constant capital plus the value of the
variable capital.

It is completely irrelevant to the problem to be solved here that a
portion of the surplus-value converted into the form of profit and rent
is not consumed as revenue, but is accumulated. That portion which is
saved up as an accumulation fund serves to create new, additional
capital, but not to replace the old capital, be it the component part of
old capital laid out for labour-power or for means of labour. We may
therefore assume here, for the sake of simplicity, that the revenue
passes wholly into individual consumption. The difficulty is two-fold.
On the one hand the value of the annual product, in which the revenues,
wages, profit and rent, are consumed, contains a portion of value equal
to the portion of value of constant capital used up in it. It contains
this portion of value in addition to that portion which resolves itself
into wages and that which resolves itself into profit and rent. Its
value is therefore = wages + profit + rent + C (its constant portion of
value). How can an annually produced value, which only = wages + profit
+ rent, buy a product the value of which = (wages + profit + rent) + C?
How can the annually produced value buy a product which has a higher
value than its own?

On the other hand, if we leave aside that portion of constant capital
which did not pass over into the product, and which therefore continues
to exist, although with reduced value, as before the annual production
of commodities; in other words, temporarily leaving out of consideration
the employed, but not consumed, fixed capital, then the constant portion
of advanced capital is seen to have been wholly transferred to the new
product in the form of raw and auxiliary materials, whereas a part of
the means of labour has been wholly consumed and another part only
partially, and thus only a part of its value has been consumed in
production. This entire portion of constant capital consumed in
production must be replaced in kind. Assuming all other circumstances,
particularly the productive power of labour, to remain unchanged, this
portion requires the same amount of labour for its replacement as
before, i.e., it must be replaced by an equivalent value. If not, then
reproduction itself cannot take place on the former scale. But who is
obliged to perform this labour, and who does perform it?

As to the first difficulty: Who is obliged to pay for the constant
portion of value contained in the product, and with what? — It is
assumed that the value of constant capital consumed in production
reappears as a part of the value of the product. This does not
contradict the assumptions of the second difficulty. For it has already
been demonstrated in Book I (Kap. V) [English edition: Ch. VII.—_Ed_.]
("The Labour Process and the Process of Producing Surplus-Value") how
the old value remains simultaneously preserved in the product through
the mere addition of new labour, although this does not reproduce the
old value and does no more than add to it, creates merely additional
value; but that this results from labour, not in so far as it is
value-creating, i.e., labour in general, but in its function as definite
productive labour. Therefore, no additional labour was necessary to
preserve the value of the constant portion in the product in which the
revenue, i.e., the entire value created during the year, is expended.
But to be sure, new additional labour is required to replace the value
and use-value of constant capital consumed during the preceding year,
without the replacement of which no reproduction at all is possible.

All newly added labour is represented in the value newly created during
the year, and this in turn is divided into the three revenues: wages,
profit and rent. — Thus, on the one hand, no excess social labour
remains for the replacement of the consumed constant capital, which must
be replaced partially in kind and according to its value, and partially
merely according to its value (for pure wear and tear on fixed capital).
On the other hand, the value annually created by labour, divided into
wages, profit and rent, and to be expended in this form, appears not to
suffice to pay for, or buy, the constant portion of capital, which must
be contained, outside their own value, in the annual product.

It is seen that the problem presented here has already been solved in
the consideration of reproduction of the total social capital — Book II,
Part III. We return to it here, in the first place, because
surplus-value had not been developed there in its revenue forms: profit
(profit of enterprise plus interest) and rent, and could not, therefore,
be treated in these forms; and then, also because precisely in the form
of wages, profit and rent there is contained an incredible blunder in
analysis, which pervades all political economy since Adam Smith.

We divided all capital there into two big classes: Class I, producing
means of production, and Class II, producing articles of individual
consumption. The fact that certain products may serve equally well both
for personal consumption and as means of production (a horse, grain,
etc.) does not invalidate the absolute correctness of this division in
any way. It is actually no hypothesis, but merely an expression of fact.
Take the annual product of a country. One portion of the product,
whatever its ability to serve as means of production, passes over into
individual consumption. It is the product for which wages, profit and
rent are expended. This product is the product of a definite department
of the social capital. It is possible that this same capital may also
produce products belonging to Class I. In so far as it does so, it is
not the portion of this capital consumed in the products of Class II,
products belonging actually to individual consumption, which supplies
the productively consumed products belonging to Class I. This entire
product II, which passes into individual consumption, and for which
therefore the revenue is spent, is the existent form of the capital
consumed in it plus the produced surplus. It is thus the product of a
capital invested solely in the production of articles of consumption.
And in the same way Department I of the annual product, which serves as
means of reproduction — raw materials and instruments of labour —
whatever capacity this product may otherwise possess _naturaliter_ to
serve as means of consumption, is the product of a capital invested
solely in the production of means of production. By far the greater part
of products forming constant capital exists also materially in a form in
which it cannot pass into individual consumption. In so far as this
could be done, e.g., in so far as a farmer could eat his seed-corn,
butcher his draught animals, etc., the economic barrier works the same
for him as if this portion did not exist in consumable form.

As already indicated, we leave out of consideration in both classes the
fixed portion of constant capital, which continues to exist in kind and,
so far as its value is concerned, independently of the annual product of
both classes.

In Class II, for the products of which wages, profit and rent are
expended, in short, the revenues consumed, the product itself consists
of three components so far as its value is concerned. One component is
equal to the value of the constant portion of capital consumed in
production; a second component is equal to the value of the variable
advanced capital laid out in wages; finally, a third component is equal
to the produced surplus-value, thus = profit + rent. The first component
of the product of Class II, the value of the constant portion of
capital, can be consumed neither by the capitalists of Class II, nor by
the labourers of this class, nor by the landowners. It forms no part of
their revenues, but must be replaced in kind and must be sold for this
to occur. On the other hand, the other two components of this product
are equal to the value of the revenues created in this class, = wages +
profit + rent. In Class I the product consists of the same constituents,
as regards form. But that part which here forms revenue, wages + profit
+ rent, in short, the variable portion of capital + surplus-value, is
not consumed here in the natural form of products of this Class I, but
in products of Class II. The value of the revenues of Class I must,
therefore, be consumed in that portion of products of Class II which
forms the constant capital of II to be replaced. The portion of the
product of Class II which must replace its constant capital is consumed
in its natural form by the labourers, capitalists and landlords of Class
I. They spend their revenue for this product of II. On the other hand,
the product of I, to the extent that it represents a revenue of Class I,
is productively consumed in its natural form by Class II, whose constant
capital it replaces in kind. Finally, the used-up constant portion of
capital of Class I is replaced out of the very products of this class,
which consist precisely of means of labour, raw and auxiliary materials,
etc., partly through exchange by capitalists of I among themselves,
partly so that some of these capitalists can directly use their own
product once more as means of production.

Let us take the previous scheme (Book II, Chapter XX, II) for simple
reproduction:

  ---------------------------------------------- --- ---------
  I. 4,000_(c) + 1,000_(v) + 1,000_(s) = 6,000   }   = 9,000
  II. 2,000_(c) + 500_(v) + 500_(s) = 3,000          

  ---------------------------------------------- --- ---------

According to this, the producers and landlords of II consume 500_(v) +
500_(s) = 1,000 as revenue; 2,000_(c) remains to be replaced. This is
consumed by the labourers, capitalists and those who draw rent from I,
whose income = 1,000_(v) + 1,000_(s) = 2,000. The consumed product of II
is consumed as revenue by I, and the portion of the revenue of I
representing an unconsumable product is consumed as constant capital by
II. It remains then to account for the 4,000_(c) of I. This is replaced
out of the product of I itself, which = 6,000, or rather = 6,000 -
2,000; for these 2,000 have already been converted into constant capital
for II. It should be noted, of course, that these numbers have been
chosen arbitrarily, and so the relation between the value of the
revenues of I and the value of the constant capital of II appears
arbitrary. It is evident, however, that so far as the process of
reproduction is normal and takes place under otherwise equal
circumstances, i.e., leaving aside the accumulation, the sum of the
values of wages, profit and rent in Class I must equal the value of the
constant portion of capital of Class II. Otherwise either Class II will
not be able to replace its constant capital, or Class I will not be able
to convert its revenue from unconsumable into consumable form.

Thus, the value of the annual commodity-product, just like the value of
the commodity-product produced by some particular investment of capital,
and like the value of any individual commodity, resolves itself into two
component parts: A, which replaces the value of the advanced constant
capital, and B, which is represented in the form of revenue — wages,
profit and rent. The latter component part of value, B, is counterposed
to the former A, in so far as A, under otherwise equal circumstances: 1)
never assumes the form of revenue and 2) always flows back in the form
of capital, and indeed constant capital. The other component, B,
however, carries within itself, in turn, an antithesis. Profit and rent
have this in common with wages: all three are forms of revenue.
Nevertheless they differ essentially in that profit and rent represent
surplus-value, i.e., unpaid labour, whereas wages represent paid labour.
The portion of the value of the product which represents wages expended
thus replaces wages, and, under the conditions assumed by us, where
reproduction takes place on the same scale and under the same
conditions, is again reconverted into wages, flows back first as
variable capital, as a component of the capital that must be advanced
anew for reproduction. This portion has a two-fold function. It exists
first in the form of capital and is exchanged as such for labour-power.
In the hands of the labourer, it is transformed into revenue which he
draws out of the sale of his labour-power, is converted as revenue into
means of subsistence and consumed. This double process is revealed
through the mediation of money circulation. The variable capital is
advanced in money, paid out as wages. This is its first function as
capital. It is exchanged for labour-power and transformed into the
manifestation of this labour-power, into labour. This is the process as
regards the capitalist. Secondly, however: with this money the labourers
buy a part of the commodities produced by them, which is measured by
this money, and is consumed by them as revenue. If we imagine the
circulation of money to be eliminated, then a part of the labourer’s
product is in the hands of the capitalist in the form of available
capital. He advances this part as capital, gives it to the labourer for
new labour-power, while the labourer consumes it as revenue directly or
indirectly through exchange for other commodities. That portion of the
value of the product, then, which is destined in the course of
reproduction to be converted into wages, into revenue for the labourers,
first flows back into the hands of the capitalist in the form of
capital, or more accurately variable capital. It is an essential
requirement that it should flow back in this form in order for labour as
wage-labour, the means of production as capital, and the process of
production itself as a capitalist process, to be continually reproduced
anew.

In order to avoid unnecessary difficulty, one should distinguish gross
output and net output from gross income and net income.

The gross output, or gross product, is the total reproduced product.
With the exception of the employed but not consumed portion of fixed
capital, the value of the gross output, or gross product, equals the
value of capital advanced and consumed in production, that is, constant
and variable capital plus surplus-value, which resolves itself into
profit and rent. Or, if we consider the product of the total social
capital instead of that of an individual capital, the gross output
equals the material elements forming the constant and variable capital,
plus the material elements of the surplus-product in which profit and
rent are represented.

The gross income is that portion of value and that portion of the gross
product measured by it which remains after deducting that portion of
value and that portion of the product of total production measured by it
which replaces the constant capital advanced and consumed in production.
The gross income, then, is equal to wages (or the portion of the product
destined to again become the income of the labourer) + profit + rent.
The net income, on the other hand, is the surplus-value, and thus the
surplus-product, which remains after deducting wages, and which, in
fact, thus represents the surplus-value realised by capital and to be
divided with the landlord, and the surplus-product measured by it.

Thus, we saw that the value of each individual commodity and the value
of the total commodity-product of each individual capital is divided
into two parts: one replaces only constant capital, and the other,
although a fraction of it flows back as variable capital — thus also
flows back in the _form_ of capital — nevertheless is destined to be
wholly transformed into gross income, and to assume the form of wages,
profit and rent, the sum of which makes up the gross income.
Furthermore, we saw that the same is true of the value of the annual
total product of a society. A difference between the product of the
individual capitalist and that of society exists only in so far as: from
the standpoint of the individual capitalist the net income differs from
the gross income, for the latter includes the wages, whereas the former
excludes them. Viewing the income of the whole society, national income
consists of wages plus profit plus rent, thus, of the gross income. But
even this is an abstraction to the extent that the entire society, on
the basis of capitalist production, bases itself on the capitalist
standpoint and thereby considers only the income resolved into profit
and rent as net income.

On the other hand, the fantasy of men like Say, to the effect that the
entire yield, the entire gross output, resolves itself into the net
income of the nation or cannot be distinguished from it, that this
distinction therefore disappears from the national viewpoint, is but the
inevitable and ultimate expression of the absurd dogma pervading
political economy since Adam Smith, that in the final analysis the value
of commodities resolves itself completely into income, into wages,
profit and rent.^([51])

To comprehend, in the case of each individual capitalist, that a portion
of his product must be transformed again into capital (even aside from
the expansion of reproduction, or accumulation), indeed not only into
variable capital, which is destined to again become in its turn income
for the labourers, thus a form of revenue, but also into constant
capital, which can never be transformed into revenue — such discernment
is naturally extraordinarily easy. The simplest observation of the
process of production shows this clearly. The difficulty first begins as
soon as the process of production is viewed as a whole. The value of the
entire portion of the product which is consumed as revenue in the form
of wages, profit and rent (it is entirely immaterial whether the
consumption is individual or productive), indeed, completely resolves
itself under analysis into the sum of values consisting of wages plus
profit plus rent, that is, into the total value of the three revenues,
although the value of this portion of the product, just like that which
does not enter into revenue, contains a value portion = C, equal to the
value of the constant capital contained in these portions, and thus
_prima facie_ cannot be limited by the value of the revenue. This
circumstance which, on the one hand, is a practically irrefutable fact,
on the other hand, an equally undeniable theoretical contradiction
presents a difficulty which is most easily circumvented by the assertion
that commodity-value contains another portion of value, merely appearing
to differ, from the standpoint of the individual capitalist, from the
portion existing in the form of revenue. The phrase: that which appears
as revenue for one constitutes capital for another, relieves one of the
necessity for any further reflection. But how, then, the old capital can
be replaced when the value of the entire product is consumable in the
form of revenue; and how the value of the product of each individual
capital can be equal to the value sum of the three revenues plus C,
constant capital, whereas the sum of the values of the products of all
capitals is equal to the value sum of the three revenues plus 0 — this
appears, of course, as an insoluble riddle and must be solved by
declaring that the analysis is completely incapable of unravelling the
simple elements of price, and must be content to go around in a vicious
circle making a spurious advance _ad infinitum._ Thus, that which
appears as constant capital may be resolved into wages, profit and rent,
but the commodity-values in which wages, profit and rent appear, are
determined in their turn by wages, profit and rent, and so forth _ad
infinitum_. ^([52])

The fundamentally erroneous dogma to the effect that the value of
commodities in the last analysis may be resolved into wages + profit +
rent also expresses itself in the proposition that the consumer must
ultimately pay for the total value of the total product; or also that
the money circulation between producers and consumers must ultimately be
equal to the money circulation between the producers themselves (Tooke);
all these propositions are as false as the axiom upon which they are
based.

The difficulties, which lead to this erroneous and _prima facie_ absurd
analysis, are briefly these:

1) The fundamental relationship of constant and variable capital, hence
also the nature of surplus-value, and thereby the entire basis of the
capitalist mode of production, are not understood. The value of each
partial product of capital, each individual commodity, contains a
portion of value = constant capital, a portion of value = variable
capital (transformed into wages for labourers), and a portion of value =
surplus-value (later split into profit and rent). Thus, how is it
possible for the labourer with his wages, the capitalist with his
profit, the landlord with his rent, to be able to buy commodities, each
of which contains not only one of these constituent elements, but all
three of them; and how is it possible for the sum of the values of
wages, profit and rent, that is, the three sources of revenue together,
to be able to buy the commodities which go to make up the total
consumption of the recipients of these incomes — commodities containing
an additional component of value, namely constant capital, outside these
three components of value? How should they buy a value of four with a
value of three? ^([53])

We presented our analysis in Book II, Part III.

2) The method is not grasped whereby labour, in adding a new value,
preserves the old value in a new form without producing this old value
anew.

3) The pattern of the process of reproduction is not understood — how it
appears not from the standpoint of individual capital, but rather from
that of the total capital; the difficulty is not understood how it is
that the product in which wages and surplus-value, in short, the entire
value produced by all the labour newly added during the year, is
realised, replaces the constant part of its value and yet at the same
time resolves itself into value limited solely by the revenues; and
furthermore how it is that the constant capital consumed in production
can be replaced in substance and value by new capital, although the
total sum of newly added labour is realised only in wages and
surplus-value, and is fully represented in the sum of the values of
both. It is precisely here that the main difficulty lies, in the
analysis of reproduction and the relations of its various component
parts, both as concerns their material character and their value
relationships.

4) To these difficulties is added still another, which increases even
more as soon as the various component parts of surplus-value appear in
the form of mutually independent revenues. This difficulty consists in
the definite designations of revenue and capital interchanging, and
altering their position, so that they seem to be merely relative
determinations from the point of view of the individual capitalist and
to disappear when the total process of production is viewed as a whole.
For instance, the revenue of the labourers and capitalists of Class I,
which produces constant capital, replaces in value and substance the
constant capital of the capitalists of Class II, which produces articles
of consumption. One may, therefore, squeeze out of the dilemma by
remonstrating that what is revenue for one is capital for another and
that these designations thus have nothing to do with the actual
peculiarities of the value components of commodities. Furthermore:
commodities which are ultimately destined to form the substantive
elements of revenue expenditure, that is, articles of consumption, pass
through various stages during the year, e.g., woollen yarn, cloth. In
one stage they form a portion of constant capital, in the other they are
consumed individually, and thus pass wholly into the revenue. One may
therefore imagine along with Adam Smith that constant capital is but an
apparent element of commodity-value, which disappears in the total
pattern. Thus, a further exchange takes place of variable capital for
revenue. The labourer buys with his wages that portion of commodities
which form his revenue. In this way he simultaneously replaces for the
capitalist the money-form of variable capital. Finally: one portion of
products which form constant capital is replaced in kind or through
exchange by the producers of constant capital themselves; a process with
which the consumers have nothing to do. When this is overlooked the
impression is created that the revenue of consumers replaces the entire
product, i.e., including the constant portion of value.

5) Aside from the confusion which the transformation of values into
prices of production brings about, another arises due to the
transformation of surplus-value into different, special, mutually
independent forms of revenue applying to the various elements of
production, i.e., into profit and rent. It is forgotten that the fact
that the values of commodities are the basis, and that the division of
these commodity-values into distinct constituent parts, and the further
development of these constituents of value into forms of revenue, their
transmutation into relations of various owners of different factors of
production to these individual components of value, their distribution
among these owners according to definite categories and titles, itself
alters nothing in value determination and its law. Just as little is the
law of value changed by the circumstance that the equalisation of
profit, i.e., the distribution of the total surplus-value among the
various capitals, and the obstacles which landed property partially (in
absolute rent) puts in the way of this equalisation, bring about a
divergence between the regulating average prices and the individual
values of commodities. This again affects merely the addition of
surplus-value to the various commodity-prices, but does not abolish
surplus-value itself, nor the total value of commodities as the source
of these various component parts of price.

This is the _quid pro quo_ which we shall consider in the next chapter,
and which is inevitably linked with the illusion that value arises out
of its own component parts. And namely, the various component values of
the commodity acquire independent forms as revenues, and as such
revenues they are related back to the particular material elements of
production as their sources of origin instead of to the value of the
commodity as their source. They are actually related back to those
sources — however, not as components of value, but rather as revenues,
as components of value falling to the share of these particular
categories of agents in production: the labourer, the capitalist and the
landlord. But then one might fancy that these constituents of value,
rather than arising out of the division of commodity-value, conversely
form it instead only through their combination, which leads to the
pretty and vicious circle, whereby the value of commodities arises out
of the sum of the values of wages, profit and rent, and the value of
wages, profit and rent, in its turn, is determined by the value of
commodities, etc. ^([54])

Considering reproduction in its normal state, only a part of newly added
labour is employed for production, and thus for replacement of constant
capital; precisely that part which replaces the constant capital used up
in the production of articles of consumption, of material elements of
revenue. This is balanced by the fact that this constant portion of
Class II costs no additional labour. But, now, this constant capital
(looking upon the total process of reproduction, in which then the
above-mentioned equalisation of Classes I and II is included), not
representing a product of newly added labour, although this product
could not be created without it — this constant capital, in the process
of reproduction, considered from the standpoint of substance, is exposed
to certain accidents and dangers which could decimate it. (Furthermore,
however, considered from the point of view of value as well, it may be
depreciated through a change in the productiveness of labour; but this
refers only to the individual capitalist.) Accordingly, a portion of the
profit, therefore of surplus-value and thereby also surplus-product, in
which (as concerns value) only newly added labour is represented, serves
as an insurance fund. And it matters not whether this insurance fund is
managed by insurance companies as a separate business or not. This is
the sole portion of revenue which is neither consumed as such nor serves
necessarily as a fund for accumulation. Whether it actually serves as
such, or covers merely a loss in reproduction, depends upon chance. This
is also the only portion of surplus-value and surplus-product, and thus
of surplus-labour, which would continue to exist, outside of that
portion serving for accumulation, and hence expansion of the process of
reproduction, even after the abolition of the capitalist mode of
production. This, of course, presupposes that the portion regularly
consumed by direct producers does not remain limited to its present
minimum. Apart from surplus-labour for those who on account of age are
not yet, or no longer, able to take part in production, all labour to
support those who do not work would cease. If we think back to the
beginnings of society, we find no produced means of production, hence no
constant capital, the value of which could pass into the product, and
which, in reproduction on the same scale, would have to be replaced in
kind out of the product and to a degree measured by its value. But
Nature there directly provides the means of subsistence, which need not
first be produced. Nature thereby also gives to the savage who has but
few wants to satisfy the time, not to use the as yet non-existent means
of production in new production, but to transform, alongside the labour
required to appropriate naturally existing means of production, other
products of Nature into means of production: bows, stone knives, boats,
etc. This process among savages, considered merely from the substantive
side, corresponds to the reconversion of surplus-labour into new
capital. In the process of accumulation, the conversion of such products
of excess labour into capital obtains continually; and the circumstance
that all new capital arises out of profit, rent, or other forms of
revenue, i.e., out of surplus-labour, leads to the mistaken idea that
all value of commodities arises from some revenue. This reconversion of
profit into capital shows rather upon closer analysis that, conversely,
the additional labour — which is always represented in the form of
revenue — does not serve for the maintenance, or reproduction
respectively, of the old capital value, but for the creation of new
excess capital so far as it is not consumed as revenue.

The whole difficulty arises from the fact that all newly added labour,
in so far as the value created by it is not resolved into wages, appears
as profit — interpreted here as a form of surplus-value in general —
i.e., as a value which costs the capitalist nothing and which, of
course, therefore does not have to replace for him anything advanced,
any capital whatever. This value thus exists in the form of available
additional wealth, in short, from the viewpoint of the individual
capitalist, in the form of his revenue. But this newly created value can
just as well be consumed productively as individually, equally well as
capital or revenue. As a consequence of its natural form, some of it
must be productively consumed. It is, therefore, evident that the
annually added labour creates capital as well as revenue; as becomes
evident in the process of accumulation. However, the portion of
labour-power employed in the creation of new capital (thus analogous to
that portion of the working-day employed by a savage, not for acquiring
subsistence, but to fashion tools with which to acquire his subsistence)
becomes invisible in that the entire product of surplus-labour first
appears in the form of profit; a designation which indeed has nothing to
do with this surplus-product itself, but refers merely to the individual
relation of the capitalist to the surplus-value pocketed by him. In
fact, the surplus-value created by the labourer is divided into revenue
and capital; i.e., into articles of consumption and additional means of
production. But former constant capital taken over from the previous
year (leaving aside the portion impaired and thus _pro tanto_ destroyed,
thus so far as it does not have to be reproduced — and such disturbances
in the process of reproduction fall under insurance) is not reproduced
as concerns value by the newly added labour.

We see, furthermore, that a portion of the newly added labour is
continually absorbed in the reproduction and replacement of consumed
constant capital, although this newly added labour resolves itself
solely into revenue, into wages, profit and rent. But it is thereby
overlooked 1) that one value portion of the product of this labour _is
no_ product of this new additional labour, but rather pre-existing and
consumed constant capital; that the portion of the product in which this
part of value appears is thus also not transformed into revenue, but
replaces the means of production of this constant capital in kind; 2)
that the portion of value in which this newly added labour actually
appears is not consumed as revenue in kind, but replaces the constant
capital in another sphere, where it is transformed into a natural form,
in which it may be consumed as revenue, but which in its turn is again
not entirely a product of newly added labour.

In so far as reproduction obtains on the same scale, every consumed
element of constant capital must be replaced in kind by a new specimen
of the same kind, if not in quantity and form, then at least in
effectiveness. If the productiveness of labour remains the same, then
this replacement in kind implies replacing the same value which the
constant capital had in its old form. But should the productiveness of
labour increase, so that the same material elements may be reproduced
with less labour, then a smaller portion of the value of the product can
completely replace the constant part in kind. The excess may then be
employed to form new additional capital or a larger portion of the
product may be given the form of articles of consumption, or the
surplus-labour may be reduced. On the other hand, should the
productiveness of labour decrease, then a larger portion of the product
must be used for the replacement of the former capital, and the
surplus-product decreases.

The reconversion of profit, or generally of any form of surplus-value,
into capital shows — leaving aside the historically defined economic
form and considering it merely as the simple formation of new means of
production — that the situation still prevails whereby the labourer
performs labour to produce means of production beyond the labour for
acquiring his immediate means of subsistence. Transformation of profit
into capital is no more than employing a portion of excess labour to
form new, additional means of production. That this takes place in the
shape of a transformation of profit into capital signifies merely that
it is the capitalist rather than the labourer who disposes of excess
labour. That this excess labour must first pass through a stage in which
it appears as revenue (whereas, e.g., in the case of a savage it appears
as excess labour directly destined for the production of means of
production) means simply that this labour, or its product, is
appropriated by the non-worker. However, what is actually transformed
into capital is not profit as such. Transformation of surplus-value into
capital signifies merely that the surplus-value and surplus-product are
not consumed individually as revenue by the capitalist. But, what is
actually so transformed is value, materialised labour, or the product in
which this value is directly manifested, or for which it is exchanged
after having been previously transformed into money. And when the profit
is transformed back into capital, this definite form of surplus-value,
or profit, does not form the source of the new capital. The
surplus-value is thereby merely changed from one form into another. But
it is not this change of form which turns it into capital. It is the
commodity and its value which now function as capital. However, that the
value of the commodity is not paid for — and only by this means does it
become surplus-value — is quite irrelevant for the materialisation of
labour, the value itself.

The misunderstanding is expressed in various forms. For instance, that
the commodities which compose the constant capital also contain elements
of wages, profit and rent. Or, on the other hand, that what is revenue
for the one is capital for another, and that therefore these are but
subjective relations. Thus the yarn of the spinner contains a portion of
value representing profit for him, Should the weaver buy the yarn, he
realises the profit of the spinner, but for himself this yarn is merely
a part of his constant capital.

Aside from the previous remarks made concerning the relations between
revenue and capital, the following is to be noted: That which, as
regards value, passes along with the yarn as a constituent element into
the capital of the weaver, is the value of the yarn. In what manner the
parts of this value have been resolved for the spinner himself into
capital and revenue, or, in other words, into paid and unpaid labour, is
completely irrelevant for the value determination of the commodity
itself (aside from modifications through the average profit). Back of
this still lurks the idea that the profit, or surplus-value in general,
is an excess above the value of the commodity, which can only be made by
an extra charge, mutual cheating, or gain through selling. When the
price of production is paid, or even the value of the commodity, the
component values of the commodity which appear to the seller in the form
of revenue are naturally also paid. Monopoly prices, of course, are not
referred to here.

Secondly, it is quite correct to say that the component parts of
commodities which make up the constant capital, like any other
commodity-value, may be reduced to portions of value which resolve
themselves for the producers and the owners of the means of production
into wages, profit and rent. This is merely a capitalist form of
expression for the fact that all commodity-value is but the measure of
the socially necessary labour contained in a commodity. But it has
already been shown in Book I that this nowise prevents the
commodity-product of any capital from being split into separate parts,
of which one represents exclusively the constant portion of capital,
another the variable portion of capital, and a third solely
surplus-value.

Storch expresses the opinion of many others when he says:

"The saleable products which make up the national revenue must be
considered in political economy in two different ways: relative to
individuals as values, and relative to the nation as goods; for the
revenue of a nation is not appraised, like that of an individual, by its
value, but by its utility or by the wants which it can satisfy."
(_Considérations sur le revenu national,_ p. 19.)

In the first place, it is a false abstraction to regard a nation whose
mode of production is based upon value, and furthermore is
capitalistically organised, as an aggregate body working merely for the
satisfaction of the national wants.

Secondly, after the abolition of the capitalist mode of production, but
still retaining social production, the determination of value continues
to prevail in the sense that the regulation of labour-time and the
distribution of social labour among the various production groups,
ultimately the book-keeping encompassing all this, become more essential
than ever.

Notes

51. Ricardo makes the following very apt comment on thoughtless Say: "Of
net produce and gross produce, M. Say speaks as follows: ‘The whole
value produced is the gross produce; this value, after deducting from it
the cost of production, is the net produce.’ (Vol. II, p. 491.) There
can, then, be no net produce, because the cost of production, according
to M. Say, consists of rent, wages and profits. On page 508 he says:
‘The value of a product, the value of a productive service, the value of
the cost of production, are all, then, similar values, whenever things
are left to their natural course.’ Take a whole from a whole, and
nothing remains." (Ricardo, _Principles,_ Chapter XXII, p.512, Note.) —
By the way we shall see later that Ricardo now refuted Smith’s false
analysis of commodity-price, its reduction to the sum of the values of
the revenues. He does not bother with it, and accepts its correctness so
far in his analysis that he "abstracts" from the constant portion of the
value of commodities. He also falls back into the same way of looking at
things from time to time.

52. "In every society the price of every commodity finally resolves
itself into some one or other, or all of those three parts [viz., wages,
profits, rent] ... A fourth part, it may perhaps be thought, is
necessary for replacing the stock of the farmer or for compensating the
wear and tear of his labouring cattle, and other instruments of
husbandry. But it must be considered that the price of any instrument of
husbandry, such as a labouring horse, is itself made up of the same
three parts: the rent of the land upon which he is reared, the labour of
tending and rearing him, and the profits of the farmer, who advances
both the rent of his land and the wages of his labour. Though the price
of the corn, therefore, may pay the price as well as the maintenance of
the horse, the whole price still resolves itself either immediately or
ultimately into the same three parts of rent, labour [meaning wages] and
profit." (Adam Smith.) — We shall show later on how Adam Smith himself
feels the inconsistency and insufficiency of this subterfuge, for it is
nothing but a subterfuge on his part to send us from Pontius to Pilate
while nowhere does he indicate the real investment of capital, in which
case the price of the product resolves itself ultimately into these
three parts, without any further _progressus._

53. Proudhon exposes his inability to grasp this in the ignorant
formulation: _L’ouvrier ne peut pas racheter son propre produit_ (the
labourer cannot buy back his own product), because the interest which is
added to the _prix-de-revient_ (cost-price) is contained in the product.
But how does M. Eugène Forcade teach him to know better? "If Proudhon’s
objection were correct, it would strike not only the profits of capital,
but would eliminate the possibility even of industry. If the labourer is
compelled to pay 100 for each article for which he has received only 80,
if his wages can buy back only the value which he has put into a
product, it could be said that the labourer cannot buy back anything,
that wages cannot pay for anything. In fact, there is always something
more than the wages of the labourer contained in the cost-price, and
always more than the profits of enterprise in the selling price, for
instance, the price of raw materials, often paid to foreign countries.
... Proudhon has forgotten about the continual growth of national
capital; he has forgotten that this growth refers to all labourers,
whether in an enterprise or in handicrafts." _(Revue des deux Mondes,_
1848, Tome 24, p. 998.) Here we have the optimism of bourgeois
thoughtlessness in the form of sagacity that most corresponds to it. M.
Forcade first believes that the labourer could not live did he not
receive a higher value than that which he produces, whereas conversely
the capitalist mode of production could not exist were he really to
receive all the value which he produces. Secondly, he correctly
generalises the difficulty, which Proudhon expressed only from a narrow
viewpoint. The price of commodities contains not only an excess over
wages, but also over profit, namely, the constant portion of value.
According to Proudhon’s reasoning, then, the capitalist too could not
buy back the commodities with his profit. And how does Forcade solve
this riddle? By means of a meaningless phrase: the growth of capital.
Thus the continual growth of capital is also supposed to be
substantiated, among other things, in that the analysis of
commodity-prices, which is impossible for the political economist as
regards a capital of 100, becomes superfluous in the case of a capital
of 10,000. What would be said of a chemist, who, on being asked, How is
it that the product of the soil contains more carbon than the soil?
would answer: It comes from the continual increase in agricultural
production. The well-meaning desire to discover in the bourgeois world
the best of all possible worlds replaces in vulgar economy all need for
love of truth and inclination for scientific investigation.

54. "The circulating capital invested in materials, raw materials and
finished goods is itself composed of goods, the necessary price of which
is formed of the same elements; so that, viewing the total goods in one
country, it would mean duplication to count this portion of circulating
capital among the elements of the necessary price." (Storch, _Cours
d’économie politique,_ II, p. 140.) — By these elements of circulating
capital Storch means the value of constant capital (fixed capital is
merely circulating in a different form. "It is true that the wages of
the labourer, like that portion of profit of enterprise which consists
of wages, if we consider them as a part of the means of subsistence,
also consist of goods bought at current prices and which likewise
comprise wages, interest on capital, ground-rent and profit of
enterprise.... This observation merely serves to prove that it is
impossible to resolve the necessary price into its simplest elements.’,
(_ibid,_ Note.) — In his _Considérations sur la nature du revenu
national_ (Paris, 1824), Storch indeed realises in his controversy with
Say to what absurdity the erroneous analysis of commodity-value leads —
when it resolves value into mere revenues. He correctly points out the
folly of such results — not from the viewpoint of the individual
capitalist, but from that of a nation — but himself goes no step further
in his analysis of the _prix nécessaire_ from that presented in his
_Cours,_ that it is impossible to resolve it into its actual elements,
without resolving it into a spurious advance _ad infinitum._ "It is
evident that the value of’ the annual product is divided partly into
capitals and partly into profits, and that each one of these portions of
value of the annual product regularly goes to buy the products needed by
the nation, as much to preserve its capital as to renew its consumption
fund (pp. 134, 135).... Can it" (a self-employed peasant family) "live
in its barns or stables, eat its seed and forage, clothe itself with its
draught cattle, dispense with its agricultural implements? According to
the thesis of M. Say one must answer all these questions in the
affirmative (pp. 135, 136) .... If it is admitted that the revenue of a
nation is equal to its gross product, i.e., if no capital has to be
deducted from it, then it must also be admitted that a nation can spend
the entire value of its annual product unproductively without impairing
its future income in the least (147). The products which constitute the
capital of a nation are not consumable" (p.150).

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 50. Illusions Created By Competition

 

It has been shown that the value of commodities, or the price of
production regulated by their total value, resolves itself into:

1) A portion of value replacing constant capital, or representing past
labour, which was used up in the form of means of production in making
the commodity; in a word, the value, or price, which these means of
production carried into the production process of the commodities. We
are not referring at all here to individual commodities, but to
commodity-capital, that is, the form in which the product of the capital
during a definite period of time, say a year, manifests itself; the
individual commodity forms one element of commodity-capital, which,
moreover, so far as its value is concerned, resolves itself into the
same analogous constituents.

2) The portion of value representing variable capital, which measures
the income of the labourer and is transformed into wages for him; i.e.,
the labourer has reproduced these wages in this variable portion of
value; in short, the portion of value which represents the paid portion
of new labour added to the above constant portion in the production of
the commodities.

3) Surplus-value, i.e., the portion of value of the produced commodities
in which the unpaid labour, or surplus-labour, is incorporated. This
last portion of value, in its turn, assumes the independent forms which
are at the same time forms of revenue: the forms of profit on capital
(interest on capital as such and profit of enterprise on capital as
functioning capital) and ground-rent, which is claimed by the owner of
the land participating in the production process. The components 2) and
3), that is, the portion of value which always assumes the revenue forms
of wages (of course only after the latter have first gone through the
form of variable capital), profit and rent, is distinguished from the
constant component 1) by the fact that in it is embodied that entire
value in which the new additional labour added to the constant part, to
the means of production of the commodities, is materialised. Now, apart
from the constant portion, it is correct to say that the value of a
commodity, i.e., to the extent that it represents newly added labour,
continually resolves itself into three parts, which constitute three
forms of revenue, namely, wages, profit and rent, ^([55]) the respective
magnitudes of whose value, that is, the aliquot portions which they
constitute in the total value, are determined by various specific laws
developed above. But, it would be a mistake to state the converse,
namely, that the value of wages, rate of profit and rate of rent form
independent constituent elements of value, whose synthesis gives rise to
the value of commodities, apart from the constant component; in other
words, it would be a mistake to say that they are constituent elements
of the value of commodities, or of the price of production.^([56])

The difference is easily seen.

Let us assume that the value of the product of a capital of 500 is equal
to 400_(c) + 100_(v) + 150_(s) = 650; let the 150_(s) in turn, be
divided into 75 profit + 75 rent. We will also assume, in order to
forestall useless difficulties, that this is a capital of average
composition, so that its price of production and its value coincide;
this coincidence always takes place whenever the product of such an
individual capital may be considered as the product of some portion —
corresponding to its magnitude — of the total capital.

Here wages, measured by variable capital, form 20% of the advanced
capital; surplus-value, calculated on the total capital, forms 30%,
namely 15% profit and 15% rent. The entire value component of the
commodity representing the newly added labour is equal to 100_(v) +
150_(s) = 250. Its magnitude does not depend upon its division into
wages, profit and rent. We see from the relation of these parts to each
other that labour-power, which is paid with 100 in money, say £100, has
supplied a quantity of labour represented by money to the amount of
£250. We see from this that the labourer performed 1½ times as much
surplus-labour as he did labour for himself. If the working-day = 10
hours, then he worked 4 hours for himself and 6 hours for the
capitalist. Therefore, the labour of the labourers paid with £100 is
expressed in a money-value of £250. Apart from this value of £250, there
is nothing to divide between labourer and capitalist, between capitalist
and landlord. It is the total value newly added to the value of the
means of production, i.e., 400. The specific commodity-value of 250 thus
produced and determined by the quantity of labour materialised in it
constitutes the limit, therefore, for the dividends which the labourer,
capitalist and landlord will be able to draw from this value in the form
of revenue — wages, profit and rent.

Let us assume that a capital of the same organic composition, that is,
the same proportion between employed living labour-power and constant
capital set in motion, is compelled to pay £150 instead of £100 for the
same labour-power which sets in motion the constant capital of 400. And
let us further assume that profit and rent share in the surplus-value in
different proportions. Since we have assumed that the variable capital
of £150 sets the same quantity of labour in motion as did the variable
capital of £100, the newly produced value would = 250, as before, and
the value of the total product would be 650, also as before, but we
would then have 400_(c) + 150_(v) + 100_(s) and these 100_(s) would
divide, say, into 45 profit and 55 rent. The proportion in which the
newly produced total value would be distributed as wages, profit and
rent would now be very different; similarly, the magnitude of the
advanced total capital would be different, although it only sets the
same total quantity of labour in motion. Wages would amount to 27 3/11%,
profit — 8 2/11%, and rent — 10% of the advanced capital; thus, the
total surplus-value would be somewhat over 18%.

As a result of the increase in wages, the unpaid portion of total labour
would be different and thereby the surplus-value too. If the working-day
contained 10 hours, the labourer would have worked 6 hours for himself
and only 4 hours for the capitalist. The proportions of profit and rent
would also be different; the reduced surplus-value would be divided in a
different proportion between the capitalist and the landlord. Finally,
since the value of the constant capital would have remained the same and
the value of the advanced variable capital would have risen, the reduced
surplus-value would express itself in a still more reduced rate of gross
profit, by which we mean in this case the ratio of the total
surplus-value to the total advanced capital.

The change in the value of wages, in the rate of profit, and in the rate
of rent, whatever the effect of the laws regulating the proportions of
these parts to each other, could only move within the limits set by the
newly produced commodity-value of 250. An exception could only take
place if rent should be based on a monopoly price. This would nowise
alter the law, but merely complicate the analysis. For if we consider
only the product itself in this case, then only the division of
surplus-value would be different. But if we consider its relative value
as compared with other commodities, then we should find solely this
difference — that a portion of the surplus-value had been transferred
from them to this particular commodity.

To recapitulate:

Value of the Product

New
Value

Rate of
Surplus
Value

Rate of
Gross Profit

First Case:

400_(c) + 100_(v) + 1505 = 650

250

150%

30%

Second Case:

400_(c) + 150_(v) + 100_(s) = 650

250

66⅔%

18 2/11%

In the first place, the surplus-value falls one-third of what it was,
i.e., from 150 to 100. The rate of profit falls by a little more than
one-third, i.e., from 30% to 18%, because the reduced surplus-value must
be calculated on an increased total advanced capital. But it by no means
falls in the same proportion as the rate of surplus-value. The latter
falls from 150/100 to 100/150, that is, from 150% to 66⅔%, whereas the
rate of profit only falls from 150/500 to 100/550, or from 30% to 18
2/11%. The rate of profit, then, falls proportionately more than the
mass of surplus-value, but less than the rate of surplus-value. We find,
furthermore, that value, as well as mass of products, remains the same,
so long as the same quantity of labour is employed, although the
advanced capital has increased due to the augmentation of its variable
component. This increase in advanced capital would indeed be very much
felt by a capitalist undertaking a new enterprise. But considering
reproduction as a whole, augmentation of the variable capital merely
means that a larger portion of the value newly created by newly added
labour is converted into wages, and thus, in the first place, into
variable capital instead of into surplus-value and surplus-product. The
value of the product thus remains the same, because it is limited on the
one hand by the value of the constant capital = 400, and on the other by
the number 250, in which the newly added labour is represented. Both,
however, remain unaltered. This product would, as before, represent the
same amount of use-value in the same magnitude of value, to the extent
that it would itself again enter into the constant capital; thus, the
same mass of elements of constant capital would retain the same value.
The matter would be different if wages were to rise not because the
labourer received a larger share of his own labour, but if he received a
larger portion of his own labour because the labour productivity had
decreased. In this case, the total value in which the same labour, paid
and unpaid, would be incorporated, would remain the same. But the mass
of products in which this quantity of labour would be incorporated would
have decreased so that the price of each aliquot portion of this product
would rise, because each portion would contain more labour. The
increased wages of 150 would not represent any more product than the
wages of 100 did before; the reduced surplus-value of 100 would
represent merely ⅔ the former product, i.e., 66⅔% of the mass of
use-values formerly represented by 100. In this case, the constant
capital would also become dearer to the extent that this product would
enter into it. However, this would not be the result of the increase in
wages, but rather the increase in wages would be a result of the
increase in the price of commodities and a result of the diminished
productivity of the same quantity of labour. It appears here as though
the increase in wages had made the product dearer; however, this
increase is not the cause, but rather the result, of a change in the
value of the commodities, due to the decreased productivity of labour.

On the other hand, all other circumstances remaining the same, i.e., if
the same quantity of employed labour is still represented by 250, then,
if the value of the means of production employed should rise or fall,
the value of the same quantity of products would rise or fall by the
same magnitude. 450_(c) + 100_(v) + 150_(s) gives a product-value = 700;
but 350_(c) + 100_(v) + 150_(s) gives a value for the same quantity of
products of only 600, as against a former 650. Hence, if the advanced
capital, set in motion by the same quantity of labour, increases or
decreases, then the value of the product rises or falls, other
circumstances remaining the same, if the increase or decrease in
advanced capital is due to a change in the magnitude of the value of the
constant portion of capital. On the other hand, the value of the product
remains unchanged if the increase or decrease in advanced capital is
caused by a change in the magnitude of the value of the variable portion
of capital, assuming the labour productivity remains the same. In the
case of the constant capital, the increase or decrease in its value is
not compensated for by any opposite movement. But in the case of the
variable capital, assuming the labour productivity remains the same, an
increase or decrease in its value is compensated for by the opposite
movement on the part of the surplus-value, so that the value of the
variable capital plus the surplus-value, i.e., the value newly added by
labour to the means of production and newly incorporated in the product,
remains the same.

But if the increase or decrease in the value of the variable capital or
wages is due to a rise or fall in the price of commodities, i.e., a
decrease or increase in the productiveness of the labour employed by
this investment of capital then the value of the product is affected.
But the rise or fall in wages in this case is not a cause, but merely an
effect.

On the other hand, assuming the constant capital in the above
illustration to remain = 400_(c), if the change from 100_(v) + 150_(s)
to 150_(v) + 100_(s), i.e., the increase in variable capital, should be
due to a decrease in the productiveness of labour, not in this
particular branch of industry, say, cotton spinning, but perhaps in
agriculture which provides the labourer’s foodstuffs, i.e., due to a
rise in the price of these foodstuffs, then the value of the product
would remain unchanged. The value of 650 would still be represented by
the same quantity of cotton yarn.

It follows, furthermore, from the above: If the decrease in the
expenditure of constant capital is due to economies, etc., in lines of
production whose products enter into the labourer’s consumption, then
this, just like the direct increase in the productivity of the employed
labour itself, may lead to a decrease in wages due to a cheapening of
the means of subsistence of the labourer, and may lead, therefore, to an
increase in the surplus-value; so that the rate of profit in this case
would grow for two reasons, namely, on the one hand, because the value
of the constant capital decreases, and on the other hand, because the
surplus-value increases. In our consideration of the transformation of
surplus-value into profit, we assumed that wages do not fall, but remain
constant, because there we had to investigate the fluctuations in the
rate of profit, independent of the changes in the rate of surplus-value.
Moreover, the laws developed there are general ones, and also apply to
investments of capital whose products do not enter into the labourer’s
consumption, whereby changes in the value of the product, therefore, are
without influence upon the wages.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Thus, the separation and resolution of new value annually added by new
labour to the means of production, or to the constant part of capital,
into the various forms of revenue, viz., wages, profit and rent, do not
at all alter the limits of the value itself, the total value to be
distributed among these various categories; any more than a change in
the mutual relations of these individual parts can change their total,
this given magnitude of value. The given number 100 always remains the
same, whether it is divided into 50 + 50, or into 20 + 70 + 10, or into
40 + 30 + 30. The portion of the value of the product which is resolved
into these revenues is determined, just like the constant portion of the
value of capital, by the value of the commodities, i.e., by the quantity
of labour incorporated in them in each case. Given first, then, is the
quantity of value of commodities to be divided among wages, profit and
rent; in other words, the absolute limit of the sum of the portions of
value of these commodities. Secondly, as concerns the individual
categories themselves, their average and regulating limits are likewise
given. Wages form the basis in this limitation. They are regulated on
the one hand by a natural law; their lower limit is determined by the
physical minimum of means of subsistence required by the labourer for
the conservation of his labour-power and for its reproduction; i.e., by
a definite quantity of commodities. The value of these commodities is
determined by the labour-time required for their reproduction; and thus
by the portion of new labour added to the means of production, or by the
portion of each working-day required by the labourer for the production
and reproduction of an equivalent for the value of these necessary means
of subsistence. For instance, if his average daily means of subsistence
have a value = 6 hours of average labour, then he must work on an
average six hours per day for himself. The actual value of his
labour-power deviates from this physical minimum; it differs according
to climate and level of social development; it depends not merely upon
the physical, but also upon the historically developed social needs,
which become second nature. But in every country, at a given time, this
regulating average wage is a given magnitude. The value of all other
revenue thus has its limit. It is always equal to the value in which the
total working-day (which coincides in the present case with the average
working-day, since it comprises the total quantity of labour set in
motion by the total social capital) is incorporated minus the portion of
the working-day incorporated in wages. Its limit is therefore determined
by the limit of the value in which the unpaid labour is expressed, that
is, by the quantity of this unpaid labour. While the portion of the
working-day which is required by the labourer for the reproduction of
the value of his wages finds its ultimate limit in the physical minimum
of wages, the other portion of the working-day, in which surplus-labour
is incorporated, and thus the portion of value representing
surplus-value, finds its limit in the physical maximum of the
working-day, i.e., in the total quantity of daily labour-time during
which the labourer can, in general, be active and still preserve and
reproduce his labour-power. Since we are here concerned with the
distribution of the value which represents the total labour newly added
per year, the working-day may be regarded here as a constant magnitude,
and is assumed as such, no matter how much or how little it may deviate
from its physical maximum. The absolute limit of the portion of value
which forms surplus-value, and which resolves itself into profit and
ground-rent, is thus given. It is determined by the excess of the unpaid
portion of the working-day over its paid portion, i.e., by the portion
of the value of the total product in which this surplus-labour exists.
If we call the surplus-value thus limited and calculated on the advanced
total capital — the profit, as I have done, then this profit, so far as
its absolute magnitude is concerned, is equal to the surplus-value and,
therefore, its limits are just as much determined by law as the latter.
On the other hand, the level of the rate of profit is likewise a
magnitude held within certain specific limits determined by the value of
commodities. It is the ratio of the total surplus-value to the total
social capital advanced in production. If this capital = 500 (say
millions) and the surplus-value = 100, then 20% constitutes the absolute
limit of the rate of profit. The distribution of the social profit
according to this rate among the capitals invested in the various
spheres of production creates prices of production which deviate from
the values of commodities and which are the real regulating average
market-prices. But this deviation abolishes neither the determination of
prices by values nor the regular limits of profit. Instead of the value
of a commodity being equal to the capital consumed in its production
plus the surplus-value contained in it, its price of production is now
equal to the capital, c, consumed in its production plus the
surplus-value falling to its share as a result of the general rate of
profit, for instance 20% on the capital advanced in its production,
counting both the consumed and the merely employed capital. But this
additional amount of 20% is itself determined by the surplus-value
created by the total social capital and its relation to the value of
this capital; and for this reason it is 20% and not 10 or 100. The
transformation of values into prices of production, then, does not
remove the limits on profit, but merely alters its distribution among
the various particular capitals which make up the social capital, i.e.,
it distributes it uniformly among them in the proportion in which they
form parts of the value of this total capital. The market-prices rise
above and fall below these regulating prices of production, but these
fluctuations mutually balance each other. If one examines price lists
over a more or less long period of time, and if one disregards those
cases in which the actual value of commodities is altered by a change in
the productivity of labour, and likewise those cases in which the
process of production has been disturbed by natural or social accidents,
one will be surprised, in the first place, by the relatively narrow
limits of the deviations, and, secondly, by the regularity of their
mutual compensation. The same domination of the regulating averages will
be found here that Quetelet pointed out in the case of social phenomena.
If the equalisation of the values of commodities into prices of
production does not meet any obstacles, then the rent resolves itself
into differential rent, i.e., it is limited to the equalisation of the
surplus-profits which would he given to some capitalists by the
regulating prices of production and which are now appropriated by the
landlord. Here, then, rent has its definite limit of value in the
deviations of the individual rates of profit, which are caused by the
regulation of prices of production by the general rate of profit. If
landed property obstructs equalisation of the values of commodities into
prices of production, and appropriates absolute rent, then the latter is
limited by the excess of the value of the agricultural products over
their price of production, i.e., by the excess of the surplus-value
contained in them over the rate of profit assigned to the capitals by
the general rate of profit. This difference, then, forms the limit of
the rent, which, as before, is but a definite portion of the given
surplus-value contained in the commodities.

Finally, if equalisation of surplus-value into average profit meets with
obstacles in the various spheres of production in the form of artificial
or natural monopolies, and particularly monopoly in landed property, so
that a monopoly price becomes possible, which rises above the price of
production and above the value of the commodities affected by such a
monopoly, then the limits imposed by the value of the commodities would
not thereby be removed. The monopoly price of certain commodities would
merely transfer a portion of the profit of the other commodity-producers
to the commodities having the monopoly price. A local disturbance in the
distribution of the surplus-value among the various spheres of
production would indirectly take place, but it would leave the limit of
this surplus-value itself unaltered. Should the commodity having the
monopoly price enter into the necessary consumption of the labourer, it
would increase the wage and thereby reduce the surplus-value, assuming
the labourer receives the value of his labour-power as before. It could
depress wages below the value of labour-power, but only to the extent
that the former exceed the limit of their physical minimum. In this case
the monopoly price would be paid by a deduction from real wages (i.e..
the quantity of use-values received by the labourer for the same
quantity of labour) and from the profit of the other capitalists. The
limits within which the monopoly price would affect the normal
regulation of the prices of commodities would be firmly fixed and
accurately calculable.

Thus just as the division of the newly added value of commodities, and,
in general, value resolvable into revenue, finds its given and
regulating limits in the relation between necessary and surplus labour,
wages and surplus-value, so does the division of surplus-value itself
into profit and ground-rent find its limits in the laws regulating the
equalisation of the rate of profit. As regards the division into
interest and profit of enterprise, the average profit itself forms the
limit for both taken together. It furnishes the given magnitude of value
which they may split among themselves and which alone can be so divided.
The specific ratio of this division is here fortuitous, i.e., it is
determined exclusively by conditions of competition. whereas in other
cases the balancing of supply and demand is equivalent to elimination of
the deviations in market-prices from their regulating average prices,
i.e., elimination of the influence of competition, it is here the only
determinant. But why? Because the same production factor, capital, has
to divide its share of the surplus-value between two owners of the same
production factor. But the fact that there is no definite, regular limit
here for the division of the average profit does not remove its limit as
part of the commodity-value; just as the fact that two partners in a
certain business divide their profit unequally due to different external
circumstances does not affect the limits of this profit in any way.

Hence, although the portion of the commodity-value in which the new
labour added to the value of the means of production is incorporated is
divided into various parts, which in the form of revenue assume mutually
independent forms, this is no reason for now considering wages, profit
and ground-rent as the constituent elements which, in combination or
taken all together, are the source of the regulating price (natural
price, _prix necessaire_) of the commodities themselves; so that it is
not the commodity-value, after deducting the constant portion of value,
which would be the original unit that divides into these three parts,
but rather, conversely, the price of each of these three parts would be
independently determined, and the price of the commodities would then be
formed by adding these three independent magnitudes together. In
reality, the commodity-value is the magnitude which precedes the sum of
the total values of wages, profit and rent, regardless of the relative
magnitudes of the latter. In the above erroneous conception, wages,
profit and rent are three independent magnitudes of value, whose total
magnitude produces, limits and determines the magnitude of the
commodity-value.

In the first place it is evident that if wages, profit and rent were to
form the price of commodities, this would apply as much to the constant
portion of the commodity-value as to the other portion, in which
variable capital and surplus-value are incorporated. Thus, this constant
portion may here be left entirely out of consideration, since the value
of the commodities of which it is composed would likewise resolve itself
into the sum of the values of wages, profit and rent. As already noted,
this conception, then, denies the very existence of such a constant
portion of value.

It is furthermore evident that value loses all meaning here. Only the
conception of price still remains, in the sense that a certain amount of
money is paid to the owner of labour-power, capital and land. But what
is money? Money is not a thing, but a definite form of value, hence,
value is again presupposed. Let us say, then, that a definite amount of
gold or silver is paid for these elements of production, or that it is
mentally equated to them. But gold and silver (and the enlightened
economist is proud of this discovery) are themselves commodities like
all other commodities. The price of gold and silver is therefore
likewise determined by wages, profit and rent. Hence we cannot determine
wages, profit and rent by equating them to a certain amount of gold and
silver, for the value of this gold and silver, by means of which they
should be evaluated as in their equivalent, should be first determined
precisely by them, independently of gold and silver, i.e., independently
of the value of any commodity, which value is precisely the product of
the above three factors. Thus, to say that the value of wages, profit
and rent consists in their being equivalent to a certain quantity of
gold and silver, would merely be saying that they are equal to a certain
quantity of wages, profit and rent.

Take wages first. For it is necessary to make labour the point of
departure, even in this view of the matter. How, then, is the regulating
price of wages determined, the price about which its market-prices
oscillate?

Let us say that it is determined by the supply and demand of
labour-power. But what sort of labour-power demand is this? It is a
demand made by capital. The demand for labour is therefore tantamount to
the supply of capital. In order to speak of a supply of capital, we
should know above all what capital is. Of what does capital consist? If
we take its simplest aspect, it consists of money and commodities. But
money is merely a commodity-form. Capital, then, consists of
commodities. But the value of commodities, according to our assumption,
is determined, in the first instance, by the price of the labour
producing the commodities, by wages. Wages are here presupposed and are
treated as a constituent element of the price of commodities. This price
then should be determined by the ratio of available labour to capital.
The price of the capital itself is equal to the price of the commodities
of which it is composed. The demand by capital for labour is equal to
the supply of capital. And the supply of capital is equal to the supply
of a quantity of commodities of given price, and this price is regulated
in the first place by the price of labour, and the price of labour in
turn is equal to that portion of the commodity-price constituting the
variable capital, which is granted to the labourer in exchange for his
labour; and the price of the commodities constituting this variable
capital is again determined, in turn, primarily by the price of labour;
for it is determined by the prices of wages, profit and rent. In order
to determine wages, we cannot, therefore, presuppose capital, for the
value of the capital is itself determined in part by wages.

Moreover, dragging competition into this problem does not help at all.
Competition makes the market-prices of labour rise or fall. But suppose
supply and demand of labour are balanced. How are wages then determined?
By competition. But we have just assumed that competition ceases to act
as a determinant, that its influence is cancelled due to equilibrium
between its two mutually opposing forces. Indeed, it is precisely the
natural price of wages that we wish to find, i.e., the price of labour
that is not regulated by competition, but which, on the contrary,
regulates the latter.

Nothing remains but to determine the necessary price of labour by the
necessary means of subsistence of the labourer. But these means of
subsistence are commodities, which have a price. The price of labour is
therefore determined by the price of the necessary means of subsistence
and the price of the means of subsistence, like that of all other
commodities, is determined primarily by the price of labour. Therefore,
the price of labour determined by the price of the means of subsistence
is determined by the price of labour. The price of labour is determined
by itself. In other words, we do not know how the price of labour is
determined. Labour in this case has a price in general, because it is
considered as a commodity. In order, therefore, to speak of the price of
labour, we must know what price in general is. But we do not learn at
all in this way what price in general is.

Nevertheless, let us assume that the necessary price of labour is
determined in this agreeable manner. Then how is the average profit
determined, the profit of every capital under normal conditions, which
constitutes the second element in the price of commodities? The average
profit must be determined by an average rate of profit; how is this rate
determined? By competition among the capitalists? But the competition
already presupposes the existence of profit. It presupposes various
rates of profit, and thus various profits — either in the same or in
different spheres of production. Competition can influence the rate of
profit only to the extent that it affects the prices of commodities.
Competition can only make the producers within the same sphere of
production sell their commodities at the same prices, and make them sell
their commodities in different spheres of production at prices which
will give them the same profit, the same proportional addition to the
price of commodities which has already been partially determined by
wages. Hence competition can only equalise inequalities in the rate of
profit. In order to equalise unequal rates of profit, profit must exist
as an element in the price of commodities. Competition does not create
it. It lowers or raises its level, but does not create the level which
is established when equalisation has been achieved. And when we speak of
a necessary rate of profit, what we wish to know is precisely the rate
of profit independent of the movements of competition, which in turn
regulates competition itself. The average rate of profit sets in when
there is an equilibrium of forces among the competing capitalists.
Competition may establish this equilibrium but not the rate of profit
which makes its appearance with this equilibrium. When this equilibrium
is established, why is the general rate of profit now 10, or 20, or
100%? Because of competition? No, on the contrary, competition has
eliminated the causes producing deviations from 10, 20, or 100%. It has
brought about a commodity-price whereby every capital yields the same
profit in proportion to its magnitude. The magnitude of this profit
itself, however, is independent of competition. The latter merely
reduces, again and again, all deviations to this magnitude. One person
competes with another, and competition compels him to sell his
commodities at the same price as the other. But why is this price 10 or
20 or 100?

Thus, nothing remains but to declare rate of profit, and therefore
profit, to be in some unaccountable manner a definite extra charge added
to the price of commodities, which up to this point was determined by
wages. The only thing that competition tells us is that this rate of
profit must be a given magnitude. But we knew this before — when we
dealt with general rate of profit and "necessary price" of profit.

It is quite unnecessary to wade through this absurd process anew in the
case of ground-rent. One can see without doing this that, when carried
out more or less consistently, it makes profit and rent merely appear as
definite extra charges added by unaccountable laws to the price of
commodities, a price primarily determined by wages. In short,
competition has to shoulder the responsibility of explaining all the
meaningless ideas of the economists, whereas it should rather be the
economists who explain competition.

Now, disregarding here the illusion of a profit and rent being created
by circulation, i.e., price components arising through sale — and
circulation can never give what it did not first receive — the matter
simply amounts to this:

Let the price of a commodity determined by wages = 100; let the rate of
profit be 10% of wages, and the rent 15% of wages. Then the price of the
commodity determined by the sum of wages, profit and rent = 125. This
additional 25 cannot arise from the sale of the commodity. For all who
sell one another commodities sell at 125 that which costs 100 in wages;
which is the same as if they had all sold at 100. Thus, the operation
must be considered independently of the circulation process.

If the three share the commodity itself, which now costs 125 — and it
does not alter matters any if the capitalist first sells at 125, and
then pays 100 to the labourer, 10 to himself, and 15 to the landlord —
the labourer receives 4/5 = 100 of the value and of the product. The
capitalist receives 2/25 of the value and of the product, and the
landlord 3/25. Since the capitalist sells at 125 instead of 100, he
gives the labourer only 4/5 of the product incorporating the latter’s
labour. Thus, it would be just the same as if he had given 80 to the
labourer and retained 20 — of which 8 would fall to his share and 12 to
the landlord. In this case he would have sold the commodity at its
value, since in fact the additions to the price represent increases that
are independent of the value of the commodity, which under the
assumption made above is determined by the value of wages. This, in a
roundabout way, amounts to saying that according to this conception the
term "wages," here 100, means the value of the product, i.e., the sum of
money in which this definite quantity of labour is represented; but that
this value in turn differs from the real wage and therefore leaves a
surplus. But, here the surplus is realised by a nominal addition to the
price. Hence, if wages were equal to 110 instead of 100, the profit
would have to be = 11 and the ground-rent = 16½, so that the price of
the commodity would = 137½. This would leave the proportions unaltered.
But since the division would always be obtained by way of a nominal
addition of definite percentages to wages, the price would rise and fall
with the wages. Wages are here first set equal to the value of the
commodity, and then divorced from it again. In fact, however, this
amounts to saying in a roundabout and meaningless way that the value of
the commodity is determined by the quantity of labour contained in it,
whereas the value of wages is determined by the price of the necessary
means of subsistence, and the excess of value above the wage forms
profit and rent.

The splitting of the value of commodities after subtracting the value of
the means of production consumed in their creation; the splitting of
this given quantity of value, determined by the quantity of labour
incorporated in the produced commodities, into three component parts,
which assume, as wages, profit and rent, independent and mutually
unrelated forms of revenue — this splitting appears in a perverted form
on the surface of capitalist production, and consequently in the minds
of those captivated by the latter.

Let the total value of a certain commodity = 300, of which 200 is the
value of the means of production, or elements of constant capital,
consumed in its production. This leaves 100 as the amount of new value
added to the commodity during its process of production. This new value
of 100 is all that is available for division among the three forms of
revenue. If we let wages = x, profit = y and ground-rent = z, then the
sum of x + y + z will always = 100 in our case. But to the
industrialists, merchants and bankers, and to the vulgar economists,
this appears quite different. For them, the value of the commodity,
after subtracting the value of the means of production consumed by it,
is not given = 100, this 100 then being divided into x, y and z. But
rather, the price of the commodity simply consists of the value of
wages, the value of profit and the value of rent, which magnitudes are
determined independently of the value of the commodity and of each
other, so that x, y and z are each given and determined independently,
and only from the sum of these magnitudes, which the may be smaller or
larger than 100, is the magnitude of value of the commodity itself
obtained by adding these component values together. This _quid pro quo_
is inevitable because:

_First_: The component parts of the value of a commodity, appear as
independent revenues in relation to one another, and as such are related
to three very dissimilar production factors, namely labour, capital and
land, and therefore they seem to arise from the latter. Ownership of
labour-power, capital and land is the cause for these various component
values of commodities falling to the share of the respective owners, and
thus transforming themselves into revenue for them. But the value does
not arise from a transformation into revenue; it must rather exist
before it can be converted into revenue, before it can assume this form.
The illusion that the opposite is true is strengthened all the more as
the determination of the relative magnitudes of these three components
in relation to one another follows different laws, whose connection
with, and limitation by, the value of the commodities themselves nowise
appear on the surface.

_Secondly_: We have seen that a general rise or fall in wages, by
causing a movement of the general rate of profit in the opposite
direction — other circumstances remaining the same — changes the prices
of production of the various commodities, i.e., raises some and lowers
others, depending on the average composition of capital in the
respective spheres of production. Thus, experience shows here that in
some spheres of production, at any rate, the average price of a
commodity rises because wages have risen, and falls because wages have
fallen. But "experience" does not show that the value of commodities,
which is independent of wages, secretly regulates these changes.
However, if the rise in wages is local, if it only takes place in
particular spheres of production as a result of special circumstances,
then a corresponding nominal rise in the prices of these commodities may
occur. This rise in the relative value of one kind of commodity in
relation to the others, for which wages have remained unchanged, is then
merely a reaction against the local disturbance in the uniform
distribution of surplus-value among the various spheres of production, a
means of equalising the particular rates of profit into the general
rate. "Experience" shows in this case that wages again determine the
price. Thus, in both of these cases experience shows that wages
determine the prices of commodities. But "experience" does not show the
hidden cause of this interrelation. Furthermore: The average price of
labour, i.e., the value of labour-power, is determined by the production
price of the necessary means of subsistence. If the latter rises or
falls, the former rises or falls accordingly. Thus, experience again
shows the existence of a connection between wages and the price of
commodities. But the cause may appear as an effect, and the effect as a
cause, which is also the case in the movements of market-prices, where a
rise of wages above their average corresponds to the rise of
market-prices above the prices of production during periods of
prosperity, and the subsequent fall of wages below their average
corresponds to a fall of market-prices below the prices of production.
To the dependence of prices of production upon the values of commodities
_prima facie_ there would always have to correspond, apart from the
oscillatory movements of market-prices, the experience that whenever
wages rise the rate of profit falls, and vice versa. But we have seen
that the rate of profit may be determined by movements in the value of
constant capital, independently of the movements of wages; so that wages
and rate of profit, instead of moving in opposite directions, may move
in the same direction, may rise or fall together. If the rate of
surplus-value were to directly coincide with the rate of profit, this
would not be possible. Similarly if wages should rise as a result of a
rise in the prices of the means of subsistence, the rate of profit may
remain the same, or even rise, due to greater intensity of labour or
prolongation of the working-day. All these experiences bear out the
illusion created by the independent and distorted form of the component
values, namely, that either wages alone, or wages and profit together,
determine the value of commodities. Once such an illusion appears with
respect to wages, once the price of labour and the value created by
labour seem to coincide, the same automatically applies to profit and
rent. Their prices, i.e., their money-expression, must then be regulated
independently of labour and of the value created by the latter.

_Thirdly_: Let us assume that according to direct experience the values
of a commodity, or the prices of production — which merely appear to be
independent of the values — always coincide with the market-prices of
the commodity rather than merely prevailing as the regulating average
prices by constant compensation of the continual fluctuations in
market-price. Let us assume, furthermore, that reproduction always takes
place under the same unaltered conditions, i.e., labour productivity
remains constant in all elements of capital. Finally, let us assume that
the component value of the commodity-product, which is formed in every
sphere of production by the addition of a new quantity of labour — i.e.,
a newly produced value — to the value of the means of production, always
split into constant proportions of wages, profit and rent, so that the
wage actually paid always directly coincides with the value of
labour-power, the profit actually realised — with the portion of the
total surplus-value which falls to the share of every independently
functioning part of the total capital by virtue of the average rate of
profit, and the actual rent is always limited by the bounds within which
ground-rent on this basis is normally confined. In a word, let us assume
that the division of the socially produced values and the regulation of
the prices of production takes place on a capitalist basis, but that
competition is eliminated.

Thus, under these assumptions, namely, if the value of commodities were
constant and appeared so, if the component value of the
commodity-product which resolves itself into revenues were to remain a
constant magnitude and always appeared as such, and finally, if this
given and constant component value always split into constant
proportions of wages, profit and rent — even under these assumptions,
the real movement would necessarily appear in distorted form; not as the
splitting of a previously given magnitude of value into three parts
which assume mutually independent forms of revenue, but, on the
contrary, as the formation of this magnitude of value from the sum of
the independent and separately determined, each by itself, constituent
elements — wages, profit and ground-rent. This illusion would
necessarily arise, because in the actual movement of individual
capitals, and the commodities produced by them, not the value of
commodities would appear to be a precondition of its splitting but,
conversely, the components into which it is split function as a
precondition of the value of the commodities. In the first place, we
have seen that to every capitalist the cost-price of his commodities
appears as a given magnitude and continually appears as such in the
actual price of production. The cost-price, however, is equal to the
value of the constant capital, the advanced means of production, plus
the value of labour-power, which, however, appears to the agent of
production in the irrational form of the price of labour, so that wages
simultaneously appear as revenue of the labourer. The average price of
labour is a given magnitude, because the value of labour-power, like
that of any other commodity, is determined by the necessary labour-time
required for its reproduction. But as concerns that portion of the value
of commodities which is embodied in wages, it does not arise from the
fact that it assumes this form of wages, that the capitalist advances to
the labourer his share of his own product in the form of wages, but from
the fact that the labourer produces an equivalent for his wages, i.e.,
that a portion of his daily or annual labour produces the value
contained in the price of his labour-power. But wages are stipulated by
contract, before their corresponding value equivalent has been produced.
As an element of price, whose magnitude is given before the commodity
and its value have been produced, as a constituent part of the
cost-price, wages thereby do not appear as a portion which detaches
itself in independent form from the total value of the commodity, but
rather, conversely, as a given magnitude, which predetermines this
value, i.e., as a creator of price and value. A role similar to that of
wages in the cost-price of commodities is played by the average profit
in their price of production, for the price of production is equal to
cost-price plus average profit on the advanced capital. This average
profit figures practically, in the mind and calculation of the
capitalist himself, as a regulating element, not merely in so far as it
determines the transfer of capitals from one sphere of investment into
another, but also in all sales and contracts which embrace a process of
reproduction extending over long periods. But so far as it figures in
this manner, it is a pre-existent magnitude, which is in fact
independent of the value and surplus-value produced in any particular
sphere of production, and thus even more so in the case of any
individual investment of capital in any sphere of production. Rather
than appearing as a result of a splitting of value, it manifests itself
much more as a magnitude independent of the value of the produced
commodities, as pre-existing in the process of production of commodities
and itself determining the average price of the commodities, i.e., as a
creator of value. Indeed, the surplus-value, owing to the separation of
its various portions into mutually, completely unrelated forms, appears
in still more concrete form as a prerequisite for creating
commodity-value. A part of the average profit in the form of interest
confronts the functioning capitalist independently as an assumed element
in the production of commodities and of their value. No matter how much
the magnitude of the interest fluctuates, at each moment and for every
capitalist it is a given magnitude entering into the cost-price of the
commodities produced by him as individual capitalist. The same role is
played by ground-rent in the form of lease money fixed by contract for
the agricultural capitalist, and in the form of rent for business
premises in the case of other entrepreneurs. These portions into which
surplus-value is split, being given as elements of cost-price for the
individual capitalist, appear conversely therefore as creators of
surplus-value; creators of a portion of the price of commodities, just
as wages create the other. The secret wherefore these products of the
splitting of commodity-value constantly appear as prerequisites for the
formation of value itself is simply this, that the capitalist mode of
production, like any other, does not merely constantly reproduce the
material product, but also the social and economic relations, the
characteristic economic forms of its creation. Its result, therefore,
appears just as constantly presupposed by it, as its presuppositions
appear as its results. And it is this continual reproduction of the same
relations which the individual capitalist anticipates as self-evident,
as an indubitable fact. So long as the capitalist mode of production
persists as such, a portion of the newly added labour continually
resolves itself into wages, another into profit (interest and profit of
enterprise), and a third into rent. In contracts between the owners of
various agencies of production this is always assumed, and this
assumption is correct, however much the relative proportions may
fluctuate in individual cases. The definite form in which the parts of
value confront each other is presupposed because it is continually
reproduced, and it is continually reproduced because it is continually
presupposed.

To be sure, experience and appearance now also demonstrate that
market-prices, in whose influence the capitalist actually sees the only
determination of value, are by no means dependent upon such
anticipation, so far as their magnitude is concerned; that they do not
correspond to whether the interest or rent were set high or low. But the
market-prices are constant only in their variation, and their average
over longer periods results precisely in the respective averages of
wages, profit and rent as the constant magnitudes, and therefore, in the
last analysis, those dominating the market-prices.

On the other hand, it seems plain on reflection that if wages, profit
and rent are creators of value since they seem to be presupposed in the
production of value, and are assumed by the individual capitalist in his
cost-price and price of production, then the constant portion, whose
value enters as given into the production of every commodity, is also a
creator of value. But the constant portion of capital is no more than a
sum of commodities and, therefore, of commodity-values. Thus we should
arrive at the absurd tautology that commodity-value is the creator and
cause of commodity-value.

However, if the capitalist were at all interested in reflecting about
this — and his reflections as capitalist are dictated exclusively by his
interests and self-interested motives — experience would show him that
the product which he himself produces enters into other spheres of
production as a constant portion of capital, and that products of these
other production spheres enter into his own product as constant portions
of capital. Since the additional value, so far as his new production is
concerned, seems to be formed, from his point of view, by the magnitudes
of wages, profit and rent, then this also holds good for the constant
portion consisting of the products of other capitalists. And thus, the
price of the constant portion of capital, and thereby the total value of
the commodities, reduces itself in the final analysis, although in a
manner which is somewhat unaccountable, to a sum of values resulting
from the addition of independent creators of value — wages, profit and
rent — which are regulated according to different laws and arise from
different sources.

_Fourthly_: Whether the commodities are sold at their values or not, and
hence the determination of value itself, is quite immaterial for the
individual capitalist. It is, from the very outset, a process that takes
place behind his back and is controlled by the force of circumstances
independent of himself, because it is not the values, but the divergent
prices of production, which form the regulating average prices in every
sphere of production. The determination of value as such interests and
has a determining effect on the individual capitalist and the capital in
each particular sphere of production only in so far as the reduced or
increased quantity of labour required to produce commodities, as a
consequence of a rise or fall in productiveness of labour, enables him
in one instance to make an extra profit, at the prevailing
market-prices, and compels him in another to raise the price of his
commodities, because more wages, more constant capital, and thus more
interest, fall upon each portion of the product, or individual
commodity. It interests him only in so far as it raises or lowers the
cost of production of commodities for himself, thus only in so far as it
makes his position exceptional.

On the other hand, wages, interest and rent appear to him as regulating
limits not only of the price at which he can realise the profit of
enterprise, the portion of profit falling to his share as functioning
capitalist, but also at which he must generally be able to sell his
commodities, if continued reproduction is to take place. It is quite
immaterial to him whether or not he realises, through sale, the value
and surplus-value incorporated in his commodities, provided only that he
makes the customary, or larger, profit of enterprise at given prices,
over and above his individual cost-price determined by wages, interest
and rent. Apart from the constant portion of capital-wages, interest and
rent appear to him, therefore, as the limiting and thereby productive
determining elements of the commodity-price. Should he succeed, e.g., in
depressing wages below the value of labour-power, i.e., below its normal
level, in obtaining capital at a lower interest rate, and in paying less
lease money than the normal amount for rent, then it is completely
irrelevant to him whether he sells his product below its value, or even
below the general price of production, thereby giving away gratis a
portion of the surplus-labour contained in the commodities. This also
applies to the constant portion of capital. If an industrialist, e.g.,
can buy his raw material below its price of production, then this
buffers him against loss, even should he sell it in the finished product
under its price of production. His profit of enterprise may remain the
same, or even increase, if only the excess of the commodity-price over
its elements, which must he paid, replaced by an equivalent, remains the
same or increases. But aside from the value of the means of production
which enter into the production of his commodities as a given price
magnitude, it is precisely wages, interest and rent which enter into
this production as limiting and regulating price magnitudes.
Consequently they appear to him as the elements determining the price of
the commodities. Profit of enterprise, from this standpoint, seems to be
either determined by the excess of market-prices, dependent upon
accidental conditions of competition, over the immanent value of
commodities determined by the above-mentioned elements of price; or, to
the extent that this profit itself exerts a determining influence upon
market-prices, it seems itself, in turn, dependent upon the competition
between buyers and sellers.

In the competition of individual capitalists among themselves as well as
in the competition on the world-market, it is the given and assumed
magnitudes of wages, interest and rent which enter into the calculation
as constant and regulating magnitudes; constant not in the sense of
being unalterable magnitudes, but in the sense that they are given in
each individual case and constitute the constant limit for the
continually fluctuating market-prices. For instance, in competition on
the world-market it is solely a question of whether commodities can be
sold advantageously with existing wages, interest and rent at, or below,
existing general market-prices, i.e., realising a corresponding profit
of enterprise. If wages and the price of land are low in one country,
while interest on capital is high, because the capitalist mode of
production has not been developed generally, whereas in another country
wages and the price of land are nominally high, while interest on
capital is low, then the capitalist employs more labour and land in the
one country, and in the other relatively more capital. These factors
enter into calculation as determining elements in so far as competition
between these two capitalists is possible. Here, then, experience shows
theoretically, and the self-interested calculation of the capitalist
shows practically, that the prices of commodities are determined by
wages, interest and rent, by the price of labour, capital and land, and
that these elements of price are indeed the regulating constituent
factors of price.

Of course, there always remains an element here which is not assumed,
but which results from the market-price of commodities, namely, the
excess above the cost-price formed by the addition of the aforementioned
elements: wages, interest and rent. This fourth element seems to be
determined by competition in each individual case, and in the average
case by the average profit, which in its turn is regulated by this same
competition, only over longer periods.

_Fifthly_: On the basis of the capitalist mode of production, it becomes
so much a matter of course to split up the value, in which newly added
labour is represented, into the forms of revenue, of wages, profit and
ground-rent, that this method is applied (leaving aside earlier stages
of history, from which we gave illustrations in our study of
ground-rent) even where the preconditions for these forms of revenue are
missing. That is, all is subsumed by analogy under these forms of
revenue.

When an independent labourer — let us take a small farmer, since all
three forms of revenue may here be applied — works for himself and sells
his own product, he is first considered as his own employer
(capitalist), who makes use of himself as a labourer, and second as his
own landlord, who makes use of himself as his own tenant. To himself as
wage-worker he pays wages, to himself as capitalist he gives the profit,
and to himself as landlord he pays rent. Assuming the capitalist mode of
production and the relations corresponding to it to be the general basis
of society, this subsumption is correct, in so far as it is not thanks
to his labour, but to his ownership of means of production — which have
assumed here the general form of capital — that he is in a position to
appropriate his own surplus-labour. And furthermore, to the extent that
he produces his product as commodities, and thus depends upon its price
(and even if not, this price is calculable), the quantity of
surplus-labour which he can realise depends not on its own magnitude,
but on the general rate of profit; and likewise any eventual excess
above the amount of surplus-value determined by the general rate of
profit is, in turn, not determined by the quantity of labour performed
by him, but can be appropriated by him only because he is owner of the
land. Since such a form of production not corresponding to the
capitalist mode of production may thus be subsumed under its forms of
revenue — and to a certain extent not incorrectly — the illusion is all
the more strengthened that capitalist relations are the natural
relations of every mode of production.

Of course, if wages are reduced to their general basis, namely, to that
portion of the product of the producer’s own labour which passes over
into the individual consumption of the labourer; if we relieve this
portion of its capitalist limitations and extend it to that volume of
consumption which is permitted, on the one hand, by the existing
productivity of society (that is, the social productivity of his own
individual labour as actually social), and which, on the other hand, the
full development of the individuality requires; if, furthermore, we
reduce the surplus-labour and surplus-product to that measure which is
required under prevailing conditions of production of society, on the
one side to create an insurance and reserve fund, and on the other to
constantly expand reproduction to the extent dictated by social needs;
finally, if we include in No. 1 the necessary labour, and in No. 2 the
surplus-labour, the quantity of labour which must always be performed by
the able-bodied in behalf of the immature or incapacitated members of
society, i.e., if we strip both wages and surplus-value, both necessary
and surplus labour, of their specifically capitalist character, then
certainly there remain not these forms, but merely their rudiments,
which are common to all social modes of production.

Moreover, this method of subsumption was also characteristic of previous
dominant modes of production, e.g., feudalism. Production relations
which nowise corresponded to it, standing entirely beyond it, were
subsumed under feudal relations, e.g., in England, the tenures in common
socage (as distinct from tenures on knight’s service), which comprised
merely monetary obligations and were feudal in name only.

Notes

55. In breaking down the value added to the constant portion of capital
into wages, profit and ground-rent, it goes without saying that these
are portions of value. One may, indeed, conceive of them as existing in
the direct product in which this value appears, i.e., in the direct
product produced by labourers and capitalists in some particular sphere
of production — for instance, yarn produced in the spinning industry.
But in fact they do not materialise in this product any more or any less
than in any other commodity, in any other component of the material
wealth having the same value. And in practice wages are indeed paid in
money, that is, in the pure expression of value, likewise interest and
rent. For the capitalist, the transformation of his product into the
pure expression of value is indeed very important; in the distribution
itself this transformation is already assumed. Whether these values are
reconverted into the same product, the same commodity, out of whose
production they arose, whether the labourer buys back a part of the
product directly produced by himself or buys the product of some other
labour of a different kind, has nothing to do with the matter itself.
Herr Rodbertus quite unnecessarily flies into a passion about this.

56. "It will be sufficient to remark that the same general rule which
regulates the value of raw produce and manufactured commodities is
applicable also to the metals; their value depending not on the rate of
profits, nor on the rate of wages, nor on the rent paid for mines, but
on the total quantity of labour necessary to obtain the metal and to
bring it to market." (Ricardo, _Principles,_ Ch. III, p. 77.)

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 51. Distribution Relations and Production Relations

 

The new value added by the annual newly added labour — and thus also
that portion of the annual product in which this value is represented
and which may be drawn out of the total output and separated from it —
is thus split into three parts, which assume three different forms of
revenue, into forms which express one portion of this value as belonging
or falling to the share of the owner of labour-power, another portion to
the owner of capital, and a third portion to the owner of landed
property. These, then, are relations, or forms of distribution, for they
express the relations under which the newly produced total value is
distributed among the owners of the various production factors.

From the common viewpoint these distribution relations appear as natural
relations, as relations arising directly from the nature of all social
production, from the laws of human production in general. It cannot,
indeed, be denied that pre-capitalist societies disclose other modes of
distribution, but the latter are interpreted as undeveloped, unperfected
and disguised, not reduced to their purest expression and their highest
form and differently shaded modes of the natural distribution relations.

The only correct aspect of this conception is: Assuming some form of
social production to exist (e.g., primitive Indian communities, or the
more ingeniously developed communism of the Peruvians), a distinction
can always be made between that portion of labour whose product is
directly consumed individually by the producers and their families and —
aside from the part which is productively consumed — that portion of
labour which is invariably surplus-labour, whose product serves
constantly to satisfy the general social needs no matter how this
surplus-product may be divided, and no matter who may function as
representative of these social needs. Thus, the identity of the various
modes of distribution amounts merely to this: they are identical if we
abstract from their differences and specific forms and keep in mind only
their unity as distinct from their dissimilarity.

A more advanced, more critical mind, however, admits the historically
developed character of distribution relations,^([56a]) but nevertheless
clings all the more tenaciously to the unchanging character of
production relations themselves, arising from human nature and thus
independent of all historical development.

On the other hand, scientific analysis of the capitalist mode of
production demonstrates the contrary, that it is a mode of production of
a special kind, with specific historical features; that, like any other
specific mode of production, it presupposes a given level of the social
productive forces and their forms of development as its historical
precondition: a precondition which is itself the historical result and
product of a preceding process, and from which the new mode of
production proceeds as its given basis; that the production relations
corresponding to this specific, historically determined mode of
production — relations which human beings enter into during the process
of social life, in the creation of their social life — possess a
specific, historical and transitory character; and, finally, that the
distribution relations essentially coincident with these production
relations are their opposite side, so that both share the same
historically transitory character.

In the study of distribution relations, the initial point of departure
is the alleged fact that the annual product is apportioned among wages,
profit and rent. But if so expressed, it is a misstatement. The product
is apportioned on one side to capital, on the other to revenue. One of
these revenues, wages, never itself assumes the form of revenue, revenue
of the labourer, until after it has first confronted this labourer in
the _form of capital._ The confrontation of produced conditions of
labour and of the products of labour generally, as capital, with the
direct producers implies from the outset a definite social character of
the material conditions of labour in relation to the labourers, and
thereby a definite relationship into which they enter with the owners of
the means of production and among themselves during production itself.
The transformation of these conditions of labour into capital implies in
turn the expropriation of the direct producers from the land, and thus a
definite form of landed property.

If one portion of the product were not transformed into capital, the
other would not assume the forms of wages, profit and rent.

On the other hand, if the capitalist mode of production presupposes this
definite social form of the conditions of production, so does it
reproduce it continually. It produces not merely the material products,
but reproduces continually the production relations in which the former
are produced, and thereby also the corresponding distribution relations.

It may be said, of course, that capital itself (and landed property
which it includes as its antithesis) already presupposes a distribution:
the expropriation of the labourer from the conditions of labour, the
concentration of these conditions in the hands of a minority of
individuals, the exclusive ownership of land by other individuals, in
short, all the relations which have been described in the part dealing
with primitive accumulation (Buch I, Kap. XXIV) [English edition: Part
VIII — _Ed_]. But this distribution differs altogether from what is
understood by distribution relations when the latter are endowed with a
historical character in contradistinction to production relations. What
is meant thereby are the various titles to that portion of the product
which goes into individual consumption. The aforementioned distribution
relations, on the contrary, are the basis of special social functions
performed within the production relations by certain of their agents, as
opposed to the direct producers. They imbue the conditions of production
themselves and their representatives with a specific social quality.
They determine the entire character and the entire movement of
production.

Capitalist production is distinguished from the outset by two
characteristic features.

_First._ It produces its products as commodities. The fact that it
produces commodities does not differentiate it from other modes of
production; but rather the fact that being a commodity is the dominant
and determining characteristic of its products. This implies, first and
foremost, that the labourer himself comes forward merely as a seller of
commodities, and thus as a free wage-labourer, so that labour appears in
general as wage-labour. In view of what has already been said, it is
superfluous to demonstrate anew that the relation between capital and
wage-labour determines the entire character of the mode of production.
The principal agents of this mode of production itself, the capitalist
and the wage-labourer, are as such merely embodiments, personifications
of capital and wage-labour; definite social characteristics stamped upon
individuals by the process of social production; the products of these
definite social production relations.

The characteristic 1) of the product as a commodity, and 2) of the
commodity as a product of capital, already implies all circulation
relations, i.e., a definite social process through which the products
must pass and in which they assume definite social characteristics; it
likewise implies definite relations of the production agents, by which
the value-expansion of their product and its reconversion, either into
means of subsistence or into means of production, are determined. But
even apart from this, the entire determination of value and the
regulation of the total production by value results from the above two
characteristics of the product as a commodity, or of the commodity as a
capitalistically produced commodity. In this entirely specific form of
value, labour prevails on the one hand solely as social labour; on the
other hand, the distribution of this social labour and the mutual
supplementing and interchanging of its products, the subordination
under, and introduction into, the social mechanism, are left to the
accidental and mutually nullifying motives of individual capitalists.
Since these latter confront one another only as commodity-owners, and
everyone seeks to sell his commodity as dearly as possible (apparently
even guided in the regulation of production itself solely by his own
free will), the inner law enforces itself only through their
competition, their mutual pressure upon each other, whereby the
deviations are mutually cancelled. Only as an inner law, vis-à-vis the
individual agents, as a blind law of Nature, does the law of value exert
its influence here and maintain the social equilibrium of production
amidst its accidental fluctuations.

Furthermore, already implicit in the commodity, and even more so in the
commodity as a product of capital, is the materialisation of the social
features of production and the personification of the material
foundations of production, which characterise the entire capitalist mode
of production.

The _second_ distinctive feature of the capitalist mode of production is
the production of surplus-value as the direct aim and determining motive
of production. Capital produces essentially capital, and does so only to
the extent that it produces surplus-value. We have seen in our
discussion of relative surplus-value, and further in considering the
transformation of surplus-value into profit, how a mode of production
peculiar to the capitalist period is founded hereon — a special form of
development of the social productive powers of labour, but confronting
the labourer as powers of capital rendered independent, and standing in
direct opposition therefore to the labourer’s own development.
Production for value and surplus-value implies, as has been shown in the
course of our analysis, the constantly operating tendency to reduce the
labour-time necessary for the production of a commodity, i.e., its
value, below the actually prevailing social average. The pressure to
reduce cost-price to its minimum becomes the strongest lever for raising
the social productiveness of labour, which, however, appears here only
as a continual increase in the productiveness of capital.

The authority assumed by the capitalist as the personification of
capital in the direct process of production, the social function
performed by him in his capacity as manager and ruler of production, is
essentially different from the authority exercised on the basis of
production by means of slaves, serfs, etc.

Whereas, on the basis of capitalist production, the mass of direct
producers is confronted by the social character of their production in
the form of strictly regulating authority and a social mechanism of the
labour-process organised as a complete hierarchy — this authority
reaching its bearers, however, only as the personification of the
conditions of labour in contrast to labour, and not as political or
theocratic rulers as under earlier modes of production — among the
bearers of this authority, the capitalists themselves, who confront one
another only as commodity-owners, there reigns complete anarchy within
which the social interrelations of production assert themselves only as
an overwhelming natural law in relation to individual free will.

Only because labour pre-exists in the form of wage-labour, and the means
of production in the form of capital — i.e., solely because of this
specific social form of these essential production factors — does a part
of the value (product) appear as surplus-value and this surplus-value as
profit (rent), as the gain of the capitalist, as additional available
wealth belonging to him. But only because this surplus-value thus
appears as _his profit_ do the additional means of production, which are
intended for the expansion of reproduction, and which constitute a part
of this profit, present themselves as new additional capital, and the
expansion of the process of reproduction in general as a process of
capitalist accumulation.

Although the form of labour as wage-labour is decisive for the form of
the entire process and the specific mode of production itself, it is not
wage-labour which determines value. In the determination of value, it is
a question of social labour-time in general, the quantity of labour
which society generally has at its disposal, and whose relative
absorption by the various products determines, as it were, their
respective social importance. The definite form in which the social
labour-time prevails as decisive in the determination of the value of
commodities is of course connected with the form of labour as
wage-labour and with the corresponding form of the means of production
as capital, in so far as solely on this basis does commodity-production
become the general form of production.

Let us moreover consider the so-called distribution relations
themselves. The wage presupposes wage-labour, and profit — capital.
These definite forms of distribution thus presuppose definite social
characteristics of production conditions, and definite social relations
of production agents. The specific distribution relations are thus
merely the expression of the specific historical production relations.

And now let us consider profit. This specific form of surplus-value is
the precondition for the fact that the new creation of means of
production takes place in the form of capitalist production; thus, a
relation dominating reproduction, although it seems to the individual
capitalist as if he could in reality consume his entire profit as
revenue. However, he thereby meets barriers even in the form of
insurance and reserve funds laws of competition, etc., which hamper him
and prove to him in practice that profit is not a mere distribution
category of the individually consumable product. The entire process of
capitalist production is furthermore regulated by the prices of the
products. But the regulating prices of production are themselves in turn
regulated by the equalisation of the rate of profit and its
corresponding distribution of capital among the various social spheres
of production. Profit, then, appears here as the main factor, not of the
distribution of products, but of their production itself, as a factor in
the distribution of capitals and labour itself among the various spheres
of production. The division of profit into profit of enterprise and
interest appears as the distribution of the same revenue. But it arises,
to begin with, from the development of capital as a self-expanding
value, a creator of surplus-value, i.e., from this specific social form
of the prevailing process of production. It evolves credit and credit
institutions out of itself, and thereby the form of production. As
interest, etc., the ostensible distribution forms enter into the price
as determining production factors.

Ground-rent might seem to be a mere form of distribution, because landed
property as such does not perform any, or at least any normal, function
in the process of production itself. But the circumstance that 1) rent
is limited to the excess above the average profit, and that 2) the
landlord is reduced from the manager and master of the process of
production and of the entire process of social life to the position of
mere lessor of land, usurer in land and mere collector of rent, is a
specific historical result of the capitalist mode of production. The
fact that the earth received the form of landed property is a historical
precondition for this. The fact that landed property assumes forms which
permit the capitalist mode of operation in agriculture is a product of
the specific character of this mode of production. The income of the
landlord may be called rent, even under other forms of society. But it
differs essentially from rent as it appears in this mode of production.

The so-called distribution relations, then, correspond to and arise from
historically determined specific social forms of the process of
production and mutual relations entered into by men in the reproduction
process of human life. The historical character of these distribution
relations is the historical character of production relations, of which
they express merely one aspect. Capitalist distribution differs from
those forms of distribution which arise from other modes of production,
and every form of distribution disappears with the specific form of
production from which it is descended and to which it corresponds.

The view which regards only distribution relations as historical, but
not production relations, is, on the one hand, solely the view of the
initial, but still handicapped, criticism of bourgeois economy. On the
other hand, it rests on the confusion and identification of the process
of social production with the simple labour-process, such as might even
be performed by an abnormally isolated human being without any social
assistance. To the extent that the labour-process is solely a process
between man and Nature, its simple elements remain common to all social
forms of development. But each specific historical form of this process
further develops its material foundations and social forms. Whenever a
certain stage of maturity has been reached, the specific historical form
is discarded and makes way for a higher one. The moment of arrival of
such a crisis is disclosed by the depth and breadth attained by the
contradictions and antagonisms between the distribution relations, and
thus the specific historical form of their corresponding production
relations, on the one hand, and the productive forces, the production
powers and the development of their agencies, on the other hand. A
conflict then ensues between the material development of production and
its social form.^([57])

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Notes

56a. J. Stuart Mill, _Some Unsettled Questions in Political Economy,_
London, 1844.

57. See the work on _Competition and Co-operation_ (1832?).

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III


Chapter 52. Classes

 

The owners merely of labour-power, owners of capital, and land-owners,
whose respective sources of income are wages, profit and ground-rent, in
other words, wage-labourers, capitalists and land-owners, constitute
then three big classes of modern society based upon the capitalist mode
of production.

In England, modern society is indisputably most highly and classically
developed in economic structure. Nevertheless, even here the
stratification of classes does not appear in its pure form. Middle and
intermediate strata even here obliterate lines of demarcation everywhere
(although incomparably less in rural districts than in the cities).
However, this is immaterial for our analysis. We have seen that the
continual tendency and law of development of the capitalist mode of
production is more and more to divorce the means of production from
labour, and more and more to concentrate the scattered means of
production into large groups, thereby transforming labour into
wage-labour and the means of production into capital. And to this
tendency, on the other hand, corresponds the independent separation of
landed property from capital and labour,^([58]) or the transformation of
all landed property into the form of landed property corresponding to
the capitalist mode of production.

The first question to he answered is this: What constitutes a class? —
and the reply to this follows naturally from the reply to another
question, namely: What makes wage-labourers, capitalists and landlords
constitute the three great social classes?

At first glance — the identity of revenues and sources of revenue. There
are three great social groups whose members, the individuals forming
them, live on wages, profit and ground-rent respectively, on the
realisation of their labour-power, their capital, and their landed
property.

However, from this standpoint, physicians and officials, e.g., would
also constitute two classes, for they belong to two distinct social
groups, the members of each of these groups receiving their revenue from
one and the same source. The same would also be true of the infinite
fragmentation of interest and rank into which the division of social
labour splits labourers as well as capitalists and landlords-the latter,
e.g., into owners of vineyards, farm owners, owners of forests, mine
owners and owners of fisheries.

[Here the manuscript breaks off.]

Notes

58 F. List remarks correctly: "The prevalence of a self-sufficient
economy on large estates demonstrates solely the lack of civilisation,
means of communication, domestic trades and wealthy cities. It is to be
encountered, therefore, throughout Russia, Poland, Hungary and
Mecklenburg. Formerly, it was also prevalent in England; with the
advance of trades and commerce, however, this was replaced by the
breaking up into middle estates and the leasing of land." (_Die
Ackerverfassung, die Zwergwirtschaft und die Auswanderung,_ 1842, p.10.)

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III

Capital Volume III



SUPPLEMENT BY FREDERICK ENGELS


Introduction

The third book of _Capital_ is receiving many and various
interpretations ever since it has been subject to public judgement. It
was not to be otherwise expected. In publishing it, what I was chiefly
concerned with was to produce as authentic a text as possible, to
demonstrate the new results obtained by Marx in Marx’s own words as far
as possible, to intervene myself only where absolutely unavoidable, and
even then to leave the reader in no doubt as to who was talking to him.
This has been deprecated. It has been said that I should have converted
the material available to me into a systematically written book, _en
faire un livre,_ as the French say; in other words, sacrifice the
authenticity of the text to the reader’s convenience. But this was not
how I conceived my task. I lacked all justification for such a revision,
a man like Marx has the right to be heard himself, to pass on his
scientific discoveries to posterity in the full genuineness of his own
presentation. Moreover, I had no desire thus to infringe — as it must
seem to me — upon the legacy of so pre-eminent a man; it would have
meant to me a breach of faith. And third, it would have been quite
useless. For the people who cannot or do not want to read, who, even in
Volume I, took more trouble to understand it wrongly than was necessary
to understand it correctly — for such people it is altogether useless to
put oneself out in any way. But for those who are interested in a real
understanding, the original text itself was precisely the most important
thing; for them my recasting would have had at most the value of a
commentary, and, what is more, a commentary on something unpublished and
inaccessible. The original text would have had to be referred to at the
first controversy, and at the second and third its publication _in
extenso_ would have become quite unavoidable.

Such controversies are a matter of course in a work that contains so
much that is new, and in a hastily sketched and partly incomplete first
draft to boot. And here my intervention, of course, can be of use: to
eliminate difficulties in understanding, to bring more to the fore
important aspects whose significance is not strikingly enough evident in
the text, and to make some important additions to the text written in
1865 to fit the state of affairs in 1895. Indeed, there are already two
points which seem to me to require a brief discussion.

------------------------------------------------------------------------


Law of Value and Rate of Profit

It was to be expected that the solution of the apparent contradiction
between these two factors would lead to debates just as much after, as
before, the publication of Marx's text. Some were prepared for a
complete miracle, and find themselves disappointed because they see a
simple, rational, prosaically-sober solution of the contradiction,
instead of the hocus-pocus they had expected. Most joyfully
disappointed, of course, is the well-known, illustrious Loria. He has at
last found the Archimedian fulcrum from which even a gnome of his
calibre can lift the solidly built, gigantic Marxian structure into the
air and explode it. What! he declaims indignantly. Is that supposed to
be a solution? That is pure mystification! When economists speak of
value, they mean value that is actually established in exchange.

"No economist with any trace of sense has ever concerned himself or will
ever want to concern himself with a value which commodities do not sell
for and never can sell for _(ne possono vendersi mai)_.... In asserting
that the value for which commodities _never_ sell is proportional to the
labor they contain, what does Marx do except repeat in an inverted form
the thesis of the orthodox economists, that the value for which
commodities sell is _not_ proportional to the labor expended on them?
... Matters are not helped by Marx's saying that despite the divergency
of individual prices from individual values, the total price of all
commodities always coincides with their total value, or the amount of
labor contained in the totality of the commodities. For inasmuch as
value is nothing more than the exchange ratio between one commodity and
another, the very concept of a total value is an absurdity, nonsense ...
a contradiction _in abjecto_...."

At the very beginning of the book, he argues, Marx says that exchange
can equate two commodities only by virtue of a similar and equally large
element contained in them — namely, the equal amount of labor. And now
he most solemnly repudiates himself by asserting that commodities
exchange with one another in a totally different ratio than that of the
amount of labor contained in them.

"Was there ever such an utter _reductio ad absurdum_, such complete
theoretical bankruptcy? Was ever scientific suicide committed with
greater pomp and more solemnity!" (_Nouva Antologia_, Feb.1, 1895,
pp.478-79.)

We see: our Loria is more than happy. Wasn't he right in treating Marx
as one of his own, as an ordinary charlatan? There you see it — Marx
sneers at his public just like Loria; he lives on mystification just
like the most insignificant Italian professor of economics. But, whereas
Dulcamara can afford that because he knows his trade, the clumsy
Northerner, Marx, commits nothing but ineptitudes, writes nonsense and
absurdities, so that there is nothing left finally for him but solemn
suicide.

Let us save for later the statement that commodities have never been
sold, nor can ever be sold, at the values determined by labor. Let us
deal here merely with Mr. Loria's assurance that

"value is nothing more than the exchange ratio between one commodity and
another," and that therefore "the very concept of a total value is an
absurdity, nonsense..."

The ratio in which two commodities are exchanged for each other, their
value, is therefore something purely accidental, stuck on to the
commodities from the outside, which can be one thing today and something
else tomorrow. Whether a metric hundredweight of wheat is exchanged for
a gramme or a kilogramme of gold does not in the least depend upon
conditions inherent in that wheat or gold. For otherwise these
conditions would also have to assert themselves in the exchange,
dominate the latter on the whole, and also have an independent existence
apart from exchange, so that one could speak of a total value of
commodities. That is nonsense, says the illustrious Loria. No matter in
what ratio two commodities may be exchanged for each other, that is
their value — and that's all there is to it. Hence, value is identical
with price, and every commodity has as many values as the prices it can
get. And price is determined by supply and demand; and any one asking
any more questions is a fool to expect an answer.

But there is a little hitch to the matter. In the normal state, supply
and demand balance. Therefore, let us divide all the commodities in the
world into two halves, the supply group and the equally large demand
group. Let us assume that each represents a price of 1,000 billion
marks, francs, pounds, or what you will. According to elementary
arithmetic, that makes a price of 2,000 billions. Nonsense, absurd, says
Mr. Loria. The two groups together may represent a price of 2,000
billions. But it is otherwise with value. If we say price: 1,000 + 1,000
= 2,000. But if we say value: 1,000 + 1,000 = 0. At least in this case,
where the totality of commodities is involved. For here the commodities
of each of the two groups are worth 1,000 billion only because each of
the two can and will give this sum for the commodities of the other. But
if we unite the totality of the commodities of the two in the hands of a
third person, the first has no value in his hand any longer, nor the
second, and the third certainly not — in the end, no one has anything.
And again we marvel at the superiority with which our southern
Cagliostro has manhandled the concept of value in such a fashion that
not the slightest trace of it has been left. This is the acme of vulgar
economics!

In Braun's _Archiv für soziale Gesetzgebung_, Vol. VII, No.4, Werner
Sombart gives an outline of the Marxian system which, taken all in all,
is excellent. It is the first time that a German university professor
succeeds on the whole in seeing in Marx's writings what Marx really
says, stating that the criticism of the Marxian system cannot consist of
a refutation —

"let the political careerist deal with that"

— but merely in a further development. Sombart, too, deals with our
subject, as is to be expected. He investigates the importance of value
in the Marxian system, and arrives at the following results. Value is
not manifest in the exchange relation of capitalistically produced
commodities; it does not live in the consciousness of the agents of
capitalist production; it is not an empirical, but a mental, a logical
fact; the concept of value in its material definiteness in Marx is
nothing but the economic expression for the fact of the social
productive power of labor as the basis of economic existence; in the
final analysis, the law of value dominates economic processes in a
capitalist economic system, and for this economic system quite generally
has the following content: the value of commodities is the specific and
historical form in which the productive power of labor, in the last
analysis dominating all economic processes, asserts itself as a
determining factor. So, says Sombart, it cannot be said that this
conception of the significance of the law of value for the capitalist
form of production is wrong. But it does seem to me to be too broad, and
susceptible of a narrower, more precise formulation: in my opinion it by
no means exhausts the entire significance of the law of value for the
economic stages of society's development dominated by this law.

There is a likewise excellent article by Conrad Schmidt on the third
volume of _Capital_ in Braun's _Sozialpolitisches Zentralblatt_,
February 25, 1895, No.22. Especially to be emphasized here is the proof
of how the Marxian derivation of average profit from surplus-value for
the first time gives an answer to the question not even posed by
economics up to now: how the magnitude of this average rate of profit is
determined, and how it comes about that it is, say, 10 or 15 per cent
and not 50 or 100 per cent. Since we know that the surplus-value first
appropriated by the industrial capitalist is the sole and exclusive
source from which profit and rent flow, this question solves itself.
This passage of Schmidt's article might be directly written for
economists a la Loria, if it were not labor in vain to open the eyes of
those who do not want to see.

Schmidt, too, has his formal misgivings regarding the law of value. He
calls it a scientific _hypothesis_, set up to explain the actual
exchange process, which proves to be the necessary theoretical starting
point, illuminating and indispensable, even in respect of the phenomena
of competitive prices which seem in absolute contradiction to it.
According to him, without the law of value all theoretical insight into
the economic machinery of capitalist reality ceases. And in a private
letter that he permits me to quote, Schmidt declares the law of value
within the capitalist form of production to be a pure, although
theoretically necessary, fiction. This view, however, is quite incorrect
in my opinion. The law of value has a far greater and more definite
significance for capitalist production than that of a mere hypothesis,
not to mention a fiction, even though a necessary one.

Sombart, as well as Schmidt, — I mention the illustrious Loria merely as
an amusing vulgar-economist foil — does not make sufficient allowance
for the fact that we are dealing here not only with a purely logical
process, but with a historical process, and its explanatory reflection
in thought, the logical pursuance of its inner connections.

The decisive passage is to be found in Marx, Vol. III,:

"The whole difficulty arises from the fact that commodities are not
exchanged simply as _commodities_, but as _products of capitals_, which
claim participation in the total amount of surplus-value, proportional
to their magnitude, or equal if they are of equal magnitude."

To illustrate this difference, it is supposed that the workers are in
possession of their means of production, that they work on the average
for equally long periods of time and with equal intensity, and exchange
their commodities with one another directly. Then, in one day, two
workers would have added by their labor an equal amount of new value to
their products, but the product of each would have different value,
depending on the labor already embodied in the means of production. This
latter part of the value would represent the constant capital of
capitalist economy, while that part of the newly-added value employed
for the worker's means of subsistence would represent the variable
capital, and the portion of the new value still remaining would
represent the surplus-value, which in this case would belong to the
worker. Thus, after deducting the amount to replace the "constant" part
of value only advanced by them, both workers would get equal values; but
the ratio of the part representing surplus-value to the value of the
means of production — which correspond to the capitalist rate of profit
— would be different in each case. But since each of them gets the value
of the means of production replaced through the exchange, this would be
a wholly immaterial circumstance.

"The exchange of commodities at their values, or approximately at their
values, thus requires a _much lower stage_ than their exchange at their
prices of production, which requires a definite level of capitalist
development.... Apart from the domination of prices and price movement
by the law of value, it is quite appropriate to regard the values of
commodities as not only _theoretically_ but also _historically_
antecedent (prius) to the prices of production. This applies to
conditions _in which the laborer owns his own means of production_, and
this is the condition of the land-owning working farmer and the
craftsman, in the ancient as well as in the modern world. This agrees
also with the view we expressed previously, that the evolution of
products into commodities arises through exchange between different
communities, not between the members of the same community. It holds not
only for this primitive condition, but also for subsequent conditions,
based on slavery and serfdom, and for the guild organization of
handicrafts, so long as the means of production involved in each branch
of production can be transferred from one sphere to another only with
difficulty and therefore the various spheres of production are related
to one another, within certain limits, as foreign countries or communist
communities."

Had Marx an opportunity to go over the third volume once more, he would
doubtless have extended this passage considerably. As it stands, it
gives only a sketchy outline of what is to be said on the point in
question. Let us, therefore, examine it somewhat closer.

We all know that at the beginning of society, products are consumed by
the producers themselves, and that these producers are spontaneously
organized in more or less communistic communities; that the exchange of
the surplus of these products with strangers, which ushers in the
conversion of products into commodities, is of a later date; that it
takes places at first only between individual communities of different
tribes, but later also prevails within the community, and contributes
considerably to the latter's dissolution into bigger or smaller family
groups. But even after this dissolution, the exchanging family heads
remain working peasants, who produce almost all they require with the
aid of their families on their own farmsteads, and get only a slight
portion of the required necessities from the outside in exchange for
surplus products of their own. The family is engaged not only in
agriculture and livestock-raising; it also works their products up into
finished articles of consumption; now and then it even does its own
milling with the hand-mill; it bakes bread, spins, dyes, weaves flax and
wool, tans leather, builds and repairs wooden buildings, makes tools and
utensils, and not infrequently does joinery and blacksmithing; so that
the family, or family group, is in the main self-sufficient.

The little that such a family had to obtain by barter or buy from
outside, even up to the beginning of the 19th century in Germany,
consisted principally of the objects of handicraft production — that is,
such things the nature of whose manufacture was by no means unknown to
the peasant, and which he did not produce himself only because he lacked
the raw material or because the purchased article was much better or
very much cheaper. Hence, the peasant of the Middle Ages knew fairly
accurately the labor-time required for the manufacture of the articles
obtained by him in barter. The smith and the cartwright of the village
worked under his eyes; likewise, the tailor and shoemaker — who in my
youth still paid their visits to our Rhine peasants, one after another,
turning home-made materials into shoes and clothing. The peasants, as
well as the people from whom they bought, were themselves workers; the
exchanged articles were each one's own products. What had they expended
in making these products? Labor and labor alone: to replace tools, to
produce raw material, and to process it, they spent nothing but their
own labor-power; how then could they exchange these products of theirs
for those of other laboring producers otherwise than in the ratio of
labor expended on them? Not only was the labor-time spent on these
products the only suitable measure for the quantitative determination of
the values to be exchanged: no other way was at all possible. Or is it
believed that the peasant and the artisan were so stupid as to give up
the product of 10 hours' labor of one person for that of a single hours'
labor of another? No other exchange is possible in the whole period of
peasant natural economy than that in which the exchanged quantities of
commodities tend to be measured more and more according to the amounts
of labor embodied in them. From the moment money penetrates into this
mode of economy, the tendency towards adaptation to the law of value (in
the Marxian formulation, _nota bene_!) grows more pronounced on the one
hand, while on the other it is already interrupted by the interference
of usurers' capital and fleecing by taxation; the periods for which
prices, on average, approach to within a negligible margin of values,
begin to grow longer.

The same holds good for exchange between peasant products and those of
the urban artisans. At the beginning, this barter takes places directly,
without the medium of the merchant, on the cities' market days, when the
peasant sells and makes his purchases. Here, too, not only does the
peasant know the artisan's working conditions, but the latter knows
those of the peasant as well. For the artisan is himself still a bit of
a peasant — he not only has a vegetable and fruit garden, but very often
also has a small piece of land, one or two cows, pigs, poultry, etc.
People in the Middle Ages were thus able to check up with considerable
accuracy on each other's production costs for raw material, auxiliary
material, and labor-time — at least in respect of articles of daily
general use.

But how, in this barter on the basis of the quantity of labor, was the
latter to be calculated, even if only indirectly and relatively, for
products requiring a longer labor, interrupted at regular intervals, and
uncertain in yield — grain or cattle, for example? And among people, to
boot, who could not calculate? Obviously, only by means of a lengthy
process of zigzag approximation, often feeling the way here and there in
the dark, and, as is usual, learning only through mistakes. But each
one's necessity for covering his own outlay on the whole always helped
to return to the right direction; and the small number of kinds of
articles in circulation, as well as the often century-long stable nature
of their production, facilitated the attaining of this goal. And that it
by no means took so long for the relative amount of value of these
products to be fixed fairly closely is already proved by the fact that
cattle, the commodity for which this appears to be most difficult
because of the long time of production of the individual head, became
the first rather generally accepted money commodity. To accomplish this,
the value of cattle, its exchange ratio to a large number of other
commodities, must already have attained a relatively unusual
stabilization, acknowledged without contradiction in the territories of
many tribes. And the people of that time were certainly clever enough —
both the cattlebreeders and their customers — not to give away the
labor-time expended by them without an equivalent in barter. On the
contrary, the closer people are to the primitive state of commodity
production — the Russians and Orientals, for example — the more time do
they still waste today, in order to squeeze out, through long tenacious
bargaining, the full compensation for their labor-time expended on a
product.

Starting with this determination of value by labor-time, the whole of
commodity production developed, and with it, the multifarious relations
in which the various aspects of the law of value assert themselves, as
described in the first part of Vol. I of _Capital_; that is, in
particular, the conditions under which labor alone is value-creating.
These are conditions which assert themselves without entering the
consciousness of the participants and can themselves be abstracted from
daily practice only through laborious, theoretical investigation; which
act, therefore, like natural laws, as Marx proved to follow necessarily
from the nature of commodity production. The most important and most
incisive advance was the transition to metallic money, the consequence
of which, however, was that the determination of value by labor-time was
no longer visible upon the surface of commodity exchange. From the
practical point of view, money became the decisive measure of value, all
the more as the commodities entering trade became more varied, the more
they came from distant countries, and the less, therefore, the
labor-time necessary for their production could be checked. Money itself
usually came first from foreign parts; even when precious metals were
obtained within the country, the peasant and artisan were partly unable
to estimate approximately the labor employed therein, and partly their
own consciousness of the value-measuring property of labor had been
fairly well dimmed by the habit of reckoning with money; in the popular
mind, money began to represent absolute value.

In a word: the Marxian law of value holds generally, as far as economic
laws are valid at all, for the whole period of simple commodity
production — that is, up to the time when the latter suffers a
modification through the appearance of the capitalist form of
production. Up to that time, prices gravitate towards the values fixed
according to the Marxian law and oscillate around those values, so that
the more fully simple commodity production develops, the more the
average prices over long periods uninterrupted by external violent
disturbances coincide with values within a negligible margin. Thus, the
Marxian law of value has general economic validity for a period lasting
from the beginning of exchange, which transforms products into
commodities, down to the 15th century of the present era. But the
exchange of commodities dates from a time before all written history —
which in Egypt goes back to at least 2500 B.C., and perhaps 5000 B.C.,
and in Babylon to 4000 B.C., perhaps to 6000 B.C.; thus, the law of
value has prevailed during a period of from five to seven thousand
years. And now, let us admire the thoroughness of Mr. Loria, who calls
the value generally and directly valid during this period a value at
which commodities are never sold nor can ever be sold, and with which no
economist having a spark of common sense would ever occupy himself!

We have not spoken of the merchant up to now. We could save the
consideration of this intervention for now, when we pass to the
transformation of simple into capitalist commodity production. The
merchant was the revolutionary element in this society where everything
else was stable — stable, as it were, through inheritance; where the
peasant obtained not only his hide of land, but his status as a freehold
proprietor, as a free or enthralled quit-rent peasant or serf, and the
urban artisan his trade and guild privileges by inheritance and almost
inalienably, and each of them, in addition, his customer, his market, as
well as his skill, trained from childhood for the inherited craft. Into
this world then entered the merchant, with whom its revolution was to
start. But not as a conscious revolutionary; on the contrary, as flesh
of its flesh, bone of its bone. The merchant of the Middle Ages was by
no means an individualist; he was essentially an associate like all his
contemporaries. The mark association, grown out of primitive communism,
prevailed in the countryside. Each peasant originally had an equal hide,
with equal pieces of land of each quality, and a corresponding, equal
share in the rights of the mark. After the mark had become a closed
association, and no new hides were allocated any longer, subdivision of
the hides occurred through inheritance, etc., with corresponding
subdivisions of the common rights in the mark; but the full hide
remained the unit, so that there were half, quarter and eighth-hides
with half, quarter and eighth-rights in the mark. All later productive
associations, particularly the guilds in the cities, whose statutes were
nothing but the application of the mark constitution to a craft
privilege instead of to a restricted area of land, followed the pattern
of the mark association. The central point of the whole organization was
the equal participation of every member in the privileges and produce
assured to the guild, as is strikingly expressed in the 1527 licence of
the Elberfeld and Barmen yarn trade. (Thun: _Industrie am Niederrhein_,
Vol. II, 164 ff.) The same holds true of the mine guilds, where each
share participated equally and was also divisible, together with its
rights and obligations, like the hide of the mark member. And the same
holds good in no less degree of the merchant companies, which initiated
overseas trade. The Venetians and the Genoese in the harbor of
Alexandria or Constantinople, each "nation" in its own _fondaco_ —
dwelling, inn, warehouse, exhibition and salesrooms, together with
central offices — formed complete trade associations; they were closed
to competitors and customers; they sold at prices fixed among
themselves; their commodities had a definite quality guaranteed by
public inspection and often by stamp; they deliberated in common on the
prices to be paid by the natives for their products, etc. Nor did
Hanseatic merchants act otherwise on the German Bridge (Tydske Bryggen)
in Bergen, Norway; the same holds true of their Dutch and English
competitors. Woe to the man who sold under the price or bought above the
price! The boycott that struck him meant at that time inevitable ruin,
not counting the direct penalties imposed by the association upon the
guilty. And even close associations were founded for definite purposes,
such as the Maona of Genoa in the 14th and 15th centuries, for years the
ruler of the alum mines in Phocaea in Asia Minor, as well as of the
Island of Chios; furthermore, the great Ravensberg Trading Company,
which dealt with Italy and Spain since the end of the 14th century,
founding branches in those countries; the German company of the
Augsburgers: Fugger, Welser, Vöhlin, Höchstetter, etc; that of the
Nürnbergers: Hirschvogel and others, which participated with a capital
of 66,000 ducats and three ships in the 1505-06 Portuguese expedition to
India, making a net profit of 150 per cent, according to others 175 per
cent (Heyd; _Levantehandel_, Vol. II, p.524); and a large number of
other companies, "Monopolia," over which Luther waxes so indignant.

Here, for the first time, we meet with a profit and a rate of profit.
The merchant's efforts are deliberately and consciously aimed at making
this rate of profit equal for all participants. The Venetians in the
Levant, and the Hanseatics in the North, each paid the same prices for
his commodities as his neighbor; his transport charges were the same, he
got the same prices as every other merchant of his "nation". Thus, the
rate of profit was equal for all. In the big trading companies, the
allocation of profit _pro rata_ of the paid-in capital share is as much
a matter of course as the participation in mark rights _pro rata_ of the
entitled hide share, or as the mining profit _pro rata_ of the mining
share. The equal rate of profit, which in its fully developed form is
one of the final results of capitalist production, thus manifests itself
here in its simplest form as one of the points from which capital
started historically, as a direct offshoot in fact of the mark
association, which in turn is a direct offshoot of primitive communism.

This original rate of profit was necessarily very high. The business was
very risky, not only because of wide-spread piracy; the competing
nations also permitted themselves all sorts of acts of violence when the
opportunity arose; finally, sales and marketing conditions were based
upon licences granted by foreign princes, which were broken or revoked
often enough. Hence, the profit had to include a high insurance premium.
The turnover was slow, the handling of transactions protracted, and in
the best periods — which, admittedly, were seldom of long duration — the
business was a monopoly trade with monopoly profit. The very high
interest rates prevailing at the time, which always had to be lower on
the whole than the percentage of usual commercial profit, also prove
that the rate of profit was on the average very high.

But this high rate of profit, equal for all participants and obtained
through joint labor of the community, held only locally within the
associations — that is, in this case the "nation," Venetians, Genoese,
Hanseatics, and Dutchmen each had a special rate of profit, and at the
beginning more or less each individual market areas, as well.
Equalization of these different company profit rates took place in the
opposite way, through competition. First, the profit rates of the
different markets for one and the same nation. If Alexandria offered
more profit for Venetian goods than Cyprus, Constantinople, or
Trebizond, the Venetians would start more capital moving towards
Alexandria, withdrawing it from trade with other markets. Then, the
gradual equalization of profit rates among the different nations,
exporting the same or similar goods to the same markets, had to follow,
and some of these nations were very often squeezed to the wall and
disappeared from the scene. But this process was being continually
interrupted by political events, just as all Levantine trade collapsed
owing to the Mongolian and Turkish invasions; the great
geographic-commercial discoveries after 1492 only accelerated this
decline and then made it final.

The sudden expansion of the market area that followed the revolution in
communications connected with it, introduced no essential change at
first in the nature of trade operations. At the beginning, co-operative
companies also dominated trade with India and America. But in the first
place, bigger nations stood behind these companies. In trade with
America, the whole of great united Spain took the place of the
Catalonians trading with the Levant; alongside it, two countries like
England and France; and even Holland and Portugal, the smallest, were
still at least as large and strong as Venice, the greatest and strongest
trading nation of the preceding period. This gave the traveling
merchant, the merchant adventurer of the 16th and 17th centuries, a
backing that made the company, which protected its companions with arms,
also, more and more superfluous, and its expenses an outright burden.
Moreover, the wealth in a single hand grew considerably faster, so that
single merchants soon could invest as large sums in an enterprise as
formerly an entire company. The trading companies, wherever still
existent, were usually converted into armed corporations, which
conquered and monopolistically exploited whole newly discovered
countries under the protection and the sovereignty of the mother
country. But the more colonies were founded in the new areas, largely by
the state, the more did company trade recede before that of the
individual merchant, and the equalization of the profit rate became
therewith more and more a matter of competition exclusively.

Up to now, we have become acquainted with a rate of profit only for
merchant capital. For only merchant and usurers' capital had existed up
to that time; industrial capital was yet to be developed. Production was
still predominantly in the hands of workers owning their own means of
production, whose work therefore yielded no surplus-value to any
capital. If they had to surrender a part of the product to third parties
without compensation, it was in the form of tribute to feudal lords.
Merchant capital, therefore, could only make its profit, at least at the
beginning, out of the foreign buyers of domestic products, or the
domestic buyers of foreign products; only toward the end of this period
— for Italy, that is, with the decline of Levantine trade — were foreign
competition and the difficulty of marketing able to compel the
handicraft producers of export commodities to sell the commodity under
its value to the exporting merchant. And thus we find here that
commodities are sold at their value, on the average, in the domestic
retail trade of individual producers with one another, but, for the
reasons given, not in international trade as a rule. Quite the opposite
of the present-day world, where the production prices hold good in
international and wholesale trade, while the formations of prices in
urban retail trade is governed by quite other rates of profit. So that
the meat of an ox, for example, experiences today a greater rise in
price on its way from the London wholesaler to the individual London
consumer than from the wholesaler in Chicago, including transport, to
the London wholesaler.

The instrument that gradually brought about this revolution in price
formation was industrial capital. Rudiments of the latter had been
formed as early as the Middle Ages, in three fields — shipping, mining,
and textiles. Shipping on the scale practiced by the Italian and
Hanseatic maritime republics was impossible without sailors, i.e.,
wage-laborers (whose wage relationship may have been concealed under
association forms with profit-sharing), or without oarsmen —
wage-laborers or slaves — for the galleys of that day. The guilds in the
ore mines, originally associated workers, had already been converted in
almost every case into stock companies for exploiting the deposits by
means of wage-laborers. And in the textile industry, the merchant had
begun to place the little master-weaver directly in his service, by
supplying him with yarn and having it made into cloth for his account in
return for a fixed wage — in short, by himself changing from a mere
buyer into a so-called _contractor_.

Here we have the first beginnings of the formation of capitalist
surplus-value. We can ignore the mining guilds as closed monopoly
corporations. With regard to the ship-owners, it is obvious that their
profit had to be at least as high as the customary one in the country,
plus an extra increment for insurance, depreciation of ships, etc. But
how were matters with the textile contractors, who first brought
commodities, directly manufactured for capitalist account, into
competition with the commodities of the same sort made for handicraft
account?

Merchant capital's rate of profit was at hand to start with. Likewise,
it had already been equalized to an approximate average rate, at least
for the locality in question. Now, what could induce the merchant to
take on the extra business of a contractor? Only one thing: the prospect
of greater profit at the same selling price as the others. And he had
this prospect. By taking the little master into his service, he broke
through the traditional bonds of production within which the producer
sold his finished product and nothing else. The merchant capitalist
bought the labor-power, which still owned its production instruments but
no longer the raw material. By thus guaranteeing the weaver regular
employment, he could depress the weaver's wage to such a degree that a
part of the labor-time furnished remained unpaid for. The contractor
thus became an appropriator of surplus-value over and above his
commercial profit. Admittedly, he had to employ additional capital to
buy yarn, etc., and leave it in the weaver's hands until the article for
which he formerly had to pay full price only upon purchasing it, was
finished. But, in the first place, he had already used extra capital in
most cases for advances to the weaver, who as a rule submitted to the
new production conditions only under the pressure of debt. And,
secondly, apart from that, the calculation took the following form:

Assume that our merchant operates his export business with capital of
30,000 ducats, sequins, pounds sterling or whatever is the case. Of
that, say 10,000 are engaged in the purchase of domestic goods, whereas
20,000 are used in the overseas market. Say the capital is turned over
once in two years. Annual turnover = 15,000. Now, our merchant wants to
become a contractor, to have cloth woven for his own account. How much
additional capital must he invest? Let us assume that the production
time of the piece of cloth, such as he sells, averages two months —
which is certainly very high. Let us further assume that he has to pay
for everything in cash. Hence, he must advance enough capital to supply
his weavers with yarn for two months. Since his turnover is 15,000 a
year, he buys cloth for 2,500 in two months. Let us say that 2,000 of
that represents the value of yarn, and 500 weavers' wages; then our
merchant requires an additional capital of 2,000. We assume that the
surplus-value he appropriates from the weaver by the new method totals
only 5 per cent of the value of the cloth, which constitutes the
certainly very modest surplus-value rate of 25 per cent. ( 2,000c + 500v
+ 125s; s' = 125/500 = 25%, p' = 125/2,500 = 5%). Our man then makes an
extra profit of 750 on his annual turnover of 15,000, and has thus got
his additional capital back in 2⅔ years.

But in order to accelerate his sales and hence his turnover, thus making
the same profit with the same capital in a shorter period of time, and
hence a greater profit in the same time, he will donate a small portion
of his surplus-value to the buyer — he will sell cheaper than his
competitors. These will also gradually be converted into contractors,
and then the extra profit for all of them will be reduced to the
ordinary profit, or even to a lower profit on the capital that has been
increased for all of them. The equality of the profit rate is
re-established, although possibly on another level, by a part of the
surplus-value made at home being turned over to the foreign buyers.

The next step in the subjugation of industry by capital takes place
through the introduction of manufacture. This, too, enable the
manufacturer, who is most often his own export trader in the 17th and
18th centuries — generally in Germany down to 1850, and still today here
and there — to produce cheaper than his old-fashioned competitor, the
handicraftsman. The same process is repeated; the surplus-value
appropriated by the manufacturing capitalist enables him (or the export
merchant who shares with him) to sell cheaper than his competitors,
until the general introduction of the new mode of production, when
equalization against takes place. The already existing mercantile rate
of profit, even if it is levelled out only locally, remains the
Procrustean bed in which the excessive industrial surplus-value is
lopped off without mercy.

If manufacturing sprung ahead by cheapening its products, this is even
more true of modern industry, which forces the production costs of
commodities lower and lower through its repeated revolutions in
production, relentlessly eliminating all former modes of production. It
is large-scale industry, too, that thus finally conquers the domestic
market for capital, puts an end to the small-scale production and
natural economy of the self-sufficient peasant family, and places the
entire nation in service of capital. Likewise, it equalizes the profit
rate of the different commercial and industrial branches of business
into _one_ general rate of profit, and finally ensures industry the
position of power due to it in this equalization by eliminating most of
the obstacles formerly hindering the transfer of capital from one branch
to another. Thereby the conversion of values into production prices is
accomplished for all exchange as a whole. This conversion therefore
proceeds according to objective laws, without the consciousness or the
intent of the participants. Theoretically, there is no difficulty at all
in the fact that competition reduces to the general level profits which
exceed the general rate, thus again depriving the first industrial
appropriator of the surplus-value exceeding the average. All the more so
in practice, however, for the spheres of production with excessive
surplus-value, with high variable and low constant capital — i.e., with
low capital composition — are by their very nature the ones that are
last and least completely subjected to capitalist production, especially
agriculture. On the other hand, the rise of production prices above
commodity values, which is required to raise the below-average
surplus-value, contained in the products of the spheres of high capital
composition, to the level of the average rate of profit, appears to be
extremely difficult theoretically, but is soonest and most easily
effected in practice, as we have seen. For when commodities of this
class are first produced capitalistically and enter capitalist commerce,
they compete with commodities of the same nature produced by
per-capitalist methods and hence dearer. Thus, even if the capitalist
producer renounces a part of the surplus-value, he can still obtain the
rate of profit prevailing in his locality, which originally had no
direct connection with surplus-value because it had arisen from merchant
capital long before there was any capitalist production at all, and
therefore before an industrial rate of profit was possible.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

 


The Stock Exchange

1. The position of the stock exchange in capitalist production in
general is clear from Vol. III, Part 5, especially Chapter [27]. But
since 1865, when the book was written, a change has taken place which
today assigns a considerably increased and constantly growing role to
the stock exchange, and which, as it develops, tends to concentrate all
production, industrial as well as agricultural, and all commerce, the
means of communication as well as the functions of exchange, in the
hands of stock exchange operators, so that the stock exchange becomes
the most prominent representative of capitalist production itself.

2. In 1865 the stock exchange was still a _secondary_ element in the
capitalist system. Government bonds represented the bulk of exchange
securities, and even their sum-total was still relatively small.
Besides, there were joint-stock banks, predominant on the continent and
in America, and just beginning to absorb the aristocratic private banks
in England, but still relatively insignificant _en masse._ Railway
shares were still comparatively weak compared to the present time. There
were still only few directly productive establishments in stock company
form — and, like the banks, most of all in the _poorer_ countries:
Germany, Austria, America, etc. The "minister’s eye" was still an
unconquered superstition.

At that time, the stock exchange was still a place where the capitalists
took away each other’s accumulated capital, and which directly concerned
the workers only as new proof of the demoralising general effect of
capitalist economy and as confirmation of the Calvinist doctrine that
predestination (alias chance) decides, even in this life, blessedness
and damnation, wealth, i.e., enjoyment and power, and poverty, i.e.,
privation and servitude.

3. Now it is otherwise. Since the crisis of 1866 accumulation has
proceeded with ever-increasing rapidity, so that in no industrial
country, least of all in England, could the expansion of production keep
up with that of accumulation, or the accumulation of the individual
capitalist be completely utilised in the enlargement of his own
business; English cotton industry as early as 1845; the railway
swindles. But with this accumulation the number of _rentiers,_ people
who were fed up with the regular tension in business and therefore
wanted merely to amuse themselves or to follow a mild pursuit as
directors or governors of companies, also rose. And third, in order to
facilitate the investment of this mass floating around as money-capital,
new legal forms of limited liability companies were established wherever
that had not yet been done, and the liability of the shareholder,
formerly unlimited, was also reduced ± [more or less] (joint-stock
companies in Germany, 1890. Subscription 40 per cent!).

4. Thereafter, gradual conversion of industry into stock companies. One
branch after another suffers this fate. First iron, where giant plants
are now necessary (before that, mines, where not already organised on
shares). Then the chemical industry, likewise machinery plants. On the
continent, the textile industry; in England, only in a few areas in
Lancashire (Oldham Spinning Mill, Burnley Weaving Mill, etc., tailor
co-operatives, but this is only a preliminary stage which will again
fall into the masters’ hands at the next crisis), breweries (the
American ones sold a few years ago to English capital, then Guinness,
Bass, Allsopp). Then the trusts, which create gigantic enterprises under
common management (such as United Alkali). The ordinary individual firm
is more and more only a preliminary stage to bring the business to the
point where it is big enough to be "founded."

Likewise in trade: Leafs, Parsons, Morleys, Morrison, Dillon — all
founded. The same in retail stores by now, and not merely under the
cloak of co-operation _à la_ "stores."

Likewise banks and other credit establishments even in England. A
tremendous number of new banks, all shares delimited. Even old banks
etc., are converted, with seven private shareholders, into limited
companies.

5. The same in the field of agriculture. The enormously expanded banks,
especially in Germany under all sorts of bureaucratic names, more and
more the holders of mortgages; with their shares the actual higher
ownership of landed property is transferred to the stock exchange, and
this is even more true when the farms fall into the creditors’ hands.
Here the agricultural revolution of prairie cultivation is very
impressive; if it continues, the time can be foreseen when England’s and
France’s land will also be in the hands of the stock exchange.

6. Now all foreign investments in the form of shares. To mention England
alone: American railways, North and South (consult the stock exchange
list), Goldberger, etc.

7. Then colonisation. Today this is purely a subsidiary of the stock
exchange, in whose interests the European powers divided Africa a few
years ago, and the French conquered Tunis and Tonkin. Africa leased
directly to companies (Niger, South Africa, German South-West and German
East Africa), and Mashonaland and Natal seized by Rhodes for the stock
exchange.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents for Capital, Vol. III

Marx/Engels Archive

_Science & Society_, Vol. 60. No. 4, Winter 1996-1997, 452-466



ENGELS’ EDITION OF THE THIRD VOLUME OF _CAPITAL_ AND MARX’S ORIGINAL MANUSCRIPT


MICHAEL HEINRICH

_ABSTRACT_.- In 1993, Marx’s manuscript of 1864-65, used by Engels as
the basis for Volume III of _Capital_, became available as part of the
_Marx-Engels Gesamtausgabe_ (_MEGA_). It is therefore now possible to
compare the original ms. with the version published by Engels. This
comparison reveals that Engels made significant modifications, despite
his own claim to have restricted his role to one of faithfully
presenting Marx’s own work. Changes to Marx’s text include design of
headings, insertion of sub-headings, and textual transpositions,
omissions and insertions. The changes have real impacts on the text,
especially in the area of crisis theory, the theory of credit, and the
relation between capitalism and commodity production. Marx’s thinking
was far more ambivalent and much less developed that it appears to be on
the basis of Engels’ editing, and it is doubtful whether the materials
were available to complete _Capital_. In any case, future study of
Marx’s thought must turn to the _MEGA_ mss. rather than to Engels’
Volume III.

IN 1894, ENGELS PUBLISHED THE THIRD VOLUME of _Capital_ out of Marx’s
literary bequest. Twenty-seven years after the first volume’s first
publication, Marx’s main oeuvre was complete — at least as far as its
“theoretical” part was concerned, since Marx had planned a fourth,
theory-historical volume in the 1860s.^([1])

The third volume has caused heavy controversies concerning Marx’s
economic theory ever since it was published. The problem of
transformation of values into production prices, the decline of the rate
of profit, crisis theory, the analysis of the credit system — all these
questions refer to parts of the third volume of _Capital_ Soon the
question was raised as to how strongly Engels intervened into Marx’s
text during the editing of the manuscript (e.g., Gide and Rist, 1913,
514).

The manuscript of 1864-65, which Engels mainly used for the publication,
was first published in 1992 in the _Marx Engels Gesamtausgabe_
(_MEGA_),^([2]) so that now for the first time in 100 years two
questions can be examined: 1) To what extent, and with what implications
for content, did Engels intervene into Marx’s original manuscript during
editing? and 2) how far did Marx actually get with the elaboration of
the third volume of _Capital_.


1. Extant Knowledge of Engels’ Editing

Two years after Marx’s death, Engels had already published the second
volume of _Capital_ from Marx’s estate. In the preface to this volume,
he wrote about volume III, which was still to be published:

The preparation of this Book for publication is proceeding rapidly. So
far as 1 am able to judge up to now, it will present mainly technical
difficulties, with the exception of a few but very important sections.
(_Capital_, II_,_ 5.)

Despite the expectations due to this statement that volume III would be
published as fast as volume II, it was to take nine more years until it
was finally finished. In the meantime, Engels had repeatedly announced
the publication, mainly in letters. In view of the long period until the
date of publication (and even considering Engels’ other obligations), it
can be presumed that the publication of the manuscript caused him great
effort and the question is, into what task was this effort invested?

In the preface to the finally published volume, Engels reported on his
editing activity. He characterized Marx’s manuscript as an extremely
“incomplete first draft":

The beginnings of the various parts were, as a rule, pretty carefully
done and even stylistically polished. But the farther one went, the more
sketchy and incomplete was the manuscript, the more excursions it
contained into arising side-issues whose proper place in the argument
was left for later decision, and the longer and more complex the
sentences, in which thoughts were recorded in _slatu nascendi._
(_Capital,_ III, 2.)

On his own editing of Marx’s text, Engels wrote:

I limited this to the essential. I tried my best to preserve the
character of the first draft wherever it was sufficiently clear....
Wherever my alterations or additions exceeded the bounds of editing, or
where I had to apply Marx’s factual material to independent conclusions
of my own, if even as faithful as possible to the spirit of Marx, I have
enclosed the entire passage in brackets and affixed my initials.
(_Capital_, III, 3.)

This statement suggests that Engels marked all his textual interventions
(except for the ones not “exceeding the bounds of editing”) as such. But
in the following characterization of the individual paragraphs, he lists
a large number of transpositions, additions, contractions and similar
alterations, which he especially made in Part V, whereby he even
dissolved a whole chapter and distributed its contents. But he thereby
“succeeded in working into the text _all_ the author’s relevant
statements” (_Capital_, III_,_ 6). Here he also says: “This could not,
of course, be done without considerable interpolations on my part for
the sake of continuity. Unless they are merely formal in nature, the
interpolations are expressly indicated as belonging to me” (_Capital,_
III, 6). This statement unmistakably says that Engels by no means
indicated all the interpolations and alterations he made. The preface
offers no clue regarding the extent of these alterations. It is to be
assumed, however, that they were by no means minor.

The supplement to _Capital_ written by Engels also indicates
considerable changes. In the supplement, Engels wrote that he had tried
to “eliminate difficulties in understanding,” and to “bring more to the
fore important aspects whose significance is not strikingly enough
evident in the text” (_Capital,_ III, 890). Thus, Engels himself wanted
to transmit what was important to the readers by correcting the
original. A letter to Danielson on July 4, 1889 also shows the extent of
the manipulations undertaken. Engels wrote:

But since this final volume is such a great and completely incontestable
work, I consider it to be my duty to publish it in a form which clearly
shows the overall line of argumentation clearly and plastically. This is
not quite so easy due to the state of this manuscript — a first, often
interrupted and incomplete sketch. (MEW, 37, 244.)

On the whole, Engels’ own characterizations of his editing activity are
contradictory. On the one hand, he claims to have only made minor
alterations; that he wanted to keep the text “in Marx’s own words” as
far as possible (_Capital_, III, 889); and that he didn’t want to
eliminate the text’s draft character. His editing indeed shows that this
third volume was by no means “finished.” Careful editing of Marx’s
manuscript can therefore be expected. On the other hand, however, there
is evidence that Engels must have made a large number of textual
modifications that are not indicated to the readers to clarify the
“overall line of argumentation,” or what Engels presumed as such.
Therefore, Engels cannot have exercised as much restraint in editing as
he claimed. This contradictory characterization of his editorial
treatment of Marx’s text is obviously an expression of his own
contradictory intentions. On the one hand, he wanted to preserve the
unfinished character of Marx’s manuscript and present an authentic text
to the readers. On the other hand, however, he wanted to make the text
more understandable (especially in view of the book’s political
importance); the most important points were to be evident not by a
commentary, but in the edition itself. These two objectives, however,
exclude each other.


2. An Overview of Engels’ Textual Modifications

The comparison of the original manuscript with Engels’ edition, which
has only just become possible, shows that there are modifications to the
original text on practically each page that have not been indicated.
Hardly one paragraph remained as Marx had written it. Engels’
modifications are not confined to “stylistical” matters. They can be
classified as follows:^([3])

A. _Design of titles and headings, the structure of the manuscript._
Even the title of the manuscript was altered by Engels: Engels turned
“Gestaltungen des Gesamtprozesses” (Formations of the Process as a
Whole) into “Der Gesamtprozess der kapitalistischen Produktion” (The
Process of _Capital_ist Production as a Whole). Thus an analogy to the
titles of Volumes I and II is created, but at the same time a certain
vagueness connected to Marx’s title is eliminated. Additionally, the
question is whether the title should, if seeking connection to the
earlier titles, mention “Reproduction” and not “Production."^([4])

Engels also made a detailed segmentation of the text. The original
manuscript was divided into only seven chapters with few or no
subdivisions. Engels turned the seven chapters into seven parts with 52
chapters and a number of subparagraphs. Many of the structure incisions
as well as most of the headings were created by

Engels: Marx’s text consists of 34 headings (and five construction
points which are only numbered), while Engels’ edition contains 92
headings.

The arrangement of a text and the headings used obviously strongly
influence the understanding of a text, especially if the text is not
finished but in large part sketchy and incomplete. By putting this
material together into chapters and inserting headings, this draft
character is concealed. But even more important, the readers can no
longer tell at what point in the manuscript “presentation” turns into
“inquiry.” The difference between presentation and inquiry, however, is
of central importance for Marx’s own methodical understanding.^([5]) To
Marx, “presentation” does not just mean the more or less skillful
assembly of final results. The factual correlation of the conditions
presented should be expressed by the correct presentation of the
categories, by “advancing from the abstract to the concrete.” To Marx,
the search for an adequate presentation is an essential part of his
process of inquiry. But the difference between complete and incomplete
presentation is concealed by the structure imposed by Engels.
Additionally, Engels tried to strengthen the coherence of the text
through omissions and connecting phrases. The readers do not learn that
a large part of Marx’s manuscript is open and undecided. Engels gives
them a _possible_ solution of the problems without letting them know
that there is a problem: the solution given _by Engels_ appears as a
mostly complete elaboration by Marx.

b. _Textual transpositions._ Engels transposed a large number of pieces
of Marx’s text. The transposed pieces consist of parts of a sentence,
long paragraphs and the rearrangement of whole text complexes, as in the
fifth chapter (Part V in Engels’ edition).

At this stage, a serious error of Engels has to be mentioned. Marx
wanted to begin his seventh chapter, “Revenues (Income) and their
Sources,” with “1) The Trinity Formula.” Engels believed he had found
three independent fragments concerning this point, two smaller ones
which he labelled I and II, and a longer one, labelled III. This last
fragment also had a gap, which Engels pointed out to the readers. As
Larissa Miskewitsch and Witali Wygodski (1985) managed to show after an
exact analysis of the manuscript even before the _MEGA_ volume was
published, these are not three independent fragments: The fragments
labelled I and II by Engels form a continuous text which exactly fills
the gap in fragment III.

c. _Text omissions._ Engels made a number of deletions of single words
or parts of sentences, and of whole paragraphs and longer text passages.
Only some of these passages were repetitions; sometimes they were
substantially important statements, as for example the reflections on
the transition from chapter I to II (_MEGA_ II.4.2, 282-83).

d. _Text conversions._ Engels changed the relevance of many text
passages: footnotes were integrated into the main text, many brackets in
the main text were omitted. Most of Marx’s emphases were deleted, and
Engels introduced his own emphases in some places. The omission of
brackets is especially problematic. It is not always clear whether the
text in brackets is an addition to the current argumentation, or a
remark that should not at all be inserted at this point, or whether it
is a preliminary, incomplete reflection. But such differentiations
disappear in Engels’ presentation. For instance, the famous passage on
the poverty of the masses as the “ultimate reason for all real crisis”
(_Capital,,_ III, 484), which is often quoted as a proof for the
existence of an under-consumption theory in Marx’s work, happened to be
inside such a bracket and was integrated into the main text by Engels.
Furthermore, Engels changed the text linguistically, but these merely
“stylistical” transformations fluently became important alterations in
context — for example the replacement of “mode of production” by
“production” (_Capital_, III, 484; _MEGA_ II.4.2, 540).

e. _Insertions and textual extensions._ Engels made a large number of
insertions other than the ones he indicated with his initials. They
concern single words or parts of a sentence or connecting phrases or
explanations to the text. Even relativizations of and reservations to
Marx’s text can be found. The alteration of Marx’s methodological
remarks is especially critical to the understanding of the text, as we
will see below.

f. _Modifications of minor importance_. These consist of textual
condensations (Engels summarized some passages expressed in a
complicated way by Marx); terminological alterations; stylistic changes
(in a narrow sense, e.g., replacement of anglicisms); alteration,
replacement and deletion of mathematical examples; and corrections of
references and citations (and their translation).

This overview already shows that the 1894 edition was an extensive
adaptation of Marx’s manuscript, and Engels did not inform the readers
about the true extent of his adaptation. The fact that this adaptation
affected the meaning of the original text was outlined above. This shall
now be shown in more detail.


3. Interpretatory Handicaps Caused by Engels’ Edition

a. _Crisis theory._ Marx did not structure the third chapter of his
manuscript, which deals with the “Law of the Tendency of the Rate of
Profit to Fall.” Engels divided the corresponding part of his edition
into three chapters (chapters XIII to XV); the first two chapters follow
Marx’s argumentation, which is adequately elaborated in the original.
Later, Marx’s chapter passes into a large mass of remarks, additions and
argumentative approaches, in unelaborated and incomplete form. At this
point, Marx’s presentation is no longer a systematic one. Due to Engels
giving this material a problematic chapter heading (“Exposition of the
Internal Contradictions of the Law”), introducing additional
substructure, inserting headings and increasing the coherence of the
text by deleting paragraphs and omitting brackets, the material in the
original manuscript is considerably upgraded. And indeed this chapter XV
— created by Engels — has often been considered a vastly complete
“Crisis Theory” based on the law of the tendency of the rate of profit
to fall. Even though the text published by Engels still shows that Marx
did not leave a complete crisis theory, the impression is given that
Marx left an essentially complete framework that had only to be filled
out.

It is not even clear whether the material adapted by Engels was actually
to constitute an independent paragraph. Several options were possible
for later elaboration: Marx could have tried to turn this material into
an independent chapter in direct relation to the presentation of the law
of the falling tendency of the rate of profit; he could have tried to
formulate an independent paragraph on capitalist crises, integrating
further material from the sphere of the credit system, for instance; he
could also have distributed the presentation of the various crisis
phenomena mentioned into different chapters, avoiding an autonomous
crisis theory; or perhaps he would not have wanted to use a large part
of what he had written about crisis within the three volumes of
_Capital._ For each of these options, reasons could be given; with each
option crisis theory would obtain a different meaning.

Engels not only avoided showing that there is a possible range of
interpretations; he also directly interfered with Marx’s text whenever
it contradicted the interpretation he himself favored. For instance,
Marx wrote on the overproduction of capital (which Engels calls
“overaccumulation of capital” at this point): “die nähere Untersuchung
darüber gehört in die Betrachtung der _erscheinenden_ _Bewegung des
Capitals,_ wo Zinscapital etc Credit etc entwickelt [the closer analysis
of this issue belongs to the study of the _appearing movement of
capital,_ where interest-bearing capital etc credit etc will be
presented],” and one must agree with the editors of the _MEGA_ volume
who argue in the annotations that “erscheinende Bewegung des _Capital_s”
(appearing movement of capital) does not belong to the matters dealt
with in _Capital_ (_MEGA_ II.4.2, 1255). Engels, however, turned Marx’s
remark into the opposite. He omitted Marx’s text and wrote instead: “its
closer analysis follows later” (_Capital,_ III, 251). In fact, some
remarks on overproduction, or overaccumulation, of capital actually do
follow. The fact that Marx obviously did not attach a systematic
relevance to them at this point, because he thought the subject cannot
be negotiated on the given level of abstraction, ^([6]) was turned into
the opposite by Engels’ textual alteration.

b. _Credit theory._ A similar situation arises in the fifth chapter of
Marx’s original manuscript. Here at least Engels gave an idea, in the
preface, of the extent of the transpositions he had made. In this
chapter too, Marx’s presentation soon changed into the protocol of a
research process containing a large amount of not fully accomplished
reflections. By Engels’ editing, the impression is again given that the
elementary problems have been solved to a vast extent and that it is
merely a question of a not quite completed presentation.

While the original structure of the third chapter still remained visible
after Engels’ editing, the emphasis in the fifth chapter was completely
shifted. As Marx’s text shows, the topic of this chapter was to be
interest-bearing capital. Marx divided this chapter into six
sub-chapters. The first four points correspond to the first four
chapters of Part V in the Engels edition (Chapters XXI to XXIV in
_Capital_ III). Marx titled point V “Credit. Fictitious _Capital_”
(_MEGA_ II.4.2, 469). Engels composed his chapters XXV to XXXV from this
material. In doing this, he made many textual rearrangements, put
footnotes into the text, distributed a whole chapter (“The Confusion”),
introduced a fair number of transitional remarks and thus obscured the
passages where Marx’s text was no longer a mature presentation but a
“process of inquiry” or sometimes even just an excerpt. Thus, Marx’s
point VI (“Pre-_Capital_ist Relationships”) corresponds to the last
chapter of Part V in Engels’ edition.

The structure, which in Marx’s writings also indicates the systematic
importance of the topic being treated, lists credit as the last
(systematic) subpoint in the presentation of interest-bearing capital.
Engels designs 11 chapters from this fifth point. Not just because of
its size but also owing to the structuring of the material, the
impression arises that the presentation of interest-bearing capital is
just an introduction to the discussion of credit. This also prevails in
the terminology: Part V is often called the “Part on credit,” even
though credit is not even mentioned in the title.

In this chapter, Engels also made textual changes as soon as the
original text got in the way of his own interpretation. Marx introduced
the point “5) Credit. Fictitious _Capital_” with the following sentence:
“An analysis of the credit system and of the instruments which it
creates for its own use, like credit-money etc., lies beyond our plan.”
(_MEGA_ II.4.2, 469). Engels introduced the word “exhaustive” here: “An
exhaustive analysis of the credit system and of the instruments which it
creates for its own use (credit-money, etc.) lies beyond our plan”
(_Capital,_ III_,_ 400).

He had made a similar alteration earlier on. In the first chapter of
Marx’s manuscript, the following remark follows under the subtitle
“Appreciation, Depreciation, Release and Tie-Up of _Capital_":

The phenomena analysed in this § require for their full development the
credit system and competition on the world-market. . . . These more
definitive forms of capitalist production can 1) only be presented,
however, after the general nature of capital is understood, and 2) they
do not come within the scope of this work and belong to its eventual
continuation. (_MEGA_ II.4.2, 178.)

Engels introduced the word “comprehensively” into the second sentence:
“These more definitive forms of capitalist production can only be
comprehensively presented. . _._” (_Capital,_ III_,_ 110). Therefore,
while Marx repeatedly clearly declares that the presentation of the
credit system lies _beyond_ his plan, this statement is crucially
relativized in the passages cited.^([7]) As a consequence of these
insertions, the consequent qualitative distinction between what can be
treated on the level of presentation attained and what cannot, is
obstructed and reduced to a mere _Quantitative_ problem: a
“comprehensive,” “exhaustive” presentation, which lies beyond the plan,
is confronted with the available less comprehensive presentation. Thus
Engels can include into the corpus of _Capital_ all sorts of points
mentioned by Marx — although these cannot yet be presented
_systematically_ on the level of abstraction attained. It would seem
that to Engels this appeared to be an unproblematic completion. The
dialectically structured presentation, which was Marx’s aim, in which
the right sequence of terms and categories is crucial for the
understanding of its meaning, is shifted towards a mere encyclopaedical
collection by Engels’ edition.

These differentiations are not mere hair-splitting, as can be shown in
the case of the credit theory. For Marx’s concept of presentation the
central question is whether the inherent laws regulating credit can
actually be discussed on the highly abstract level of _Capital,_ or
whether they are linked to a number of historically specific
institutional factors, such as the constitution of the money and banking
system, so that there cannot be a general credit theory. In Marx’s
manuscript this question remains open. Engels chose to present the
research material found in Marx’s manuscript on the general level, which
led to the reproach against Marx that he had unduly generalized specific
historic conditions of the credit system in 19th century England.

c. _Commodity production and capitalist production._ Engels attained a
considerable influence over the interpretation of _Capital_ as a result
of his chapter “Law of Value and Rate of Profit” in the Supplement to
Volume III. There he claimed the existence of simple commodity
production for several millennia before the emergence of capitalist
commodity production, in which commodities were exchanged according to
the labor-time necessary for their production. He cites an incidental
remark made by Marx to prove that this was also Marx’s opinion (“it is
quite appropriate to regard the values of commodities as not only
theoretically but also historically prius to the prices of production”;
_Capital_, III, 896). It may be a question for economic historians,
whether such a “simple commodity production” ever existed or not, but
Engels’ conclusion from this claim is meaningful for the interpretation
of _Capital._ the first part of the first volume of _Capital_ is seen as
presenting the laws of this (precapitalist) commodity production
(_Capital_, Vol. III, 899). Engels thus fostered a historical reading of
_Capital_ which could already be found in Kautsky’s (1887) widespread
popularization of _Capital_. Commodity and money as they are presented
at the beginning of the first volume of _Capital_ are thus turned into
categories of precapitalist conditions and the (theoretical) problem of
the transformation of values into production prizes is turned into a
historical succession. However, as the _Introduction_ of 1857 shows with
the example of the term “labor,” Marx was aware of the problem that
seemingly simple categories mean different things in different
production relations.^([8])

As Marx already explains in the first sentence of _Capital,_ he is not
analysing the commodity of a precapitalist, simple commodity production;
rather he is analysing the commodity as an “elementary form” of the
“wealth of those societies in which the capitalist mode of production
prevails” (_Capital_, I, 43). With similar clarity, Marx states in
reviewing his argument in the last chapter of his manuscript: “In the
case of the simplest categories of the capitalist mode of production, in
the cases of commodities and money, we have already pointed out the
mystifying character . . _._” (_MEGA_ II.4.1, 848f). Engels, however,
underlays this statement with his own understanding of what is presented
at the beginning of _Capital_ and turns this sentence into: “In the case
of the simplest categories of the capitalist mode of production, and
even of commodity-production, in the cases of commodities and money, we
have already pointed out the mystifying character . (_Capital,_ III,
826). Commodities and money are now no longer the simplest categories of
the capitalist mode of production, but of commodity production.


4. Conclusions

The book published by Engels in 1894 is not a mere edition of Marx’s
manuscript, but a far-reaching adaptation of the original manuscript.
Only the smallest number of Engels’ interventions is made visible. The
largest extent of the alterations remains hidden to the readers. The
interventions themselves are not just of a formal or stylistical nature;
they deceive the readers about the actual extent of elaboration, they
offer solutions for problems which the manuscript left open (without
clarification that these are Engels’ solutions!), and in some passages
they even change the argumentation of the original text, if this
obstructs Engels’ interpretations. Therefore, Engels’ edition can no
longer be considered to be volume III of Marx’s _Capital_; it is not
Marx’s text “in the full genuineness of his own presentation,” as Engels
wrote in the supplement (_Capital,_ III, 889), but a strong editing of
this presentation, a preinterpreted textbook edition of Marx’s
manuscript.

The fact that Engels did not undertake a textual editing fulfilling
modern demands is quite understandable from the point of view of those
times. Editions did not have to fulfill such high demands concerning
textual loyalty as is necessary today. An editor was given much larger
freedom than today, especially if he was spiritually close to the edited
author. Furthermore, it was most important to Engels to publish a book
which could serve as an intellectual weapon for the working class in the
class struggle, which therefore was understandable and topical. And with
all of the criticisms in view, we must not forget that it was an
incredible achievement to publish this manuscript, of which Marx had
once said in a letter to Engels that nobody at all could publish it in a
readable form except for he himself (letter on February 13, 1866).

Even still, all understanding for Engels’ motives and procedure cannot
alter the assessment that the text he has presented is by no means the
third volume of _Capital._ Every future discussion of Marx’s economic
theory will have to refer to Marx’s original manuscript.

But this manuscript also cannot simply be considered to be the third
volume of _Capital_, judging from the full elaboration of the first
volume. Therefore, it is indeed a “first, incomplete draft,” as Engels
says in the Preface. The gaps, however, are not just of a _quantitative_
nature. It is not just that Marx didn’t have enough time to fully
accomplish an already completely sketched picture. In quite a few
places, it is not even clear what the sketches should look like on the
given basis. Marx was nowhere near solving all of the _conceptual_
problems. Even the fully developed parts of his work, such as the value
and money theory of the first volume, include a number of
ambivalences,^([9]) which make it seem questionable whether it was in
any way possible to complete _Capital_ on the given basis.

_Turmstr. 53_
_D-10551 Berlin_
_Germany_


References

Gide, Charles, and Charles Rist. 1913. Geschichte der
volkswirsschaftslichen Lehrmeinungen. Jena.

Heinrich, Michael. 1989. “Capital in General and the Structure of Marx’s
_Capital_. New Insights from Marx’s ‘Economic Manuscripts of 1861-63.'”
_Capital & Class,_ 38 (summer), 63-79.

Heinrich, Michael. 1991. Die Wissenscha.ft vom Wert. Die Marxsche Kritik
der politischen ökonomie zwischen wissenschaftlicher Revolution und
klassischer Tradition. Hamburg: VSA.

Heinrich, Michael. 1995. “Gibt es eine Marxsche Krisentheorie? Die
Entwicklung der Semantik von Krise in den verschiedenen Entwürfen zu
einer Kritik der politischen ökonomie.” Pp. 130-150 in _Beiträge zur
Marx-Engels-Forschung Neue Folge: Engels_ _Druckfassung versus Marx’
Manuskriple zum III. Buch des “KapitaL_” Berlin: Argument-verlag.

Jungnickel, Jürgen. 1991. “Bemerkungen zu den von Engels vorgenommenen
Veränderungen am Marxschen Manuskript zum dritten Band des ‘Kapitals.”
Pp. 130-138 in _Beiträge zur Marx-Engels-Forschung Neue Folge: Studien
zum Werk_ _von_ Marx und Engels. Hamburg: Argument-Verlag.

Kautsky, Karl. 1887. Karl Marx Oekonomische Lehren: Gemeinverständlich
dargestellt und erläutert. Stuttgart.

Marx, Karl, and Friedrich Engels. MEW. 1956-1968. _Werke. Herausgegeben
vom_ Institut für _Marxismus-Leninismus beim Zk der SED_. Berlin, GDR:
Dietz Verlag.

Marx, Karl, and Friedrich Engels. 1974. _Capital._ 3 vols. Moscow:
Progress Publishers.

Marx, Karl, and Friedrich Engels. 1992. _Ökonomische Manuskripte
1863-67, Teil II. MEGA_ II. Abteilung, Band 4.2. Berlin: Dietz Verlag.

Miskewitsch, Larissa, and Witali Wygodski. 1985. “Über die Arbeit von
Marx am II. und III. Buch des ‘Kapitals’ in den Jahren 1866 und 1867.”
Pp. 198-212 in _Marx-Engelsjahrbuch,_ 8. Berlin, GDR: Dietz Verlag.

Polanyi, Karl, Conrad M. Arensberg, and Harry W. Pearson, eds. 1957.
_Trade and Markets in the Early Empires: Economies in History and
Theory._ Glencoe.

Rosdolsky, Roman. 1977. _The Making of Marx’s “Capital”._ London: Pluto
Press.

Vollgraf, Carl-Erich, and Jüjrgen Jungnickel. 1995. “Marx in Marx’s
Worten? Zu Engels’ Edition des Hauptmanuskripts zum dritten Buch des
‘Kapitals’.” Pp. 3-55 in _MEGA-Studien_ 1994/2. Berlin: Dietz Verlag.


Footnotes

1 Marx had resumed his economic studies in the 1850s in London and
finally written three large drafts for A _Critique of Political Economy_
(and not initially of _Capital_)_:_ 1) In 1857-58 _the Grundrisse_ and
the plan of an oeuvre of six books (capital, landed property,
wage-labor; the State, foreign trade, world market) was developed. In
1859, A _Contribution to the Critique of Political Economy_ was
published as the first part of the first book. 2) In 1861-63 Marx wrote
an extensive manuscript, which contains the _Theories_ of surplus Value.
Only during the work on this manuscript, the plan of publishing an
independent work of three books, _Capital_, developed, and a fourth
volume which was to contain the theory’s history. 3) In 1863-65 Marx
wrote the manuscripts for the three books of _Capital_, whereas only the
last chapter, “Results of the Immediate Process of Production,’ left out
in the published version, is all that remained of the draft of the first
book, apart from a few single pages. Marx himself published the first
volume of _Capital_ on the basis of this manuscript in 1867. The
manuscript for book three, which was written in 1864-65, was used by
Engels as a basis for his edition of the third volume in 1894. For the
second volume of _Capital_ which he published, he did not use the
corresponding manuscript of 1864-65, but later texts. To what extent the
three volumes of _Capital_ still follow the original plan of six books
is a disputed issue (cf. Rosdolsky, 1977; Heinrich, 1989).

2 Marx, 1992. The _MEGA_’s cover pages are sometimes pre-dated. The
_MEGA_ has been published in Berlin (GDR) since 1975. It was published
by the Institutes of Marxism-Leninism in Berlin and Moscow until 1989.
After the collapse of the Soviet bloc, it was continued under a new,
international funding body independent from political parties and is now
published by the “Internationale Marx-Engels Stiftung” (IMES) based in
Amsterdam. Next to two German and two Russian institutes, the
International Institute of Social History (IISG) in Amsterdam also
belongs to IMES, which possesses about two-thirds of Marx’s handwritten
estate. The _MEGA_ is a historical-critical edition of all writings by
Marx and Engels. It is divided into four parts: Division I contains all
works except for _Capital_ and its preparations; Division II contains
_Capital_ and the preparations; Division III contains all the letters of
Marx and Engels and the letters addressed to them by others; and
Division IV contains excerpts. The _MEGA_ is to consist of over 100
volumes; to date nearly 50 volumes have been published. This is already
the second attempt at a complete edition of the Marx-Engels works; in
the 1920s and 1930s 12 volumes of a first _MEGA_ were published in
Germany and the Soviet Union. In Germany, the victory of Fascism ended
the work on the _MEGA_; in the Soviet Union it was crippled by
Stalinism. Many editors, including David Riazanov, director of the
Marx-Engels-Lenin Institute in Moscow and first publisher of the _MEGA_,
were condemned in show trials and killed in the 1930s.

3 A first classification (which differs from the one presented here) is
to be found in Jungnickel (1991). In Vollgraf and Jungnickel (1995),
this first classification is refined and illustrated with a number of
examples.

4 Vollgraf and Jungnickel (1995) have pointed this out and also mention
in this context that Engels often replaced “production” with
“reproduction” or vice versa, the reason not always being clear.

5 Cf. the Afterword to the second German edition of Volume I of
_Capital_ (especially _Capital_, I, 28), and the paragraph on the method
of political economy in the Introduction of 1857.

6 During the discussion of overaccumulation that follows in the text,
Marx, among other things, also deals with transformations of the
exploitation process in the cycle. However, Marx wanted to abstract from
such cyclical movements in the presentation of the capitalist mode of
production in its “ideal average” (_Capital,_ III, 831). If an
overaccumulation of capital can only be explained with cyclical
phenomena, then it is precisely not part of the general laws of movement
of the capitalist mode of production which are supposed to be described
in _Capital._ A detailed evaluation of the development of Marx’s crisis
theory in the three large drafts for A _C7itique ofpolitical Economy_
(cf. note 1) and the resulting theoretical problems can he found in
Heinrich, 1995.

7 A further passage, in which Marx writes that the treatment of the
conjunctures of industry and credit lay beyond his scope, was edited by
Engels with (this time in actual fact) just stylistical alterations, but
correctly (_Capital_ III, 831; _MEGA_ II.4.2, 852f.)

8 The studies of Karl Polanyi _et al_ (1957), for example, show how
far-reaching these differences can be.

9 In Marx’s work we can find a superposition of two discourses: on the
one hand, we have the. breach with the theoretical field of classical
political economy; on the other, he remains inside this field in many
aspects. The superposition of such discourses produces quite a number of
problems and unresolved ambivalences (see Heinrich, 1991).

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Capital Volume III | Marx/Engels Archive

+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+
| [Marx at his Study]               |                                   |
|                                   |                                   |
|                                   | STUDY GUIDE FOR KARL MARX’S _“CAP |
|                                   | ITAL”_ VOLUME III                 |
+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+

 


Part I: The Conversion of Surplus-Value into Profit and of the Rate of Surplus-Value into the Rate of Profit

 Chapters 1-3: - The Rate of Profit to the Rate of Surplus-Value

Terms: Commodity, Labour, Labour Power, Constant and Variable Capital,
Surplus Value, Rate of Surplus Value, Price, Appearance, Essence,
Capital, Profit, Proletariat, Rate of Profit, Means of Production.

Questions for discussion:
 1. The very first paragraph on “Cost Price and Profit” explains that it
is only in this third volume, published 11 years after Marx's death,
that forms discussed in _Capital_ will “approach step by step the form
which they assume on the surface of society”. With reference to the
concepts of value vs. price and surplus value vs. profit, can you
explain concretely the relation between these concepts and the “form
which they assume on the surface of society”?
2. Marx subdivides the value of any commodity, C, into c + v + s.
Assuming that this subdivision reflected the average and therefore the
subdivision of the _total_ products in circulation, what could this tell
us?
3. If the market has already set a price for a given commodity which a
capitalist was considering producing, how would the capitalist determine
what price to put on her product?
4. What basis does the capitalist have for believing that the increment
in value added in production is derived from capital and not from
labour?
5. How would you prove that this view is _wrong_ and that the increment
is brought about by labour, since _all_ the components of the value of
the product are paid for at their value?
6. How do capitalists calculate rate of profit and how does this differ
from what Marx calls the “rate of profit”?
7. Is Marx's definition nevertheless a valid representation of the
“point of view” of the capitalist?

 Chapters 4-7: - Effects on the Rate of Profit

Terms: Organic Composition of Capital, Distribution and Exchange,
Circuit of Capital, Cycle of Reproduction, Necessary and Surplus Labour
Time, Absolute and Relative Surplus Value, The Working Day, Departments
of Capital, Business Cycle.

Questions for discussion:
 1. How does average turnover rate of capital convert the “rate of
profit” into annual rate of profit?
2. What do you think about the turnover rate of capital in a modern
economy today?
3. What effect does Marx suggest “industrial progress“ has on the
organic composition of capital?
4. What is the effect on the rate of profit in an industry if the
quantity of raw materials used and finished products made increases
while _everything else_ remains constant?
5. How is it that the capitalists manage to reap for themselves benefits
derived from improvements in productivity in all _other_ branches of
industry.
6. At the close of the first section of Chapter V., Marx mentions three
ways in which the workers are alienated from the labour process even
where it absorbs their whole life. What were these three ways?
7. What significance do you see for today in Marx's comments about
“early adopters” usually going bankrupt?
8. What were the Corn Laws about?
9. Marx says that the capitalist system works against rational
agriculture. What was his argument and do you think it has been
substantiated by subsequent history?
10. Marx has pointed out how the rate of surplus value is determined by
the length of the working day and the necessary labour time, both
characterising the economy as a whole. On the other hand, he has shown
how a large number of factors, which may vary from industry to industry,
may cause the rate of profit to vary. What do you see as being the
effect of this variation in the rate of profit?


Part II: Conversion of Profit into Average Profit

 Chapters 8-12: - The General Rate of Profit

Terms: Value, Political Economy, Economics, Wages, Market, Genetic
Exposition, Abstract and Concrete, Class, Proletariat, Division of
Labour, Theory of Marginal Utility.

Questions for discussion:
 1. Marx claims to be investigating “the way in which a general rate of
profit takes shape in any given country” What is the basis for such an
investigation limited to “a given country” and to what extent if any is
the approach invalidated by the world market in capital, commodities and
labour which exists today?
2. Marx eliminates differing rates of exploitation as significant in
this investigation of the differing rates of exploitation between
industries, but pays special attention to rate of turnover of capital
and the organic composition of capital. What is the basis for this
distinction and what are the effects of the latter two variables?
3. What is the difference between the “technical composition” and the
“organic composition” of capital?
4. Marx is showing how values are transformed into prices. How can this
be explained?
5. “The exchange of commodities at their values, or approximately at
their values, thus requires a much lower stage than their exchange at
their prices of production, which requires a definite level of
capitalist development”. Explain.
6. What is Marx's argument against supply and demand as the process
determining prices in terms of it being a “tautology”? And can you see
how the Marginal Theory of Value to some extent answers Marx's
criticism, and how it doesn't?
7. “It is, therefore, a matter, at least as a minimum, of selling the
commodities at prices which yield the average profit, i.e., at prices of
production. In this form capital becomes conscious of itself as a
_social power_ in which every capitalist participates proportionally to
his share in the total social capital.” Explain
8. “Now, if the commodities are sold at their values, then ... very
different rates of profit arise in the various spheres of production,
depending on the different organic composition of the masses of capital
invested in them. But capital withdraws from a sphere with a low rate of
profit and invades others, which yield a higher profit. Through this
incessant outflow and influx ... it creates such a ratio of supply to
demand that the average profit in the various spheres of production
becomes the same, and values are, therefore, converted into prices of
production.” Explain.
9. “The incessant equilibration of constant divergences is accomplished
so much more quickly, 1) the more mobile the capital, i.e., the more
easily it can be shifted from one sphere and from one place to another;
2) the more quickly labour-power can be transferred from one sphere to
another and from one production locality to another. ”. Discuss this
terms of the state of the world economy today.
10. What factors does Marx list in Chapter XII which may cause a change
in the price of production, all of which are political-economic rather
than technical or natural causes. Can you explain each of them?


Part III: The Law of the Tendency of the Rate of Profit to Fall

 Chapters 13-15: - The Falling Rate of Profit

“If it is assumed that this gradual change in the composition of capital
is not confined only to individual spheres of production, but that it
occurs more or less in all, or at least in the key spheres of
production, so that it involves changes in the average organic
composition of the total capital of a certain society, then the gradual
growth of constant capital in relation to variable capital must
necessarily lead to _a gradual fall of the general rate of profit,_ so
long as the rate of surplus-value, or the intensity of exploitation of
labour by capital, remain the same.”

Terms: Falling rate of Profit, Concentration of Capital, Private
Property, Socialisation, Overproduction and Underconsumption, The Great
Depression.

Questions for discussion:
 1. What arguments does Marx bring forward to suggest a tendency for the
organic composition of capital to rise?
2. The law as such is referred to the “rate of profit” as a proportion
of the total social value in circulation. What is the significance of
the law in these terms?
3. If the “rate of profit” is multiplied by the velocity of circulation
of capital to give the _annual_ rate of profit (which Marx considers
later on), what would this signify?
4. Taking into account the formation of a general rate of profit, to
what extent does the velocity of circulation of capital vary between
constant and variable capital?
5. Why is the tendency of the rate of profit to fall a problem for
capitalism, but not for _other_ modes of production?
6. Why does the action of this law tend to drive up the rate of surplus
value, i.e., to decrease the proportion of a workers' day worked on her
own account and increase the number of unpaid hours of work performed
for the capitalist?
7. Marx notes that “the same amount of value represents a greater mass
of use-values and enjoyments.“ So, how does this process intersect with
the struggle of workers for a better standard of living?
8. Why is “a mounting concentration of capitals ... _therefore_, one of
the material requirements as well as one of its results” of capitalist
production?
9. What countervailing tendencies does Marx list?
10. In examining these questions, do you see any advantage Marx has in
approaching the problems in terms of labour time and the class struggle,
rather than in terms of prices and supply vs. demand, in the manner of
bourgeois economics? And any disadvantages?
11. “The capitalist process of production consists _essentially_ of the
production of surplus-value”. What does this mean?
12. What is the reason for the drive of capitalism to continuously
extend the market?
13. What corresponds socially to an increasing mass of surplus value, a
falling rate of profit and an increasing productivity of labour?
14. “The _real barrier_ of capitalist production is _capital itself_.
... production is only production for _capital_ and not vice versa.”
Explain.
15. Some have argued that the increasing use of computers and software
industries, and technologies which allow, for example, a very small
group of people to produce CDs which were once a large-scale industrial
process, and the rise of labour-intensive service industries, such as
labour-hire or personal services, have reversed the process of the
rising organic composition of capital. What do you think?


Part IV: Conversion of Commodity-Capital and Money-Capital into Commercial Capital and Money-Dealing Capital (Merchant's Capital)

 Chapters 16-20: - Commercial and Merchants' Capital

Terms: Cycle of Reproduction, Productive and Unproductive Labour,
Production and Consumption, Realisation, Mediation, Critique.

Questions for discussion:
 1. What costs does Marx allocate to _circulation_, and what do you
think about whether these costs can nowadays be seen as distinct from
costs of production?
2. In particular, which of the following kinds of labour can be employed
in the production of surplus value, and under what circumstances:
transportation, software production, advertising, insurance broking.
3. What social function is performed by commercial capital? and how does
it contribute to the social production and appropriation of surplus
value
4. What significance would you see in the growing proportion of the
total social capital of a country being commercial or commodity capital,
and a smaller proportion being productive capital? What do you think is
the case in your country in recent decades?
5. What would be the effects of a fall in profitability in the
commercial sector?
6. What do you make of the paragraph, near the end of Chapter XVII,
beginning: “The commercial worker produces no surplus-value directly”?
7. How does competition in the commercial sector function in the
determination of the velocity of circulation of capital and in the
formation of the general rate of profit?
8. Commercial capital and commercial activity grows up in the widening
gap between production and consumption arising from the development of
the social division of labour. Do you see any significance in this?
9. What conflicts of interest do you see between money-capital,
commercial-capital and productive capital?
10. Commercial capital is historically older than productive capital,
but yet it is seen that commercial capital is fundamentally _derivative_
of productive capital. What do you make of this? And Marx mentions that
the “Merchantile system” was historically the first _theory_ of
economics. Do you see any significance in this observation for this
study group?
11. Near the close of Chapter XX, Marx refers to the “masters” of
furniture makers in Tower Hamlets being in effect, not capitalist
employers, but simply “middle-men”. Can you see any extension of this
argument in relations between different classes in modern capitalist
society?


Part V: Division of Profit into Interest and Profit of Enterprise. Interest-Bearing Capital.

 Chapters 21-24: - Interest and Profit

Terms: Credit, Monetarism, Money.

Questions for discussion:
 1. What is the relation between the market rate of interest on capital
and the general rate of profit, in the absence of any government or
central bank intervention?
2. A productive capitalist figures the interest payments she makes on
loans as part of the costs of production. How does Marx see this?
3. Marx refutes the assertion that profit from capital is the result of
the labour of supervision. Does he nevertheless regard supervision as
productive labour?
4. What is meant by “profit of enterprise”?
5. At the opening of Chapter XXIV, Marx says “The relations of capital
assume their most externalised and most fetish-like form in
interest-bearing capital”. Can you explain what he means?
6. The closing words of Chapter XXIV: “the reproduction of the value of
products of past labour is _only_ the result of their contact with
living labour.” Why does Marx emphasise this point?

 Chapters 25-28: - Credit and Fictitious Capital

Terms: Privatisation and Nationalisation, Business Cycle, Crisis of
Capitalism, Inflation,

Questions for discussion:
 1. What social functions does Marx see banks as performing?
2. “That anything can ultimately destroy its own cause is a logical
absurdity only for the usurer enamoured of the high interest rate” &c.
Can you generalise the point Marx is making here?
3. In the passages in Chapter XXVII., for instance, where Marx comments:
“the stock company is a transition toward the conversion of all
functions in the reproduction process which still remain linked with
capitalist property, into mere functions of associated producers, into
social functions.” — what do you make of these observations after the
experience of the past century?
4. What are the various distinct kinds and functions of money identified
by Marx?

 Chapters 29-36: - Money Capital and Real Capital

Terms: Fictitious Capital, Wall Street Crash, Gold Standard, Bretton
Woods, Centralisation and Decentralisation, Imperialism.

Questions for discussion:
 1. What distinction would you make between credit and debt?
2. “The independent movement of the value of these titles of ownership,
not only of government bonds but also of stocks, adds weight to the
illusion that they constitute real capital alongside of the capital or
claim to which they may have title. For they become commodities, whose
price has its own characteristic movements and is established in its own
way. Their market-value is determined differently from their nominal
value, without any change in the value (even though the expansion may
change) of the actual capital”. Discuss.
3. “With the development of interest-bearing capital and the credit
system, all capital seems to double itself, and sometimes treble itself,
by the various modes in which the same capital, or perhaps even the same
claim on a debt, appears in different forms in different hands.”
Discuss.
4. “To what extent does a scarcity of money, i.e., a shortage of loan
capital, express a shortage of real capital (commodity-capital and
productive capital)? To what extent does it coincide, on the other hand,
with a shortage of money as such, a shortage of the medium of
circulation?”
5. “The monetary system is essentially a Catholic institution. the
credit system essentially Protestant. "The Scotch hate gold." In the
form of paper the monetary existence of commodities is only a social
one. It is _Faith_ that brings salvation. Faith in money-value as the
immanent spirit of commodities, faith in the mode of production and its
predestined order, faith in the individual agents of production as mere
personifications of self-expanding capital. But the credit system does
not emancipate itself from the basis of the monetary system any more
than Protestantism has emancipated itself from the foundations of
Catholicism.” (End of Chapter XXXV) What do you make of this?
6. What distinction and connection does Marx make between _usury_ and
_interest-bearing capital_?


Part VI: Transformation of Surplus-Profit into Ground-Rent

 Chapters 37-47: - Differential Rent

Terms: Rent, Goods and Services.

Questions for discussion:
 1. “So far as we are concerned, the farmer produces wheat, etc., in
much the same way as the manufacturer produces yarn or machines.” What
does Marx specifically mean by this?
2. “One of the big contributions of Adam Smith was to have shown that
ground-rent for capital invested in the production of such agricultural
products ... is determined by the ground-rent obtained from capital
invested in the production of the principal article of subsistence.”
Discuss this is the modern context.
3. How does Marx describe the transformation of agriculture by
capitalism?
4. How does it come about that the peasant (who unlike the proletarian,
owns her own means of production) is exploited by capital?
5. If rent derives from the labour expended in improving ground, how is
it possible that “All ground-rent is surplus-value, the product of
surplus-labour.”?
6. “The waterfall, ... like any natural force, has no value because it
does not represent any materialised labour” (Chapter XXXVIII) How does
Marx describe the way natural forces come to be commodified and acquire
value and price?
7. What is the distinction betwen Differential Rent I and Differential
Rent II?
8. What does Marx mean by “the employment of constant capital is always
cheaper than that of variable capital” (Chapter XLI)?
9. How does Marx describe the bankruptcy of European landlords brought
about by trade with America and India (Chapter XLIII)?
10. “The mere legal ownership of land does not create any ground-rent
for the owner. But ...”. Can you explain and complete what comes after
the "but" (Chapter XLV)?
11. Describe how Chapter XLVII sketches how the historical development
of capitalist production, and struggles between different sections of
the capitalist class, are reflected in theoretical disputes among
political economists, for example, Petty, the Physiocrats, and Adam
Smith.
12. It has been suggested (see The Informatisation of Production) that
capitalism has entered a new phase in recent decades, pushing
manufacture into second place, just as manufacture had pushed
agriculture into second place in the 19th century. Provisionally
accepting this proposition for the moment, how would you apply to
manufacture, the kind of observations made by Marx in this section in
respect to agriculture?


Part VII: Revenues and their Sources

 Chapters 48-52: - Distribution and Production

Terms: Distribution and Exchange.

Questions for discussion:
 1. What is The Trinity Formula, and what criticism does Marx make of
the formula?
2. What does Marx mean by “Capital is not a thing, but rather a definite
social production relation”?
3. “Just as the savage must wrestle with Nature to satisfy his wants, to
maintain and reproduce life, so must civilised man, ... With his
development this realm of physical necessity expands as a result of his
wants; but, at the same time, the forces of production which satisfy
these wants also increase. Freedom in this field can only consist in
socialised man, the associated producers, rationally regulating their
interchange with Nature, bringing it under their common control, instead
of being ruled by it as by the blind forces of Nature; and achieving
this with the least expenditure of energy and under conditions most
favourable to, and worthy of, their human nature. But it nonetheless
still remains a realm of necessity. Beyond it begins that development of
human energy which is an end in itself, the true realm of freedom,
which, however, can blossom forth only with this realm of necessity as
its basis. The shortening of the working-day is its basic prerequisite.”
What do you make of this? And after all that, why add the bit about the
length of the working day?
4. “However, the landlord plays a role in the capitalist process of
production not merely through the pressure he exerts upon capital, nor
merely because large landed property is a prerequisite and condition of
capitalist production since it is a prerequisite and condition of the
expropriation of the labourer from the means of production, but
particularly because he appears as the personification of one of the
most essential conditions of production.” Does this cause you to reflect
on the position of the indigenous people in your country? What other
issues arise?
5. “Surplus-value contained in the commodities seem not merely to be
realised in the circulation, but actually to arise from it; an
appearance which is especially reinforced by two circumstances: first,
the profit made in selling depends on cheating, deceit, inside
knowledge, skill and a thousand favourable market opportunities;” What
does this mean in terms of social consciousness?
6. “The actual process of production, as a unity of the direct
production process and the circulation process, gives rise to new
formations, in which the vein of internal connections is increasingly
lost, the production relations are rendered independent of one another,
and the component values become ossified into forms independent of one
another.” What does this mean in terms of social consciousness?
7. What does Marx mean by “our description of how production relations
are converted into entities and rendered independent in relation to the
agents of production” (Chapter XLVIII) and can you give examples of
words that have recently entered the language to illustrate this?
8. “The authority assumed by the capitalist as the personification of
capital in the direct process of production, the social function
performed by him in his capacity as manager and ruler of production, is
essentially different from the authority exercised on the basis of
production by means of slaves, serfs, etc. ... not as political or
theocratic rulers as under earlier modes of production ... themselves
only as an overwhelming natural law in relation to individual free
will.” (Chapter LI) Discuss.
9. At the very close of the manuscript, Marx is in the midst of
explaining why the sources iof revenue do not constitute an adequate
basis for the definition of _classes_. How would you continue the
manuscript?

Supplement

 Engels: - Labour Theory of Value etc.

Terms: Labour Theory of Value, Theory of Marginal Utility, Productive
Labour.

Questions for discussion:
 1. What is “the Law of Value” and who first formulated it?
2. Under what conditions can “the Law of Value” operate as a law
governing human affairs?
3. How do you understand the way _Nike_ adds value to its products by
getting sports stars to wear their logo?
4. The manufacturer “pumps” surplus value out of the workers, while the
landlord using his land like a “magnet” to attract it, said Marx
earlier. Can you use this kind of metaphor to explain how surplus value
is distributed in today's economy with its huge finance, retail,
advertising, etc., industries?
5. The Labour Theory of Value has not been supported by bourgeois
economists since the 1860s, though it was conventional wisdom at least
till the 1840s. What do you make of this?
6. How can we go about liberating humanity from the Law of Value and
other such laws by means of which own activity confronts us as “blind
necessity”? And once successful, what, if anything, would _replace_ the
Law of Value?

 


Commentaries on _Capital_


Engels' 1894 Preface


Engels' Edition of the Third Volume of Capital and Marx's Original Manuscript, by Michael Heinrich


More Study Guides 


Marx Biography

 

Andy Blunden, 2002

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Table of Contents | Marx/Engels Works Index | Marxists Internet Archive
